In making this a special day to honor those who were victims of this famine, we Americans are afforded as well another opportunity to honor our own system of government and the freedoms we enjoy and our commitment to the right to self-determination and liberty for all the peoples of the world. In so doing, let us also reaffirm our faith in the spirit and resilience of the Ukrainian people and condemn the system that has caused them so much suffering over the years.

Driving impaired by alcohol or other drugs is one of our Nation's most serious public health and safety problems. Each year, drunk drivers account for tens of thousands of highway fatalities and hundreds of thousands of injuries.

This senseless carnage on our highways can be reduced through increased awareness of what can be done and a willingness to get involved in doing the right thing. We must not wait until personal tragedy strikes to become involved. It is too late for those who have already become the victims of the drunk drivers.

Strict law enforcement and just penalties are essential. Contrary to popular opinion, driving is not a right, but a privilege -- which can and should be withdrawn when a drunken driver deliberately endangers others. We also need improved means of detecting intoxicated drivers before they cause an accident.

Statistics show that in many alcohol-related accidents, our young people are either the cause or the victim. In recognition of the considerable evidence that raising the legal drinking age reduces alcohol-related motor vehicle crash involvement among young drivers, the Federal government is encouraging each State to establish 21 as the minimum age at which individuals may purchase, possess, or consume alcoholic beverages. Many States have already raised the legal drinking age as a result of efforts of dedicated citizen volunteers and the growing awareness that motor vehicle accidents are the leading cause of death among young people.

We need informed, concerned citizens who are willing to get involved in generating awareness, education, and action to eliminate drunk and drugged drivers from our highways. With the continued involvement of private citizens working together, and action at all levels of government, we can begin to control the problem of drunken and drugged driving.

As the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving recommended, we are seeking a long-term sustained effort that brings to bear the resources of our local, State and national levels of government. To that end, a National Commission on Drunk Driving has been formed to continue the work of the Presidential Commission.

Prime Minister Indira Gandhi of the Republic of India. The people of the United States join me in extending our deepest sympathy and condolences to the people of India and the Prime Minister's family as they mourn Mrs. Gandhi's death.

Mrs. Gandhi was a source of global leadership. Her determined efforts to promote peace, security, and economic development in South Asia and throughout the world will serve as a constant reminder of Mrs. Gandhi's commitment to protect the shared values of democratic nations.

The Prime Minister and I had personal correspondence recently regarding the scourge of terrorism. We agreed upon the necessity for freedom-loving states to strengthen our cooperation to stamp out this menace to humanity. Her senseless murder serves as a vivid reminder of the terrorist threat we all confront. We must therefore renew our determination to overcome this threat and ensure that Prime Minister Gandhi's accomplishments and memory will serve as an inspiration for humanity.

I know that all I should be doing is saying, over and over again, thank you, to all of you. I do know what you have been doing, and you young people, particularly. From someone who was a Governor back in the Vietnam days -- [laughter] -- I can't quite get used to this. [Laughter] But I am deeply moved by it.

But it's been a wonderful experience for me and an opportunity I welcome, to thank you all. I know how many of you are volunteers. And it's just a few more days, and I'm as nervous as you are tired. [Laughter] So, we'll sweat it out together.

The President. All right, I'm game. I know this is my last campaign, so I'm going to -- I know I'm accused, also, of telling anecdotes. But if you wonder why I should be nervous or anything in the face of all this, I'll tell you one little experience back from my sports announcing days.

But sitting in the press box, and the scores would come into us of other games, and they kept coming in. And it was Ohio State -- 13, Notre Dame -- nothing, with 2 minutes to play. And, of course, the accompanying staff with me were having a lot of fun at my expense -- silently, because the mikes were on and we were broadcasting the game.

Having spent so much of my life in California, I've always been aware of the many contributions that Americans of Hispanic descent have made to our country. And the pride, the dignity of the Hispanic community has been a source of strength, a deep well, of inspiration from which America has drawn in good times and bad, during peacetime and in times of danger and conflict.

Americans of Hispanic descent have added so much to our way of life, in government service, in the private sector, in the arts, and in every aspect of our culture. And today we gather to pay a special tribute to Americans of Hispanic descent who have placed their lives on the line in the defense of America.

The Postmaster General, at our suggestion, today is issuing a stamp commemorating this awe-inspiring record of courage and valor. And this stamp is the result of a concerted effort on behalf of the 10 surviving Hispanic Medal of Honor recipients, the United States Postal Service, and the Department of Defense. It's a fitting tribute to the men and women who have given such service to the cause of freedom.

It was 174 years ago when Father Miguel Hidalgo y Costilla rang the bells in his village. Like the sounding of our Liberty Bell, he was proclaiming to the world his people's resolve to live in freedom. That same love of freedom still rings in our hearts today, especially in the hearts of our fellow citizens of Hispanic descent that's been demonstrated time and again.

When danger threatened our Republic, Hispanics, as this stamp underscores, have been in the forefront of the defense of our freedom and independence. Thirty-seven of them, an incredible number, have received our highest military award, the Congressional Medal of Honor.

Hispanic-American, to Master Sergeant Roy Benavidez. I've gotten to know Roy. He and the nine other Hispanic Medal of Honor recipients visited me here at the White House this spring. And when I met and spoke with them, I could clearly see that it was the values they were taught as children that gave them the strength to be the kind of men they grew up to be.

These values -- devotion to family and respect for God, love of country and respect for honest work -- these are the ingredients that have molded the character of Americans of Hispanic descent. This is the stuff of which heroes are made.

There's an even bigger monument, and it's the one in the heart of every man, women, and child in this country who are thankful for the precious liberty we enjoy and grateful to those to whom we owe such a debt. The stamp that we issue today is our way of giving a heartfelt message to our wonderful Hispanic neighbors who have fought for their country, individuals to whom we owe so much. And the message is: You are truly American heroes.

Popieluszko. Father Popieluszko was a champion of Christian values and a courageous spokesman for the cause of liberty. His life exemplified the highest ideals of human dignity; his death strengthens the resolve of all freedom loving peoples to stand firm in their convictions.

On August 6, 1984, the Tribunal rendered its largest non-bank award, almost $50 million, in favor of the R.J. Reynolds Co. In a significant development, Iran agreed to withdraw all of the cases that it had filed in the Dutch courts seeking to set aside certain Tribunal awards in favor of U.S. claimants. It also agreed to stay proceedings in Iranian courts against two U.S. claimants, as requested by the Tribunal, but has not yet complied with similar Tribunal requests in other cases.

While Iran continues to resist efforts to resolve these claims expeditiously, we are pressing for early Tribunal action. A third senior legal officer has recently been hired by the Tribunal to work exclusively on these claims. Finally, the Tribunal recently issued three awards on agreed terms, reflecting settlements between U.S. claimants and Iran of these claims.

Foreign Assets Control, of blocked tangible property in which, Iran has any interest whatsoever, the export of which requires the issuance of any specific license under U.S. law. This amendment was promulgated in order to help assure compliance with the export restrictions of U.S. law, particularly those with respect to properties having potential military application.

Mangard, a third-country arbitrator, in an attempt to exclude him from the Tribunal. This unprovoked and unprecedented attack resulted in an indefinite suspension of Tribunal proceedings from September 5. In response to the attack, the United States filed a formal challenge seeking the removal of the two Iranian arbitrators in the event that the Government of Iran does not voluntarily remove them. A special chamber has been established to consider requests for withdrawals or terminations of claims and for awards on agreed terms until regular proceedings are reestablished.

In the past 2 years, delays in approval of the ICE and ISCE have tended to disrupt highway construction plans. We must continue to keep the highway program free of costly special interest projects that hamper our ability to fund the national Federal interest highway system. It is with great pleasure that I sign S. 1514.

In order to deal with the unusual and extraordinary threat to the foreign policy and economy of the United States referred to in Executive Order No. 12532, and in view of the continuing nature of that emergency, and in view of the successful completion of those consultations, I have issued an Executive order, a copy of which is attached, exercising my statutory authority to prohibit such imports effective October 11, 1985.

African Government, and not against the people of that country or its economy. The Krugerrand measure ordered was taken in recognition of the fact that the Krugerrand is perceived in the Congress as an important symbol of apartheid. This view is widely shared by the U.S. public. I am directing this prohibition in recognition of these public and congressional sentiments.

In order to prevent the interruption of joint fishery arrangements between the United States and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics when the current agreement expires on December 31, I urge that the Congress give favorable consideration to this extension at an early date.

Charter the fervent hope that humanity might experience peace and international cooperation in the era after the greatest and most costly war ever experienced. The ideals expressed in the Charter were that all member states would work together to maintain international peace and security, encourage human rights, and cooperate in dealing with the economic, social, humanitarian, and technical problems that afflict our planet.

On this the United Nation's 40th Anniversary, it is appropriate that all member states reflect not only on the achievements of the organization, but also its shortcomings, its unfulfilled promise, and yes, even its failures. We do so in a positive spirit, seeking constructive solutions to those problems that prevent the U.N. from realizing its full potential and fully embodying the ideals of the Charter. We believe that by facing those problems realistically and working together, many can be solved. The tasks before us are not easy. It will require both patience and dedication to the ideals of the U.N. Charter. We owe it to ourselves, however, to our children, and to all future generations to make this effort.

To the American people and their elected representatives, the United Nations plays an important role in the search for peace with justice. It provides a forum where member states can discuss and try to resolve their differences peacefully, in the spirit of the Charter. We will continue to do all we can to support that process within the U.N., within recognized regional fora, and in direct bilateral dialogue. As we encourage more responsible international behavior, we strengthen the United Nations and the prospect for achieving the goals of its Charter. But much more can and must be done. We look to all member states to support the sound principles upon which the U.N. was founded. These include respect for the rights and views of states that may find themselves in the minority, and support for recognized regional associations as provided for in the Charter, as well as the wise use of its own resources and established procedures.

The people and the government of the United States take satisfaction in the very substantial moral, political, and financial support we have given to the United Nations since its founding. We remain firmly committed to the noble ideals set forth in the Charter; they are entirely consonant with the ideals embodied in our own political institutions. The United Nations continues to stand as the symbol of the hopes of all mankind for a more peaceful and productive world. We must not disappoint those hopes.

American dream. Generations of Polish Americans have left a lasting imprint on American life in every field of human endeavor: from science and the arts to politics, sports, and religion. Their achievements have enriched the lives of all Americans.

Thank you, and good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's an honor to be able to greet so many leaders of American business. You provide our nation with jobs, direct the creation of much of our wealth, and oversee the development of innovations which keep our economy vibrant. Now, you've come together to perform a further service to our nation by supporting America's fair share tax plan.

For small business, our plan will represent a substantial tax break. Unincorporated small businesses, as you know, are taxed according to the personal incomes of their owners. As our plan reduces personal income tax rates for most individuals, therefore, it will be doing the same for many unincorporated small businesses. The top individual rate alone will come down from 50 to just 35 percent. Incorporated small businesses will receive graduated rates of 15, 18, 25, and 33 percent -- a measure that will prove of particular benefit to businesses that are just getting started. This tax relief will benefit our entire economy as small businesses multiply and grow.

From late 1982 to late 1984, industries in which small businesses predominated created new jobs at the rate of more than 11 percent. Under our progrowth plan, new jobs could be created even more quickly.

Compare this to the present system. The corporate tax structure today represents a vast maze of deductions, credits, and allowances for those industries and corporations who happen to be favored by Capitol Hill. It encourages competition of the worst kind, not to produce better products at lower prices, but to assemble ever bigger, more clever terms of lobbyists -- or teams of lobbyists, I should say, or to hire lawyers more skilled in taking advantage of tax code ambiguities. It all amounts to a so-called industrial policy -- that's a fancy name for Washington using the tax code to tell you how to run your business.

Every man and woman in this room must know a gifted fellow worker whose career has been spent entirely on tax policy or political calculations. Think of that person as I assert that in making taxes simpler and lower we'll be engaging in a great act of liberation, and the countless individuals who now waste their talents on tax considerations will be set free -- free to participate in the ennobling work of creating new goods, services, and techniques. My friends, isn't it time that we let American business get back down to business?

For capital formation, our plan envisions a cut in the top rate on capital gains to just 17\1/2\ percent. This measure is founded on clear-cut, recent experience. During the seventies, you remember that capital formation suffered. High rates on capital gains combined with raging inflation nearly wiped out sources of venture capital and turned many of our best entrepreneurs into tax refugees. One story concerns Gene Amdahl, the inventor of what many consider the most successsful computer ever built. Back in the seventies he decided to start his own company. He searched America for capital; he couldn't find enough. In the end he was forced to go to a large high-technology firm in Japan. They gave him capital -- in return for the rights to his ideas.

And I have already mentioned that we'll lower the rates for most individuals. In addition, we'll increase to $4,000 the standard deduction for married couples filing jointly, and nearly double the personal exemption from just over $1,000 all the way to $2,000. The American people will have more money in their pockets, more with which to purchase your goods, more to save, and more to invest. History is clear: When we pit industry against industry in a costly combat for special tax treatment, when we diminish disposable income by shifting the tax burden onto individuals and families, then we choke off the sources of economic growth and innovation. America's tax plan will do the reverse. It will promote fairness by making certain that everyone -- corporations and individuals alike -- pays his fair share. It'll increase disposable income and foster capital formation.

I'm afraid Nancy doesn't approve, either. [Laughter] And since I can't think of an acceptable substitute word anywhere as eloquent as Harry's, I'll just use more words and say, yes, it can be passed this year if all of us do what we know is the statesmanlike thing to do and quit playing political games.

Tax reform is among the most pressing issues facing the country. There can be no greater demand upon the time and attention of the Congress. For delay in enacting it, there can be no excuse. In the words of Congressman Rostenkowski: ``To those who are preparing to stand against the change, I have a warning,'' he said. ``Don't underestimate the public. Demand for reform is growing.'' I've kind of guessed that myself. I've gone out, as you know, and a few places -- and we'll be doing it again this week to talk about this to crowds. And when you go into a town of 14,000 for an outdoor rally and see more than 20,000 people standing in the hot sun and had been there for a couple of hours waiting, and they had made great banners hailing the tax reform, and you're applauded on just about everything that you say about it, I think that Rostenkowski is right: The public is further along on this than some of the boys on the Hill are giving them credit for.

Well, permit me one final thought. The practice of business is, in large measure, a moral endeavor; a practice in which men and women give of themselves, their strength, their intelligence, and imagination to unlock the mysteries of the material world on behalf of their fellow man. To inhibit this process through an oppressive system of taxation is, in a fundamental sense, to inhibit human development. What we're dealing with in the matter of tax reform is not there for a mere collection of facts and figures, but the liberation of the human spirit.

Initiatives develop character and a sense of responsibility, a feeling of optimism. The future looks more open and promising to our young people than it did before, for the simple reason that it is more open and promising. We've had a doubling of business starts in the last seven years. There has been a riot of new technologies; there has been a convergence of policy and technology that has changed the spirit of America.'' My friends, by enacting this historic tax reform, we can make America's spirit brighter still. And with your help, I'm confident we will.

The President. I've come here to make an announcement and also to say a few words with regard to that announcement. I am delighted and happier than I've been in a long time that Margaret Heckler has agreed to my request that she become the Ambassador to Ireland.

And in saying this, I would like to say -- and I'm sorry that I didn't start saying it sooner -- that the malicious gossip, without any basis in fact, that had been going on for the last several days about this is without any basis in fact. She has done a fine job at HHS. As a matter of fact, if she hadn't done such a good job, I wouldn't have been so eager to seek her out to be the Ambassador to Ireland. And whoever finally replaces her there, as she goes on to her new duties, will find that that agency is in great shape as a result of her direction and her leadership.

The President. Well, because we have a need for an Ambassador, and Ireland is getting very impatient, and I thought that she might like a change of pace. It was my desire for her, and I think that she will be just great in that particular spot.

The President. Yes, you bet she is, and she's executed the policies that I have wanted for that particular agency, and, as I say, it is in great shape. She has done a fine job, and if she hadn't, well, then I don't think I would have asked her to be an Ambassador.

The President. I don't know whether one job is better or greater than another, but I think that there is a distinction to an ambassadorship. The title is retained for life, and, after all, when you come down to the Embassies, the Ambassadors are the personal representatives of the President.

Q. Mr. President, since you're here, could you tell us, do you agree with the administration officials who've said that they feel the Soviet offer is unbalanced because it locks in their superiority, particularly in terms of strategic missiles and because it would prevent us from deploying the D - 5, the Midgetman, the MX, some of the things that are coming on line?

The President. Andrea, I am not going to comment on this, and I don't think anyone should. This is in the hands now of the negotiators, and I just don't think that you, from outside, get into public discussions about things of that kind. But I am not going to take any more questions on any other subject.

Secretary Heckler. Not quite. Mr. President, I'd like to say that I have had a really rewarding and challenging career in public service. In serving as a Member of Congress for 16 years and having the honor of being appointed by you, sir, to represent you, carry your portfolio of health and human services -- these have been very important opportunities for public service which has really been my life.

Now that you have offered me the post of Ambassador to the Republic of Ireland, I see a new opportunity for public service. And I think every American of Irish ancestry can appreciate the special place that Ireland is to each of us. It is especially special at this time as we hoped there will be some movement toward the reconciliation of the most serious and difficult issue in that country. I look upon your trust in me as a new facet of a public service career. I thank you, Mr.

President, for the faith that you have reposed in me. It has been an honor to represent you in the role that I have played. And as I look to the new day in the future, it will be as an honor and a very exciting challenge to represent you as Ambassador to Ireland. And I thank you for the opportunity.

United States, asks one to take on an assignment that is significant and important -- not only in his eyes but, truly, in terms of its external impact as well as internal impact, important to many Americans of Irish background -- it is, in my view, irresponsible for one who has served in public office for all these years -- or public service -- to have said no to the President at his request.

Secretary Heckler. The President and I are the only two who have discussed the issue of my service in both the Cabinet and my service as Ambassador to Ireland. I feel very strongly that the President, in offering me an opportunity for a new dimension in service, he reposed in me a special degree of trust. I looked upon this assignment with new eyes having heard the presentation that he made and having also his assurance that it was my choice to stay on as Secretary of HHS or to become Ambassador to Ireland.

Q. You've heard the whispering campaign -- excuse me, Chris -- you've heard the whispering campaign against you. What do you think of that whispering campaign which said either that you are not conservative enough or that you are not a good administrator? Speak to it.

Secretary Heckler. I'm very proud of my record as Secretary of Health and Human Services. I'm proud of the fact that we inaugurated the perspective payment plan; we've inaugurated a new direction in health policy; I have carried the President's portfolio and been faithful to his philosophy and to his directives. I'm very proud of what I leave behind and would expect that the new drug approval process at FDA and the other changes that I've inaugurated will actually be implemented by my successor. I would expect these things to happen. But I am also very proud of the fact that this President, whom I consider to be a great leader, has now asked me to take on a new challenge, a new direction in my life.

Secretary Heckler. I am proud of my service in all regards. And, frankly, I am proud of the team who has helped me and the individuals at HHS who have made my service, I believe, as distinguished as it is.

The President. Well, I will break my own self-imposed rule only to say this: That terrorism, that kind of violence, is, I think, the most cowardly, the most vicious thing the world is faced with today, regardless of who the victims are.

Thank you all, and welcome to the White House. You know, I have been out of school for some time now, but I still get nervous around so many principals. [Laughter] Actually, one of the advantages of being 39 years old as long as I have is that you develop a different perspective on life. I have come to realize that principals and Presidents have a great deal in common; both of us have to keep a lot of people happy. You have school boards, and I have the administration. You have the PTA, and I have the voters. You have unruly children; I'd better not name any names.

Seriously, it is a great honor to have you here today. I don't think it's an exaggeration to say that we are seeing a renaissance in American education, and it's people like you in communities like yours who are making it happen. Not too long ago, much of the news we heard about education was bad. From 1963 to 1980, scholastic aptitude test scores underwent a virtually unbroken decline. Science and achievement scores of 17-year-olds were dropping, and an alarming number of those 17-year-olds were dropping out. Crime was on the rise in our nation's schools; teachers and students lived in fear of violence. Our educational system, the very underpinning of our free society, appeared to be breaking apart. Well, as we used to say when I was in school: That's all ancient history. No, we haven't solved all of the problems yet. In public and private schools throughout the country, administrators, teachers, and parents still labor like heroes against tremendous odds. But today there is a new spirit of optimism in our land, and, as Secretary Bennett has said, American education is on the mend.

You know, I have been on a number of campuses recently, and, granted, I am talking about those who are up there on the college level, but from all those appearances, and after having gone through the years of the sixties when it was quite different, I have come back with the firm conviction that the 21st century is going to be in good hands. Well, one of the most heartening things I've witnessed in these last 4\1/2\ years is the pride and exuberance with which our young people have taken up the call to America's future. I don't think there's ever been a younger generation with more spirit or promise. America's a team effort, and as we've seen with these recent SAT scores, America's young people are some of our star players.

We have a challenge at the Federal level as well: to reform programs that stand in the way of educational excellence. That's why we're going to make our program for teaching English to limited English-speaking students more flexible, allowing local districts to use the teaching methods that they know from experience work best. And in our compensatory education program, we're going to give parents of disadvantaged children the right to choose the school that gives their children the best education. Affluent Americans already have that choice; why shouldn't the poor and the minorities, too?

There can no longer be any question that an education founded on the basics works; that higher standards produce higher achievement; and that an orderly, disciplined classroom is a prerequisite for learning. And we're also finding out again the value of values. A recent Gallup Poll found that the overwhelming majority of parents want their schools to do two things above all: to teach their children to speak and write correctly and, just as important, to teach them a standard of right and wrong -- in other words, to teach them values; teachers agree. In another recent poll, 92 percent of teachers polled said that schools should emphasize the development of ethical character in students. Unfortunately, some so-called experts in the field still insist that education should be what they call value neutral. Well, as I've said before, a value-neutral education is a contradiction in terms. If we fail to instruct our children in values of justice and liberty, we'll be condemning them to a world without virtue, a life in the twilight of civilization where the great truths have been forgotten.

And maybe in this modern age our schoolchildren need a little extra support; maybe like the rest of us, sometime during the day they need that extra support of prayer. I can't help but thinking that if some of those people who spend all their time trying to keep God out of our nation's schools spent just as much time trying to keep out drugs and violence, well, they'd certainly be doing our children a lot more good.

You here today represent the best in American education. You're in the vanguard of educational reform, and every vanguard needs a flag. So, I'm going to hand over the podium to the only substitute teacher I know of with Cabinet rank -- [laughter] -- our Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett, and he is going to hand out your awards. Fly these flags with pride; you've earned them.

I wanted to stop by briefly today and extend my good wishes to each of you. The United States is honored and proud that you would choose our Capital as the site of your convention. And we're especially pleased that you have extended to one of our distinguished public servants, John Simpson, the privilege of serving as your president.

John, who is a good friend, will tell you, if he hasn't already, about the priority that our administration has placed on the war against the crime syndicates -- syndicates that in recent years have grown in power and sophistication. Here in the United States, for example, prosecutions of traditional organized crime families, as well as some of the newer groups of drugs traders, have gone up dramatically. And for the first time, we feel we're making significant headway. In addition to dramatically increasing the number of prosecutors and Federal agents working in these areas, we have taken many other steps. One of them is our Presidential Commission on Organized Crime, which is currently working with your member nations to bring to light problems like money laundering, especially its international dimensions. And that word ``international'' is, of course, the point. Whether it's organized crime, narcotics trafficking, terrorism, or any other area of criminal activity, the increasing sophistication and power of criminal syndicates calls for a response from those who are pledged to uphold the law and protect society from the hardened criminal. And this is the work of Interpol.

And now, if you will permit, I'd like to leave you on a personal note. You know, I've spoken to many law enforcement groups throughout my time in public life, and I doubt that I have ever failed to mention that yours is one of the most difficult of any profession in civilized society. And yet there is no work more vital to the safety and freedom of your fellow citizens. The nature of your work frequently brings you in contact with your fellow citizens when they have been victimized by crime or committed a crime themselves. So frequently you see people only when they're hurting or in trouble. I hope you will not permit this to discourage you too much about human nature or to change your perspective on society as a whole. I hope you will remember that not only are most people upstanding and law-abiding citizens, but they are also on your side in the fight against lawlessness and are very grateful to you for the work you do. And that's why I think there is great cause for hope in the war against crime.

Georges Simenon has also said that sometimes ``the truth is too simple for intellectuals.'' Well, we all remember a time when some elaborate theories excusing criminal wrongdoing were very fashionable, a time when there was a great loss of will in apprehending and bringing to justice professional wrongdoers. And now all of this is changing. Increasingly, the people of my own country and yours are coming to appreciate again the truth of old verities like: Right and wrong do matter, individuals should be held accountable for their actions, and society has the right to be protected from those who prey on the innocent.

This trend is no better evidenced than in the growth and renewed strength of Interpol. So, again, I want to pledge the American people's full support. And I want to wish each of you well in your professional lives, in your stay here in the United States; and I want to convey to you the warmest welcome and the kindest regards of the American people. And thank you for letting me have these few minutes with you here. God bless you all.

Lanka. It is based on model income tax treaties developed by the Department of the Treasury and the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development. The Convention deviates from these models, however, in several significant respects, as indicated in the attached report of the Department of State, to reflect Sri Lanka's status as a developing country. These deviations generally provide for broader source country right to tax than is found in the model treaties.

Nancy and I are saddened by the news of Rock Hudson's death. He will always be remembered for his dynamic impact on the film industry, and fans all over the world will certainly mourn his loss. He will be remembered for his humanity, his sympathetic spirit, and well-deserved reputation for kindness. May God rest his soul.

The President announced the creation of an administration Trade Strike Force designed to uncover unfair trading practices used against the United States and to develop strategies to counter and eliminate them. It will identify barriers to U.S. exports, as well as unfair export subsidies. The Strike Force will be chaired by Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige. Other members will be the Secretaries of the Treasury, State, Transportation, Agriculture, and the United States Trade Representative.

The Strike Force will report its findings to the President through his Economic Policy Council, along with a recommended plan of action, on a regular basis. The appropriate executive branch agencies will then be responsible for execution of the plan. Working groups chaired by Commerce Under Secretary for International Trade Administration Bruce Smart will be established under the Strike Force.

Thompson is a founding member of the board of the Committee on the Present Danger and is a member of the Council on Foreign Relations and of the International Institute for Strategic Studies. He serves on the Board of the Foreign Policy Research Institute and the Institute for Strategic Trade. He is the author of many books on U.S. global strategy.

Erikson set out on a daring and danger-filled voyage that began a centuries-long relationship between the Nordic peoples and the lands of North America. ``Leif the Lucky,'' as his contemporaries knew him, sailed well beyond the tip of Greenland to the shores of the North American mainland. His enthusiastic account of his voyage describes a fertile land abounding in fruit, grain, and timber.

Atlantic to make their homes in this land of opportunity. Pressing westward, they settled across the continent, making important contributions to American agriculture and industry. Prizing personal freedom, hard work, and family values, these hardy God-fearing pioneers played a key role in shaping the American character. Today, cultural exchanges, commercial ties, and cordial diplomatic relations with the countries of Denmark, Finland, Iceland, Norway, and Sweden continue to enrich the lives of all Americans.

Gamble during the campaign; didn't get exactly here, though. It hardly seems possible now that there was actually a Presidential candidate back then who promised the first thing he'd do if elected was raise your taxes. Well, the American people held a little referendum on that idea and sent a message loud and clear to Washington that America wants less government, less taxes, and more prosperity. And that's why leaders of the other party have now joined us in our effort to overhaul our nation's creaky tax code and replace it with a streamlined version, one that cuts personal and business tax rates, closes unfair loopholes, and spurs economic growth.

America's fair share tax plan is now working its way through the House of Representatives. It's up to them to send a bill to the Senate as quickly as possible so that we can pass a fairer, progrowth tax plan this year, in 1985. It's a challenge, I know, but I just don't think that America should have to wait for fairness and the increased growth that lower tax rates will bring. And if we have to, we're going to send Mr. Clean down there to keep an eye on them -- [laughter] -- and make sure they do the job right.

From the beginning, Procter & Gamble has been an important ally in our fight for tax reform. I was talking to one of your executive officers earlier, and he had kind of a funny way of talking, but I couldn't have agreed more with what he was saying. He said there's a rising Tide of good Cheer and Joy in the land. [Laughter] We see new Zest in the economy every day. [Laughter] And all we need now is a Bold new Dash to Safeguard the gain we've made already. [Laughter] I said thanks and congratulated him on the Top Job that you're all doing -- [laughter] -- in support of tax fairness.

Well, seriously, this company exemplifies the forward-looking, executive -- or expansive philosophy, I should say, that has made America the number one economic power in the world, the kind of positive thinking behind America's fair share tax plan. Your president, John Smale, testified before the House Ways and Means Committee that, although Procter & Gamble would be affected by our loophole closing, you support the initiative because you know lower tax rates mean greater growth and more jobs. And this company has the vision to look beyond the ledger books and see what's good for America is good for individual businesses and every one of their employees and customers, too.

Tom Kindness and Bob McEwen, and one who was going to be with us, but then got interrupted by the press of things in the House and couldn't, Del Latta -- they understand one thing that is all too often forgotten in Washington: that a tax overhaul that doesn't make life easier for America's working men and women isn't worth the paper it's printed on. That's why our profamily initiatives are the heart and soul of America's fair share tax plan.

I think the people just don't know yet what it is we're talking about. We're going to make it affordable to raise children again. You hear a lot about tax shelters, well, the one shelter we approve of is the family home. The truth is, the profamily measures of our tax plan are there to right a great historical injustice. Throughout the great tax explosion of the sixties and seventies, everybody with a paycheck got hit, and hit hard, by taxes; but those trying to raise families got clobbered. Not only did their taxes skyrocket, their personal exemption, the real value of the deduction they were allowed to take for themselves and each one of their dependents, was steadily knocked down by inflation.

In 1977 -- Henry Hazlett, the economist, has done a study of this -- the average median income -- that's the halfway mark, half the people are above it and half the people are below it -- was $189 a week -- 1977. By now its up to $299 a week. And that means, of course, the individual that's making that many more dollars is paying considerably more income tax, has moved up through the tax brackets. But figure out that earnings in 1977 dollars. If the dollar today had the same purchasing power it had in 1977 -- that $299 only has $171 of purchasing power compared to $189 in 1977. But, in addition to that, because the tax is based on the number of dollars, not their value, that individual has moved up through a number of tax brackets and is paying a higher percentage of less purchasing power than he was before. In other words, families were getting a double whammy, double tax hikes. It wouldn't be an exaggeration to say that the colossal growth of government over the last two decades was financed by raiding the dwindling bank accounts of America's families.

Federal taxes on the first $12,000 of income. And because saving is so essential to families but so very difficult with all these expenses, we're expanding the tax-free savings accounts, the IRA's, the individual retirement accounts, so that they are fully available to nonwage-earning spouses. We figure that the housewife is also working a full 40-hour week. Now, you shouldn't have to be affluent to experience the blessings of a home life, and that's a right to which every American is entitled.

I am glad to say that the Democratically controlled House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families has rated our tax proposal the most profamily tax proposal before the Congress, more profamily than any other proposal around and light years ahead of the present tax system.

Now, this goes beyond economics, and, although, in my opinion, profamily policies are the best economics there is. This gets to the moral core of our nation. America has a responsibility to the future, and our children are our future. We're a nation of immigrants who've labored and sacrificed to give their children a better life. And that's the American dream. And we can't let American tax policies and big government policies kill that dream.

You know, our forefathers got so riled up over a tea tax, among other things, that they started a revolution. And now we have a tax on families, a tax on achievement, success, and aspiration -- a tax on the American dream. I think I know what Thomas Jefferson would have said about that, because Thomas Jefferson only had one line of criticism when the Constitution was adopted. He said, it lacks one important thing: a provision preventing the Federal Government from borrowing money. Well, I think it's time we had another revolution, a peaceful one this time, called America's fair share tax plan. We need your support. Let Congress know that you're progrowth, profairness, and profamily. And America's fair share tax plan is a gift that we owe to our children. And with your help and with this company's support and with these fine Representatives in the House that I've mentioned who are here with me, it's a gift that -- we all do our part -- we'll have wrapped up by Christmastime. And, then, maybe we can sing ``Joy to the World'' with extra feeling.

I mentioned here this -- some people have suggested publicly, lately, that I'm so concerned about the tax plan that I'm not concerned about the deficit, the Federal deficit that we're trying to correct. Well, don't let anybody fool you. Both of these things are important, but there's nothing more important than eliminating the deficit in Federal spending. And right now a few of our Senators and us are talking about a long-range plan -- not just every year trying to whittle a dollar here or a dollar there out, but a plan aimed at a balanced budget. And then we will obey the wisdom of Mr. Jefferson and see if we can't get a provision in the Constitution that says the Government, from then on, can't spend any more than it takes in.

Q. He said that there will be a cap on SS - 20's back to the June '84 level, that they will dismantle the launchers in Europe, and that he wants separate negotiations with the British and French. Isn't that quite a big change in their position?

Certainly, the United States cannot negotiate with the Soviets about what they're going to do with regard to the nuclear missiles of other countries. With regard to the remarks he made about the intermediate-range missiles in Europe, this was the -- when we acceded to the European request and provided missiles for them to have, intermediate missiles, in defense against these missiles aimed at them -- this is what caused the Soviets, more than a year ago, to walk out for more than a year from the negotiations, because we had put those missiles in Europe. Now, they're back negotiating, and they now, I understand, have made a suggestion about reducing the number of their weapons. This, too, will have to be negotiated.

The President. But with regard to this latest statement about the SS - 20's, which are their multiwarhead missiles that are aimed at European targets, and in response to which we had put the Pershings and the cruise missiles in Europe. As I understand it, the only proposal they've made is one that would not be destroying any of their weapons; it would simply be moving them. Well, that missile, the SS - 20, is a mobile missile. It is transported; it can move from place to place. To simply drive them up into the Ural Mountains or someplace else and then say that they're not a threat to Europe makes no sense.

The President. Well, he could probably feel that way because the Soviet Union is about 10 years ahead of us in developing a defensive system themselves, and they're very upset at the idea that they might not be the only ones that have a defense against nuclear weapons as well as having the offensive nuclear weapons. Now, we're working so that we, too, can have a defensive shield that kills weapons, not people. And I'm sure that is upsetting to them, but we're not going to retreat from the research that could deliver to the world a defense against these nuclear weapons and finally bring us to the realization that we should eliminate the nuclear weapons entirely.

The President. No, I don't believe so at all. It certainly would drive a wedge if we arrogantly decided that we would negotiate on behalf of other countries and without their consent. No, this is between them and the Soviet Union. And more power to them. I've got to go on.

Thank you, Dr. Barrett, and thank you all. This is quite a wonderful reception. You know, for a minute there, I thought maybe you thought I was Pete Rose. [Laughter] Well, it's great to be back in Cincinnati and a genuine honor to share the platform with your Congressman, Bill Gradison, and his Ohio colleagues, Tom Kindness and Bob McEwen. Del Latta would have been with us but, as things happen in Washington, something happened that interfered with his getting here.

I spoke to you that day about my dreams for America and my plans for this second term. And I told you: ``We're going to simplify the tax system, actually make it understandable and clear and fair. And when we do that, your tax rates are going to come down, not go up.'' Well, my friends, today I've come back to Cincinnati to help make good on that promise. We now have before the Congress a sweeping proposal to reform our entire Federal system of taxation. It has its roots deep in the American tradition of limited government, individual achievement, and economic growth.

During the 1920's for example, Presidents Harding and Coolidge instituted a series of tax cuts that reduced the top rate on individuals from 73 percent to just 25 percent. Today we remember the boom that followed as the Roaring Twenties. In the 1960's John F. Kennedy cut taxes again, and again the economy responded with great vigor and great growth. In 1981 our own first-term tax cuts were enacted, and in 1983, when those installments -- because it was an installment plan of tax cuts -- went into effect and began to take full effect, America took off on this recovery. I understand that here in Cincinnati, in 1984 alone some 20,000 new jobs were created. And during the last 18 months, greater Cincinnati has seen the creation of more than 1,400 businesses. No wonder the press has coined the term ``Cincynomics.'' I knew the program was succeeding when they stopped calling it Reaganomics. [Laughter] Today the American expansion is in its 34th consecutive month, and across the country, we've seen the creation of more than 8 million new jobs.

My friends, history is clear: Lower tax rates mean greater freedom, and whenever we lower the tax rates, our entire nation is better off. Freedom for people to grow is as American as apple pie and the Cincinnati Reds. America's fair share tax plan will give us a new burst of economic achievement. Now, many already understand that our plan will mean lower Federal income taxes for most individuals, but there's been some confusion about just what it would mean for business.

Cincinnati Chamber should be aware that for small businesses our plan will represent a substantial tax break. Unincorporated small businesses, taxed according to the personal incomes of their owners, will benefit as we reduce and simplify personal income tax rates. The top personal rate alone will come down from 50 percent to just 35 percent. Incorporated small businesses will receive graduated rates of 15, 18, 25, and 33 percent, a measure especially helpful to businesses just getting started. As you know, small businesses create most of our new jobs. From late 1982 to late 1984, industries dominated by small businesses created new jobs at the remarkable rate of more than 11 percent. Under our progrowth plan, I'm convinced that small businesses will form, grow, and create new jobs even more quickly.

Those of you here with the Cincinnati Business Committee represent larger concerns, such giants as Procter & Gamble and Kroger Company and Federated Department Stores. Well, it's no mistake that this wonderful town is called the ``Blue Chip City.'' For corporations like your own, America's fair share tax plan will mean a lower top corporate rate, down from 46 to just 33 percent. In addition, the system will dramatically be simplified as countless provisions for special treatment are reduced or eliminated. Take a moment to compare this simplified, low-tax rate future to the present arrangement. The corporate tax structure today represents a jungle of deductions, credits, and allowances. The only ones who can hack their way through it with ease are those with friendly guides on Capitol Hill. The whole weed-ridden, overgrown arrangement encourages competition of the worst kind -- not to produce better products at lower prices, but to hire bigger and bigger teams of lobbyists and lawyers evermore skilled in taking advantage of the tax code. My friends, great American corporations should not be strapped by a system that is tied to the stake of tax shelters. It should be set free to make better products than any other industry, in any country of the world. And that's what America's tax plan, we think, is going to do.

As businesspeople, you'll understand that by far the most significant aspect of our plan is that it will be good for your employees and customers, the American people. As I've said, rates for most individuals will come down. To benefit the family, we'll increase to $4,000 the standard deduction for married couples filing jointly and nearly double the personal exemption from just over $1,000 all the way to $2,000. The American people will have new incentives -- more money in their pockets, more with which to purchase your goods, to save, and to invest.

Indians said this: ``Babe Ruth made a big mistake when he gave up pitching.'' [Laughter] My friends, today, naysayers will soon take their place beside Tris Speaker in the Great Mistakes Hall of Fame. Just as sure as Ruth could hit home runs and Rose can break records, during this session of the Congress, America's tax plan will become law; but it's going to take all of us and all of you letting the folks in Washington know that you want this change made.

I'm going to inject something here because lately I've seen some remarks or some -- no, philosophy attributed to me that somehow I am concerned only with this and that I'm not paying any attention to the national deficit, the deficit spending that the Government is doing. Thirty years ago, out on the mashed-potato circuit, I was saying we had to interrupt this 50-year span that we've had of deficit spending and which over the years we were told was necessary to prosperity. And I kept saying it would blow up and get out of control. And it has, but I'd like to just tell you something about that.

That's a top priority with us, and in our wing over there, at the West Wing of the White House, we have been talking about not just each year trying to get further cuts in the budget with the hope that someday we can get down to a balanced budget; we have been discussing a plan -- over a period of years, to start a plan of spending cuts that will bring the percentage of gross national product that the deficit is today down 4, then 3 percent, then 2 percent, and on down to zero in a several-year period -- not too many years -- and then our dream is, at the end of that, that year you implement a constitutional amendment that denies the Federal Government the right to borrow money.

Congressmen, Del Latta, were engaged in discussions of exactly the same thing. Now, we hadn't said a word about what we were talking about; they hadn't told us either what they were talking about. But we found out that we were sure thinking alike. I don't know whether the ESP was going from them to us or us to them or whether it crossed on the way, but we have gotten together, and we are now in discussions with the people up on the Hill about that kind of a plan, to exert the discipline that is needed in Washington so that for someone to stage a big fight for his particular spending and overspending that he wanted to do or she wanted to do -- instead they would be breaking the pattern of a plan, over extended years, to bring about a balanced budget.

And I just want to say to you my gratitude for what so many of you have done. You know, I've talked about the things that have happened there -- for the last 4 months inflation has only been 2\1/2\ percent. I'd spoke about the capital money, the venture capital that is available. We know that interest rates are coming down. We know about the 8 million jobs that I mentioned. And we didn't do all of that; America did all of that, and I think the greatest contribution we made was, we tried to get government out of your way. And we're going to keep on trying to do that.

The President. Good morning. I'm announcing today what may well be an historic agreement to bring Federal spending under control and, at long last, put the United States on the course to a balanced Federal budget.

Over the years, sincere efforts have been made by men and women of good will in both parties to solve the chronic problem of overspending by the Federal Government. But the problem has not been solved. This week, Congress faces the unhappy task of raising the debt ceiling to over $2 trillion. We cannot escape the simple truth that the budget process has failed nor will we avoid the harsh verdict of history if we cannot summon the political courage to put our national house in order and finally live within our means. The great saving strength of democracy is that we can confront the truth about ourselves. Individuals of vision, courage, and leadership can set things right.

Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985. This legislation will impose the discipline we now lack by locking us into a spending reduction plan. It will establish a maximum allowable deficit ceiling beginning with our current 1986 deficit of $180 billion, and then it will reduce that deficit in equal steps to a balanced budget in calendar year 1990. One of the reasons I like this Gramm-Rudman bill is because it attacks budget deficits the right way, not by raising taxes, but by restraining spending. I want it clearly understood that while spending discipline must and will be enforced, we will honor our commitments on Social Security. We will maintain a strong defense, and I expect the Congress to live up to its previous commitments on defense.

Under this legislation, no budget may be submitted with a deficit greater than the maximum allowable as set out in law, and neither House may consider any budget that violates these ceilings. Speaking for myself, I would like to make an additional request -- that Congress work with me to put in place a balanced budget constitutional amendment to begin taking effect in 1991. It will make permanent our plan to have no deficits at the Federal level.

If Congress cooperates and passes this legislation, we can send a clear and compelling message to the world: The United States Government is not only going to pay its bills, but we're also going to take away the credit cards. From now on it'll be cash and carry. And I believe it's critical that the Senate vote today because the debt-limit authority expires on Monday. If we move with bipartisan unity to pass this dramatic but responsible plan to bring Federal spending securely under control and, just as important, unite to bring personal and business tax rates further down, there will be no barriers to America's progress. There'll be no limits to the American dream. And the time is now to move on. So, let's get started.

The President. Well, that changes the subject here a little bit. But, no, we have no word, no way to confirm. He is the one who had been kidnaped in March of '84. We have no confirmation, and until we know something definite, why, we're not going to comment.

The President. Well, I'm sorry there seems to be a misunderstanding. This is simply the summit, seven that meet every year. And it was just our thought that since they were going to be here, with the opening of the U.N. and all, that we'd have an extra summit meeting of the kind that we usually have.

But I've come here just to let you know that I have officially appropriated the saying of the State across the river there, and I just want to say, I love New Jersey! It's wonderful to be here. I saw Tom Kean a few months ago when I was visiting Bloomfield, and I told him I wanted to come back soon, and he very conveniently arranged this fundraiser just to accommodate me. Wasn't that sweet of him? [Laughter] Incidentally, I should apologize to -- and I should have done this when I first started talking here -- about keeping you waiting for so long. But, you know, the whole hitch was that the plan called for an airplane from Washington to here and then a helicopter closer to here and then an automobile for the last few minutes, and the helicopter had to be canceled. But if it will encourage you, this gray stuff is all the way to Washington -- [laughter]. And I can tell you from having been up there, if you just want to go 2,000 feet straight up, you're in the clear sunshine. [Laughter] It's that low.

Well, it used to be that, centuries ago, that New Jersey was said to be a valley of humility between two mountains of pride. Well, if that is still true, and humility is a virtue, then I think, Jersey, you'd better be aware of the important place that you hold in our White House. I want you to know -- and I'm serious about this -- I've been watching New Jersey these past few years and seeing it as a bellwether for the national recovery. There are reasons for this. In many ways New Jersey is a perfect reflection of our country as a whole. You're both industrial and agrarian; you're a big manufacturing State, and you're the ninth largest State in population, and you have one of the lowest unemployment rates in the country. And as your Governor just told you, you just passed yourselves a tax cut bill, a State tax cut bill. So, New Jersey is in good shape; it's in great shape. You've got the Giants and the Jets, Springsteen and Sinatra, and the single most popular Governor in the history of the State of New Jersey.

This, too, is an experience that I shared, because as Governor of California for 8 years, 7 of those had a majority of the other party. If the people of the State believe enough in the things that Tom Kean is doing, then they ought to give him the help that he needs and the capital to get those things done, instead of making an uphill fight for him. And then next year, I'd like to talk to you about another body. [Laughter] But the race for the State assembly and the race for the Governor's mansion won't be easy. They'll require all your commitment, your time, your efforts, and, as well, some of your cash. [Laughter] But it's going to be a good cause. Ultimately, it's going to help the party that stands for economic growth and economic justice; the party that cares that the poor get a piece of the pie; the party that has finally put an end to the tax enslavement of the middle class in America. It's our party that has worked for years now to get government spending down.

And I want you to know that I have just come from Washington where this morning we announced an historic agreement to put our nation on the road to a balanced budget. We are uniting with the leaders of the Senate to support the balanced budget and emergency deficit control act of 1985. This is a measure that will lock us into spending reductions and lead us to a balanced budget by 1990.

Let me just tell you something unusual about this. Over in the west wing of the White House, we have been huddling over the idea of a plan -- that it isn't good enough just each year to see if we can haggle the budget down and get a little more money out of it. We needed a plan leading toward a balanced budget, and so we were talking about looking for 5 years of a declining pattern of deficits. There's no way this deficit can be eliminated in 1 year, we know, but 5 years -- and then at the end of the 5 years, let's get that balanced budget amendment that the Federal Government will have to stop spending more than it takes in after we get it. But while we were doing that in the White House, all of a sudden, a few days ago, we discovered that up on the Hill, two of our Senators were working on exactly the same kind of plan -- 5 years and then our balanced budget. And so, this morning was to announce that -- I don't know whether the extrasensory perception was going that way, from the White House or from the Hill down to us, but we were all on the same track, and we are working together now with the Congress to bring this about and pass as quickly as we can this 5-year plan so that from now on, when somebody wants to bust the budget for some particular spending program, they will be breaking into a well-organized plan that is aimed at, as I say, the balanced budget.

Well, it's the GOP that would keep political power near the true roots of that power -- in the neighborhood, the town, the county, and then the State. Such an approach to governmental justice demands creativity on the part of the local elements who would lead and govern. Happily, it's the Republican Party that strives for creativity on the local level, that encourages and develops it. The Republican Party sees the challenges of the world with clear eyes and recognizes the difference between the totalitarians and the freedom fighters and rejects the former and hails the latter.

SDI, our strategic space shield. They call it Star Wars; there's nothing in that, descriptive of what we're talking about. We're talking about a defensive shield that won't hurt people, but will knock down nuclear weapons before they can hurt people. We will go forward with seeing if it cannot be made into a great protector of our people and the people of the world. It could be the device, if the research pans out -- we can perfect this -- it could be the thing that would eliminate nuclear weapons because they wouldn't have any use any more. Demands to abandon a program with real potential for strengthening deterrence and enhancing Western security do not deal with the real issue of peace. What we need are good-faith discussions, and we're seeking to discuss even now with the Soviets in Geneva the vital relationship between strategic offense and defense. I see where he made a statement in a recent interview, where he said that he did not believe that the God above could have done something -- would prevent the people of the world from doing something for themselves. And I have to believe if he's talking to God we ought to be able to get along, because so am I.

But much is at stake when we talk about the principles of our party. And much is at stake when we ask New Jersey to get out there and elect a Republican assembly. It'll be another step toward the political realignment that's been going on for a few years now and that needs an extra push from your wonderful State. And remember the whole country will be watching. What you do in a few weeks will make a difference. And I just want to thank all of you for caring and sharing your time. You're the troops of a mighty movement, you are the movement, and God bless you all.

I am signing House Joint Resolution 394 that expresses our sympathy as a nation for the people and Government of Mexico. The United States is already providing emergency medical, water storage, and communications supplies to help alleviate the immediate suffering from this tragic event. In addition, we stand ready to cooperate with Mexico in long-term efforts to recover from the effects of the earthquake. A global effort will surely be needed and will surely be forthcoming.

States. State and local governments, church groups, schools, businesses, labor unions, and individual citizens have given generously and freely in an effort to relieve the evident human suffering. With pride and dignity, the people of Mexico have accepted this help from their neighbors as they have carried out an impressive effort of their own to save lives and to protect the well-being of those affected. This tragedy has demonstrated dramatically that, indeed, we are more than neighbors; we are brothers. Their pain is our pain; their loss is our loss. Throughout the past several days as citizens of Mexico waited, citizens of the United States also waited for news of loved ones. Hundreds of thousands called our Department of State to learn the fate of friends and family members in the earthquake zone.

This tragedy, the shared sorrow, the spontaneous acts of friendship and assistance -- all of these things clearly demonstrate that our lives, our fortunes, and our futures are inextricably intertwined. We will respond with sympathy knowing that were the situation reversed, Mexicans would react with the same compassion for us. As I have said many times, we are all Americans.

Title V of the Social Security Act. Under that authority, the Federal government has sponsored a wide variety of training, demonstration, research, and related special activities that have made a great contribution to our effectiveness in providing health care to American mothers and their children.

Block Grant. Through this approach, States have matched Federal funds and have assumed full responsibility for program administration. We can all take pride in this relationship that has supported a wide range of vital preventive and therapeutic services for mothers and infants and children and adolescents, including highly sophisticated help to children with special needs, such as those with handicaps and chronic illness. We can take pride in the services provided and, especially, in the way they are provided, for the nature, scope, location, and timing of these services are determined as they should be -- at the State and community levels, and by the medical professionals at the scene. These are the people who know firsthand what the greatest needs are and how best to respond to them.

On this Child Health Day, 1985, as we celebrate 50 years of cooperative endeavor in support of maternal and child health, we should rededicate ourselves to the expansion of State and local responsibility in this extremely important field. We must do everything necessary to protect the health of our mothers and children. We must remember that the best way to do this is to entrust the responsibilities and the needed resources to the States and communities in which they live.

We are privileged each year to pay honor to the great explorer whose epic voyages of discovery led to the development of the Western Hemisphere. Christopher Columbus won an imperishable place in history and in the hearts of all Americans by challenging the unknown and defying the doubters. In doing so he set in motion a chain of events which transformed the world and led to the birth of the great country in which we live.

Columbus' achievement lies not only in his daring navigational exploits but also in the practical outgrowth of his efforts. More than a great seaman, he was a man of vision who could see the opportunities that lay beyond the horizon. Indeed, the results of his quest were far grander than he could have envisioned. Those who followed in the path he had opened built a new world whose economic, political, and social development have been marvels of human energy and ingenuity.

Columbus exemplified a spirit which still inspires all Americans -- a spirit of reaching out, expanding the frontiers of knowledge, a spirit of undaunted hope. In the words of Joaquin Miller, ``He gained a world; he gave that world its grandest lesson: `On! Sail On!''' Like Columbus, we Americans are ready to take risks in pursuit of our goals. We understand that boundless opportunities await those who dare to strive.

Our tribute to Columbus has special meaning to Americans of Italian descent. This son of Genoa was the first of many great Italian travelers to the New World. Millions of his countrymen would later settle in the new land, adding their precious contribution to the developments that stemmed from Columbus' voyages. Columbus was the first link in a chain which today binds the United States to Italy in a special relationship.

This remembrance is also particularly important for those of Spanish descent. Columbus' achievement depended on the vision and energy of a newly united Spain. This was only the first of Spain's many cultural and economic contributions to the New World. We share with our Spanish-speaking neighbors this heritage and our debt of gratitude to Spain.

In the coming years this commemoration of the voyage of 1492 will take on heightened significance, because we are approaching the 500th anniversary of that great event. The Christopher Columbus Quincentenary Jubilee Commission, a distinguished group of Americans assisted by representatives from Spain and Italy, will plan, encourage, and carry forward the commemoration of Columbus' great voyages of discovery. The Committee held its initial meeting on September 12, and will report within two years its recommendations for observance of the celebration.

Section 1. Entry of the following classes of Cuban nationals as nonimmigrants is hereby suspended: (a) officers or employees of the Government of Cuba or the Communist Party of Cuba holding diplomatic or official passports; and (b) individuals who, notwithstanding the type of passport that they hold, are considered by the Secretary of State or his designee to be officers or employees of the Government of Cuba or the Communist Party of Cuba.

Sec. 2. The suspension of entry as nonimmigrants set forth in Section 1 shall not apply to officers or employees of the Government of Cuba or the Communist Party of Cuba: (a) entering for the exclusive purpose of conducting official business at the Cuban Interests Section in Washington; at the Cuban Mission to the United Nations in New York; or at the United Nations in New York when, in the judgment of the Secretary of State or his designee, entry for such purpose is required by the United Nations Headquarters Agreement; (b) in the case of experts on a mission of the United Nations and in the case of individuals coming to the United States on official United Nations business as representatives of nongovernmental organizations when, in the judgment of the Secretary of State or his designee, entry for such purpose is required by the United Nations Headquarters Agreement; or (c) in such other cases or categories of cases as may be designated from time to time by the Secretary of State or his designee.

This legislation will impose the discipline our government has so long lacked to control its insatiable appetite to spend. Under this proposal the Federal Government, by law, would be required to lock in a deficit reduction path leading to a balanced budget. This would be achieved without raising taxes, without jeopardizing our defenses, and without breaking our commitments on Social Security. The proposal would establish a maximum allowable deficit ceiling, beginning with the current level of $180 billion, and then mandate that this deficit be reduced -- by equal amounts each year -- until we reach a balanced budget in calendar year 1990. Moreover, I personally believe in, and I've asked Congress to put in place, a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution to take effect in 1991. By doing this, we could make sure that our progress would not be lost.

The importance of the proposal to eliminate deficit spending can hardly be overstated. For decades Federal spending has been growing virtually out of control. It took 173 years, from the establishment of our government in 1789 to the Kennedy administration in 1962, for the annual budget of the United States to reach $100 billion. It took only the next 9 years for the budget to double to 200 billion, and in the 14 years since, it has more than quadrupled to over 900 billion.

Not surprisingly, as the Government has been spending like a drunken sailor, it's taken our country deeper and deeper into the red. Indeed, today the Federal deficit amounts to more than $211 billion.

Now, this deficit has not -- and I repeat, not -- developed because of our tax cut. On the contrary, government revenues have actually been rising rapidly since we cut tax rates -- 42 percent since we started, but spending has increased by 60 percent. But overall, since our tax cut, government has still spent more than it has taken in. It sort of reminds me of that old definition of a baby -- an enormous appetite at one end and no sense of responsibility at the other. Well, with the passage of the bill I endorsed yesterday, the Government of the United States can show that, at long last, we are growing up, and we're gaining that sense of responsibility. The Senate is debating this proposal today, and I strongly urge them to approve it before the debt limit authority expires on Monday.

Let me add here a personal caveat: While spending control is vital to the economic well-being of this nation, the highest priority of any American Government is preservation of the national security. The maintenance of a national defense second to none, indeed, the only legitimate justification for running a large annual deficit -- as we ran every year of World War II -- is preservation of the Nation, itself. When the spending cuts are made by this administration, as they must be made, the security of this country, its allies, and its friends will not be put at risk. The Congress has agreed, and next year I will propose those amounts already accepted as necessary for keeping the peace.

Permit me now to turn to recent events in the Middle East. In shock and dismay, we've watched murderous attacks on Israeli civilians, and in response, an Israeli military raid on a PLO headquarters in a country that is an old friend of the United States. Now we hear that one of our American hostages in Lebanon may have been murdered, as was a Soviet citizen earlier this week.

The only way to bring a lasting end to this dreadful cycle of violence is to deal with the circumstances that underlie it through negotiations -- direct, peaceful negotiations among the parties concerned.

Permit me to close by mentioning the gifted statesman whose country was affected by this week's violent events, President Habib Bourguiba of Tunisia. Farseeing and wise, President Bourguiba has been a true friend to America for decades. There is a particularly bitter irony about events of the past week because President Bourguiba was one of the very first to urge a negotiated settlement of the Arab-Israeli conflict. Our hearts go out to him and to the innocent Tunisians swept up in this violence. In this horror, our hope lies in statesmen like President Bourguiba and King Hussein, President Mubarak and Prime Minister Peres. They are men of vision and peace; they deserve our support and our prayers.

This is a momentous day for the United States Senate. Zero hour is approaching. By tomorrow, the Federal Government's cash balances will be virtually exhausted and we will be facing a financial emergency. The choice before the Senate is clear: to meet its responsibilities by approving the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment to bring deficits down, thereby permitting the debt ceiling increase to pass, or to resort to a temporary quick fix that will only postpone the day of reckoning and raise the price all of us must pay. This latter course would be imprudent, unwise, and unsatisfactory. The American people have grown very weary of delays, excuses, and inaction. They cannot accept that this government is incapable of living within a reasonable budget, when their families can and do live within their budgets.

Republicans and Democrats in urging the Senate: Seize this moment of opportunity, move now to pass the historic Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment that will deal decisively with deficits and give our nation a balanced budget by 1990. There is no problem that we Americans cannot fix if only we have the faith, unity, and courage to act. The days of delays have run out.

Mr. Whitfield is presently serving as Chief of Staff to the Secretary of Labor. Previously he was with the Republican National Committee as regional political director for the Southeast, then as director of education and training, and later, director of political affairs. He was director of the Republican National Committee's 1979 and 1980 voter registration program.

This is a real treat for me today. It's a treat because while you may not know it, you're the ones I think of whenever those jaded voices start telling us what we can't do and why we shouldn't even try. I think you know who I mean. Weren't you the ones who rebelled against the notion that America was becoming a sick old bird, too wobbly to walk or fly? Seems to me you were saying, don't hold us down, don't get in our way. America is still an eagle, and she's ready to soar again.

And, yes, you not only said the American people want to win, the people will win again because we offer a vision of victory. You did all that. At an important moment in our history, we set forth together to awaken our nation and rally her spirit. We said, let the opposition have their entrenched elites, their power brokers, and let them play their special interest politics. Let them have all that; we just want the people, and we're winning the people -- millions of converts to our cause, millions of new Republicans uniting under bright banners of freedom and opportunity, turning a Grand Old Party into a grand new party, making GOP the great opportunity party for every American.

When we asked the people to help out and cut spending and tax rates, bring down inflation and interest rates, to index taxes so government can never again profit from inflation at the people's expense -- when we won each of those great victories, we did it with the people's help, and all of the people have been helped. When we asked the people to help America meet great new challenges through renewed excellence in education and developing new frontiers in space and technology, we were declaring that the Republican Party does not fear the future; that the Republican Party embraces the future with confidence, a clear vision, and an open heart. And when we say we're the party of opportunity, we mean to draw attention to a modern miracle: nearly 8\1/2\ million -- wait a minute, I can update that figure as of this morning -- more than 9 million new jobs in the last 34 months; 378,000 more people went to work last month than had been working. If you take the employment pool, as defined as everyone -- male and female, from 16 to 65 -- the highest percentage of that potential pool is employed than has ever been employed in the United States before.

Now, more can be done to squeeze this bloated Federal Establishment, and believe me, more will be done. We're going to bring deficits down, and we're going to bring them down the right way -- with greater growth and spending restraint and not higher taxes. We're backing -- [applause] -- I was just worried there for a split second. [Laughter] I hoped you were with me on that last part.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment in the Senate that will lock in spending reductions and lead, at long last, to a balanced Federal budget. And believe me, that's one proposal that is worth fighting for.

Government in an emergency situation. The business of our nation must go forward. We need the debt ceiling increase passed. Now, I know it's true that we Republicans have swallowed hard, and we have regretted every time we've had to sign an increase in that, but we weren't responsible for the 50 years of deficit spending that was a matter of policy on the part of our opponents and that brought this all about. We've now inherited the bomb that we always said was there with a lighted fuse in all of that deficit spending, and we're going to do something about it -- on a permanent basis. And we need the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment passed so we can reach a balanced budget without hurting our senior citizens who are on Social Security and without raising taxes.

Let's just make one thing very plain: We don't have a deficit problem because the American people are not paying enough in taxes. We have a deficit problem because the Federal Government is spending too much of the people's money.

Now, I'm appealing for your help on that plan and on another pressing matter, too. We have another historic opportunity to overhaul our tax code -- to knock down the barriers to achievement, to make America's future as big and open and bright as your dreams. We can replace an unfair system of 14 tax brackets with a simple 3-bracket system of 15, 25, and 35 percent so that more of what the people earn stays in their pockets, not Uncle Sam's pockets. We can reduce business rates to 15, 18, 25, and 33 percent and enable our firms to outcompete, outproduce, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world. We can be the American family's most faithful friend by nearly doubling the personal exemption to $2,000 for each dependent; increasing the standard deduction to $4,000; by providing the full benefit of IRA's, those are the amounts of earnings that could be deducted and put into a savings account and be tax deductible until the time of cashing in. And we want to extend that to both spouses, those working inside the home as well as those working outside the home. I don't think anyone can ever convince anyone in their right mind that a spouse working within the home is not working.

I'm convinced that an historic reform of this magnitude would be the most precious gift that we could give to our children -- an America striding with confidence into the sunlight of human progress, leading a world that hungers for liberty, prosperity, and peace. Here in Washington, rumor has it that this tax issue doesn't excite the people's passion. Well, that's not the impression I get out in the grassroots. As a matter of fact, one of my most recent appearances out there -- it was in a town of 14,000 and 20,000 of the 14,000 had come -- [laughter] -- for the rally. So, let me ask you. Are you with us? [Applause] Okay. With your strong support in your communities, contacting your representatives and the media, we can forget what the cynics say and pass America's fair share tax plan this year.

But even that great step won't be enough to get us where we want to be. We know there are pockets of great pain in America, with casualties lining the roadsides stretching back for too many years. Well, we're the party of Lincoln, born in the deep, rich soil of the plains, born and bred of hurdy-sturdy stock -- the hardest working, most productive people in the world. And only by keeping our family farmers strong and only by keeping our family businesses strong will our Republican Party remain strong. When anxiety and despair knock at our door, we must answer with a willing hand, reaching out with support; we must answer with tax policies that ensure robust growth at home and with trade policies that pry open markets that are closed to American exports abroad; and we must answer with monetary policies that ensure a sound dollar, low inflation, low interest rates, and stable exchange rates. Incidentally, the inflation rate for the last 4 months has been 2\1/2\ percent. We have learned that without such stability, as I've just mentioned, free trade is a fantasy. Now, all this we must work for and more.

My friends, when we say that we're going forward and taking America's heritage with us, we're saying that the values of our fellow citizens deserve to be respected and not patronized. For us, words like faith, family, work, and neighborhood are not slogans to be dragged out of the closet at election time; they're values we cherish and live by every day. For us, the right of an unborn child to be brought into the world, the right of children to pray and acknowledge God in their schools, the right of parents to guide the education and moral development of their children -- these are not fringe issues to be forever shunted aside; these are questions that go to the core of who we are and what we stand for. And these rights must and will be proudly carried forward by our party.

I can't leave without reminding you that America must remain freedom's staunchest friend, for freedom is our staunchest ally. It's America's responsibility and the responsibility of the Republican Party to stand with people that are being persecuted for their beliefs, to stand with people risking their lives for liberty, from Afghanistan to Angola to Nicaragua. Supporting them is not only morally right, it is the way of honor; to abandon these brave souls would be to condemn America to eternal shame. By pushing forward the frontiers of freedom, we reinvigorate the forces for democracy and peace.

Seriously, that's why I'm determined to pursue our research program to explore the feasibility of strategic defenses, a security shield that could protect the United States and our allies from a missile attack. Why should this effort fill us with hope? Because it would not kill people, it would destroy weapons; because it would not militarize space, it would help demilitarize the arsenals of Earth; because it's the essence of science and spirit joining for mankind's highest ideal -- peace on Earth. It must go forward; it will go forward. It is not a bargaining chip, and we will go forward.

More than one hundred and twenty thousand Americans have served in the Peace Corps in more than ninety countries. Their projects and programs have built bridges of understanding between the people of the United States and the peoples of the countries they have been privileged to serve.

Peace Corps volunteers have returned to their communities enriched by the experience, knowing more of the world, its complexities, and its challenges. They continue to communicate with people in the countries where they served, thereby strengthening the ties of friendship and mutual understanding.

The Peace Corps' call for service has renewed importance today, as American volunteers help others overseas seek long-term solutions to the complex human problems of hunger, poverty, illiteracy, and disease. The generous response to this call continues to exceed the Peace Corps' recruitment requirements.

At some time in their lives, millions of Americans in all walks of life suffer from some form of mental illness. The cost of such illness to society is staggering, totaling billions of dollars for treatment, support, and lost productivity each year.

The emotional costs to those who suffer, and the anguish it causes their families and friends, are beyond reckoning. Because of the unwarranted stigma too often associated with mental illness -- a by-product of fear and misunderstanding -- many victims do not seek the help they need.

But help is available. Treatment can bring relief to many. Scientific advances in recent decades have led to a variety of effective treatments, using modern drugs as well as behavioral and psychosocial therapies: the lows of a depressive disorder can be ameliorated; suicide prevented; hallucinations and delusions dispelled; and crippling anxieties eased. Those who suffer can be healed and again become productive members of society.

The dazzling success of Singapore in these last two decades shines as a tribute to the hard work and ingenuity of its people and also as a monument to the wise leadership that you have provided your countrymen over your 26 years in office. Mr. Prime Minister, today it is common to hear of the vitality and progress of the Pacific rim; perhaps more than any other, your country exemplifies the spirit which is catapulting Pacific rim nations into a new age. The people of the United States, Mr. Prime Minister, are committed to being part of this great experiment in enterprise and freedom. We are and will remain a Pacific rim country.

Consistent with this, our two countries enjoy ever-broadening commercial ties. Two-way trade between us continues to grow rapidly. The United States is now the largest foreign investor in Singapore -- over 400 United States corporations have a presence there. Our people are joined together in a multitude of profitmaking enterprises that benefit all concerned. As in many parts of the world, Singapore is struggling to overcome the effects of the international economic downturn, yet your people are free, with every reason to have faith in tomorrow. Freedom is the mainspring of progress that has enriched the lives of our people. Competition, the profit motive, low tax rates that increase incentives to work, save, and invest -- these have accomplished much.

A principal foreign policy objective of the United States is to protect and expand free trade by opening markets now closed or unfairly regulated. This will be a major goal at the next round of trade talks. In striving to accomplish this, I hope, as has been true in so many other areas of common concern, that we can stand shoulder to shoulder. Protectionism is a threat to the living standards our people have worked so hard to build. Once unleashed, it will set in motion a cycle of reaction and paralysis, eventually destroying those it claims to protect.

Mr. Prime Minister, I look forward to our discussion today. I'm confident that people of good will working together can make our international trading system work, defeat protectionism, and tear down unfair trade barriers. And, Mr. Prime Minister, you can be proud that under your leadership, Singapore has not only moved forward economically, but it has also stood for democratic government, human rights, and international peace. As a country, like the United States, composed of citizens with many philosophies and religions, your democratic institutions encourage social harmony by protecting the rights of the minority and offering peaceful resolution to differences and conflict. As a genuinely nonaligned nation, Singapore is independent and beholden to no country; we respect this, Mr. Prime Minister. We also admire that, although nonaligned and independent, you have demonstrated a sense of responsibility that few can match -- playing a constructive role in the world community of nations and in the Asian-Pacific region.

Association of South East Asian Nations have taken against the Vietnam occupation of Cambodia and ASEAN's reasonable proposal for a political settlement returning self-determination to the Cambodian people. You and other ASEAN nations have waged a successful diplomatic offensive, rightfully denying international respectability to the Cambodian puppet regime. At the same time, support has been provided to the non-Communist resistance to this aggression. The United States applauds and supports this courageous effort by its ASEAN friends.

Our two peoples, though separated by thousands of miles, have much in common. We both cherish our political and economic freedom. Our populations are composed of people who are fiercely competitive, who strive for and expect perpetual progress. We're builders, entrepreneurs, people of wisdom. It's natural for us to be friends and to work together, and I'm grateful to have this opportunity to meet with you and discuss a broad range of issues and to renew our personal friendship.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, it is an honor to be received by you. I'm delighted to find you as robust as ever. Great leaders mirror the qualities of the nations they lead, and I see in your demeanor an America at peace, prosperous, and facing the future with confidence.

Since 1945 American leadership has been a constant factor in an ever-changing world. What the leader of the world's most powerful country and the world's largest economy does affects Singapore and the rest of East and Southeast Asia. Twenty years ago there was no external power that could have challenged the preeminence of the United States in Southeast Asia. In 1975, when the Communists captured South Vietnam, Laos, and Cambodia, the outlook turned bleak. Few dared to believe that American resolve to stay in power in the region would not melt, that the U.S. fleet and Air Force would continue to be based in the region.

Vietnam and its tragic ending, the non-Communist countries of Southeast Asia came to understand the imperative of self-reliance and of cooperation between themselves. They grew closer together in political and economic cooperation as member states of the Association of South East Asian Nations. They have sustained stability and achieved rapid economic growth.

Since then, the bonds of common interests between Singapore and the United States have grown deeper and more extensive. Mr. President, I look forward to my discussions with you and your colleagues, and I'm sure that our discussions will be positive and constructive. The ties between the United States and Singapore will strengthen, for it is an association that rests easily on both of us and our governments and brings mutual benefits.

The President is deeply displeased that 70 key appointments touching virtually every area of the executive branch are being deliberately held up by Senate Democratic Leader Robert Byrd. These are Assistant Secretaries, Ambassadors, Federal circuit and district judges, and members of important agencies, commissions, and boards. Over 5,000 midlevel career military personnel alone are being denied promotions and pay raises. It is the largest backlog of Presidential appointments in modern history.

President Reagan did not evade the Senate's power to confirm. The individuals he appointed had already been nominated before the recent Senate recess. The Senate just hadn't acted on the nominations. And those appointees were renominated when the Senate returned. The Constitution speaks without equivocation on the power and right of the President to make recess appointments. The courts have held the President has the power, and history dating to the first President confirms it. These individuals stand ready to serve.

It was a great pleasure for me today to renew a valued friendship with Prime Minister Lee. I first met the Prime Minister on a trip that I took on behest of President Nixon. And when we stopped in Singapore, I was amazed at the dynamic society that I found there. How could a country with such a small area and few resources be making such strides? And then I met Prime Minister Lee, and my questions were answered. He is a man of principle and vision. His leadership has provided the vigorous and creative people of Singapore the means to move ahead, to achieve, and to build.

Singapore's experience has been in stark contrast to developing countries where political power has been derived from terror and brute force. Instead, Prime Minister Lee's authority has rested on his capacity to mold the opinion of his countrymen and build consensus. He has used his position to free the talents and energy of his people so they could be channeled into constructive, society-building activity. Fortunately, Prime Minister Lee's sound judgment does not stop at the water's edge. American leaders, including this one, have frequently benefited from his wise counsel. Our meetings today were no less beneficial. Our exchange was cordial, reflecting a mutuality of interests and a harmony of views.

Mr. Prime Minister, I want to express my personal admiration for your recognition of the contributions America makes to world peace. As the world's most powerful democracy, our people carry a heavy military and diplomatic burden and often thankless task. But you have demonstrated an appreciation and understanding that makes it all worthwhile. This spirit of mutual respect was evidenced in our meetings today. None of this should be reason for surprise.

Our two peoples may, at first glance, seem worlds apart, both in geographic location and culture; but a closer look reveals that Singapore and the United States are nations made up of hard-working immigrants and their descendants, who came to a new homeland to improve their lot and build a decent life for their families. We're both democratic nations committed to peace and to the preservation of human liberty. And these bonds are being bolstered by continued cultural and educational exchanges and, of course, the many commercial ties between our peoples.

Mr. Prime Minister, we're aware that your people are now faced with severe challenges brought on by international economic conditions. The United States faced economic adversity not long ago; tough decisions had to be made. It's heartening to see that you're moving forward, Mr. Prime Minister, with an eye toward the long-run well-being of your people. I understand full well this is not always easy to do, but I want you and your citizens to know that the people of the United States want you to succeed and prosper. Our meetings today confirmed again the people of Singapore, as we say here, are our kind of people.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, my wife and I are much honored and delighted to be here with you, enjoying your warm hospitality. We would like to express our special thanks to Mrs. Reagan, for we learned of her personal interest in the preparations for this splendid occasion. It is a rare and gracious First Lady who would personally settle and approve the menu, the wines, the floral arrangements, and the entertainment.

You made your fellow Americans and your friends feel proud and optimistic by the confidence you radiated. You have never allowed any problem, however daunting, to weigh you down. Now, as imports surge into America because of an over-strong dollar, Congress, in its pessimism, moves towards protectionism. You have not yielded to such despair. You will astound your critics yet again when you turn the spell of apparent adversity to advantage by opening up foreign markets and creating new jobs for Americans. The Reagan years will surely be a noticeable landmark in American history, for you have restored American leadership in the maintenance of a just and equitable world order.

Railroad Retirement Board actuaries inform me that, while the Railroad Retirement Solvency Act of 1983 has removed immediate cash-flow problems threatening the rail pension fund, ``the long-term stability of the railroad retirement system is still questionable.'' Despite the 1983 legislation, the rail sector unemployment fund is insolvent and currently owes some $700 million to the rail pension fund. Extending Federal/State unemployment insurance coverage to rail employment, as proposed, would provide comprehensive, soundly financed unemployment insurance coverage for rail workers, and would ensure that rail pensioners' assets are protected and all debts to the rail pension are repaid.

I've just come a short distance to be here today, but I feel worlds away from that town across the river. It's estimated that nearly 60 percent of all Virginians identify with the conservative philosophy. My only question is, what happened to that other 40 percent? [Laughter] And how are we going to help them see the light? I guess we all know the answer to that. He's sitting right here -- Wyatt Durrette, the candidate for Governor. He ranks right up with the finest of the fine Governors that have governed this great Commonwealth of Virginia. And that's why so many of Virginia's most respected elected officials have come out strongly for Wyatt. And Wyatt's support extends beyond the State and crosses party lines. I know at least two former Democrats who are giving Wyatt Durrette their wholehearted endorsement. One is Harry Byrd, who served this State so ably for so many years, and the other one is the current leader of the Republican Party -- me.

Well, Virginia needs Wyatt Durrette's strong, principled leadership. But you all know that already, and I'm here today to tell you that America needs him, too, because it's only if we pull together at both the State and national levels that we can give America the bright future of expanding hope and opportunity that she deserves. Wyatt understands that the road to that future is not paved with government programs. He knows it's freedom that creates economic growth and prosperity, and all over the world we are seeing more and more freedom works.

He knows, in addition to that, that it's not another new State office boondoggle paid for by higher taxes that we need for any of the problems that confront us. He knows the way to give minorities a fair shake is to open up with enterprise zones and a youth opportunity wage for teenagers. He understands the transportation needs of Northern Virginia, and he knows that the way to educational excellence is through incentives for achievement, higher standards for our students, and merit pay for teachers.

I've been following this race in Virginia pretty closely, and in many ways it reminds me of that campaign I was going through not too long ago. Last year, too, we heard promise after promise for billions of dollars of new government spending programs, but at least my opponent, then, admitted that he wanted to raise your taxes. Well, the American people let it be known last November what they thought about that idea, and I am convinced come November 5th, the people of this great State are going to repeat that message loud and clear when they elect Wyatt Durrette Governor of Virginia.

While I'm on that subject of taxes, let me interject a note here about the national scene. I'm going to let you in on a little-known fact. There are people in Washington -- some of them even hold elected office -- who still harbor a secret desire, way down deep in their hearts, to raise your taxes. Now, I know you may find this hard to believe, but it's true. They pine for the old days, when the special interests were lined up 10 deep at the Federal trough gorging on taxpayer dollars; some even want to pervert our fair share tax plan and turn it into a sneaky way of raising America's taxes. Well, they can keep on dreaming because there isn't going to be any tax hike.

I've said it before, and I'll keep on saying it as many times as it takes: No matter how it's disguised or packaged, if Congress sends me a tax hike I'll send it right back with a big veto written across it. And for those who are trying to torpedo tax fairness, let's remind them exactly what's on the line. America's fair share plan, as submitted, would increase the gross national product by about 3 percent above projections; that translates into nearly 4 million more new jobs and $600 to $900 a year in added income for every American household. Now, those are the benefits of America's fair share tax plan, and those are the standards by which any alteration of the plan will be judged. Any plan that is less progrowth, any plan that is less profamily will be robbing America of the jobs and prosperity that are rightfully theirs.

But when we talk about the future of Virginia and the future of America, we're really talking about something more fundamental than dollars and cents. Wyatt understands that underneath all these issues lie basic questions of values. The big spending pressures that we still have to fight against on both the State and national levels are really an attempt to artificially pump up a failed and exhausted liberal ideology. It's an ideology that looks on America with despair and that has spent the last several decades trying to unravel the social order that binds us together as a nation and as a people. When it looks abroad, it is an ideology that, in Jeane Kirkpatrick's famous phrase, always ``blames America first,'' while too often making excuses for the enemies of freedom. At home, it erects walls to lock out God and keep Him away from our schoolchildren, but has trouble locking up drug pushers, thieves, and murderers. Well, I just have to say -- and I think you'll agree with me -- that the real walls of separation we need in this country are prison walls that will keep criminals off the streets and away from our children.

You know, I often think the real heroes of today are the parents trying to raise their children in an environment that seems to have grown more and more hostile to family life. Music and the media floods their children's world with glorifications of drugs and violence and perversity, and there's nothing they can do about it, they're told, because of the first amendment. Well, I don't think James Madison, author of the Bill of Rights and one of Virginia's proudest sons, ever imagined that his great document of liberty would be twisted into a pretext for license. I don't believe that our Founding Fathers ever intended to create a nation where the rights of pornographers would take precedence over the rights of parents and the violent and malevolent would be given free rein to prey upon our children.

I guess one of the things that I like best about Wyatt is that he has common sense enough to know the value of values. Family, faith, freedom, and opportunity aren't just campaign slogans for him; they're the foundation upon which his political philosophy is built. Wyatt is an experienced, principled leader that Virginia can depend on and trust.

Well, you know, ladies and gentlemen, Virginia is one of the greatest States of the greatest Nation on Earth. Virginia deserves the very best -- John Chichester for lieutenant governor, Buster O'Brien for attorney general, and Wyatt Durrette for Governor. And all of them, I know, endorse the fact that we must never forget that our very freedom is based on this fact: that this nation is a federation of sovereign States, and they must never be reduced to administrative districts of the Federal Government, as some in Washington would have us do.

Thanks to the efforts in both the public and private sectors, our annual fire loss has been declining in recent years. But we must not become complacent. We must build on the progress that has been made.

I urge every American to join the fight against fire. During Fire Prevention Week, communities should begin initiatives for fire prevention and control that can be implemented throughout the year. I encourage all citizens to join in local efforts to marshal the forces of the entire community -- local government, the fire service, business leaders, civic organizations, and service groups -- to redouble their efforts to prevent and control fire and minimize its toll of life and property.

Lives.'' Everyone should plan ahead noting the most convenient fire exits. Families should install and maintain smoke detectors in their homes to provide early warning of fire. Your local fire fighters can provide you with more detailed recommendations and will be happy to do so. And let us not forget to thank them for the great job they do to protect us, our homes, our businesses, and our belongings. Daily they risk their lives to protect our communities. It is most fitting that the culmination of National Fire Prevention Week will be the observance of the National Fallen Firefighter Memorial Service in Emmitsburg, Maryland. The observance will honor the scores of brave firefighters who last year gave their lives in service to others.

We also must recognize and commend the efforts of all organizations concerned with fire prevention and control, and in particular the National Fire Protection Association, the International Association of Firefighters, the International Association of Fire Chiefs, the National Volunteer Fire Council, the International Society of Fire Service Instructors, the Fire Marshals Association of North America, and all the members of the Joint Council of National Fire Service Organizations.

The youth of our Nation are our greatest resource, and the school lunch program demonstrates our commitment to the promotion of their health and well-being. Under its auspices, over 23 million lunches are served daily in nearly 90,000 schools throughout the country. The success of this effort is largely due to resourceful and creative food service managers and staff, working in cooperation with government personnel, parents, teachers, and members of civic groups.

By joint resolution approved October 9, 1962, the Congress has designated the week beginning on the second Sunday of October in each year as ``National School Lunch Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

Americans admire courage and respect independence. Every day some of our neighbors renew our appreciation of these qualities. They are the Americans who set forth about their daily business bearing the white cane.

The white cane is the badge of courage carried by those blind and visually impaired citizens who believe freedom and independence are meant for all Americans. The white cane tells the world that its bearer expects not pity but fairness and consideration -- on the street, on the job, and everywhere Americans' paths cross.

A generation ago, the majority of children with spina bifida died. Today, their survival rate and long-term outlook have improved dramatically. Carefully planned programs of biomedical research have led to advances in neurosurgery that help alleviate some physical problems.

Further improvements in treating this crippling birth defect can be expected to result from research supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development. Achieving the long-sought goal of prevention now appears more likely.

So that we as a Nation may increase our sensitivity to the needs of spina bifida children and the difficulties faced by their parents, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 111, has designated October 1985 as ``National Spina Bifida Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

There is hardly an area of the Nation where this great resource has not been a critical development factor. The oil heat industry is, and always has been, made up of a large and diverse group of competitive small businesses, many of which are in the forefront of the new energy-efficient technologies of the 1980s. They are helping develop higher-efficiency oil heat, new conservation techniques, solar heating, and other technologies.

In recognition of the many thousands of men and women who have contributed to this important industry in our Nation over the past 100 years, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 115, has designated 1985 as ``Oil Heat Centennial Year'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation to commemorate this event.

While we welcome the release of the passengers and crew of the Achille Lauro, we are saddened and outraged at this brutal killing of an innocent American, the second such terrorist murder in 3 months. We are particularly distressed that there has been no announcement yet that those responsible will be turned over to the appropriate authority for prosecution and punishment.

Government of Italy our opposition to negotiations with the terrorists and our expectation that the terrorists would be apprehended, prosecuted, and punished. The United States remains determined to see that those responsible for this heinous act be brought to justice and punished to the maximum extent. There must be no asylum for terrorists or terrorism.

The President. Let me just say something if I can, first. I know that all of us were pleased, of course, when the hijackers were apprehended and the hostages were all freed, but then, I know how sorry all of us were to learn that one, an American, Klinghoffer, had been murdered -- brutally murdered -- by the hijackers. Now, it is possible and certainly is apparent at this time, or seems to be, that they have been allowed to depart Egypt and -- to parts unknown. But we're doing everything we can to see if they cannot be brought to justice. We think that no nation, responsible nation, should give shelter to these people, should make them available to whichever country has the proper jurisdiction for prosecution -- if that is us, because the victim was American, fine; or Italy, because it was on an Italian ship, or -- I'm not a lawyer, the legal niceties of that sort of thing, but we're going to do everything we can to see that they are brought to justice.

The President. Apparently, from what we know so far -- it's been rather difficult getting all the information -- apparently the Egyptians did not know that a hostage had been murdered, that there'd been a crime committed at that time, before they were turned over to the PLO, which evidently was the arrangement, would get them off the ship and free the hostages.

The President. I think certainly a demand should be made. Mr. Arafat has said the PLO had nothing to do with this. I would think that we should make a demand to him, then, to turn them over to whichever country should have proper jurisdiction.

The President. Well, I would think that if he believes that their organization has enough of a -- sort of a kind of a national court set up, like a nation, that they can bring them to justice and carry that out, all right; but just so they are brought to justice.

The President. Well, you know our position has always been -- and we've tried to persuade all the other countries that had an interest in this, were involved -- that you do not negotiate or bargain with terrorists.

Hyde -- thank you all. And I just was greeted out at the helicopter by the Deerfield High School student body, and now I see the band is in here also. Well, bless you. And I'd like to recognize also the founder of Sara Lee, Charles Lubin. Charles, you've made it very difficult for a lot of people to stick to their diets.

But it's great to be here in Deerfield and at the Kitchens of Sara Lee. You're the expert when it comes to baking, but I thought I'd bring you a recipe of my own. It's a recipe for tax relief, as you've just heard here from Chairman Bryan, for working families and prosperity for our country, and we call it America's fair share tax plan. Now, the main ingredients are tax rate cuts for individuals and businesses, loophole closings, and a near doubling of the personal exemption for you and every dependent in your family. And all of it adds up to increased incentives for work and achievement, rising real incomes, and a bigger economic pie for our country.

America's fair share tax plan is a plan for a growing, dynamic nation. You know, using that symbol of a pie, economic pie -- for too many years in this country, we've had a lot of people around government that have been trying to say that they want to make someone's share smaller, his slice of pie, so they can make someone else's slice bigger. The simple answer is let's make the whole pie bigger, and everybody gets a bigger slice. Lower, flatter tax rates will give Americans more confidence in the future. It'll mean that if you work overtime, get a raise or a promotion, or if your company does well and raises your salaries, more of your extra earnings will end up where they belong -- in your wallet and not in Uncle Sam's pocket.

Let's get specific: Our very conservative, long-time estimates show that our tax plan will add three percentage points to our gross national product. And that translates into the equivalent of 4 million new jobs and from 600 to 900 extra real dollars of income for every household, every family in America. And the immediate benefits of our plan are even more dramatic: We are hiking the standard deduction and raising the personal exemption, the deduction that the taxpayer can take for himself and every one of his dependents, to $2,000. Now, that'll mean that a family of four wouldn't pay one penny of Federal tax on the first $12,000 of income.

We're expanding the tax-free savings of IRA's, you know, those are those tax deductible savings that you can deposit for your own retirement some day and no tax to be paid until the payoff day comes. Well, we're now enlarging those so that they will fully cover both spouses working inside or outside the home or members of the Sara Lee team. But we figure that the housewife -- it better be recognized -- she's working too and, therefore, she can take out the money for that.

Five years ago, one of the first things we did when we came into office was pass an across-the-board 25-percent cut in tax rates. Those tax cuts saved our economy from shipwreck and put us on a steady course of economic growth with increasing productivity, rising real wages, and declining inflation. And ever since 1984, the first full year that all of our tax elements were in place -- you will remember it came in three installments -- our expanding economy has brought in increasing amounts of revenue to the United States Government. The fact is, you can cut the rates but increase the total revenue because of the increase in prosperity and the number of people working and all those things. In the first months -- 11 months -- of fiscal 1985, revenues grew an astounding 10 percent at the fully reduced rates. The tax rate cuts and profamily measures of America's fair share tax plan are the next necessary steps to prosperity.

But we must also do something about the deficit timebomb that is ticking away, threatening to destroy all the progress that we've made. It's clear that tax hikes are not the answer -- they're like cooking the goose that lays the golden egg; they just slow the economy and shrink revenues. Tax cutting and economic growth are already bringing in, as I mentioned, sizable revenue increases.

The problem is, for all the talk about the deficit, some in Congress are still spending and spending like mad. They gobble up that added 10 percent and still want more. The time has come to match all that deficit talk with action. It's time to stop complaining about the deficit and to simply reduce it.

Now, last week I announced my support for a Senate bill -- the Gramm-Rudman amendment -- that will put the force of law behind deficit reduction, locking us into a downward deficit path that will bring the budget into balance by 1990. Yesterday the Senate took a major step toward this proposal and should be commended. But some who've been talking the loudest about deficits would obstruct this bill. It seems that some would do anything not to have to kick their spending habit, even if it threatens the well-being of our nation and undermines the economic security of every American. Well, they may try to obstruct and delay, but I've got news for them -- the American people aren't going to put up with it.

Deficit reduction and America's fair share tax plan -- a sure recipe for a vibrant, surging economy into the 21st century. Chairman Bryan has been one of the most determined and eloquent supporters of our plan in the business community. He's been stumping the country, too, in an all-out effort for tax fairness. And, John, I thank you, and America thanks you. John has the vision to see that what's good for America's working men and women is good for American business and vice versa. America is a team, the best team there is, and if we all pull together, there ain't no stopping us now. And there's something else you all should be proud of. I've heard that you've achieved 68 percent participation in our U.S. Savings Bond drive. Well, congratulations, and keep up the good work.

Now, there's no reason that we shouldn't have a tax fairness bill through the Congress by the end of December. We're urging the House to conclude their work so that the Senate has time to act before the end of the year. Tax fairness will be America's Christmas present to ourselves, and we shouldn't let any Grinch steal our Christmas this year. Give the people in Washington a piece of your mind, and you might let those ladies and gentlemen in the press know how you feel, too -- who are right there with you. [Laughter] Let's do what's right for America. Let's pass tax fairness this year.

And let me just interject something -- in all of the conversation, and we talked about the deficit and all the attempts now going around to try and spread the blame around for who's responsible for the deficit -- oh, I've come in for my share of that. This deficit has been building and growing -- I've been talking out of the mashed-potato circuit 30 years ago. We've been deficit spending virtually every year for the last 50 years. And when some of us spoke up and said, ``We ought to end this; we ought to spend no more than we take in,'' the voices from Washington back over those 50 years said, ``Oh, it's quite all right; a little deficit spending makes for prosperity,'' and that, ``after all, it's all right, we owe it to ourselves.'' Well, let me just tell you what happened with this -- it's built into the structure. And that's why you can't all at once pull the rug out from under it and why we've got a 5-year plan pending to do this and bring it down, then level it off, and then have a constitutional amendment that says from now on government will spend no more than it takes in.

Thank you very much, thank you. I'll obey your instructions. First of all, Nancy wouldn't let me eat it all. [Laughter] But if I could make just one little correction, when I take it up on Capitol Hill, can I use it to blackmail them into doing what we want? [Laughter] All right. Thank you all.

The President. Listen, I'm just going to take a second. I've got 30 people waiting in there to have lunch. But apparently there's a little confusion, and maybe I'm responsible, I don't know, with regard to the PLO and their part in this hostage setup. I did not mean to imply that I favored them giving a trial or attempting to do justice to the hijackers. I really believe that the PLO, if the hijackers were in their custody, should turn them over to a sovereign state that would have jurisdiction and could prosecute them as the murderers that they are. And that is reality -- what I think should be done and what we would make every effort to see would be done.

The President. I would have to tell you that there had been so many things spoken and left unanswered in this -- and this and then I'm going to go into lunch, after I say this -- that I'm hesitant about saying anything positive. It was our understanding that they were put in their custody. And where they are now or whether they have them, I don't really know. And I'm just trying to keep in touch with our sources of information, our Ambassador there, to try and stay abreast of what the situation is.

Italy because it was an Italian ship. I think because the crime began in Egypt there could be a -- I think that you could find a reason for more then one sovereign nation to have jurisdiction in this case.

The President. The case is whether he has all the same information or the information he should have, too. Earlier, in his work to get the hostages freed, he did not know that a crime had been committed either.

Martin and Hyde -- and I've got to stop on one of those names there. Congresswoman Martin represents the district in Illinois that contains a town called Tampico, where I was born, and a town called Dixon, where I grew up. So, I didn't think the rest would mind if I gave a special mention here. I can still call her my Congresswoman. But you the faculty and the students -- I thank all of you very much. Believe me, it's great to be in Chicago; it's my kind of town. And it's wonderful to be at Gordon Tech and the home of the Rams.

College down here in the center of the State, and I remember one night in a chalk talk -- I guess maybe today they're called skull sessions -- but anyway, in this chalk talk the conversation got around -- I don't know how -- now, I'd always known that I never started a football game without asking somebody's help. And I wouldn't have said that out loud; I'd have been afraid to. But I was amazed that, one by one, we found there wasn't a man in the squad that didn't pray before a game.

But we found that we'd finally worked it out for ourselves that each one of us was praying that no one would get hurt, be no injuries, that everyone would do their best, that the best team would win, and we'd have no reason for regret at how it turned out. So, I'll pass that prayer on to all of you for the game at Loyola.

But I've come here not just to talk to you, but to talk with you and to have a little give and take about some of your concerns and your hopes and dreams for the future. But first let me just say a few words about the kind of future that I hope for you, and it is a nation that prospers in a world that is free. This is the America that we've been trying to -- well, maybe -- I was going to say create, but no; I think it's the kind of America we have created. And I looked at some of your signs up here, and I know something about your student body. Did you ever realize how unique you are and we are in all the world?

The President. All of us. All of us -- either by ourselves, on our own, or by way of our ancestors, our parents, grandparents, or great-grandparents -- all of us came here from someplace else in the world, and it meant that somebody in our family had an inner spirit, a desire and love for freedom, and the courage to pick up and leave a homeland and come here to a strange land and start all over again and become a whole new breed of people called Americans. And we all retain, as the signs indicate, a feeling with regard to the land of our heritage. You know, a man doesn't have to give up his mother because he takes a wife; so, it's a little bit that way with us. Yes, we're Americans, but, yes, we have a feeling of kinship with those places from whence we came, and there isn't any other place on Earth like it.

Now, a few years ago when we first started in Washington, we found that we had a broken economy that needed a little fixing -- government had grown so big, taxing and spending were out of control, families were struggling to get by, a web of regulations were so thick that businesses were spending most of their time filling out forms instead of tending to business and rather than keeping America number one in the world. So we tried to use some common sense. We put the people back in charge and cut the increase in government spending nearly in half. We cut the growth of regulations by about a third, and we're still whittling at those. And we passed the first across-the-board tax cut for everyone since 1964, and then we indexed the tax rates to inflation.

And maybe some of you haven't thought about what that means. The income tax is based on the number of dollars you earn, not their purchasing power. And so, when we were going through these long decades of inflation that continued to erode the value of the dollar and when people had to get cost-of-living pay raises to make them keep even with inflation, they didn't keep even because the number of dollars increased, and Uncle Sam pushed you into higher tax brackets, and you found out you were paying a higher tax, year after year, just for trying to keep even with the depreciating value of your money. Well, we've indexed that now, so that can't happen again.

We've had 34 months of economic growth, and we've created about 8\1/2\ million new jobs. Our trading partners in Europe -- the European Community, 10 nations there -- have not increased or had a new job created in any of the countries there in over the last 10 years. We've had a record number of new business incorporations.

But our job isn't finished; the Government is still spending too much. If your families can live within a reasonable budget, the Federal Government ought to be able to do the same thing. So, I'm supporting a thing that the Senate was taking action on yesterday -- and maybe it's one of the reasons why our friend, Congressman Rostenkowski, couldn't be here today, because now it's over to the House -- and that is a plan called the Gramm-Rudman amendment that would force the Government to control spending and give the United States a balanced budget. In other words, to bring the deficits down over a period of 5 years, and by 1990, we would balance the budget. And then it is my dream that we adopt a constitutional amendment that says henceforth the Federal Government cannot spend more than it takes in.

And so with the help of your fine Congressman Dan Rostenkowski, we're going to do that, and we're going to overhaul that complicated tax system and make it shine with fairness for everyone and make it simple. The present tax system has 14 different brackets in which you earn a few more dollars and the Government shoves you automatically up into another bracket. Well, our proposal will only have 3 brackets -- 15 percent, 25 percent, and 35 percent. Well, there will be a fourth bracket that we haven't talked about. That'll be zero because there'll be a lot of people down at the lower end of the earning scale that won't have to pay any tax at all.

But there's more than just doing something about the economy. It's also renewing America's mind and heart and spirit. And some of that renewal has evidently been going on right here, from what I've heard. We're determined to stand up for the rights of the family, to strengthen the community, to acknowledge that we're a nation under God that gives all children the right to pray in their schools. And that's why we're determined to renew excellence in education, to help restore discipline to schools, to reward teachers of merit, to make sure all our students learn English, and to put parents back in charge of their own families. Now, we've been making some gains in that educational field because those SAT scores -- you know, the scores that you take in the examinations with regard to college entrance -- well, they have been up now for 3 of the last 4 years, after 20 years of straight decline. And this year's jump was the biggest jump since 1963.

Now, there's one other reform that we want. We've tried, and we haven't gotten it so far, but we're going to keep trying because it's right and it's fair. We believe for parents who are sending young people to schools like yours, they are entitled to a tuition tax credit.

But you tempted me beyond my strength, and I talked longer than I was supposed to. But we're going to have a dialog now instead of a continued monolog, and I know that you have chosen some for questions. And I'll start with the right microphone and then switch back and forth -- take your questions.

The President. Why did I choose to come to this school? Well, I'd have to ask them -- no, I'd have to ask some people that were doing some of the scheduling. But all I can tell you is that I keep needling those people that put a schedule on my desk and tell me what I'm going to do. I keep needling them to let me come to more schools, because I like what I've seen of young America.

This terrorism and this thing that is going on in the world is the most frustrating thing to deal with. You know, you want to say retaliate when this is done, get even. But then what do you say when you find out that you're not quite sure that a retaliation would hit the people who were responsible for the terror and the crime, and you might be killing innocent people, and so you swallow your gorge and don't do it.

But in this last situation, we had moved; we were ready and prepared, and then this thing that happened with the Egyptian Government offering to release the hostages. They did not know at the time that a murder had been committed. I can only say about this one that we are making every effort to see if those hostages cannot be -- or not the hostages, those terrorists, the four of them, cannot be located and turned over to one of the governments -- our own or Italy or Egypt -- the governments that would have a legitimate right to prosecute them and bring them to the court of justice for the murder.

You have friends who told me that I would find a great spirit here, told me some other things about your school, your accomplishments. But believe me, I heartily approve, and I think, looking at all of you, the 21st century is in good hands.

The President. What about more financial aid to college students? All right. Well, as one who worked his way through college, believe me, I have a sympathy for those who could not go without having some kind of help. As a matter of fact, one of the better jobs I've ever had was working my way through college. I washed dishes in the girls' dormitory. But there seems to have been some misunderstanding. I know why you ask about us and our approach to that very subject.

First of all, we found when we arrived in Washington that there were people who were getting grants and loans whose family income was such that they weren't justified. We thought that the help should be aimed more directly to those who would actually have to have help if they were to go to school.

So, we did make some changes. And there were some people, then, that on the basis of income were ruled out as to getting this help. And we have directed more to those with the incomes that made it necessary. But, also, the idea that in these changes that somehow we have cut back -- we have reduced requests for more spending, but we right now are spending more on that program of college aid to students than has ever been spent in the country's history. And right this year, we're spending around $9 billion on college aid, and more than 40 percent of the college students in this country are getting some kind of Federal help. So, I think we're doing -- in the situation we're in, what with deficits and all -- as much as could be expected of the Federal Government.

Presidency as -- you know, some people become President, but I've always thought of it that temporarily you are given custody of an institution called the Presidency. And you must then return the custody of that or hand it on to someone else when your turn is over.

Obviously, there is a great pride and there's a great thrill to serving the people of this great country, and I feel it very deeply. I have to say, also, there are moments of great stress when decisions have to be made. I don't know of a strain on a President or a problem that could be greater and more anguishing than to some day have to put the young men and women in uniform in our country out where they face the risk of wounds or death. And I made such a decision with regard to the invasion of Grenada. I have made decisions of that kind with regard to terrorism and then found that the exercises didn't need to be carried out. But you have moments, things that you will never forget, such as the death of our marines at the hands of a fanatic terrorist in Lebanon.

The President. Yes, we're a peace-loving people, and out of the wars we've been in, we haven't taken additional territory or conquered other lands. We've had peace for 40 years, and I believe that peace is based on two things: a deterrent capacity, and the other is that after wars -- and there've been four in my lifetime -- after previous wars, peace would come and, yet, in the terms of the peace we would lay the foundation for the next war. The hatreds, the rivalries would still pertain. And 40 years ago, our country -- when we came to the end of the World War II -- our country set out to help all the war-ravaged nations, including our enemies. And today those enemies -- Japan, West Germany, Italy -- they are our staunchest and strongest allies. And we believe that part of the 40 years of peace has been due to the fact that we, for once, helped in bringing about a peace that erased the hatreds and rivalries, rather than just smoothing them over until there would be another chance to express them.

When we came into office, we found that our military had been allowed to decline. We had, as you know, the draft, and we have now a volunteer army. Do you know that we meet our quotas every year on enlistment. We do better on reenlistment than has ever been done. But do you also know that we have the highest percentage of high school graduates in uniform in this country than we have ever had in the history of the United States.

I wish I'd have forgotten the opening remarks so we could have taken more questions here; I love to do this. And I just want to tell you I also have received from your student council a document, a letter containing a lot of things and subjects that you are interested in. Many of them did not come up in the limited questioning so far today, but I'm going to take that back with me. I just received it today and saw it for the first time. I'm going to take it back and I'm going to write an answer to that letter to your student council for all of you.

At the President's direction, U.S. military forces intercepted an aircraft over international airspace that was transporting the Achille Lauro terrorists. The aircraft was diverted to the airbase at Sigonella, Italy. In cooperation with the Government of Italy, the terrorists were then taken into Italian custody for appropriate legal proceedings. Earlier today, upon learning that the terrorists would be flown from Egypt to their freedom, the President directed that U.S. forces intercept the aircraft and escort it to a location where the terrorists could be apprehended by those with appropriate jurisdiction. U.S. F-14 aircraft, flying from the carrier Saratoga, detected the aircraft in international airspace and intercepted it. They instructed it to follow them and escorted it to the military airbase at Sigonella, Italy. This operation was conducted without firing a shot. The aircraft landed with Italian consent and was surrounded by American and Italian troops. The terrorists aboard were taken into custody by Italian authorities. The Egyptian aircraft, with its crew and other personnel on board, is returning to Egypt.

We have been assured by the Government of Italy that the terrorists will be subject to full due process of law. For our part, we intend to pursue prompt extradition to the United States of those involved in the crime. This action affirms our determination to see that terrorists are apprehended, prosecuted, and punished. This episode also reflects our close cooperation with an exemplary ally and close friend -- Italy -- in combating international terrorism. The American Government and people are grateful to Prime Minister Craxi, his Government, and the Italian people for their help.

Finally, we must at this point note our gratitude to the Government of Egypt for its efforts to end this dangerous crisis without additional loss of life. We strongly disagreed with the Government of Egypt, however, on disposition of the terrorists. From the onset, the United States Government made clear to all the Governments involved our firm opposition to negotiations with the terrorists or concessions to them. We also made clear our expectation that the terrorists would be brought to justice. We were, therefore, deeply distressed to learn that those responsible for the death of Leon Klinghoffer might be permitted to go free. We said yesterday that we were determined to see justice done and that we would use every appropriate means to that end.

The decision on ending the hijacking was an independent one by the Government of Egypt. When we were consulted, we advised strongly against any arrangements which would permit the terrorists to escape justice. Since the time the terrorists were taken off the ship, we have continued intensive contacts with the Government of Egypt to pursue that point. The United States wants to emphasize the fundamental and durable interests that the United States and Egypt share, interests which transcend this difficult incident. These have been trying times for both our governments. We will do all we can to ensure that the basic U.S.-Egyptian relationship -- in which both our countries have taken so much pride for so long -- remains unaffected.

In closing, the President wants to emphasize once again that the international scourge of terrorism can only be stamped out if each member of the community of civilized nations meets its responsibility squarely -- passing up no opportunity to apprehend, prosecute, and punish terrorists wherever they may be found. We cannot tolerate terrorism in any form. We will continue to take every appropriate measure available to us to deal with these dastardly deeds. There can be no asylum for terrorism or terrorists.

The President. Before making the announcement and the business that has brought me here and knowing your great concern and not wanting you to lose any sleep at night -- [laughter] -- let me explain the patch on my nose. I figured you might ask. The doctor has been keeping track of me since the first operation for skin cancer on my nose and felt that there was some additional work needed. So, yesterday afternoon when we came back from Chicago, I went over there in the White House to the doctor's office, and he did the additional work. And a biopsy revealed there were some cancer cells. And now I have a verdict of -- my nose is clean.

So, listening to all the questions and comments regarding my thoughts on last night's events, I felt it might be helpful to take a moment here to make a comment, and then I'd ask Bud McFarlane to be here to provide answers to all the questions that you may have.

Events of the past 24 hours reinforce the determination of all of those who share the privileges of freedom and liberty to join together in countering the scourge of international terrorism. All civilized peoples welcome the apprehension of the terrorists responsible for the seizure of Achille Lauro and the brutal murder of Leon Klinghoffer. The pursuit of justice is well served by this cooperative effort to ensure that these terrorists are prosecuted and punished for their crimes.

I want to point out the crucial role played by the Italian Government in bringing this operation to a successful and peaceful conclusion. Throughout, Prime Minister Craxi has been courageous in his insistence that those apprehended shall be subject to full due process of law. I also want to note my gratitude that the Government of Egypt was able to end the crisis without additional loss of life, although I disagreed with their disposition of the terrorists. And, additionally, I wish to praise President Bourguiba's forthright decision to refuse the entry of the fugitives.

Most of all, I am proud to be the Commander in Chief of the soldiers, sailors, airmen, and marines who deployed, supported, and played the crucial role in the delivery of these terrorists to Italian authorities. They and the men and women of our foreign service and intelligence community performed flawlessly in this most difficult and delicate operation. They have my gratitude and, I'm sure, the gratitude of all of their countrymen. These young Americans sent a message to terrorists everywhere. The message: You can run but you can't hide.

The President. I don't believe so. I don't think that there's any increase that could be made. I think that Americans are, as well as many other people from other countries -- as was evidenced in the passenger list of that ship -- are targets of continued terrorism.

Q. Mr. President, we were told you'd answer a few questions. If I might ask one. The Egyptians are apparently holding on to the Achille Lauro, the ship that the hijacking took place on. What do you know about that? Is there any tie to the fact that Italy is now holding the Egyptian plane, and what are you going to do to try to get that ship released? There are apparently still Americans on it.

The President. I really don't know whether that is being held there for anything other than just simply it is berthed there at this time. I don't know whether the other passengers who were away from Port Said -- they are waiting for them to come aboard or anything -- whatever might be true of that. I just don't know.

Q. Mr. President, can you tell us about your attitude now toward Egypt, and can you tell us whether we intercepted this plane without any help from Egyptian authorities, either the top officials of the Government or lower down or whether in fact they did give us some sort of help?

Q. Mr. President, you say the decision was made on Air Force One. Can you tell all of us exactly what you did on this yesterday? What went through your mind, what decisions exactly you made, and what it was like for you yesterday?

The President. Well, I can't answer exactly on some of those things, on the decisions that were made. The operation, as it was carried out, was the operation that I ordered and approved of. But the reason I don't want to answer any more specifically on things of that kind is because terrorism and fighting terrorism is an ongoing thing, and again, as we've said before, I don't want to make public decisions that we've made as to what we would or would not do in events of that kind, because I think it's for the terrorists to wonder what we're going to do.

The President. I don't know whether a decision like that can ever be called easy, but I had complete faith in our forces, and the opportunity was there, and I believed that the mission was possible, and I didn't think there was any way that I could not approve a mission of that kind with what was at stake.

Q. Mr. President, what kind of message do you think this sends regarding your resolve? You've been criticized in the past for not taking action against terrorists. How does this fit the profile of what you think is possible, feasible, and what kind of message for the future?

The President. Well, our problem in the past has not been a lack of will. Our problem has been in terrorist attacks that have taken place in the past. First of all, in a number of them, such as the terrible tragedy with the marines, the perpetrators of the act went up with the bomb. They were suicides, so, there wasn't -- you couldn't -- you were faced with, well, who were their collaborators, who were behind them, how do you retaliate -- they're gone. And the other thing is in a number of incidents where to retaliate would simply be an act of violence without any knowledge that you were striking the perpetrators of the deed and you might be attacking many innocent people. This has been our great problem with terrorism. But here was a clear-cut case in which we could lay our hands on the terrorists.

Q. Mr. President, on extradition, will you press to extradite the terrorists to the United States if the Italians do give them what you consider to be justice, knowing that there is no capital punishment in Italy?

The President. Well, we think this is the proper thing to do because -- I'm not a lawyer, and I don't intend to get into too many legal areas where I might be caught short -- but they could be tried in both countries, and in this country they would be tried for murder, where in Italy they will probably be tried on the basis of piracy because of the taking over of the Italian vessel. So, this is why we have put in a request for extradition.

The President. No. We had a phone call last night. He told me what his situation was with regard to them, and I told him what ours was. And I told him that we would introduce an extradition request. He told me what their legal process was with regard to that, that it wasn't something that he could just give an opinion on himself, any more than I could if the situation was reversed. And, no, we had full cooperation.

The President. I have no way of knowing that or what they're thinking. All I know is that we are still doing everything we can, and investigating every channel we can, to try and get back the other six hostages.

The President. No. As I say, we disagreed, but we have had too firm a relationship between our two countries, and there's too much at stake with regard to peace in the Middle East for us to let a single incident of one kind or a disagreement of this kind color that relationship.

We know that the four that were on the ship were the ones that perpetrated the crime. Very obviously, they are part of a splinter group from the PLO and have their own goals and aims, and how many were involved in planning or supporting such a mission of this kind, we don't know.

The crowning wonder of our marvelous universe is the human brain. This organ of awesome complexity usually functions so dependably that thoughts can be transmitted from one person to another across the centuries, across the barriers of language, custom, and place. In all our daily transactions, we assume that others will comprehend and respond to the symbols of logic and language that are processed through the instrumentality of the brain.

They exhibit learning disabilities. In a sense, they are most aware of the deep complexity of our mental processes, for they must struggle to make the connections that, for most of us, are effortless habits.

While science still knows little about the biochemical and structural differences in brain function that may account for the various anomalies we call learning disabilities, our educators are finding alternative methods of teaching which help the learning disabled enjoy a greater use of their mental potential despite the difficulties they may face in reading, calculating, and other forms of mentation and expression. Meanwhile, scientific observation of the difficulties and the successes of learning-disabled persons is helping researchers gain greater understanding of both the learning process and the functioning of the brain.

Awareness of learning disabilities is one of the most important advances in education in recent years. As more and more Americans become aware, our citizens with learning disabilities will have even greater opportunity to lead full and productive lives and to make a contribution to our society.

Over the past decade, Americans have become increasingly aware of the accomplishments and the potential of the developmentally disabled. Nowhere has this become more evident than in the changed attitudes and perceptions regarding Down Syndrome.

Today, great progress has been made on all fronts. Through advances in medical science, the basis for the condition has been uncovered, raising hopes for eventual prevention. Already, treatment can minimize the effects of the condition and increase the life span of people with Down Syndrome.

Down Syndrome Congress, programs are being put into place to assure access to appropriate medical treatment, education, rehabilitation, and employment. Such programs can have a dramatic impact on the lives of those with this disorder, respecting their intrinsic worth as individuals and maximizing the contributions they can make to society. These efforts include developing special education classes within the context of mainstream school programs; providing vocational training in preparation for competitive employment in the work force; and preparing young adults with Down Syndrome for independent living.

In addition, parents of babies with Down Syndrome are receiving the education and support they need to understand this condition and acquire new hope for the future of their children. We must work together to increase the awareness of the American public as a whole to the true nature of this condition and dispel the stubborn myths about the degree to which it is disabling.

Systemic lupus erythematosus (also known as lupus or SLE) is a potentially serious, complicated, inflammatory connective tissue disease that can produce changes in the structure and function of the skin, joints, and internal organs. More than 500,000 Americans are estimated to have lupus; approximately 90 percent of these are women. One of the most frequent serious disorders of young women, lupus is characterized by periods when the disease is active alternating with periods of remission.

In recent years, the outlook for lupus patients has become progessively brighter as a result of advances from biomedical research. Positive findings have emerged from such diverse projects as studies of the immune system; research on genetic and environmental factors; investigations of hormonal effects; and evaluations of the course and treatment of the disease and its complications.

The Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on lupus. Working together, our objective must be to eradicate lupus and its tragic consequences.

Myasthenia gravis is a harrowing neuromuscular disorder that enfeebles as many as 250,000 of our citizens, most of them in their prime years. It debilitates strength and destroys vigor. Extreme muscle weakness and abnormal fatigue weigh down its victims, sapping their ability to stand, to walk, to pick up a glass and drink from it, and -- in critical cases -- even to breathe.

Myasthenia gravis can strike anyone at any time. While its exact cause is unknown, scientists have found evidence that a chemical needed to stimulate muscle movement is somehow blocked, leaving muscles unable to contract. Such new knowledge suggests the possibility of one day preventing myasthenia gravis by replenishing the missing chemical and restoring the transmission of nerve impulses. To this end, scientists supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and by private voluntary groups -- notably the Myasthenia Gravis Foundation, Inc., and the Muscular Dystrophy Association -- are diligently investigating the basic neurological processes that underlie voluntary movement. Studies of immune system function are also underway to help scientists understand why myasthenia gravis patients seem more susceptible than others to infections.

Thanks to previous investigations, several drugs have been developed that can help many myasthenia gravis patients regain muscle strength and resume a fairly normal life. More research is needed, however, to find ways of liberating patients and their families from rigid medication schedules and from the side effects that accompany long-term drug use.

The strength and ingenuity of private enterprise, the efficiency and liquidity of our capital markets, and sound government policies have brought decent and affordable housing to the overwhelming majority of Americans. The opportunity to own a home or to live in decent rental housing strengthens the family, the community, and the Nation. It gives individual Americans a stake in the local community and encourages responsible political involvement.

Since World War II, the housing industry has made an immense contribution to the economic prosperity of the United States. It has created millions of productive jobs, creating demand for goods and services, and generated billions of dollars in tax revenues.

Shelter is one of the most basic human needs, and therefore encouraging the production of decent affordable housing must be a primary concern at all levels of government. It is, then, fitting to reaffirm our national commitment to livable housing and family home ownership and to recognize the multiple economic benefits engendered by the current housing recovery.

Last week our State and Defense Departments released the most comprehensive report yet on the strategic defense programs of the Soviet Union. You can obtain a copy of -- it's called ``Soviet Strategic Defense Programs'' -- by writing the Department of Defense in Washington, DC. This report shows that the Soviets not only continue to build up their offensive nuclear forces at an unprecedented rate, they're also spending almost as much on strategic defense.

For years, we have deterred aggression through the threat of nuclear retaliation, but we virtually ignored our defensive needs. While the Soviets were expanding their own involvement in strategic defense, we were virtually standing still. At this point, their buildup of offensive weapons combined with their very extensive strategic defense programs is threatening the security of the West. We must respond in three ways: first, by modernizing our own strategic forces, the forces on which deterrence depends; second, by doing our part to get an agreement with the Soviets in Geneva for equitable and verifiable reductions in offensive nuclear forces; and third, by investigating the possibilities of nonnuclear defenses to help protect the United States and our allies from attack.

It's our hope that this research and testing under our Strategic Defense Initiative, or SDI, may, in fact, point the way to advanced defenses that could protect millions of people. We've got to restore military balance between the United States and the Soviet Union, and we need your support for both a strong defense and a strong deterrent against aggression. In a democracy, no policy can be sustained without such public support, but the Soviet Union is not a democracy. We see this in its internal structure, in its treatment of the individual, and in the way it conducts its foreign affairs. The Soviets refuse to admit they have any strategic defense program at all. This is not only deception, its dangerous deception, for without a full picture of what is going on, the people of the world cannot know what they need to know to keep the peace.

Let me give you just a few details about Soviet strategic defense programs. First of all, unlike our own, Soviet activities go well beyond research. The Soviet Union today has the world's only operational antiballistic missile system. The Soviet Union also has the world's only operational antisatellite system and the world's most extensive strategic air defense network. Beyond that, the Soviets are engaged in a number of activities that raise questions about their commitment to the antiballistic missile treaty of 1972, including the construction of a new radar in central Siberia, which is an out-and-out violation of the treaty. But that's not all. The Soviets have for a long time been doing advanced research on their version of SDI. They don't talk about that; all they say about SDI is that the United States shouldn't have it, but as many as 10,000 Soviet scientists and engineers are believed to be working on research related to SDI. They're doing so well, our experts say they may be able to put an advanced technology defensive system in space by the end of the century.

When you look at what the Soviets are doing in both strategic offense and defense, you realize that our SDI research program is crucial to maintain the military balance and protect the liberty and freedom of the West. America's research and testing is being conducted within the terms of the ABM treaty. I want to make it clear that we welcome the day when the Soviet Union can shoot down any incoming missile, so long as the United States can shoot down any incoming missile, too. Our SDI research offers the hope that we can enhance U.S. and allied security through greater reliance on defenses which threaten no one, rather than on offensive nuclear weapons which could kill millions. What I'm speaking of is a balance of safety, as opposed to a balance of terror. This is not only morally preferable, but it may result in getting rid of nuclear weapons altogether. It would be irresponsible and dangerous on our part to deny this promise to the world.

And so, we're dealing with the real issue of peace, with the real issue of how to free the entire world from the nuclear threat. And this is why we want the Soviets to join us now in agreeing to equitable and verifiable reductions, and I mean significant reductions in offensive nuclear arms.

The President extends his sincere condolences to Mr. Odeh's widow Norma and his three small daughters, as well as to other members of the family. The President has instructed that appropriate Federal authorities provide the fullest possible support to the local police investigation now underway.

The U.S. Government finds it incomprehensible that Italian authorities permitted Abu el Abbas to leave Italy despite a U.S. Government request to the Italian Government for his arrest and detention. Abbas is one of the two Palestinians who accompanied the four Achille Lauro hijackers on the plane that was intercepted after leaving Egypt Thursday night. A U.S. Federal judge Friday issued a warrant for Abbas' arrest, charging him with violation of 18 U.S.C. 1203, hostage taking, as well as piracy and conspiracy to commit both offenses. The Italian Government was notified, and the U.S. requested Italy to arrest Abbas provisionally pending transmission of a formal request for extradition.

Abbas, also known as Abu Khaled, is one of the most notorious Palestinian terrorists and has been involved in savage attacks on civilians. Evidence at hand strongly suggests that Abbas was criminally implicated in the hijacking of the Achille Lauro; indeed, that he planned and controlled the operation. The Italian Government has informed us, however, that its judicial authorities did not consider this evidence legally strong enough to support provisional arrest of Abbas while awaiting a formal U.S. request for his extradition. The U.S. Government is astonished at this breach of any reasonable standard of due process and is deeply disappointed.

We got rid of some irresponsible policies that have been kicking around Washington for a while, and we put in a growth-oriented program in their place. And that couldn't have been done without a Republican Senate. When we got to Washington, when Steve got there to the Senate and I got there in the White House, we found that inflation was more than 12 percent. It's now, for the last 4 months, been 2\1/2\ percent. We lowered the income tax rates by 25 percent. And the prime interest rate was 21\1/2\ percent, and it's now down to less than half of that. And Steve Symms was a soldier in the frontline of the battle that brought these things about, and that battle is still being fought.

The President. And we're going to have a tax reform that will make the tax program fairly understandable and I think a little bit cheaper. And it'll be fair, which isn't true of the present system. And we're going to do this, and in spite of some critics to the contrary, we're going to do it at the same time we keep our military forces strong, as they should be.

So, I know I've got to go into town -- there's some people waiting there -- but I just wanted to say to you, you keep Steve Symms right there in Washington where he belongs for this next Senate term. You need him, and our country needs him, and I'll guarantee you, I need him.

Congressman Craig, and all of you, the distinguished people up here. And, especially, I want to mention these two grandstands filled with these wonderful young people up here. This is what these contests are all about. And a special congratulations to Veronica Barnes for her award-winning essay on why she's proud to be an American.

Well, it's a pleasure for me to be here in support of a champion of liberty, a tough advocate for the interests of Idaho and for all of America -- Senator Steve Symms. Somebody asked me earlier today how it feels to be leaving Washington for a visit to Idaho. Well, I said, it's a little like coming home to old friends after a trip through the Twilight Zone. [Laughter] And it really does feel like being home with friends. Steve mentioned this already, but I haven't forgotten the 66-percent and the 72-percent majorities the Gem State gave me in 1980 and 1984. And all I can say is: Thank you, Idaho! You not only helped me get my present job, you also sent to Washington one of this country's finest and most responsible Senators, Steve Symms. And along with Senator Jim McClure and Congressman Larry Craig, they're all doing a terrific job. I need them. Can I count on you to keep them there? [Applause] All right.

A little over 4\1/2\ years ago, we set out to revitalize our country and to turn around some ominous trends. Inflation was raging, our economy was declining, and our military strength was getting weaker by the day. With the help of hard-working, concerned citizens like yourselves, we've put America back on track. Now, some of the experts said that it would take 10 years to wring inflation out of our economy. Well, you know what an expert is? That's someone who can tell you every reason why something can't be done. We didn't listen to the naysayers and neither did Steve Symms. And now, instead of the 12-percent inflation rate we inherited last -- well, last month, and as it's been for most of the last 3 years, inflation was under 4 percent, and for the last 4 months, it has been 2\1/2\ percent. Now, that's good for you, it's good for Idaho, and it's good for America.

The drop in the inflation rate is only part of the picture. The prime interest rate was 21\1/2\ percent before we got to Washington; today it's under 10. Productivity has jumped, real take-home pay has increased, and that's real, not just pay that was raised to keep pace with inflation. And we've had 34 straight months of economic growth. Unemployment is down to 7.1 percent, and this year we have had a higher percentage of our working-age population employed than at any time in our nation's recorded history. Last month 378,000 more people found jobs in America. Now, this couldn't have been accomplished without effective Senators like the two that are here, like Jim McClure and like Steve Symms.

The progress that we've enjoyed has not been, as our liberal opposition would like the public to believe, as a result of luck or personality or the celestial effects of Halley's Comet. America is back because we discarded wrongheaded solutions that relied on big government, high taxes, and more Federal regulation. Instead, we put power back in the names [hands] of the people. Your success proves the best thing that anyone can do for the American people is to get the Government off your backs and out of your way. Our program, aimed at private sector growth rather than more government and higher taxes, stood in stark contrast to failed liberal policies of the past two decades. It was about as popular with the Washington establishment, that program of ours, as a skunk at a lawn party. [Laughter] So, it hasn't been easy. I've had to rely heavily on individuals with courage, energy, and principle. And you know now I'm talking about Steve Symms. Steve has been a linchpin, a driving force behind our efforts to keep our country free, prosperous, and at peace.

Steve told you, the Republican Senate, with the support of a majority of Democrat Senators, adopted the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction plan. This farsighted legislation puts in place a fair, enforceable method of reducing the budget deficit by equal amounts each year, mandating a balanced budget by 1990. And then, I hope we'll be able to get a constitutional amendment to ensure that from then on the Federal Government doesn't spend any more than it takes in. Maybe over the weekend, on some of the talk shows, you have seen some people -- without mentioning them -- snidely calling this some kind of a gimmick, this Gramm-Rudman-Hollings plan, and some kind of a trick to cover up the fact of the deficits.

Well, it's no such thing. Let me just take a second and tell you briefly what it is. From the moment we got there, we've been trying to reduce the deficits and eliminate them and get them down to the balanced budget. If we had gotten all the spending cuts that we asked for in 1981, the deficit would be $50 billion less than it is right now. And so, each succeeding year, you got back to the same old fight, asking some of those in Congress who have favorite programs that are supported by special interest groups, trying to get further reductions in the spending of government. Well, finally, the idea came, let's have a program -- we're on a path, right now, started on a path of decline in the deficits in proportion to the gross national product. So, we said, why don't we have a 5-year plan in which we keep this downward path of deficits to the point that it arrives at the balanced point? And then, instead of battling that same old battle every year, anyone who tries to bust the budget with a spending program will be violating an adopted 5-year program. And that's what that amendment does.

And, of course, it's now over in the House. Friday, the House of Representatives took a step in the right direction, but we still have a large hurdle to get over. In a few days, the House-Senate conferees will meet to iron out their differences. And they need to know, back in Washington, how you feel about it and what you want. So, don't hesitate to take pen in hand or a telegram or a wire. The American people will not tolerate, I don't believe, any attempt to scuttle this last, best hope to come to grips with the budget deficit. The days of the big spender are over. The House-Senate conference committee should realize the American people are watching.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings will finally put behind us. One indication of the respect his colleagues have for Steve is his membership on the critical Senate Finance Committee. It is a tribute for a freshman Senator to get a coveted seat on that committee. And it, along with his Budget and Environment and Public Works Committee assignments, allows him effectively to represent the needs and views of Idaho in our Nation's Capital. For instance, as chairman of the Senate Transportation Subcommittee, he has worked hard and successfully to keep up this State's and the Nation's infrastructure, making certain that your roads and bridges are in tiptop shape. Effective as he has been for your State, Steve has never lost sight of the fact that what's best for Idaho is what's best for America.

We've come a long way, but there's still much more to do. I know that here in Idaho some of your key industries are still struggling. Quick fixes aren't the answer. We've had a half a century of that.

We're opposed to any policy that raises trade barriers against our products. With our farmers under stress as they are now, we must not hurt them further with a trade policy that cuts them off from the foreign markets that are the key to a recovery for our agricultural economy. Now is not the time to be closing markets and retreating; now is the time to let the world know we mean business. The era of the all-providing, never-complaining America is over. Fair trade means fair trade for us, too. I don't care if we're talking about microchips, potatoes, chemicals, or any other product. It has to be free, fair, and open trade for all.

Restoring America's economic vitality was priority number one for this administration. To do that we had to come to grips with economy-destroying levels of taxation. We cut the Federal income tax rates 25 percent across the board, offsetting tax increases that were built into the system. And then, we indexed taxes so they wouldn't increase because of inflation.

Some idea of what had happened to you in the years just a few years before -- let me give you just one little set of figures here. Indexing, and what does it mean? Maybe some of our young people who haven't paid an income tax yet don't know that as inflation was raging back over the last decade and a half or so, and we were getting pay raises to try and keep pace with inflation -- not to increase our income, but just to stay even -- well, you're taxed on the number of dollars you earn, not on their value. So, you get a cost-of-living increase and you're pushed up into another one of those 14 tax brackets. And you pay a higher rate of tax, but you hadn't improved yourself at all, and you're worse off than you were back there before you got the cost-of-living pay raise.

Well, this is what is cured with indexing; now it can't happen. Now, it'll be really done away with when we get tax reform. But right now with the present tax system, that is indexed so that, as you get cost-of-living pay raises, you don't go up into another tax bracket. You stay in the same bracket you were until you actually get a real raise. But the figures I was going to mention -- in 1977 the average weekly wage in America was $189. By 1985 that had gone to $299. That sounds like a pretty hefty raise, doesn't it? But if you count that 299 in 1977 dollars, without the intervening inflation, the 299 was only equal to $171 in the 1977 purchasing power. And yet think how many tax brackets that 189 to 299 had taken you up, so that the Government could profit by your bad fortune. Well, thanks to the hard work of Steve and Jim and Larry and others, we also dramatically brought down the inheritance tax so families, especially family farmers and small businessmen, won't lose through taxation what they spent a lifetime building.

Now it's time for step two. Our taxes are still too high. The system is unfair, as I've just pointed out, and too complicated. We propose to overhaul the system from top to bottom, bringing down the tax rates, simplifying the process, and making it more fair. Now, some of the Washington cynics who are opposing this say that you don't really care. I say it's time for a change. Can we count on your help to get the job done? [Applause] Thank you, you just made my day. I've always had the sneaking suspicion that not only can Americans run their own affairs better than government can, they can probably run the Government better than the bureaucrats and politicians.

Constitution. And I was amazed to find that it has a lot of things in there that it promises, that our own Constitution promises. Of course, they don't keep those promises over there, but they're in there. But then, I was trying to figure out, what is the great difference between our two constitutions? And for these young people, if they've ever wondered, I want them to listen clearly.

All those other constitutions I read said, we, the government allow you, the people, the following rights and privileges. Our Constitution says, we, the people, will allow the Government to do the following things, and nothing more than we have allowed them.

During the last decade we permitted our military strength to erode. The Soviets, at the same time, rushed ahead with one of the most massive peacetime strategic and conventional buildups in history. No one in a free country likes to spend money on weapons. I'd much rather see that money left in the hands of those who work for it, but as long as I'm President, I will not see our free country relegated to a position of weakness or inferiority to any other country. Now, this does not have to mean, necessarily, more and more weapons. One way out is reaching arms agreements which will reduce the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind to equal and verifiable levels. If we're resolute in our search for an agreement while, at the same time, firm in protecting our own interests, arms reduction can be a reality. But let's not kid ourselves, progress in this arena will not come from weakness or vacillation. If the United States negotiates with anyone, it must be from a position of strength.

As the world has been reminded repeatedly in recent weeks, we're involved in a major research effort to see if it is feasible to build a system, a security space shield, which would protect us against missile attacks, against those giant intercontinental ballistic missiles. This program is an historic turning point. For the first time, energy and resources are being put to use in an attempt to find new technology that is aimed at saving lives. If we're successful, it will improve the opportunity for arms reduction because missiles, no longer the ultimate weapon they are today, will be more negotiable. You wouldn't know it from what they've been saying about the American research effort, but the Sviets have had an expensive, ongoing strategic defense research program of their own for years before we ever started such a thing. Well, the idea of using American technological genius to develop a system to protect us against nuclear missiles is moral and in the fundamental interest of the United States and our allies and the cause of peace. We will not bargain this research and testing program away when we get to Geneva.

Technological advances, like developing a space shield, offer us new options. Yet we should never forget that our independence and freedom ultimately depend on our courage, determination, and strength of character. And I think there's reason for optimism here, too. There is a new patriotism alive in our country. I've been in a few schools recently, doing what I am doing here and talking to some students. And I've been on a few campuses recently, and I've seen something that back when I was Governor and those rioting days were going on that I haven't seen. And I have to tell you, as you look at these young people up here, I have come to the conclusion the 21st century is going to be in good hands.

There's a new patriotism alive in our country. And, something about which I'm most proud, those brave men and women who are defending our way of life have no doubt that their fellow countrymen appreciate their dedication. As a former marine, Steve knows how important that is.

He understands that the fellows who intercepted those terrorists last week need to know that we are behind them all the way. And I can tell you, I'm mighty proud of the job they did, as I know you are. They didn't have more than an hour's notice, and yet out there over the Mediterranean, with all the aerial traffic that is going on in that area, in the dark of night, they were able to pick out the target plane and persuade it to land where they wanted it to land. Any time, now and then, if you see someone in uniform -- it only takes a couple of steps out of the way -- you might want to say hello and give them a smile and tell them how proud we are. Do you know that today we have in our military the finest young men and women that I think we've ever had? As a matter of fact, we have the highest percentage of the military that are high school graduates that we have ever had in our nation's history -- 91 percent are graduates.

We're building an America that is confident and proud, where every citizen enjoys the fruits of peace and prosperity. Steve Symms and I know that our greatest days are still ahead. There's no limit to what free men and women can do, and there's no limit to how far America can go.

State University. He was introduced by Senator Symms. Following his remarks, the President attended a reception at the center for major donors to Senator Symms' reelection campaign. He then traveled to Milwaukee, WI.

Thank you, Bob, and ladies and gentlemen here on the dais with me and all of you, thank you very much. You know, in the business that I used to be in, I don't think I can top what's already happened here. I should maybe take a bow and leave.

But it's great to be back here in the great city of Milwaukee. I noticed on the way that there were some protesters outside. Bob, I always think of protesters as a good luck sign. We had them all through last fall's campaign, and as I remember that election turned out fair to middling.

Well, in the battle to control Federal spending and make our tax system fairer, as Bob was telling you, Bob is leading the charge. He's effective because he works hard, knows the issues inside and out, and really cares about the people of Wisconsin. And when it comes to delivering for Wisconsin and America, you can count on Bob Kasten. He'll always come through for you.

Wisconsin needs Bob Kasten, but you know that already. I'm here to tell you America needs him, too. Bob has been a leader in America's economic renaissance, keeping our nation on an upward path of economic growth and prosperity. You know, I've heard that there is a new version of Trivial Pursuit, that game; it's called the economist's edition. In this one there are 100 questions, 3,000 answers. [Laughter] But Bob has learned one lesson well from history: The one great nonanswer in economics is tax increases.

Tax rates in this country long ago passed the point where they became counterproductive, stunting economic growth and actually bringing in less revenue than the tax rate cuts that spur growth and draw investment out of wasteful loopholes and back into productive economy. Look at the effect of our first across-the-board 25-percent tax cut. Now, I've heard some voices of the cynics in Washington suggesting that that contributed to the deficits. Not on your life! First of all, that was the principal cause of the economic recovery that we've been having. But second of all, would it interest you to know that the revenues for government have increased as the rates were reduced. Everything -- you know, it was a 3-year installment plan -- our program, economic program -- and finally, it was all in place. And so, 1984 was really the first year when all the elements were there so you would see what had been happening -- and the tax revenues were increasing at a rapid pace. In the first 11 months of fiscal '85, this year, Federal revenues grew a remarkable 10 percent, and that's quite unusual.

Well, Bob Kasten knows these issues inside out, and that's why he's in the forefront of the fight for our tax overhaul. He's going to make sure that we get a tax system that's profamily, profairness, and progrowth. And incidentally, in the House just a short time ago, the Democratic-dominated committee having to do with youth and family and all said that, in their study of all the tax proposals before the Congress, this one is the most profamily. And that's one good reason I'm confident that come November 1986, the people of Wisconsin are going to say, ``Six more years for Bob Kasten in the United States Senate.'' Bob knows that the economy is more than numbers; the economy is people, their hopes and dreams, their hard work, and their faith. He knows that high taxes are more than just an economic mistake; they're a human mistake.

They destroy our dreams; they dash our hopes; they make our hard work futile; and they undermine our faith. And he knows that America's economic renaissance didn't come about through government programs; it is the spirit of America unleashed, a spirit that knows no bounds, that can scale any heights.

If I had to give just one brief phrase as to what was at the bottom of and the best description of what our economic program was beginning in 1981 is: We just tried to get government out of your way. I mentioned a moment ago about what tax cuts, I thought, had done in regard to the recovery. Well, we have had one of the strongest economic expansions in our nation's history. We have helped put nearly 8\1/2\ million more people to work -- new jobs -- in this country in the last 34 months alone. And after trailing behind so much in the years just immediately following World War II, when our Marshall plan had set up the economies of so many other countries, now a Japanese study shows that United States plant and equipment is, today, newer than Japan's, and that's for the first time since World War II. And that came about because more businesses and industries and more people had more money to invest. And that's what does it.

Let's continue to build the American dream by passing a fair, progrowth American tax plan this year, in 1985. And just as a free society needs laws, so, too, a free economy needs the assurance of a stable dollar, a dollar that will be worth as much tomorrow as it is today, so that savings can't be stolen away by inflation and Americans can invest in the future with confidence. This stealing away of the people's money -- and government contributed to that also. In 1977 the average income in the United States was -- the weekly wage -- was $189; this year that average is $299.

What this bill does is make this a 5-year program, a program in which we start a deficit decline that by 1990 will bring us to the even stage. And, then, I pray that we'll have the sense to have a constitutional amendment that says from 1990 on the Federal Government will not spend more than it takes in. You see what this does now? This makes it so that somebody that tries to bust the budget now in the future will be going against a plan that has been put into effect by law. And we won't have to every year fight that same futile and frustrating fight with the big spenders. In a few days, the House-Senate conferees will meet to iron out their differences. The American people I don't think will tolerate any attempt to scuttle this last, best hope to come to grips with the budget deficit. The days of the big spender are over. The House-Senate conference committee should realize the American people are watching.

America's future never held more promise, but we need Bob Kasten in the Senate to make that promise real. Our agenda is full: fair taxes, balanced budgets, and, beyond the economy, excellence in education and the end to government-sanctioned discrimination and, important above all, using our technology, in which we're the world's leader, to make peace more secure for generations to come.

I know you've heard all about it. First of all, a hostile voice was raised and called our defense plan that we're working on Star Wars. Well, it isn't anything of the kind. Then, we've been going by SDI, which is the Strategic Defense Initiative. Well, I tell you what I prefer to call it. It is the strategic space shield, a nonlethal weapon that is not going to kill people, but that is going to kill antiballistic missiles before they can reach their target. Today our deterrent, our war deterrent, is based on: They have missiles, we have missiles; and if they fire their missiles and kill millions of our people, we will fire ours and kill millions of theirs. That's no way to go. How long can the American people stand still for a strategy that threatens so many innocent lives? But our goal is that once we can prove and establish -- we can with this research -- that the kind of weapon we're talking about, a defensive weapon aimed at missiles, is effective, then, we really can do away with nuclear weapons in the world once and for all, because they'll be useless from then on.

We're searching for the most cost-effective means of providing for our defense based on rapid advances in technology, and that's the American way. We are high tech and the highest tech in the world today. Computers that, not so long ago, used to fill whole rooms and cost millions of dollars are today outperformed by little silicon chips smaller than your thumbnail and costing only a fraction of a penny. Technology is getting more productive and cheaper every day. Doesn't a cost-effective defense, allied with high technology, make sense in this day and age? The semiconductor industry is discovering a world of seemingly unlimited possibility in the infinitely small recesses of a grain of sand. Our technological achievements of the past few years are one of the greatest stories ever told, and if we can bring this great resource of knowledge and wisdom to bear in creating a more secure and peaceful world, it may be one of the greatest blessings that mankind has ever received.

Well, it's been a real pleasure coming out to this beautiful State once again. Pretty soon I am going to have to be getting back to Washington, and I'm just hoping that the people of Wisconsin will send Bob Kasten back there to keep me company. Bob is the Senator Wisconsin needs to represent it into the 1990's, and he's the kind of leader America needs to carry us proudly into the 21st century. So, you elect Bob Kasten in 1986 and that would really make my day. And it would make America's day, too.

America has been blessed with an abundance of forestland. There is much to praise in the beauty of our forests and much to be thankful for. John Muir once said of the forests of America that they ``must have been a great delight to God; for they were the best He ever planted.'' They are also a great boon to man. Besides their beauty, they act as protectors of our drinking water and wildlife and provide us with abundant opportunities for recreation. They bring us cooling shade in summer and break the icy winter winds.

America's forests also are an unparalleled resource. For the past three centuries they have contributed greatly to the economic and social development of our Nation. From our forests come the lumber we use to build our houses and the paper for the books, magazines, and newspapers we read. Though we may sometimes overlook the fact in this age of technological breakthroughs, wood is an enduring and invaluable part of our everyday lives.

The Pennsylvania Dutch have a saying: ``We don't inherit the land from our ancestors, we borrow it from our children.'' That is a profound insight we cannot afford to ignore. Fortunately, Americans have proven time and again that we see ourselves as the stewards of this abundant land of ours. We well understand that we cannot take our forests for granted. From the time of Gifford Pinchot, the Nation's first Americanborn trained forester, Americans have sought and found ways to insure the health and improve the management of our forests. Today, we have reached a point where the growth of our forests exceeds the harvest. This has come about thanks to the continuing efforts of our Nation's forestry and natural resource schools, hundreds of trained foresters, and other resource specialists, working with private firms and local, State, and Federal agencies such as the United States Forest Service.

Through the success of sustained-yield forestry, Americans can enjoy the splendor of our Nation's woodlands, as well as benefit from an abundant supply of the numerous products that come from trees. The forests provide jobs for millions of people, and they afford a healthy environment for the many who take to the woods in their leisure time. Even though forests provide us with a variety of products today, we will still have -- thanks to proper management -- millions of acres of forest as a living legacy for generations to come.

Veterans Day is a special day for all Americans. It is a time to reflect on the many sacrifices and the great achievements of the brave men and women who have defended our freedom, and to salute them for their loyal and valiant service.

The blessings of liberty which our ancestors secured for us, and which we still enjoy, are ours only because, in each generation, there have been men and women willing to bear the hardships and sacrifices of serving in the military forces we need to preserve our freedom.

They exemplify the spirit that has preserved us as a great Nation, and they deserve our recognition for everything they have done. With a spirit of pride and gratitude, we honor and remember our veterans today.

I urge all Americans to recognize the valor and sacrifice of our veterans through appropriate public ceremonies and private prayers. I urge the families and friends of our sick and disabled veterans to visit them and extend to them a grateful Nation's promise that they will not be forgotten. I ask all Americans, whether or not a family member or friend is a veteran, to find ways to pay a special sign of respect to a veteran in their community on this day.

States and to encourage and participate in patriotic activities throughout the country. I invite the business community, churches, schools, unions, civic and fraternal organizations, and the media to support the national observance with suitable commemorative expressions and programs.

Since the days of our Founding Fathers, the American people have banded together to meet the needs of their communities. This spirit of neighbor helping neighbor is one of the Nation's finest traditions. Generosity and awareness of community needs are traits that have kept our country strong. Voluntary service remains as important today as it was in earlier decades, and personal involvement lends a warmth to giving and sharing that no government or institution by itself can.

During the holiday season, I call upon all Americans to join in partnership with others to help provide food for those who are in need. The agriculture and food industries, churches, civic and fraternal organizations, corporations, and nonprofit groups can each play a vital role in reaching out to their fellow Americans. Let the caring and sharing that stems from private sector initiatives reach out across this great land of ours like the warming rays of dawn and bring to all the blessings of compassion and goodwill, to those who give as much as to those who receive.

The President is also pleased to announce today that consultations between the American Institute in Taiwan and the Coordination Council for North American Affairs have resulted in an agreement by Taiwan to improve access to its market for American beer, wine, and cigarettes.

Ambassador Yeutter will report to the President by December 31, 1985, on Taiwan's progress in implementing these changes. This market-opening step by Taiwan is particularly gratifying because it represents the kind of response we would hope to receive from all nations to our request for elimination of trading practices that prohibit free and fair competition between the goods and services produced by all nations.

Through the actions we have already taken and the further actions we are announcing today, we are asking all nations to live up to their responsibility to preserve and enhance free trade. Our objective continues to be to enlarge and enhance the world trading system for the benefit of all.

For many years, the United States has shared its agricultural abundance and technical expertise with nations in need. We have led the effort to alleviate world hunger. Yet it is clear that charitable assistance in the form of emergency food deliveries, no matter how extensive, treats only the symptoms of malnourishment, not the causes.

The persistent problem of underfed people has deep roots that unfortunately are too often nourished by government policies that discourage economic growth and progress, put obstacles in the way of international trade, and inhibit a free market system. Governments dictate urban food prices at the expense of farmer income, and the farmer's judgement on the type of crops to plant and harvest is ignored.

Although some American farmers have recently suffered economic reverses, this Nation has not wavered in its commitment to aid the developing nations of the world to improve their agricultural methods and to provide food relief during emergencies. Our assistance has paid dividends to the recipient countries. Since 1954, when the Eisenhower Food For Peace program was adopted by the United States, food production per person has increased an average of 21 percent in the developing countries. Food consumption in the same areas has increased an average of 7.5 percent per person since 1963. We are especially proud that America has taken the lead in the promotion and distribution of oral rehydration therapy. This simple technology saved the lives of half a million children around the world last year.

In recognition of the continuing problem and of the need to continue focusing public awareness on means to alleviate world hunger, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 72, has designated October 16, 1985, as ``World Food Day'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that day.

Russell Long would want to retire. [Laughter] Now, of course, that's only a cue for a story I want to tell you, because, you know, in my position anymore I have to be very careful of whether there is any ethnic note to any jokes that I tell, but I find that I can still tell jokes about people getting old. [Laughter] They know I'm not picking on anyone. So, this doesn't have any bearing on his being too young to retire.

But, ladies and gentlemen, I'm delighted that I could be here tonight to salute one of the most important presences in the United States Senate for, yes, over 36 years. There's one thing about being able to talk first, and before you all have dinner because then no one can -- well, maybe I'm taking some material away from some others -- [laughter]. But the simple facts about Russell Long are that he's the son of an American political legend. He ran a celebrated campaign for student body president at Louisiana State University. He earned four battle stars in his country's service in World War II; was elected in 1948 to the United States Senate, and that was the day before he turned 30; and he became one of the most powerful Senators in that body's history, including a committee chairmanship and a leadership post.

Now, these are the simple facts, but, you know, in a curious way, they don't really tell the whole story. You see, for those who really know Washington well, Russell Long is regarded as one of the most skillful legislators, compromisers, and legislative strategists in history. Lyndon Johnson, Richard Nixon, and many others who knew the Congress intimately fully appreciated the enormous weight and power that Russell Long wielded on Capitol Hill and the tremendous savvy that he brought to any legislative enterprise. For example, Senator Long is famed for his capacity to anticipate the truly critical moments in the legislative process. He was the one legislator who had his mind on the conference, one observer noted, when the others were worrying about the floor debate. Indeed, it's true that this son of a political legend has become a legend on his own.

But to be serious, we're not here this evening simply because Russell Long was and is a distinguished and important United States Senator. We're here tonight because Russell Long, throughout one of the longest and most substantive careers in public life, has been a friend of ours, a friend of his country, and of the American people. Russell, I assure you that I speak not only for your friends on Capitol Hill but for the people of Louisiana and for the American people who say ``thank you'' for your devotion to duty, for the years of service to your country. You won four battle stars making amphibious landings in North Africa, Italy, and southern France.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Charles Roger Carlisle, of Vermont, for the rank of Ambassador during his tenure of service as United States Negotiator on Textile Matters in the Office of the United States Trade Representative. He would succeed Richard H.

Previously he was Deputy Assistant Secretary of Civilian Personnel Policy and Requirements in the Office of the Assistant Secretary of Defense (Manpower, Installations and Logistics). Prior to joining the Department of Defense, he was manager of industrial and labor relations with the Boeing commercial airplane company in Seattle, WA. He also taught on the faculty of the University of Washington School of Business.

Charles D. Hobbs, Deputy Assistant to the President for Policy Development, has been designated as the Director of the Office of Policy Development, replacing Dr. Roger B. Porter, who has left the administration to return to the faculty at Harvard University.

Well, thank you all, and welcome to the White House. I just stopped and stuck my head in the door of a meeting that's going on down the hall you'd have liked very much. They range from about that high on up to that high. They were the Young Astronauts. This is the first anniversary of the Young Astronauts Program. Well, a special greeting to Virgil Dechant and Al Mazewski -- two men that I know have done a great deal in support of our fair share tax plan.

Washington, I'm glad to say, is cooling off now that it's fall, but the battle for tax fairness is just beginning to heat up. As someone once said, government is too big and important to be left to the politicians. The same could be said of our struggle to overhaul our tax system. We need you, America needs you to get actively involved and to help get the message out to the American people and, through them, back to Congress that we want a progrowth, profairness, and profamily tax bill this year, in 1985.

I've been all around this country stumping for tax fairness, and everywhere I go, the American people enthusiastically embrace our proposals. I was thrilled to see a poll in USA Today recently -- where I went to talk about our tax plan earlier this month; that was in Cincinnati. Support for America's fair share plan among those who had read or heard my explanation of what the plan does shot up 14 points to an overwhelming 68-percent majority. I have complained that I think one of the reasons there isn't more action from the people is that there just isn't enough information out there about what the plan will do. When the people hear all the facts, when they hear the case for tax fairness as well as the case against it, America's fair share tax plan wins a landslide victory. The American people know a good deal when they see one, but you have to show it to them first.

Now, I'd like to be able to visit every city and town in this country and talk about our fair share tax plan. I'd like to be able to go door to door and tell every American how our proposal will benefit them, but there's just not enough time if we're going to pass tax fairness in 1985. And that's why you were asked here to the White House today. We can't rely on the media to tell the good news of America's fair share tax plan to the American people. They've got all kinds of news to report and just can't take that on. But you represent ethnic and fraternal benefit organizations all across our country. You are the grassroots that everyone talks about. You are America. You can get the message out directly to the American people that if we want our nation to achieve its full potential, if we want America to be first in economic growth and technological innovation, if we want to save the American family from being crushed under the burden of Federal taxation, and if we want our children to have the bright and prosperous future they deserve, we must restructure our nation's tax system; we must pass America's fair share tax plan. I know you've had some briefings and some talk already, but I hope I won't be plowing plowed ground, but let me get into a few specifics of our plan.

First, we see no reason to start up a new tax on America's fraternal benefit organizations. We should be bolstering and encouraging, not taxing and discouraging these essential organizations that mean so much to the private life of our nation. But let me also tell you some of the specifics of how we plan to make it easier for families, because our profamily initiatives are the heart and soul of America's fair share tax plan. The historians Will and Ariel Durant once wrote that the family ``is the nucleus of civilization.'' Well, they were right, but for the past several decades, the Federal Government has been treating the family almost as if it didn't matter. Throughout the great tax explosion of the sixties and the seventies, everybody with a paycheck got hit and hit hard by taxes, but those trying to raise families got clobbered. Not only did their taxes skyrocket, their personal exemption, the real value of the deduction they were allowed to take for themselves and each one of their dependents, was steadily being knocked down by inflation. In other words, families were getting a double whammy, a double tax hike.

It wouldn't be an exaggeration to say that the colossal growth of government over the last two decades was financed by raiding the dwindling bank accounts of America's families. If the personal exemption, which was $600 in 1948, had kept pace with inflation, it would be worth $2,700 today. So, there's a tax increase the people didn't even know was being imposed on them.

We plan to almost double the current exemption to $2,000. We can't go all the way, but our plan would raise the exemption in order to make up for some of what the families lost over those years. To me, that's only fair, and what's fair is worth fighting for. And I hope you're with me on that. [Applause] Thank you.

Now, we are also increasing the standard deduction for joint returns to $4,000, and our proposal will mean that families as well as the elderly, the blind, and the disabled living at or below the poverty line will be completely scratched from the Federal income tax rolls. The United States Government will no longer tax families into poverty. Our profamily measures will mean that a family of four doesn't have to pay one single cent of Federal taxes on the first $12,000 of income.

And because saving is so essential to families but so very difficult with all these expenses, we're expanding the tax-free savings accounts of the IRA's so that they are fully available to nonwage-earning spouses. We figure that the housewife is also working a full 40 hours a week and probably much more. So, let's have an end to treating homemakers like second-class citizens.

Our profamily initiatives are designed to make it affordable to raise families again. You shouldn't have to be affluent to experience the blessings of home life, and that's a right to which every American is entitled. I'm glad to say that the Democratic-controlled House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families has rated our tax proposal the most profamily tax proposal before the Congress, more profamily than any other proposal that's around and light years ahead of the present system. Now -- and this goes beyond economics, although in my opinion profamily policies are the best economics there is -- this gets to the moral code -- or core of our nation.

America has a responsibility to the future, and our children are our future. We're a nation of immigrants who've labored and sacrificed to give our children a better life, and we can't let big government, high tax policies take away what we've worked so hard to achieve.

House, both as a personal friend and the leader of the Government of Israel. It's a great honor for me to receive the Weizmann Institute's honorary degree of doctor of philosophy. The Weizmann is synonymous with humanitarianism and the pursuit of excellence. For Israel, the institute is a symbol of an old intellectual tradition that has survived even the ravages of the Holocaust. The institute made a magnificent contribution to the future state of Israel, helping to assure its leading role in the vanguard of peaceful democratic nations leading the world toward the 21st century.

Our talks today have been in the tradition of the close regular dialog that we have with Israel, a reflection of the warm and enduring relationship between our two nations. In our talks, we paid special attention to two issues: our commitment to Israel's security and well-being and our shared desire to move forward together toward a just and lasting peace between Israel and all its Arab neighbors. Prime Minister Peres and I fully agreed to press ahead in this search. We recognize there are obstacles, significant obstacles to peace, but we also recognize that there is a better opportunity for real progress now than there has been for some time and a better chance than we may have for some time to come; much progress has already been made.

Prime Minister Peres has made clear Israel's desire for direct negotiations without preconditions, and King Hussein stated here at the White House on September 30 that he welcomes the prospect of beginning negotiations with Israel promptly and directly. This kind of determination and good faith gives the United States confidence that the hurdles to peace can be overcome. Prime Minister Peres and I are also fully agreed that a strong, secure Israel is a shared interest. In the year since the Prime Minister's last visit, Israel and the United States have strengthened and expanded our security cooperation, which furthers a number of common objectives, including the maintenance of Israel's qualitative military advantage against any combination of adversaries.

Arab victims and has brought tragedy to many others. Terrorism is the cynical, remorseless enemy of peace, and it strikes most viciously whenever real progress seems possible. We need no further proof of this than the events of the last few weeks. The Prime Minister and I share a determination to see that terrorists are denied sanctuary and are justly punished. Furthermore, and just as important, Prime Minister Peres and I agreed that terrorism must not blunt our efforts to achieve peace in the Middle East.

Among other things, we've concluded a free trade area agreement, the first of its kind for us. In this regard, I salute Prime Minister Peres and his government for their courage in adopting an economic reform program that holds promise if effectively implemented for leading Israel to strong and steady noninflationary growth. We agreed last year that growth is the main objective.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I'm grateful for the opportunity of expressing to you the admiration and the gratitude of the people of Israel. In our country, pluralistic as it is, where the national consensus is reserved for very rare occasions, you have achieved it -- an admiration of all parts in our country, all people, who came, really, to learn to know you and to admire you.

We admire your leadership because it gave American greatness a new dimension; because it has introduced a new solidarity to the free world; because it has enhanced the desire for knowledge in the realm of science; because it has demonstrated a moving friendship for the new and old Israel.

On a personal note, may I add that one who has had to take decisions affecting the lives of young soldiers, I appreciate both your correct instinct and decisive reaction to the unfolding drama in the east Mediterranean last week as it was manifested in real leadership and real courage.

Twelve months ago, Mr. President, when we met here, I felt that I was standing at a new beginning. You then extended your support for some of Israel's ambitious plans. Since then, we have removed the Lebanese wall from the agenda of Arab-Israel relations. We tightened our belts in order to stabilize our economy, reduce inflation, and deficits. We have begun a process meant to transform the peace treaty into a viable precedent for the whole region -- I'm referring to the peace treaty with Egypt. We have changed our policy on the West Bank. We confronted the agony of terrorism without losing hope that peace would destroy terror before terror would destroy peace. Today we stand ready to take bold steps in a no less challenging direction, and I trust, Mr. President, that we shall have the benefit of your continued support.

The first objective is the most challenging of all: making peace. With our hand of peace extended across the Jordanian River, we call upon our eastern neighbor to heed and accept this sincere invitation. We should not miss the opportunity of putting an end to belligerency and of entering honorable and direct negotiation. We are ready to meet without preconditions, without losing time, at any suitable location -- be it in Amman, in Jerusalem, or Washington. We are prepared to consider any proposal put forward by the Jordanians. Let us bear the cost of peace in preference to the price of war. Our second objective is to move economically from stabilization to growth.

Finally, Mr. President, we would like to join hands with the United States in an appeal to the heart of our fellow men. We welcome the opportunity to participate in amplifying the voice of democracy and echoing its values as we address those who are denied its reality, yet yearn for it.

Mr. President, Chaim Weizmann, a world-renowned scientist, was our first president. He believed that ancient prophecy and modern science, together reaching across the gulf of generations, could set our small nation on the road to development at its highest values. In recognition of your proven ability to lead a great country to even greater heights by seeking the new horizons of real and great promise, the Weizmann Institute, which has gained high repute, was proud to bestow on you, Mr. Ronald Reagan, an honorary doctorate. Your search for a more stable and safer world has unleashed human curiosity in pursuit of wisdom and knowledge as well as of untold opportunity.

Mr. President, as always, it was a great pleasure and honor to meet with you to discuss in a real friendly way and free spirit our common problems and hopes. And again, thank you for your support, and I'm sure we shall be able to cooperate in the future in the same good way that our two countries were working together for such a long period of time.

National High-Tech Month provides an opportunity for all Americans to learn how technological advances contribute to our economic growth and rising standard of living and to reaffirm our national commitment to maintain the leadership of the United States in high-technology development. Technology is crucial to our physical well-being, a strong national defense, and economic growth. It is transforming not just industry, but medicine, agriculture, education, communications -- indeed, virtually every field of human endeavor.

History has demonstrated that progress in technology is essential to maintaining competitiveness, creating new products, and improving productivity. Enhanced productivity lowers unit costs, thereby increasing profits and allowing industries to reduce prices and capture a larger share of the market. Technology-induced productivity gains help hold down inflation, make American products more competitive in world markets, and raise our standard of living.

I am calling upon all Americans to open themselves to the opportunities presented by the incorporation of technology into their lives and livelihoods. First, government policies should not penalize but rather improve incentives for the entrepreneurial development of new technology so critical to maintaining industrial leadership. Second, American business should redouble its efforts to channel investment into promising research and development projects. Third, American labor and management must recognize and welcome the opportunities provided in a high-technological economy and actively cooperate in adapting to the changing work environment, availing themselves of the benefits to their working lives that will come with enhanced productivity and innovation.

Finally, we must pay attention to the education of American youth -- education that will give them the skills and insights they need to grow and develop in a high-technology future. School systems from the elementary level to graduate school must conscientiously seek opportunities to educate our young people about the benefits of technology and to encourage development of the basic knowledge our citizens will require if they are to function successfully in tomorrow's world.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President today announced the fifth annual President's Volunteer Action Awards to honor outstanding volunteer achievement by individual citizens and organizations. The President will present the awards at a White House ceremony in April. Award categories include arts and humanities, education, the environment, health, human services, international volunteering, mobilization of volunteer, public safety, youth, and the workplace.

Change in a free society is never easy, and the battle for a balanced budget is no exception. And that's why we have asked you here today -- or have you guessed that? We need some help from the first string. Many of us have been slugging it out on the issue of deficit spending for a number of years, many years. I think that we now have a window of opportunity to establish -- or accomplish what we have so long strived for. We cannot let this opportunity pass, and I hope I can count on every one of you to maximize your efforts in the days ahead.

The Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction plan, if passed, will be a landmark victory for responsible government. The need for structural reform has been evident to some of us for quite some time, and that's why we've been raising our voices in support of a balanced budget amendment. What we haven't realized, however, and what is clear now is that there is also need for a transition to that point where structural change is possible. And that's what Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is all about. This farsighted and practical proposal gives us an enforceable method of reducing the budget deficit each year, leaving us with a balanced budget by 1990. An end to deficits can be made permanent with an amendment to the U.S. Constitution requiring a balanced budget and preventing us from ever getting behind the eight ball again.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings as an indication that America's military strength is going to be weakened. There's too much at stake. We must keep this country strong and at peace. We'll continue spending what is necessary in this vital area, but no more, no less.

During the last election much was said on this issue. I think any political figure who declaimed in front of the voters against the deficit owes it to the people to support this bipartisan approach or explain him or herself. I'm counting on each of you to help me let our fellow citizens know who's standing in the way and who's clearing the way. Or, put in the vernacular of the 1960's, who's part of the solution or who's part of the problem. By being here today, we figure that you're part of the solution. The big spenders, still trying to hold on to the free-wheeling days of the past, have got to realize how serious the American people are about this. The American people are watching, and I don't think they'll tolerate obstructionism. Those politicians who try to scuttle this reform in the fall of 1985 do so at their own peril.

But I must tell you, I am optimistic. I think we can be proud of the foursquare example the Senate has set on this issue. The Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment passed the United States Senate with the support of a majority of members of both parties and is now in a House-Senate conference committee. If you hear some unusual noises floating in through the window, that's what's going on. [Laughter] Our elected representatives must know that on this issue, no one is anonymous; everyone is on record. If they understand this, then we'll be on the edge of an historic victory. But your perseverance is needed, and we can't afford to wait a day. I hope you'll be up on the Hill this afternoon to let them know how high a priority Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is on your agenda. And as I have said already today to another group of individuals who you might run into up on the Hill, it isn't necessary that you make them see the light, just make them feel the heat.

And that rate of increase has continued through the years we've been here. In spite of our efforts to cut, all we've been able to do is reduce the increase in spending. We've fought every year for a number of cuts, and now we've come to the conclusion that this thing of instead of every year, trying to whittle away here and there and hope we can get enough votes to do so and hope that one day the budget deficit will disappear.

But today the idea is -- with this amendment I've been talking about -- is a 5-year plan in which you look at the rate of decrease in the deficit and you can point to a year down here in which sticking to this plan -- that is the balanced budget and, then, we get that constitutional amendment and make sure that Uncle Sam gets off his sailor's binge and stays within the limits of the revenues.

Heart attack is the number one cause of sudden death in the United States. More than a million and a half Americans will experience heart attacks this year, of which over a half million will be fatal. We are making progress: Mortality from heart attacks has declined significantly over the past decade. But since heart attacks remain by far the leading cause of death in America, much remains to be done.

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation may also be life-saving first aid for other conditions that cause sudden cessation of the heartbeat or cut off the delivery of oxygen into the lungs. Medical authorities are in agreement that a person adequately trained in CPR can make all the difference between life and death in many emergencies. But they stress that CPR is effective only when employed by people who are properly trained.

Facilities for CPR training are widespread, and I am pleased to acknowledge the contribution by those who train others. I urge all qualified Americans to take advantage of this training and to become certified in the use of CPR. This could be a life-saving decision.

Next week Nancy and I will be traveling to New York City. We'll be joining some 80 world leaders and other distinguished guests from around the globe to commemorate the 40th anniversary of the United Nations General Assembly. I'll be meeting with many of these leaders, and I want to share with you my thoughts and hopes on this special occasion.

I can remember vividly the high hopes and expectations we all shared when the United Nations was created in 1945. The nations of the world, exhausted and devastated after the most destructive war in history, came together to lay the foundation for a better world, one free of war.

Americans have never stopped striving to uphold and defend those principles. The American people have held high the torch of freedom for all those fighting for liberty around the world. Our farmers have provided food for millions of needy people across the globe. We helped rebuild the nations ravaged by the Second World War. We and our allies have worked to prevent a third.

Salvador, and Grenada. And we've worked to bring about peace in the Middle East and offered far-reaching proposals to reduce nuclear arsenals. For 40 years, we have honorably carried out our responsibilities to the U.N. Charter, and we have not hesitated to stand firm against those who've sought to undermine peace and freedom for their own sinister ends.

This is a problem which affects the well-being of virtually every country and can only be solved through the kind of cooperative efforts the United Nations was intended to foster. In 1 month, I will be meeting with Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev. I intend to discuss with him, openly and frankly, the obstacles to peace and to suggest how, together, we can remove some of them. If he's receptive, our discussions can go a long way toward building a safer world and realizing the ideals of the U.N. Charter.

The United Nations' founders understood that true peace must be based on more than just reducing the means of waging war. It must address the sources of tension that provoke men to take up arms. True peace is based on self-determination, respect for individual rights, open and honest communications, and that is the kind of peace we want. We want countries to stop trying to expand their power and control through armed intervention and subversion. We have the opportunity -- in fact, we have the mandate -- to reduce the danger of nuclear war by drastic reduction of nuclear arsenals. And that's why we've proposed radical, verifiable, and balanced reductions of offensive nuclear weapons and why we're pursuing research and testing to identify defensive technologies which threaten no one.

We must defend human rights everywhere, since countries which respect human rights are unlikely to unleash war or to impose their will on others. And that's why we insist that the Helsinki accords and other international commitments be observed. We must establish better communication between our societies, since misunderstandings make the world more dangerous.

These will be the subjects of my discussion with General Secretary Gorbachev. I hope that our discussions will contribute to building true peace, to guaranteeing a safe path into the 21st century. But whether this comes to pass will depend on the Soviet willingness to address the real sources of tension in the world and, in particular, their conduct in the world, their treatment of their own citizens, and their continuing and longstanding arms buildup. In preparing for my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev, I'll be seeking the advice and counsel of our allies and friends, some of whom will be in New York with me. With their support and yours, we can set a course now for a safer future.

When I spoke to the American Bar Association a short time ago, I said how disappointed I was that the White House counsel wouldn't let me accept the honorarium. [Laughter] I was really looking forward to the first time I ever talked to a group of lawyers and came home with the fee.

Well, I'm told there won't be any honorarium this morning, either. [Laughter] But, you know, that's not quite right either, because there will be honorariums today, except this time it's the speaker who is going to be handing them out. By that I mean I just wanted to be here today to say how grateful I am to all of you, to each one of you. All of you are on the front line; each one of you holds one of the toughest jobs there is in law enforcement. You know, sometimes when I've spoken to police officers, I've reminded them to be cautious about drawing too many conclusions based on their daily work, to remember that too often they only see their fellow citizens when they've committed a crime or been victimized by one, when they're hurting or in trouble. It's easy to forget the people they don't see every day -- that great majority of Americans who are law-abiding citizens and who are proud of those in law enforcement, grateful to them and anxious to give them their full support.

Well, not only do you have to deal with the criminals and their victims every day, you also have to deal with judges and juries and other lawyers. And all of that, I know, demands the utmost in professional skill and dedication from each one of you. I'm sure there are moments of enormous frustration, and I'm sure there are times when you feel unappreciated. But I hope that in such moments in the future you'll remember the fellow who lives in public housing just across the street here and spoke to you once about your work and its meaning, a fellow who, on behalf of millions of your fellow Americans who never get the chance, wants to say to you today: We're mighty appreciative and mighty grateful to you and proud of you also. I want to underscore a point that I know the Attorney General has regularly made. You and your assistants are in large measure the Justice Department. Our job here in Washington is to support you, to give you the tools that you need to do your job.

Now, I don't want to keep you too long, so let me just touch quickly on a few items of mutual interest. As you know, there was some speculation that this second term might turn out to be a caretaker Presidency, a quiet time that saw little in the way of reform or action. And I just happen to think that the work you're doing is one bit of strong evidence to the contrary.

For example, you're cutting deeply into the infrastructure of the mob by prosecuting major crime bosses. You are not -- as one longtime crusader against organized crime, Professor Robert Blakey, of Notre Dame, said about past government prosecutions -- picking off the retired or wounded. In fact, organized crime convictions are running at a rate quadruple what they were in 1981. This means we're finally doing something about a black mark on our national history, one that's been there roughly since the turn of the century.

And you know, I've heard some people wonder about the sudden appearance of the powerful new drug rings, but no one should really be surprised. In many ways these new criminal syndicates are a result of our past failure to deal effectively with the older organized crime rings who have attempted to corrupt so much of American life. The new groups see in these older syndicates their prototype, an example to emulate, an inspiration to follow. And that's why we have to act as promptly and as effectively as we can against the syndicates, old and new.

I always steer away from questions about any kind of a personal legacy I'd like to leave America after 8 years in office. Answering questions like that sound a bit pompous, and right now, thank you very much, I think such thoughts are just a bit premature. [Laughter] But just this once I'll break my rule, and I'll tell you. Some years ago, many of us in Hollywood saw organized crime at work when it attempted to infiltrate and corrupt unions there; indeed, the union of which I later became president. And we've never forgotten. And believe me, there is nothing I'd like better than to be remembered as a President who did everything he could to bust up the syndicates and give the mobsters a permanent stay in the jailhouse, courtesy of the United States Government. The American people feel just as strongly on this issue, a fact sometimes forgotten by too many in American politics. But if you look at the careers of Tom Dewey, Estes Kefauver, John and Robert Kennedy, and others in public life, I think you will see evidence the American people have always cared deeply about this issue and approved of public officials who spoke and acted responsibly in dealing with it.

There will be no negotiated settlements, no detente with the mob. It's war to the end where we're concerned. Our goal is simple: We mean to cripple their organization, dry up their profits, and put their members behind bars where they belong. They've had a free run for too long a time in this country. And that's the end of quoting myself. [Laughter] One other thing, after due process has been done, after you're certain the defendant's rights have been protected and a fair trial has been held, should the jury return a guilty verdict and the court ask you for a sentencing recommendation, will you do me and the millions of Americans who are fed up with professional gangsters and career criminals -- do us the favor of asking His Honor to throw the book at them?

And while we're on the subject, let me bring up another area you have to deal with: waste and fraud against the United States Government, which has been unrelenting national scandal. Well, now that we've reinvigorated the Inspector Generals' program as well as instituted reforms that have uncovered items like $400 hammers, that scandal may be starting to relent, but only a bit.

Believe me, we're still a long way from home. Frankly, I can think of few criminals more contemptible than those who for selfish ends would cheat our service men and women out of the best we can give them to defend America or those who for personal gain would corrupt a social welfare program designed to benefit the less fortunate members of our society. So, I encourage you to prosecute fraud against the government cases and seek severe penalties against those who seek to cheat the taxpayers by shortchanging the armed services or depriving the truly needy.

These $400 hammers and expensive toilet covers and a few things like that -- these have been portrayed generally as if our people and this administration is somehow responsible. Well, we are responsible -- for finding them. They've been going on for a long time, and every time they have come to public attention, it's because we brought them to public attention by digging them out and doing something about it. And we're going to keep on doing that, and we'll take your help whenever we can get it.

And finally, let me speak about another matter that comes up from time to time, and that's the selection of Federal judges. I'm very proud of our record of finding highly qualified individuals who also adhere to a restrained and truly judicious view of the rule of the courts -- or the role of the courts under our Constitution. The independence of the courts from improper political influence is a sacred principle. It must always be guarded. And let me assure you, it always will be guarded while this administration is in office. But as you know, the Founding Fathers knew that, like any other part of the Government, the power of the judiciary could be abused. They never intended, for example, that the courts preempt legislative prerogatives or become vehicles for political action or social experimentation or for coercing the populace into adopting anyone's personal view of utopia. So, to make sure the courts weren't misused in this way and did not set themselves up as an institution entirely removed from the society they're intended to serve, the Founding Fathers provided for checks and balances, one of which was to place the appointive power for the judiciary in the hands of those who are in office as a result of popular election.

Now, during the past two Presidential elections, I've made it clear to the American public that I felt the courts had sometimes gone too far in interfering with the constitutional prerogatives of other branches of government, even while they neglected their constitutional duty of protecting society from those who prey on the innocent. Well, this is still my belief. So, I intend to go right on appointing highly qualified individuals of the highest personal integrity to the bench, individuals who understand the danger of short-circuiting the electoral process and disenfranchising the people through judicial activism. I want judges of the highest intellectual standing who harbor the deepest regard for the Constitution and its traditions, one of which is judicial restraint.

So, again, my thanks to each one of you, and please tell all of those working with you in your offices and in the investigative agencies how proud and grateful I am. And that is just an echo of how the people of this country feel about you and the way you serve. Thank you. Thank all of you, and God bless you.

I had the pleasure today to meet Mr. Jerzy Milewski, the distinguished representative in Brussels of the Polish labor union Solidarity and a close friend of Nobel Peace Prize Laureate Lech Walesa. We discussed a subject of great interest to me, the situation in Poland.

I told Mr. Milewski of my high hopes that the amnesty declared in July 1984 would represent a giant step toward national reconciliation. Unfortunately, most of the recent news from Poland has not been good. The number of persons detained for purely political reasons has once again risen sharply. Amendments to the penal code have gone into effect which empower the authorities to make summary judgments on a wide variety of so-called crimes. A new law on higher education impinges severely upon traditional academic freedoms. Amendments to the 1982 trade union law effectively rule out de jure trade union pluralism for the foreseeable future. The parliamentary elections just concluded, and like elections before them, have failed to provide a genuine public mandate for Poland's legislative representatives.

Mr. Milewski and other thoughtful observers of the Polish scene understandably feel deep concern over this trend of events. History proves that increased repression only aggravates current problems and sows the seeds of future discontent. I continue to believe that a genuine dialog between the government and important elements of society, including free and independent trade unions, is the only way to solve Poland's serious problems. The release of political detainees would certainly be a prerequisite, both for improving conditions within Poland and for pursuing that country's relations abroad. Mr. Milewski's work in keeping the Western World abreast of his countrymen's efforts to bring their needs and aspirations to the attention of their government is thus extremely important.

The President. Well, we have no evidence that they do -- and this is required. We're very hopeful that south Asian countries will forgo nuclear weapons -- all of the countries there. And yet at the same time, we want to be of assistance with regard to legitimate energy needs, and that is a source of energy, but should not be a coverup for bombs and the making of nuclear weapons. As a matter of fact, we're going to try our best to see if we, at the level of the Soviet Union and ourselves, cannot do something about curbing those, and I would like to think that they might one day eliminate them all.

The President. We hope by that time that we definitely know that there are no nuclear weapons -- not going to be any, because that's what we've tried to, as I say, to impress on both the major countries there -- and on all of south Asia or, for that matter, the rest of the world.

Q. Mr. President, in the postwar era, no two leaders came to the summit with so much political support at home and with such charisma. We in India look upon the next month's meeting between you and Mr. Gorbachev as a unique opportunity for disarmament and durable peace. Do you share that view?

The President. I believe that our meeting offers a unique opportunity to set U.S.-Soviet relations on a more constructive course for years to come. I have no illusions. I understand well the difficulties involved, but I feel an obligation to make a sincere effort at least to narrow some of the profound differences between us. If we can make any progress toward that goal, I believe that all peoples throughout the world will benefit. General Secretary Gorbachev and I will surely discuss our respective ideas of how best to bring about deep reductions in arms levels. If the Soviets are ready for the give and take that an arms agreement will require, they'll find us ready as well.

I think it is also important to remember that arms, whether nuclear or conventional, do not come to exist for no reason. They exist because nations have very real differences among themselves and suspicions about each other's intentions. Thus, a frank discussion of our concerns about Soviet behavior, particularly its attempts to expand its influence by force and subversion, is an important part of our effort to focus on the sources of world tension, not just the symptoms. To establish the foundation for a truly more constructive relationship, I want to talk with General Secretary Gorbachev not only about arms control but also about regional tensions, about our bilateral relationship, and about the obligation of both our nations to respect human rights -- all of these issues are as important to us as the question of nuclear arms. I will go to Geneva ready to make whatever progress the Soviets will allow toward resolving them.

May I add that I am aware the people of India and of many other nations sometimes feel that they have no control over what the big powers do in matters that affect all mankind. I want to do my part to dispel this impression. I am very aware of the way people around the globe will be watching our decisions in Geneva, and I can assure them that I will have their concerns in mind when I sit down at the table with General Secretary Gorbachev. I only hope that the General Secretary will come to our talks with a similar attitude. And in my speech to the United Nations General Assembly this week, I will be spelling out in more detail just how I believe we can make real progress toward easing the world tensions that are of concern to us all.

Q.  Important as it is, arms control by itself cannot resolve the geopolitical rivalries of the two superpowers. Would the summit agenda next month include a discussion on some more abiding ways of resolving these differences?

The President. I think you are right in viewing arms control in this broader context. As anyone who has studied the differences between the Western democracies and the Communist system realizes, we have fundamentally different views of the world and fundamentally different ways of behaving in it. My hope would be to find ways with Mr. Gorbachev to ensure that our differences continue to be peaceful. In some other areas, serious discussions may permit the bridging of differences. In those areas, if the Soviets are willing, we can make immediate progress. This progress may lead, in turn, to agreements in other, more contentious areas.

Soviets have had since the beginning of this year. As you know, our regional experts have already met to discuss Afghanistan, the Middle East, Africa, and east Asia. Later this month in Washington, we'll have talks on Central America and the Caribbean. Although these talks haven't resulted in any solutions to problems in those parts of the world, they have been useful for two reasons. First, by clarifying our respective positions on regional issues, we lessen the chance of miscalculations or misunderstandings between us. Second, these talks give us an opportunity to make clear what we, our allies, and our friends consider important.

Southeast Asia could escalate into a world war. Even if an arms control agreement were to be reached at Geneva, these regional conflicts would continue to threaten world peace. Would you not like to propose next month some restraint on the political conduct of superpowers to defuse these regional conflicts?

The President. Our regional exchanges with the Soviets have covered and will continue to cover these points. Let me suggest briefly how the Soviets can advance the cause of peace in one of these regions, your very own. In Afghanistan, we are witnessing a brutal war simply because the Afghan people are determined to resist an attempt by outsiders to impose a government on them.

It's clear that the Afghan spirit of independence cannot be crushed; that continued war will only mean more bloodshed; and that only a political solution is possible. The Soviets claim that they, too, believe in a negotiated settlement. I will be asking General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva whether, if that is so, he is willing to address the crucial issue: withdrawal of the more than 100,000 Soviet troops in Afghanistan and the restoration of that country's independence and nonalignment.

I know the Soviet Union has concerns about the countries on its border, but Afghanistan poses no threat to Soviet security. We Americans also have neighbors, and neighbors that do not always agree with us; however, look at our borders with Canada and Mexico. They stretch for thousands of miles, and not an inch of them is defended. Bear in mind, too, that both of these countries have very independent political systems and foreign policies, and, in fact, Mexico is one of the leaders of the nonaligned movement. The way to solve regional problems is through dialog and negotiations, not invasion and occupation.

Q. Former President Nixon has suggested that one of the ways to reduce world tensions is for the two superpowers to stop supplying sophisticated arms to poor developing countries. Do you agree with this view, and would you like to propose a moratorium on such arms supplies at the next summit?

The President. To my mind, poor nations are entitled to security just as rich nations are. That ought to be obvious. The hard question is, what really promotes their security? To answer that, we need a more sophisticated approach than simply trying to cut off military sales and assistance; that has its place in an overall strategy, but it doesn't seem like quite the right place to start.

Start with the real sources of conflict and see how they can most realistically be overcome -- that's our approach. I might add that it hasn't been everyone's approach. Over the past 10 years, a growing source of instability and war in the developing world has been the imposition of new regimes -- Marxist-Leninist ones -- that are, almost from the day they take over, at war with their own people, and then before very long, at war with their neighbors. This is a problem that simply has to be addressed, a pattern that has to be broken if we are to avoid the further spread of conflict. The Soviet Union, as we see it, is too often supporting, and sometimes directing, these wars. In such cases, the flow of arms from outside is a major concern, and we want to do something about it. I'll speak on this subject this week at the United Nations and, of course, with General Secretary Gorbachev when I meet him in Geneva.

Q. In view of the danger of proliferation and the graver risk of miniaturization of nuclear weapons, which could bring such weapons within the reach of terrorists, would you not like to put some more determined restraint on countries that have an advanced nuclear weapons-making program?

The President. Our concern about the proliferation of nuclear weapons is a matter of public record. We have been working with a number of countries, including the Soviet Union, to control access to both weapons and technology, in good part because of the kind of concerns you mention. It really is a grave threat, both proliferation and miniaturization, and restraining proliferation is a big part of our effort to reduce the threat of nuclear war or nuclear accident or incident. We recognize that a country's sense of insecurity may lead it to look for a nuclear option, yet if one pauses to think, one has to agree that possession of nuclear weapons actually adds to the insecurity. We hope that the countries of south Asia will set an example by forgoing nuclear weapons.

Q. Recently, the Soviet Union also came in for attack from the terrorists -- one of its diplomats was killed in the Middle East. Countries like the United States and India have been facing the problem of international terrorism. Would you not like to bring this up and make a joint declaration from the summit pronouncing terrorism and abetment of terrorism an international crime?

The President. We have condemned the kidnaping of Soviet diplomats in Beirut. The murder of one of the Soviets was an abhorrent act, and we have expressed our regret to the Soviet Union. In turn, we note with satisfaction their condemnation of the Achille Lauro terrorists. We hope that this is a sign that their own recent experiences may have made them aware that terrorism knows no international boundaries and lead them to reassess their policy of support for terrorist organizations and states. India for its part has suffered the terrible loss of a great national leader, Madame Gandhi. The U.S. also has suffered terribly from terrorism and is determined to combat it vigorously. We would be pleased if the Soviets would join us in a common effort to stamp out terrorism. Unfortunately, we believe some of their policies actually encourage terrorism.

Q. Mr. President, it is believed that your stand on the Strategic Defense Initiative, which has come to be known as the Star Wars system of defense, is crucial to the success of the summit next month. What is SDI, and why does the United States have to change from deterrence to defense?

The President. For at least the past 30 years, deterrence has rested on the threat of offensive nuclear retaliation; the United States and the Soviet Union have been hostage to each other's nuclear forces. Our retaliatory deterrent has enabled us to live in peace with freedom; however, the ability to deter rests on an equitable and stable strategic balance. That balance is now being increasingly threatened by the continuing Soviet buildup in offensive nuclear forces, a buildup which began in the early seventies, as well as deep Soviet involvement in strategic defense. Our Strategic Defense Initiative is a prudent response to these Soviet programs. It is a research program, being conducted in conformity with our treaty obligations, which seeks to establish whether in the future deterrence could be based increasingly on defensive systems which threaten no one, rather than on the threat of offensive retaliation.

I began this intensified research effort on March 23, 1983, when I proposed that we explore the possibility of countering the awesome Soviet missile threat with defensive systems that could intercept and destroy missiles before they strike their targets. Such a defense-oriented world would not be to any single nation's advantage, but would benefit all. And the research and testing of SDI would move us toward our ultimate goal of eliminating nuclear weapons altogether from the face of the Earth. By necessity, this is a very long-term goal. For years to come, we will have to continue to base deterrence on the threat of nuclear retaliation, but there is no reason why we should not begin now to seek a safer, more stable world.

The President. I have directed that the SDI research program be conducted in a manner fully consistent with all U.S. treaty obligations, including the ABM treaty. We are and intend to remain in full compliance with the ABM treaty and to seek Soviet compliance as well.

Q. Sir, you have said that new technologies are now at hand which make possible a truly effective nonnuclear defense, and for that reason you have launched the SDI. Do you believe that the U.S.A. will continue to have a lasting lead in these technologies? Don't you think that the Soviet Union will catch up as it did in the case of the MIRV technology, which was a U.S. monopoly in the sixties?

The President. It is not a question of the Soviet Union catching up with U.S. technologies. For over two decades, the Soviet Union has pursued an intensive research program in many of the same basic technological areas that our research program will address. For example, more than 10,000 Soviet scientists and engineers are engaged in their advanced laser research program. A comprehensive report on Soviet strategic defense programs has just been released by our State and Defense Departments. If we do not respond to Soviet strategic defense efforts, Soviet programs in both offense and defense could seriously threaten our ability to deter attack.

Q. The first nation to achieve both defensive and offensive capabilities might well be tempted to launch a devastating nuclear first strike. Since decisionmaking in the Soviet political system is secret and highly centralized, as distinct from the open system of governance in the U.S.A., the U.S.S.R. could well be that nation. By advocating SDI, therefore, sir, are you not promoting the first-strike capabilities of the Soviet Union?

The President. If the Soviet Union were to achieve overwhelming superiority in both offensive and defensive systems, it could come to believe that it could launch a nuclear attack against the U.S. or its allies without fear of effective retaliation. That is why the U.S. is concerned over the massive Soviet investment in both offensive and defensive systems. SDI is, in part, a response to the danger from these Soviet military programs. It is aimed precisely at strengthening deterrence and stability by reducing the danger that the Soviets might be tempted to think in terms of a nuclear first strike.

Q. Mr. President, do you share the apprehension that SDI would give a new dimension to the arms race by taking nuclear weapons into outer space and that this could heighten tensions at the decisionmaking levels of both the superpowers, making the world more unstable and insecure?

Q. Some strategists have suggested that while the U.S.A. moves close to actual deployment of a defensive space weapons system, the Soviet Union would be under an increasingly desperate temptation to strike while it still has a chance. For that reason, would you not like to launch a joint superpower initiative for research in defensive space weapons so that the fears and suspicions raised by SDI are obviated?

The President. As I said earlier, we are seeking agreement in Geneva on ways to strengthen deterrence through the introduction of defensive systems into the force structures of both sides, if the technologies which we are both investigating prove feasible and cost-effective. Our negotiators at Geneva are prepared to discuss how such a transition could be carried out in a stable manner. And I want very much to explain personally to General Secretary Gorbachev how important it is for him not to let this chance to set arms control on a more hopeful course pass by.

Q. What is the Soviet Union doing in the field of strategic defense? Do you think that the Soviet opposition to SDI is merely pre-summit posturing similar to their opposition to cruise missile deployment in Western Europe?

The President. Posturing is a good word. Although they have been treating strategic defenses as if they were solely an American invention, the Soviets, over the past 20 years, have spent roughly as much for strategic defense as they have for their massive offensive buildup. During this time, it has been the Soviets who have built the world's most extensive network of civil defenses and the most widespread air defense system; who have deployed the world's only operational ABM and antisatellite systems; and who have devoted extensive resources to investigating many of the very same technologies we are now examining in our SDI research. Some of these Soviet efforts, such as their construction of a large phased-array radar in central Siberia, are in clear violation of the 1972 ABM treaty; others are questionable under the treaty.

Soviets are intent on undermining the U.S. SDI program, while minimizing any constraints on their own ongoing strategic defense activities. For our part, we believe that it is important that our two countries get down to a serious, no-nonsense dialog about the questions of how we might together enable our mutual interest in strategic defenses to lead to a more stable balance.

Q. All the ills of the world are not due to Russia. If there were no Russia, the problems of poverty and underdevelopment of most of the world would still be there. Next month, the two strongest leaders of the world are meeting in Geneva. Is this not an opportunity to cry halt to the deployment and development of all new nuclear weapons and to divert the resources thus saved to improve the lot of the poorest countries of the world?

The President. I certainly would like to see a world in which there are no nuclear weapons and plentiful resources devoted to the eradication of world poverty. I suspect that I won't see such an ideal world during my lifetime, but I will do all I can to help this dream come true. If General Secretary Gorbachev and I can address some of our differences frankly, we will perhaps have taken one small step towards this goal, and no one should underestimate the importance of that.

Although the Soviet Union is not the source of all the troubles of the developing world, we do think that the Soviet Government has too often supported forces intent on imposing their rule by violence. This not only creates untold suffering and halts economic and social development but often introduces an East-West element in the disputes when there should be none. These practices must stop if we are to create a safer and better world. All nations are entitled to work out their destinies free from force and violence, particularly that coming from other countries.

Let me suggest, then, one immediate way that the peoples of the West and the Soviet Union can help the poorer nations: by keeping the competition of ideas peaceful. Let there be competition by example -- no subversion of free governments, no invasion, no occupation, no injection of foreign troops to support factions in internal disputes. Developing habits of solving problems peacefully would benefit all. We already are observing those principles, because they are the only ones consistent with our vision of the future.

Perhaps I can close by saying a word about that vision as it applies to the developing nations. As you know, the United States has contributed billions of dollars to economic and social development in all regions of the globe; most of this aid has gone to nations that won their independence during the past few decades. Hundreds of thousands of Third World students, many of them from India, have received American university educations. Both the U.S. Government and private American donors are contributing great sums today to famine relief in especially needy countries.

But, to be frank, aid levels aren't the heart of the matter. The future of the developing nations, both economic and political, really depends on the resolution of a broader issue; that is, whether those institutions of freedom are created that are the best, and in the long term the only source of economic growth and guarantee of individual dignity. India's great victory in the past 40 years has been to protect those institutions through good times and bad. The benefits you win from them are probably only just beginning. They are the basis of so much of the cultural vigor and economic dynamism that we see in your country now. Free institutions, however, aren't just a freak of history, something that only a few peoples can ever hope to enjoy. There's no reason they can't take deeper root throughout the Third World. If they do -- well, almost anything will be possible.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Frances Barrett Hammer to be an alternate member on the part of the United States on the Roosevelt Campobello International Park Commission. She will succeed Grace Tully.

Mrs. Hammer is a member of the Amazing Blue Ribbon 400 and is on the board of directors of the Armand Hammer United World College of the American West. She has participated in the Armand Hammer Conferences for Peace and Human Rights as well as other projects for improvements in human and cultural needs. Mrs. Hammer is one of the founders of the International Student Center at UCLA. She is also a recipient of the Award of the American Women for International Understanding and Peace.

The problem of terrorism has become an international concern that knows no boundaries -- religious, racial, political, or national. Thousands of men, women, and children have died at the hands of terrorists in nations around the world, and the lives of many more have been blighted by the fear and grief that terrorist attacks have caused to peace-loving peoples. Today, unfortunately, terrorism continues to claim many innocent lives.

Recent events in the Middle East, including the piratic seizure of the ACHILLE LAURO and the brutal murder of Leon Klinghoffer, only serve to remind us of the intolerable threat from terrorists. All Americans share the sorrow of the families of their victims, and we are determined that those responsible be brought to justice.

October 23 is the second anniversary of the date on which the largest number of Americans was killed in a single act of terrorism -- the bombing of the United States compound in Beirut, Lebanon on October 23, 1983, in which 241 United States servicemen lost their lives. These brave soldiers died defending our cherished ideals of freedom and peace. It is appropriate that we honor these men and all other victims of terrorism. Let us also offer our profound condolences to the families and friends of the victims of these unprovoked and contemptible acts of violence.

Nations. The world is a busy place. It's full of movement and action, and it's good for us to get away from things for an hour or two and meet in the quiet of this great room, consider the meaning of the United Nations, its past and its future. There are a great number of distinguished world leaders here today. I believe, Mr. Secretary General, that their presence bears witness to the enduring vitality of the idea of the United Nations. I believe it also bears witness to the success of your leadership during a challenging time for both the U.N. and the world.

This anniversary, for all of us -- a time for reflection as well as celebration. The nations and the peoples of the world value the United Nations for many things, but most, perhaps, for what it symbolizes. The U.N. began as a symbol of hope and reconciliation 40 years ago after the worst war in history; it's no less a symbol today. The United Nations is still a symbol of man's great hope that some day he'll be able to resolve all disputes through peaceful discussion and never again through the force of arms. The United Nations is a symbol of man's long struggle to rise beyond his own flawed nature and live by the high ideals that the best of mankind have defined and declared down through the ages.

We have criticized it sometimes in the past when we felt that it was not all it could be and should be. And we have on occasion been frustrated, but we have never stopped believing in its possibilities, and we've never stopped taking the United Nations seriously. That is why we are determined to see to it that the United Nations lives up to its noble potential to further the cause of freedom, defend individual rights, increase economic growth and well-being, and strengthen the rule of law.

And so, today, 40 years after the birth of the United Nations and 15 years before the end of the century whose tribulations inspired it, let us, together, seize the moment. Let us recapture the vision of the charter and recall the principles upon which the U.N. was founded. Let us resolve to make this organization and the world it represents a better, safer place. And let us renew our commitment, individually and together, to peace and justice and the rights of man. And may I presume to suggest a toast to the Secretary General and what he has accomplished and what he is doing for all of us.

Mr. Danzansky is a partner in the Washington office of the law firm of Willkie Farr & Gallagher, where he served as managing partner. He has been appointed under three Presidents and elected Chairman of the District of Columbia Law Revision Commission; has been an adjunct professor at George Washington University School of Law; and is a member of the D.C. Bar Association, International Trade Commission Trial Lawyers Committee, and the International Law Institute Advisory Board. He was appointed by President Reagan to serve as a member of the Advisory Committee for Trade Negotiations. Mr. Danzansky has also served as an officer and director of numerous civic and cultural organizations.

Well, the deep desire to be free moves people everywhere to resist oppression, from Afghanistan to Cambodia, Angola, Ethiopia, and Nicaragua. Make no mistake, the attempt to impose repressive dictatorships subordinated to Soviet objectives is a fundamental source of tension in many regions of the world. This is why our support for struggling resistance forces shall not cease, why in my address to the U.N. I proposed a three-part initiative to resolve regional conflicts: First, negotiations among warring parties to end the violence and to bring about the democratic reforms and respect for human rights essential for national reconciliation. Second, once progress is made by those directly involved, the United States and the Soviet Union should negotiate the elimination of all foreign military presence and flow of outside arms. Third, when progress is made through negotiations to end the violence, to bring about democratic reforms and to eliminate the foreign military presence, the United States will ask other nations to join in supporting economic recovery and reconstruction.

When I meet with General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva, I intend to make our regional peace initiative a key part of our discussions. How can we discuss the goal of a more peaceful and civilized world without discussing those places where peace is being violated and innocent people are being killed? Does the Soviet Union share our conviction that true peace must rest on the right of all people to choose their destiny, to grow and develop free from coercion and fear? Well, we shall see in Geneva. Secretary of State Shultz will be taking up these and other issues on his forthcoming trip to Moscow.

We Americans are practical. We seek practical solutions to problems that seemed intractable, from achieving the universal immunization of children to finding new ways to protect civilization against missile attack. Talking about a safer world is not good enough; we must make it happen. I had detailed discussions with some of our allied leaders this past week. Our conversations convinced me more than ever that we are on the right track. We're negotiating hard with the Soviet Union on reducing offensive nuclear weapons. We have proposals on the table for deep reductions and are examining their counterproposal. We're also determined to move ahead on research and testing of our Strategic Defense Initiative to see whether an effective nonnuclear defense against a nuclear attack is feasible.

Finally, we're combating the deadly menace of international terror. Our action weeks ago to apprehend the Palestinian hijackers was not our last. We're working with all peace-loving nations to create a united front against terrorism, and we're fighting the international narcotics traffickers poisoning our youth. The First Lady's drug conference at the United Nations, which Nancy hosted this week, bringing together 31 first ladies from around the world, will raise global awareness and hopefully touch the conscience of the world.

This has been an important week. We have held high our banner for personal freedom, human progress, and global peace. Now we must go forward to do what is not only practical and beneficial but what is right and just.

Humphrey -- also, representatives from Associations United To Cut Federal Spending -- 38 trade organizations led by Wayne Smith, who advised the caucus -- and lastly, former members of the Grace commission and of another of my favorite organizations, Citizens Against Government Waste, cochaired by Peter Grace and Jack Anderson. You know, Peter, every time you're here I start thinking about how the Grace contingent keeps growing in numbers, in power, and in influence. Believe me, nothing delights me more, because we need a people's lobby here in Washington.

All of you are here today because of your deep concern about a problem in government that's easy to talk about in terms of saving billions of dollars a year. The war against waste and inefficiency is worth waging on just these grounds alone, but I know your involvement goes even beyond this.

The people who came before us in this nation put a heavy emphasis on what is today almost a forgotten virtue. I remember back in Dixon, Illinois, when I was growing up, it was called thriftiness. Thriftiness was a quality appreciated as a kind of signal about the maturity and judgment of a person or institution, an indication that deeper values were there. Some of you in business have noticed that when a company gets in trouble, there are more serious problems than simple inefficiency -- all sorts of projects and activities that are wasteful or marginal and a neglect of those products or services that made the firm successful in the first place.

Well, then these special interests became involved. Pretty soon the way to a prospering political career was to vote for higher appropriations and for grand, new spending schemes that appeal to this or that voting bloc. And if this pattern of putting politics over country sounds familiar, that's because it is. Historians have frequently seen in this ``bread and circuses'' climate the signs of government in decline and a nation in decay. Faith in our democratic system -- and without that faith democracy simply can't work -- was being undermined. As James Madison said, ``It's the gradual and silent encroachments of governments, not sudden revolutions, that prove to be the threat to freedom.'' So, it was the average citizen who harbored enormous feelings of resentment toward government and an enormous sense of frustration. They believed the only voices that were heard in this city were those of the organized lobbies or special interests, not the taxpayers.

Those of you associated with the Grace commission have forthrightly and without apologies helped change all of this. You've shown that citizens from every walk of life could come to the Capitol and not only make their voices heard but persuade and, yes, push and prod government to change its ways. The Grace commission stood back and took a look at government, concluded that the Federal Government had lost its moorings, came up with concrete proposals on how to recover those moorings. But, as I know Peter believes, the most important part of the job is upon us -- making sure that the Grace commission is not remembered as just another government commission and that its recommendations don't become just another pile of reports gathering dust in the Library of Congress; in short, implementing as many recommendations as possible.

And on this point, I've just come from a meeting with the Domestic Policy Council. I've received a final report that shows we are going forward with over 80 percent -- as a matter of fact, 83 percent of the commission's recommendations. Many have already been implemented; others included in the '86 budget; and a number will be proposed in the '87 budget. Even with the recommendations deferred at this time, we have every intention of trying to implement as many of them as possible in the future. I've asked Jim Miller to have OMB continue to monitor our progress and report to me periodically through the Domestic Policy Council. I also thanked Peter Grace at the close of the meeting, and let me do so now again publicly.

Washington. You shook this city up. You put the issue of waste and inefficiency front and center on the public agenda, and I am grateful to you and so is America. But now, we must work together to get your recommendations through the Congress, and that's what this people's lobby of yours is all about. It's why the Congressional Caucus leaders who are here today are so important. Imagine the courage of these Members of Congress who would dare to associate themselves with such a clear-cut effort to thwart the special interests. And I want to thank each one of them who are here today.

In carrying on this battle, you're going to need the help of the largest pressure group of all -- the taxpayers. And that's why the multimillion-dollar, nonpartisan campaign by the Advertising Council is so important in helping to inform and educate the taxpayers. And finally, that's why the work of the trade associations and Citizens Against Government Waste are also vital -- vital in the battle against budget deficits and vital to the strength and resiliency of the democratic system and public confidence in our government.

So, I want to congratulate you on all that you've done. You know, I've mentioned this to you before, but I can well remember a time when waste and inefficiency were thought of as issues without any political appeal, issues that stirred little interest in the media or among the seers and sayers of Washington. Well, all of that has changed. Government management -- mismanagement, I should say, is a hot story, and the Grace commission has played a key role in bringing the change about. In fact, I want you to know the vigor with which you've pursued this fight has inspired me on other closely related matters, and once again, the issue is your issue -- making government responsive to the people.

First, I must warn the Congress that their unwillingness to deal with the debt ceiling and to take responsible action on the deficit is creating a large and unnecessary problem. We're running up against the possibility that we may have to disinvest the Social Security Trust Fund, shortchanging that trust fund of accumulated interest, all because of the inexcusable dithering and delay in meeting the responsibilities about raising the debt ceiling. So, please help us convince them -- present company exempted; they're convinced -- that the time for political gamesmanship was over long ago.

All of us know the importance of an effective resolution this year to our deficit problem, and I happen to think the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings proposal is an excellent one. This proposal is linked closely to what you're doing, because if we can adopt the plan, we can maintain our commitment to a strong defense while providing a framework for the Grace reforms and a device for flushing out waste and inefficiency. Congress must not fail the people on this.

Hospices play an important role in our national medical care system. Terminally ill hospice patients receive expert medical care while they and their families can develop essential emotional and spiritual support.

Under the hospice concept, each program has a team of physicians, nurses, social workers, pharmacists, psychological and spiritual counselors, and community volunteers -- all trained to assist the terminally ill. The team works together to care for patients and their families, especially helping them to cope with their pain and grief.

Hospices are rapidly becoming full partners in our health care system. In November 1983, hospice care benefits became available to people under Medicare. Many private insurance carriers and employers have also recognized the value of hospice care and included hospice benefits in their health care plans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

American farmers are the most productive in the world. But without farm machinery, fuel, electric power, chemical products, and other supplies from industry, our farms could never have achieved this remarkable level of efficiency.

American consumers have the widest variety and the most plentiful supply of food and fiber products that can be found anywhere. But without adequate transportation, processing, and marketing, our consumers could not reap the full benefits of our bounteous farms, orchards, and ranches.

States a cornucopia for its own citizens, able to share its superabundance with a world where large regions suffer from critical shortages of food, often because of policies that discourage initiative and thwart progress.

It is within the family that we first gain an understanding of who we are; that we learn to give and receive love; that we learn to respect the individuality of others; that we grow to be strong, healthy adults able to take our place in the larger families of community, country, and the world.

Through the family we pass on our traditions, our rituals, and our values. From our families we receive the love, encouragement, and education needed to meet life's challenges. Family life also provides a stimulus for the spiritual growth that fosters probity of character, generosity of spirit, and responsible citizenship.

It is important that we dedicate ourselves to the promotion of strong families for, with their strength, commitment, and loyalty, they form the hearth and heart of our national life. As an eminent American educator has wisely observed: ``The security and elevation of the family and of family life are the prime objects of civilization, and the ultimate ends of all industry.'' Special concern is due to troubled families, for we recognize that any chain is only as strong as its weakest link. At their best, strong families are small communities of love. Let us help them prosper.

Americans who have extended the love and support of their families to a child through adoption or foster care. By giving the shelter of their loving arms to such a child on a temporary or permanent basis, these Americans demonstrate in a special way the unconditional love that only families can provide.

She remains a Wonder of the World -- an uncanny fusion of art and engineering. She is the result of a unique collaboration between two freedom-loving Frenchmen with a profound affection for America: a great sculptor, Frederic-Auguste Bartholdi, and the greatest structural engineer of his time, Alexandre Gustave Eiffel. Next year she will be 100 years old.

She rises majestically 151 feet above the magnificent base designed by Richard M. Hunt, the preeminent American architect. But she is much more than her awesome dimensions and her physical splendor. For millions of anxious immigrants, the forebears of countless millions of today's Americans, she was the first glimpse of America. She was assurance of journey's end, safe harbor reached at last, and the beginning of a new adventure in a free and blessed land. For them she was a dream come true, the Lady with the Lamp, a warm welcome to a new world and a new life.

Since its dedication on October 28, 1886, the Statue of Liberty has held high the beacon of freedom, hope, and opportunity to welcome millions of immigrants and visitors from foreign lands. From that time she has been one of the proudest symbols of the American ideal of liberty and justice for all.

Between 5,000 and 6,000 babies die of SIDS annually in the United States. Most die unobserved in their sleep. Despite two decades of aggressive biomedical and behavioral research, supported in large part by the Federal government, the exact cause of SIDS remains elusive. From what we have learned through research, choking, neglect, infection, and heredity have been ruled out as probable causes, and today the syndrome is attributed to a combination of subtle physiological deficiencies in the infant.

The parents and families of SIDS victims frequently experience intense and traumatic grief, often accompanied by unwarranted feelings of guilt that can result in psychosocial and even physical problems. It is extremely important that the facts about SIDS be widely disseminated and understood in order to banish myths and misconceptions. By working together, parents, schools, private and voluntary organizations, and government at all levels can bring about a greater public understanding of this tragic syndrome.

Three very nice young people. I will speak about them in a few moments. Lee Iacocca, chairman of the Statue of Liberty-Ellis Island Foundation, honored guests, and ladies and gentlemen, on this date in 1886, President Grover Cleveland stood on an island in New York Harbor to dedicate a statue entitled ``Liberty Enlightening the World.'' Ninety-nine years later, the statue is known by a more familiar affectionate name, the Statue of Liberty or simply Miss Liberty. She's cherished across America, and the torch that she bears is recognized throughout the world as a symbol of human freedom.

Legend has it that as he worked, he modeled the statue's face -- that face of utter calm and nobility -- on the features of his own mother. Completed, the statue rose more than 150 feet and was constructed of 200,000 pounds of hand-hammered copper sheathing hung on an iron frame engineered by Gustav Eiffel, who later designed the Eiffel Tower. On July 4th, 1884, the statue was presented to the American Ambassador to France. Built using funds donated by the French people, she was then dismantled and shipped to the United States. Then, she was rebuilt using funds donated by the American people, including money raised by schoolchildren. Ever since, she's stood on her island in that great harbor lighting the way to freedom.

In recent years, it became all too apparent that Ellis Island and Miss Liberty, herself, were being ravaged by the passing of decades. Nearly half of all Americans can trace their ancestry to someone who passed through the Ellis Island checkpoint. But that island, which should be a proud memorial to our forebearers, had instead become a sad and ramshackled place. Miss Liberty, for her part, had been badly corroded by decades of salt air; her iron supports had weakened; in places, she'd become pocked with jagged, rusty holes.

Liberty and rebuild Ellis Island, and to do so with private funds. This effort has become one of the largest private sector initiatives in American history. Across America, everyone is lending a hand; major corporations are making contributions; small businesses are helping out. And I'm pleased to say that just as schoolchildren helped raise the money to build her pedestal and install Miss Liberty back in the 1880's, today, a century later, they're holding bake sales and car washes to see to it that she gets the restoration she needs.

Amy Nessler, of West Deptford Township, New Jersey, who brought a jar of 365 pennies into her first-grade class to help raise money for the Statue of Liberty. The pennies had been collected 15 years earlier by Amy's mother, who, day by day, put one into a jar to mark the time that her fiance was in Vietnam. And now, after all these years, they felt it was only appropriate to give these special coins to Lady Liberty, who symbolizes what Amy's dad fought for -- freedom. Well, I'm very happy that Amy, her mother, and father are here with us today. And finally, there is Donna Daley, a 13-year-old from Ridgeland, South Carolina. When Donna's hometown learned that she was losing her sight to an incurable eye disease, they pitched in to raise money to send her and her family to visit the Statue of Liberty. However, Donna, in the spirit of generosity, donated part of this contribution to the Liberty Restoration Project. And, Donna, you're a fine example to us all.

So far, this private sector initiative has raised more than $170 million, well on its way to its goal of 230 million. Today Miss Liberty and Ellis Island are surrounded by scaffolding; workers are on the sites 24 hours a day. Among countless other repairs, they're giving the statue new iron supports and fitting her pedestal with the tallest hydraulic elevator in America. On Ellis Island, they're giving the main building a new roof, replacing the copper towers, and completely restoring the interiors. Much has been accomplished, but there's still a great deal to be done in order to reopen Ellis Island and the Statue of Liberty by the only appropriate date -- the Fourth of July, 1986.

Well, I'm looking forward to attending the Liberty Weekend celebration next July and the hundredth anniversary a year from today. David Wolper, who is producing the Liberty Weekend activities, has promised to outdo himself, which won't be easy, after seeing the superb job he did with the 1976 bicentennial and the 1984 Olympics. And Ambassador Mosbacher has planned quite a display himself with the tall ships of Operation Sail.

Liberty and Ellis Island, perhaps our nation's most moving and powerful symbols of freedom. And drawing inspiration from these symbols, let us rededicate ourselves to the great cause of human liberty throughout the world.

President, the President's Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board (the ``Board''). The Board shall consist of not more than fourteen members, who shall serve at the pleasure of the President and shall be appointed by the President from among trustworthy and distinguished citizens outside the government who are qualified on the basis of achievement, experience, and independence. The President shall establish the terms of the members upon their appointment. To the extent practicable, one-third of the Board at any one time shall be comprised of members whose current term of service does not exceed two years. The President shall designate a Chairman and Vice Chairman from among the members. The Board shall utilize full-time staff and consultants as authorized by the President. Such staff shall be headed by an Executive Director, appointed by the President.

Sec. 4. The Board shall receive, consider, and recommend appropriate action with respect to matters, identified to the Board by the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency, or other government agencies engaged in intelligence or related activities, in which the support of the Board will further the effectiveness of the national intelligence effort. With respect to matters deemed appropriate by the President, the Board shall advise and make recommendations to the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency, and other government agencies engaged in intelligence and related activities, concerning ways to achieve increased effectiveness in meeting national intelligence needs.

On the recommendation of his Economic Policy Council, the President has decided to permit the export of a small quantity of Alaskan oil produced at Cook Inlet. This administrative action does not permit export of oil from the North Slope of Alaska, which is a question to be addressed in a Commerce Department study that will be submitted to Congress next April.

This decision is consistent with the administration's market-oriented policy of removing barriers to trade and encouraging others to do likewise. U.S. interests will be well served because of the reduced oil transportation costs associated with shipping oil to Asia rather than to U.S. refining terminals. This will generate higher revenues to producers, thereby generating higher Federal and Alaska State tax revenues. In addition, the incentive to explore and develop oil reserves in the Cook Inlet area will increase. The President, in making his decision, sought nothing in exchange.

This action has long been recommended by Senator Frank Murkowski, and the President has expressed his utmost appreciation to the Senator for his advice on the issue. Furthermore, the administration will be consulting with Congress to ensure that these benefits to the U.S. are well understood.

Since 1961 Mr. Harder has been serving as a State senator in Kansas. In the senate he serves as chairman of the senate education committee; chairman of the master planning commission; a member of the senate ways and means committee; and a member of the commercial and financial institutions committee. From 1972 to 1976, he was the majority floor leader of the Kansas senate.

Thank you all very much, and welcome to the White House. I always feel self-conscious when I say that, and I say that every time I'm in here, but somehow, technically -- and that just kind of explains some of the problems of government -- that this Old Executive Office Building is part of the White House. I haven't put my clothes in a single closet over here.

Well, I'm glad to welcome members of the clergy and lay leaders to Washington. I've always assumed that men of the cloth can visit this town and really see how it works without returning home feeling the need to pray fervently, and let me tell you, we need all the help we can get. I also feel a certain kinship with those of you who are members of the clergy. Now, this is a comparison that isn't always made, but politicians and clergy do have a lot in common. We both have to make speeches and keep our audiences interested, and I know I'm running a risk in telling members of the clergy a story about their own profession, but maybe it will be new to some of you.

I've come to talk to you about our efforts to overhaul our nation's tax code, but I first want to stress our commitment to solving the school dropout problem and youth unemployment. The two subjects aren't unrelated because a vital, growing economy, liberated from high tax rates and an unfair and restrictive tax code, is the best way to provide opportunity for all. For the special problem of our unemployed young people, a youth employment opportunity wage is also vital.

Now, if you haven't heard that term expressed, it's something we've asked of the Congress and asked that they do. The figures reveal that every time the minimum wage has increased, the number of jobs available for teenagers, young people, has gone down -- those afterschool jobs, those weekend, and those summer jobs. The jobs are simply priced out of existence. They aren't that necessary, and we've made the cost too high. The school dropout problem is more complex, but I think that we can all agree that it's at least attributable in part to the increase in family breakdown. But one of the common causes of dropout from school also is a need or desire to be earning some money.

Federal Government, instead of helping, has been adding to the burden of families. Throughout the great tax explosion of the sixties and seventies, everybody with a paycheck got hit and hit hard by taxes, but those trying to raise families really got clobbered. Not only did their taxes skyrocket, their personal exemption, the real value of the deduction that they were allowed to take for themselves and each one of their dependents, was steadily knocked down by inflation. If the personal exemption, which was $600 in 1948, had kept pace with inflation, that exemption today would be $2,700.

Now, this is where the profamily initiatives of America's fair share tax plan come in. We're not going to go to the $2,700 -- or haven't asked to do that -- but in our tax plan we have asked to almost double it, to raise it to $2,000 in order to make up for some of what the family has lost over those years. We're also increasing the standard deduction to $4,000 for joint returns. Our proposal will mean that families, as well as the elderly, the blind, and the disabled, living at or below the poverty line will be completely scratched from the Federal income tax rolls. The U.S.

Government will no longer tax families into poverty. And under our proposal, a family of four wouldn't have to pay one single cent of Federal income taxes on the first $12,000 of income. And because saving is so essential to families, but so very difficult with all those expenses, we're expanding the tax-free savings accounts of IRA's, the individual retirement accounts, so that they're fully available to nonwage-earning spouses. We think they're working, too.

Democratically controlled House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families rated our plan more profamily than any other tax proposal around and light years ahead of the present system. And then, there's Pat Moynihan, the Democratic Senator from New York. He said that our profamily provisions will ``do more for the poor than Lyndon Johnson ever did during the years of the Great Society.'' So, I guess the question is: Are we going to give up and stick with a tax system loved only by the special interests and their high-priced tax attorneys, or are we going to stop making excuses and give the poor the break from unfair taxation they so very urgently need? Indeed, giving everyone a break from this unfair tax situation.

Opportunity also means economic growth, and the best way to achieve that's by cutting tax rates still further. One of the great economic lessons of the last few years is the beneficial effect of tax rate reductions. We've seen that as tax rates go down, all the negative economic indicators, like poverty and inflation, go down, too; and all the positive economic indicators, like productivity, disposable income, and employment, go up. Something else also goes up when marginal tax rates are cut -- believe it or not -- at the lower rates, government revenue increases; it does not go down with the cut in the rates.

Tax rates in this country, long ago, passed the point where they became counterproductive, stunting economic growth and actually bringing in less revenue than tax rate cuts that spur growth and draw investment out of wasteful loopholes and back into the productive economy. Just a few years ago, before our present tax cut -- the one that we launched in 1981 -- before that, there was only $39 million in America available for what is called venture capital -- to be invested into new ventures and new business and so forth. Well, last year, after our tax cuts were in effect, there was $4 billion available for such investment.

Our first tax cut -- you can see the across-the-board thing -- it was 25 percent. And since 1984 -- that was the first year that all of the three installments of our tax cut were in place -- we found that the tax revenues have been increasing at a rapid pace. And in fiscal year 1985, which ended October 1st, Federal revenues continued to grow at the remarkable rate of 10 percent. Now, let me suggest that over the long haul, the Federal Government simply can't raise revenue any faster than by cutting tax rates and, then, cutting them again. So, it doesn't make much sense to blame the deficit on tax cuts, and even less to ask for economy-busting tax hikes as a cure. The deficit is quite clearly caused by overspending. The government Gargantua has been eating up those extra revenues from our tax cut and pounding on the table demanding more. Well, we're going to put Gargantua on a diet, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings diet. It would pare $36 billion a year off its overeating, resulting in a balanced budget by 1990. All we're asking is that Congress take a little over one-half the extra $60-odd billion in revenue generated by our tax cuts and economic growth and use it to reduce the deficit.

Well, we're seeing an economic renaissance in this country, but we need two things to keep it going: cuts in the deficit and cuts in the tax rates. Both are in the Congress now, and we need your support to keep their noses to the grindstone. As for America's fair share tax plan, we're shooting for Christmastime. Economic growth and tax fairness are gifts we owe ourselves and our children, and with your help, we'll have them all wrapped up by the holiday season, ready to take effect in 1986. And then we'll really have something to celebrate on New Year's Day.

Issue two, political potpourri. [Laughter] We're talking about the four horsemen of the political apocalypse and their now-famous rotating chair. By the way, Pat Buchanan rotated all the way to a windowless office down the hall in the west wing just across from the broom closet.

One last word in keeping with the format of the show -- I'd like to offer a prediction. [Laughter] I predict that besides your current outlets, you're going to be carried by at least one other major city -- ``Miami Vice,'' watch out. [Laughter] As you've heard, the group promises real mayhem, and this kid McLaughlin, he means business. [Laughter] Well, thank you for making that half hour every weekend something very special to look forward to. I wouldn't miss it. I can't afford to.

The President. Well, I think that the most that we could get out is if we could eliminate some of the paranoia, if we could reduce the hostility, the suspicion that keeps our two countries particularly -- but basically, should we say, the Warsaw bloc and the West -- at odds with each other. And while I know everyone is looking toward and emphasizing a reduction in arms -- this is vital and important, but I see reduction in arms as a result, not a cause. If we can reduce those suspicions between our two countries, the reduction of arms will easily follow because we will reduce the feeling that we need them.

Mr. Widlake. Mr. Shultz is off to Moscow on Saturday to do the groundwork for this summit fully aware, as he himself admits, that there are major differences between the United States and Russia. Apart from the paranoia which you talked about, what are those differences as you see them?

The President. Oh, my heavens. Here are two systems so diametrically opposed that -- I'm no linguist, but I've been told that in the Russian language there isn't even a word for freedom. And two nations everyone's referring to as the ``superpowers'' obviously are competitive and our philosophies and our ideas on the world -- and that probably can't be corrected, but we can have a peaceful competition. We have to live in the world together. There's no sense in believing that we must go on with the threat of a nuclear war hanging over the world because of our disagreements.

We don't like their system; they don't like ours, but we're not out to change theirs. I do feel sometimes they're out to change ours -- but if we could get along. They have a system of totalitarian government and rule of their people; we have one in which we believe the people rule the government. And there isn't any reason why we can't coexist in the world. Where there are legitimate areas of competition, compete; but do it in a manner that recognizes that neither one of us should be a threat to the other.

The President. No, I would think that probably the main point in their meeting ahead of the major meeting is to establish an agenda. In other words, Secretary [of State] Shultz would tell them the things that we feel are important to be discussed. Minister Shevardnadze will probably have a list of things that are on their agenda, so that we can plan and neither one of us be caught by surprise at the summit with having a subject come up that hadn't even been considered. So, I think that this is probably the main, useful purpose that will be served by their getting together.

Geneva, where our arms control delegations are meeting and have been meeting for a long time, we have had a proposal for a reduction of nuclear weapons. Now, for the first time, the Soviet Union has made a counterproposal. We have put that in the hands of our people in Geneva now for them to look at; we ourselves are studying it. There are some elements in there that are -- well, we've called them ``seeds to nurture,'' things that we look at and say, ``Yes, these could very easily be acceptable.'' At the same time, in their proposal there are some things that we believe are so disadvantageous to us that they should be negotiated and some changes made.

And with all of this going on, I'm not in a position to say now at what point will we make our reply to their counteroffer and state where we are or where we differ and so forth, and then, that should be the area in which negotiations would take place. Now, whether that doesn't happen prior to the summit meeting or whether our team in Geneva tables it before they adjourn for their recess that is coming up, that I can't answer; that still remains to be seen.

Geneva, but particularly I'd like to talk to you about the Strategic Defense Initiative and how important that is going to be. Can anything be achieved in Geneva without some understanding from both sides in this area?

The President. Probably not, but I think there can be an understanding when they hear what we have in mind. I believe that this is something that is probably one of the most momentous things in a century. We have a team that, within the terms of the ABM treaty, is researching to see if there is a defensive weapon, the possibility of a defensive weapon that could intercept missiles before they reach their target, instead of having a deterrent to war, as we have now, which is both sides with massive weapons of destruction -- nuclear missiles -- and the only thing deterring war is the threat we represent to each other of killing millions and millions of citizens on both sides.

Now, if we can come up with a defensive weapon, then, we reach -- and we know that we have it, that it is there, that it is practical, that it will work -- then, my idea is that we go to the world, we go to our allies, we go to the Soviet Union, and we say, ``Look, we are not going to just start deploying this at the same time we maintain a nuclear arsenal. We think this weapon, this defensive weapon -- we would like to make available, and let's have the world have this for their own protection so that we can all eliminate our nuclear arsenals.'' And the only reason, then, for having the defensive weapon would be, because since everyone in the world knows how to make one, a nuclear weapon -- we would all be protected in case some madman, some day down along the line, secretly sets out to produce some with the idea of blackmailing the world, and the world wouldn't be blackmailed because we would all be sitting here with that defense. I've likened it to what happened in 1925, after World War I -- all the nations got together and outlawed poison gas, but everybody kept their gas masks. So, we would have a world with some nuclear gas masks, and we could sleep at night without thinking that someone could bring this great menace of the nuclear threat against us.

Mr. Widlake. When you say, Mr. President, you'd go to the world once you had proved -- satisfactory to yourself -- that here was a weapon which would actually work. If you go to the world, would you include Russia in that?

The President. Yes. I think that -- what could be safer than -- today everything is offensive weapons. It's the only weapon I know of that's ever been developed in history that has not brought about a defense against it. But what would be safer than if the two great superpowers, the two that have the great arsensals -- both of us sat there with defensive weapons that ensured our safety against the nuclear weapons and both of us eliminated our nuclear missiles.

The President. Why not? And I think this is something to be discussed at the summit as to what kind of an agreement we could make in the event. I would like to say to the Soviet Union, we know you've been researching for this same thing longer than we have. We wish you well. There couldn't be anything better than if both of us came up with it. But if only one of us does, then, why don't we, instead of using it as an offensive means of having a first strike against anyone else in the world, why don't we use it to ensure that there won't be any nuclear strikes?

Mr. Widlake. Are you saying then, Mr. President, that the United States, if it were well down the road towards a proper SDI program, would be prepared to share its technology with Soviet Russia, provided, of course, there were arms reductions and so on on both sides?

Gorbachev, I think, accepts the idea that you could do nothing about research because it's not really verifiable; testing, on the other hand, worries him. Now, does testing, in your view, come within the ABM treaty?

The President. Yes, I believe it does. I think that we're well within it and within a strict adherence to the treaty, although you could have a more liberal interpretation of the treaty that I believe is justified. But rather than have any debate or argument about that, we are staying within the strict limits of the treaty.

The President. I wouldn't see any need for them at all. I wouldn't know why a nation would strap itself to invest in them. But, as I say, there is always the possibility of a madman coming along, and, as I say, you can't eliminate the knowledge about building those weapons -- who might seize upon them. We've had an experience in our lifetime of a madman in the world who caused great tragedy worldwide. And so, I would think that this would be our gas mask.

The President. Well, I would think that this is very much a part of trying to rid the world of the suspicions. They claim that they fear that we of the Western World threaten them, that somehow we're lying here in wait for a day when we can eliminate their method of government and so forth.

There is no evidence to sustain that. If you look back to the end of World War II, our country, for example, absolutely undamaged -- we hadn't had our industries destroyed through bombings and so forth -- and we were the only nation with the bomb, the nuclear weapon. We could have dictated to the world; we didn't. We set out to help even our erstwhile enemies recover. And today those erstwhile enemies are our staunchest allies in the NATO alliance.

Mr. Widlake. Do you think you were being a bit optimistic in your U.N. speech? You proposed the idea that these areas of regional conflict should be discussed. But, of course, you took them much further than that. What you actually said -- they should be discussed up to the point when they're just eliminated. Now, do you think you're being optimistic when you recognize the fact that the fellow sitting opposite you is Mr. Gorbachev, and he's tied up in these things.

The President. Yes. But on the other hand, he has some practical problems in his own country, some problems of how long can they sustain an economy that provides for their people under the terrific cost of building up and pursuing this expansionist policy and this great military buildup.

The President. Yes. And if we can show him that he can resolve those economic problems with no danger to themselves, convince him that we represent no threat, then I could see us -- as I've said before, we don't like each other's systems, maybe we don't like each other; but we're the only two nations that can probably cause a world war. We're also the only two nations that can prevent one.

The President. I would like to feel it's a step along the road, and there needs to be more. I don't think, however, that the human rights thing should be a kind of a public discussion and accusing fingers being pointed at each other and their claim that this is an internal matter with them. But I think it should be explained that some of these violations -- well, first of all is the violation of the Helsinki pact. This was one of the main reasons why we are signatories to that pact is this agreement about not separating families and so forth, allowing people freedom to choose. What they have to understand is that in some of the major areas where we could seek agreement, we have a better chance in our type of society of getting the approval that we need from our Congress, from our people of some of these agreements if these issues, these human rights problems are not standing in the way. And maybe I can point that out.

Mr. Widlake. Mr. President, there have been fears expressed in Europe that arms control will be pushed right down the agenda at Geneva in favor of issues like regional conflict and human rights, which we've been discussing. Can you give an assurance that that is not the case?

The President. Well, I don't know him as yet, but he seems to have shown more of an interest in the people, the man in the street, than other Soviet leaders have. He has expressed great concern about the economic problems and the improvements that he feels that should be made there. And he's younger and more energetic than some of the more recent leaders have been. And I'm optimistic by nature, but I have to be optimistic that he is looking at the entire picture. On the other hand, I don't think we should believe that he is not dedicated to the principles of their system, to communism and so forth. If he wasn't, he wouldn't be where he is.

Mr. Widlake. Do you think he's, in terms of youth, energy, if you like, intelligence, and obviously a powerful grasp of public relations -- do you think he is a pretty formidable Russian leader to deal with compared with his predecessors?

The President. Well, I don't know. On the public relations thing, he did far better with some of our own press than he did with the French press on his recent visit when he was there. I can't judge him on that. Sometimes public relations are made by those reporting, not by those doing.

The President. Well, I know, and yet we felt that we had no choice in the matter if we were going to prevent those terrorists from suddenly, as so many in past have, disappearing into the rabbit warrens that abound the Middle East, Lebanon and so forth; and therefore they would escape being brought to justice. They had murdered a man, a helpless individual. We felt we had to do it.

The President. Yes. And I think that you'd have to judge each case on its own as to the need to bring terrorists to justice; the need to convince them that terrorism is not going to be successful, it is not going to make governments, like your own or our own, change their policies out of fear of terrorism. If that ever happens, then, the world has gone back to anarchy. So, you would have to judge that against how much you would be violating international law to achieve your goal.

The President. Well, 5 years ago when we came here, the United States had allowed its defenses to decline. The United States economy -- I remember attending my first economic summit in Ottawa, Canada -- and that was just in the spring of the year, my first year here -- and I remember our friends and allies, the heads of state of the other summit nations there, beseeching me to stop exporting our inflation and our recession to their countries in this world of international trade and all -- that we were exporting bad economic situations to the rest of the world. The Soviet Union -- again, as I say, through surrogates or on their own -- there was Afghanistan, there was Ethiopia, South Yemen, Angola, Nicaragua, and they had forced governments of their choosing into all of those countries.

Well, it's been 5 years now. We have the greatest recovery, economic recovery that we've ever had in our history. It is not we who are exporting inflation anymore. Inflation is down from those double-digit figures -- well, for the last 5 months it's only been 2\1/2\ percent, and none of our trading partners can match that. Our interest rates are down. We have created almost 9 million new jobs over these 5 years with our economic recovery.

And in the world abroad, the Soviet Union has not stepped in or created a government of its kind in any new country in these 5 years. It's not moved under one additional inch of territory, and I just like to feel that maybe some of the things we did here -- the American people, their spirit was down, they had heard talks, prior to our arrival, that maybe we should give up our high expectations, that never again could we look toward the future as we had in the past, lower our expectations, and so forth.

Today we have a volunteer military, we exceed our enlistment quota every year. We have the highest level of education in the military, in this volunteer military, that we've ever had in our history, even in wartime drafts. The American people have rallied, and with a spirit of voluntarism, voluntarily stepping into problems that once they just let go by and thought somebody in the Government would take care of them. And as I say, the economy -- last year some 600,000 new businesses were incorporated in our country.

I would like to be remembered not for doing all those things -- I didn't do them; the American people did them. All I did was help get government out of their way and restore our belief in the power of the people and that government must be limited in its powers and limited in its actions.

The President. The doctor said that I'd had a 100 percent recovery. I'm riding horses regularly now, as I've always done, and I'm doing my exercises in the gym every day at the end of the day. I have a little gymnasium upstairs and some weights and so forth, and I'm doing all those things.

In accordance with Section 205(d) of P.L. 98 - 615, any agency or unit of an agency that was excluded from merit pay immediately prior to enactment of this legislation is excluded from coverage under the Performance Management and Recognition System for the 12-month period beginning on the date of enactment. However, such exclusion may be revoked at any time in accordance with 5 U.S.C. 5402(b)(5). Upon request of the heads of the affected agencies and upon recommendation of the Director of the Office of Personnel Management, I have revoked the exclusion of seven agencies and units of agencies so that they may implement the Performance Management and Recognition System in fiscal year 1986.

The Convention is designed to secure the prompt return of children who have been abducted from their country of habitual residence or wrongfully retained outside that country. It also seeks to facilitate the exercise of visitation rights across international borders. The Convention reflects a worldwide concern about the harmful effects on children of parental kidnapping and a strong desire to fashion an effective deterrent to such conduct.

Convention is designed promptly to restore the factual situation that existed prior to a child's removal or retention. It does not seek to settle disputes about legal custody rights, nor does it depend upon the existence of court orders as a condition for returning children. The international abductor is denied legal advantage from the abduction to or retention in the country where the child is located, as resort to the Convention is to effect the child's swift return to his or her circumstances before the abduction or retention. In most cases this will mean return to the country of the child's habitual residence where any dispute about custody rights can be heard and settled.

The Convention calls for the establishment of a Central Authority in every Contracting State to assist applicants in securing the return of their children or in exercising their custody or visitation rights, and to cooperate and coordinate with their counterparts in other countries toward these ends. Moreover, the Convention establishes a judicial remedy in wrongful removal or retention cases which permits an aggrieved parent to seek a court order for the prompt return of the child when voluntary agreement cannot be achieved. An aggrieved parent may pursue both of these courses of action or seek a judicial remedy directly without involving the Central Authority of the country where the child is located.

The Convention would represent an important addition to the State and Federal laws currently in effect in the United States that are designed to combat parental kidnapping -- specifically, the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act now in effect in every State in the country, the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act of 1980, the 1982 Missing Children Act and the Missing Children's Assistance Act. It would significantly improve the chances a parent in the United States has of recovering a child from a foreign Contracting State. It also provides a clear-cut method for parents abroad to apply for the return of children who have been wrongfully taken to or retained in this country. In short, by establishing a legal right and streamlined procedures for the prompt return of internationally abducted children, the Convention should remove many of the uncertainties and the legal difficulties that now confront parents in international child abduction cases.

Federal legislation will be submitted to provide for the smooth implementation of the Convention within the United States. This legislation will be consistent with the spirit and intent of recent congressional initiatives dealing with the problem of interstate child abduction and missing children.

United States ratification of the Convention is supported by the American Bar Association. The authorities of many States have indicated a willingness to do their part to assist the Federal government in carrying out the mandates of the Convention.

I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the Convention and accord its advice and consent to ratification, subject to the reservations described in the accompanying report of the Secretary of State.

Section 247(b) conveyed the sense of Congress that I should negotiate ``with the principal foreign copper-producing countries to conclude voluntary restraint agreements with those governments for the purpose of effecting a balanced reduction of total annual foreign copper production for a period of between three and five years . . .'' In light of this provision, an interagency task force, chaired by the Office of the United States Trade Representative, was formed to take another look at the possibility of negotiating such restraints -- which had been considered, and rejected, in the context of the determination made on September 6, 1984, on import relief in accordance with Section 202(b)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974.

In light of this review, I have determined that it would be inappropriate for this Government to seek to negotiate voluntary production restraint agreements with the governments of the principal foreign copper-producing countries.

An attempt to negotiate such restraints would be inconsistent with the overall, market-oriented trade and economic policy objectives of this Administration. It would set an undesirable precedent in light of both our efforts to increase the responsiveness of the domestic and international economy to market forces and our continued opposition to cartels or other arrangements aimed at controlling world markets. Moreover, any effort by this Government, in the context of production restraint negotiations, to give foreign producers assurances regarding the intentions of U.S. copper producers would raise serious antitrust concerns.

Efforts to raise world copper prices through the restraint of foreign production would also be inefficient and expensive for the U.S. economy; they would incur losses to U.S. consumers substantially in excess of any gains accruing to U.S. producers.

Finally, I do not believe it would be feasible either to conclude or to implement production restraint agreements. The major copper-producing countries have made it clear that they are opposed to the negotiation of such restraints -- largely because they do not feel that such actions would be effective in improving the longer term situation in the world copper market. Moreover, past experience shows that production restraint agreements are extremely difficult to implement effectively and that any benefits from restraints tend to be eroded or reversed in the years following their termination.

While I do not believe that the negotiation of restraints is an appropriate course of action, I have asked the United States Trade Representative to continue to follow closely developments in the world copper market and to explore other possibilities for improving the situation of the U.S. copper industry. I also continue to be deeply concerned about the problems facing many workers in the U.S. copper industry. In response to my directives of September 6, 1984, the Department of Labor has developed, and begun to implement, a plan for a special effort to assist workers displaced from the copper industry.

This plan consists of three elements. First, of the funds reserved by the Secretary under Title III of the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA), $5.0 million has been earmarked specifically for retraining programs to assist copper workers in heavily impacted States and localities. To assure that a maximum effort is made in the States to assist copper workers, the States have been asked to contribute an amount equivalent to twice the Federal allocation to support these projects. In total this will amount to approximately $15 million in new training and employment services for copper workers. In addition, the 12 States targeted by this plan already have been allocated almost $38 million of title III grant resources which they have matched with some $25 million in State support. These combined resources totalling almost $63 million are also available for States to use in assisting dislocated copper workers.

Finally, Secretary Brock, working closely with representatives of industry and labor and officials from all levels of government, is monitoring these efforts and seeking ways to improve upon them. A more detailed report on the Department of Labor's efforts to assist dislocated copper workers is attached.

Most of us have been fortunate enough to have enjoyed a very special relationship with our grandparents. They were the living bridge to the past. They handed down to us the hard-won lessons they had learned from life and the wisdom they had received from their own grandparents.

Today, the elderly and retired participants in the Foster Grandparent Program provide unique, personal guidance and care to tens of thousands of physically, emotionally, and mentally handicapped children as well as those who have been abused, neglected, or who are in the juvenile justice system, or in need of other special help.

Love is the only thing we have more of the more we give it away. And these volunteers who give of themselves, of their wisdom, and of their time, reap rich benefits. They rejoice in a newfound independence. Their loneliness and fear of isolation disappear. In many cases, their health improves. Their sense of self-worth is enhanced as they find themselves deeply involved with others who depend on them. They experience a new fulfillment in performing a much-needed community service which taps all their reserves of understanding, creativity, and warmth.

From their very beginnings, the colonies that later were to form the United States of America set great store by the education of the young, and with the birth of the New Nation this commitment to education deepened. Our Founding Fathers shared the insight of an ancient sage that ``only the educated are free,'' and they took to heart the inspired maxim that it is the truth which sets us free.

American Education Week offers all Americans an invitation to reflect on the importance of education to our Nation, not only to its prosperity but to the proper functioning of our whole system of government. It invites each of us to play a part in the national commitment to sound education and to the constant striving to improve the institutions that provide education at every level, from pre-school through graduate school. American Education Week is a time for all Americans to seek to do something to further the cause of education -- whether by involvement in parent-teacher groups, contributions to private educational institutions, serving on local school boards, participation in adult education programs, furthering the utilization of libraries and museums, or any similar activity. For educators it is a time to rededicate themselves to what is surely one of the noblest of callings; and to students it is a challenge to make the best use of the manifold educational opportunities this country offers.

Nancy and I are deeply saddened by the loss of our friend, John Davis Lodge. His death is not only a personal loss to those of us who trusted in his friendship and advice but to the country he served so patriotically throughout his long and full life.

John was a man of great and varied talents who excelled in each of his chosen occupations. We will never forget the young lawyer-cum-movie star who acted in such film classics as ``Little Women'' and ``The Scarlet Empress'' and who continued his acting career on the stage. But we shall always be most grateful to John Davis Lodge, the able public servant. As a Congressman and Governor of Connecticut, Ambassador to Spain, Argentina, and Switzerland, and in many other important positions, John was a tireless fighter against communism and a constant friend of freedom, both at home and abroad. At the time of his death, John was still serving his nation and the cause of humanity as a delegate to the United Nations. He will be sorely missed by his friends and by the country to which he gave such a full measure of his devotion.

The President. Well, I thank you all. Welcome to the White House and back to the White House for some of you. It's a great pleasure to have you here, just as it was a great pleasure to watch these gentlemen perform in the World Series, and all of my words of welcome are intended for all of you, also.

In that Interstate 70 series, the ``Show Me'' spirit really came through. Your team showed the world, and you did it royally. You've proved to America what a never-say-die spirit can do. Even after losing the first two games of the series at home, you met the challenge, and you kept America in suspense for seven full games and rallied to bring the World Series trophy to Kansas City. Only five other teams in World Series history have managed to overcome such a margin.

But it's the Royals' team play, a combination of the great spirit and hard work of every one of you on the roster, that brought you this championship. I always like to point to experience as a major element of success, but it's hard in this case when you could add up the ages of three of the five starting pitchers and come up with fewer birthdays than I've seen. [Laughter] Seriously, you've fought long and hard throughout the season. And your dedication has paid off. And now that you've proved you're the champions of the world, what do you do for an encore?

The President today announced his intention to appoint John George Pappajohn to be a member of the Advisory Committee on the Arts (John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts, Smithsonian Institution). This is an initial appointment.

The President. I have instructed our negotiators in Geneva at the nuclear and space talks to present a new United States proposal designed to advance the prospects for achieving real reductions in nuclear arms, enhancing stability, and addressing the legitimate concerns of the United States and our allies as well as of the Soviet Union. I have also asked our negotiators to seek Soviet agreement to extend this round of the negotiations into next week so that our negotiating team can make a full presentation of our proposal and have a real give-and-take with the Soviets on its details. Finally, I have written to the leaders of allied nations and have transmitted a personal letter to General Secretary Gorbachev on this subject.

I'm not going into any details about our proposal. Suffice to say that our proposal is serious, it is detailed, and it addresses all three areas of the negotiations. It builds upon the very concrete reductions proposals, which our negotiators had tabled earlier, as well as the Soviet counterproposal.

White House meeting in September, following which it was tabled at Geneva by the Soviet negotiators. Since that time, our arms control experts have analyzed the Soviet counterproposal extremely carefully. This analysis now completed, I have met with my senior advisers, decided on our response, and have instructed our negotiators to make this move. During our careful review, we measured the Soviet counterproposal against our concrete proposals for deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions which we already had on the table and against the criteria which we have long held for attaining effective arms control agreements. We have made clear that, measured against these criteria, the Soviet counterproposal, unfortunately, fell significantly short in several key areas. At the same time, as I indicated in my address to the United Nations General Assembly last week, the counterproposal also had certain positive seeds which we wish to nurture.

Our new proposal builds upon these positive elements and calls for very significant balanced reductions of comparable nuclear systems, particularly those that are the most destabilizing. It's my hope that our new proposal will enable both of our nations to start moving away from ever-larger arsenals of offensive forces. At the same time, we seek in Geneva to undertake with the Soviets a serious examination of the important relationship between offensive and defensive forces and how people everywhere can benefit from exploring the potential of nonnuclear defenses which threaten no one. I'm pleased that we seem to have made a successful start on this long process. The Soviet response to our earlier proposals and the new proposal which we're making are important milestones in moving these negotiations forward.

Strengthening the peace and building a more constructive, long-term U.S.-Soviet relationship requires that we move ahead in all of these areas. I believe progress is, indeed, possible if the Soviet leadership is willing to match our own commitment to a better relationship.

The President. Just let me -- just sum up. What I wanted to say is that I would characterize our arms control position as deep cuts, no first-strike advantage, defensive research -- because defense is safer than offense -- and no cheating.

The President. Well now, this is all I'm going to respond to and simply say -- because it touches on something I said here and explains. Since they were scheduled -- the negotiations -- to recess, they will do that, but hopefully a week late. Naturally, both sides are going to have to agree to that. We're asking our people to extend it by a week, but it will give them time to table this and at least be able to see back and forth. After all, it isn't that deep a document, but the figures and where they are. And then they will find the relationship between the counterproposal and our original proposal.

Q. You told the Soviet journalists that you hoped for concrete achievements at Geneva. Just a couple of days ago you told a BBC interviewer that perhaps the hope was that the paranoia might be lessened. It sounds like you're more optimistic about actually coming out with something?

The President. Well, I was answering -- I think that some of you have misinterpreted the answer that I gave in that BBC interview. The question had been what was my hope -- what I thought -- felt would come out and so forth. And I was simply putting in place that arms control is a result; that first, you've got to eliminate the suspicions and the paranoia between us and so forth, and then, you find out that arms control can come easily. But to just simply dwell on arms control -- if both of you are sitting there suspiciously saying how can we keep an advantage -- each side saying the same thing to itself, well, then, it doesn't really matter how many missiles you've counted.

On May 1, 1985, in Executive Order No. 12513, I declared a national emergency to deal with the threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States posed by the policies and actions of the Government of Nicaragua. In that order, I prohibited: (1) all imports into the United States of goods and services of Nicaraguan origin; (2) all exports from the United States of goods to or destined for Nicaragua except those destined for the organized democratic resistance; (3) Nicaraguan air carriers from engaging in air transportation to or from points in the United States; and (4) vessels of Nicaraguan registry from entering United States ports.

It should be noted that Section 540.505 permits the issuance of licenses authorizing the export of goods from the United States to Nicaragua in certain circumstances involving contractual obligations which the exporter incurred prior to May 1, 1985. The regulation provides that such exports may be authorized only through October 31, 1985. Once this deadline has passed, licenses for exports on prior contractual grounds will no longer be available.

The President. May I welcome you all. It's a pleasure here, and I appreciate very much the opportunity to be able to speak, in a sense, to the people of your country. I've always believed that a lot of the ills of the world would disappear if people talked more to each each other instead of about each other. So, I look forward to this meeting and welcome your questions.

Q. Mr. President, we appreciate greatly this opportunity to ask to you, personally, questions after you kindly answered our written questions. We hope that they will be instructive and will facilitate success for your forthcoming meeting with our leader.

Q. Mr. President, we have become acquainted with the answers which you furnished to our written questions. They basically reflect the old U.S. proposals, which have been evaluated by the Soviet side as being unbalanced and one-sided in favor of the U.S. side, and you have not answered concerning the new Soviet proposal. And this reply to the new Soviet proposal is what is of greatest interest before the meeting in Geneva.

The President. When this interview is over, later this afternoon at 3 o'clock, I will be making a statement to our own press -- well, to all the press -- to the effect that we have been studying the Soviet proposal, and tomorrow in Geneva our team at the disarmament conference will be presenting our reply, which will be a proposal that reflects the thinking of the original proposal that we had, but also of this latest. Indeed, it will show that we are accepting some of the figures that were in this counterproposal by the Secretary General. There are some points in which we have offered compromises between some figures of theirs and some of ours, but all those figures will be available tomorrow, and I will simply be stating today that that is going to take place tomorrow in Geneva. But it is a detailed counterproposal to a counterproposal, as is proper in negotiations, that will reflect, as I say, the acceptance on our part of some of this latest proposal as well as compromises with earlier figures that we'd proposed.

Washington Post and ABC on Tuesday, it was found that 74 percent of the American people, as compared to 20 percent, said that they would like the U.S. and the Soviet Union to reduce their nuclear arsenals and not to have the U.S. develop space weapons. This seems to be the choice which the American people have made. It seems clear that without stopping the development of weapons in space there can be no reduction of nuclear weapons. This is the position of the Soviet side. So, how then will you react, Mr. President, to this opinion expressed by the American public?

The President. Well, for one thing, it is based on a misconception. The use of the term Star Wars came about when one political figure in America used that to describe what it is we're researching and studying, and then our press picked it up, and it has been worldwide. We're not talking about Star Wars at all. We're talking about seeing if there isn't a defensive weapon that does not kill people, but that simply makes it impossible for nuclear missiles, once fired out of their silos, to reach their objective -- to intercept those weapons.

Now, it is also true that -- to show that this is a misconception on the part of the people when you use the wrong terms -- not too long ago there was a survey taken, a poll of our people, and they asked them about Star Wars. And similar to the reaction in this poll, only about 30 percent of the people in our country favored it, and the rest didn't. But in the same poll they then described, as I have tried to describe, what it is we're researching -- a strategic defensive shield that doesn't kill people, but that would allow us one day -- all of us -- to get rid of nuclear weapons, and over 90 percent of the American people favored our going forward with such a program.

Now, this is one of the things that we will discuss. We are for and have for several years now been advocating a reduction in the number of nuclear weapons. It is uncivilized on the part of all of us to be sitting here with the only deterrent to war -- offensive nuclear weapons that in such numbers that both of us could threaten the other with the death and the annihilation of millions and millions of each other's people. And so that is the deterrent that is supposed to keep us from firing these missiles at each other. Wouldn't it make a lot more sense if we could find that -- as there has been in history for every weapon -- a defensive weapon? Weapon isn't the term to use for what we're researching. We're researching for something that could make it, as I say, virtually impossible for these missiles to reach their targets. And if we find such a thing, my proposal is that we make it available to all the world. We don't just keep it for our own advantage.

Q. Mr. President, with the situation as it stands today in the international arena, attempts to create such a space shield will inevitably lead to suspicion on the other side that the country creating such a space shield will be in a position to make a first strike. This is a type of statement whose truth is agreed to by many people. Now, it's apparent that the American people have indicated their choice, that if it comes down to a choice between the creation of such a space system and the decrease in nuclear arms, they prefer a decrease in nuclear arms. So, it seems to be a realistic evaluation on the part of the American people. And I would like to ask how the American government would react to the feelings of the American people in this regard.

The President. Well, in the first place, yes, if someone was developing such a defensive system and going to couple it with their own nuclear weapons, offensive weapons, yes, that could put them in a position where they might be more likely to dare a first strike. But your country, your government, has been working on this same kind of a plan beginning years before we ever started working on it, which, I think, would indicate that maybe we should be a little suspicious that they want it for themselves. But I have said and am prepared to say at the summit that if such a weapon is possible, and our research reveals that, then our move would be to say to all the world, ``Here, it is available.'' We won't put this weapon -- or this system in place, this defensive system, until we do away with our nuclear missiles, our offensive missiles. But we will make it available to other countries, including the Soviet Union, to do the same thing.

Now, just whichever one of us comes up first with that defensive system, the Soviet Union or us or anyone else -- what a picture if we say no one will claim a monopoly on it. And we make that offer now. It will be available for the Soviet Union as well as ourselves. And if the Soviet Union and the United States both say we will eliminate our offensive weapons, we will put in this defensive thing in case some place in the world a madman some day tries to create these weapons again -- nuclear weapons -- because, remember, we all know how to make them now. So, you can't do away with that information, but we would all be safe knowing that if such a madman project is ever attempted there isn't any of us that couldn't defend ourselves against it. So, I can assure you now we are not going to try and monopolize this, if such a weapon is developed, for a first-strike capability.

Q. Mr. President, I would like to ask you about some of the matters which concern mutual suspicion and distrust. And you indicated at your speech at the United Nations that the U.S. does not have troops in other countries, has not occupied other countries, but there are 550,000 troops, military personnel, outside of the United States; in 32 countries, there are 1,500 military bases. So, one can see in this way which country it is that has become surrounded. And you have agreed that the Soviet Union has the right to look out for the interest of its security. And it is inevitable that the Soviet Union must worry about these bases, which are around it. The Soviet Union, in turn, has not done the same. So, how do you in this respect anticipate to create this balance of security, which you have spoken about?

The President. Well, I can't respond to your exact numbers there that you've given. I don't have them right at my fingertips as to what they are, but we're talking about two different things. We're talking about occupying a country with foreign troops, such as we see the Soviet Union doing in Afghanistan, and there are other places, too -- Angola, South Yemen, Ethiopia.

Europe along the NATO line, there in response to even superior numbers of Warsaw Pact troops that are aligned against them. And the United States, as one of the members of the alliance, contributes troops to that NATO force. The same is true in Korea in which, at the invitation of the South Korean Government, we have troops to help them there because of the demilitarized zone and the threatening nature of North Korea, which attacked them without warning. And that was not an American war, even though we provided the most of the men; that war was fought under the flag of the United Nations. The United Nations found North Korea guilty of aggression in violation of the charter of the U.N. And finally, South Korea was defended, and the North Koreans were defeated, but they still have maintained a sizable, threatening offensive force. Other places -- we have bases in the far Pacific; we've had them for many years in the Philippines. We lease those; those are bases we rent. In fact, we even have a base that is leased on Cuba, that was there long before there was a Castro in Cuba, a naval base.

Pact. They never were allowed the self-determination that was agreed to in the Yalta treaty -- the end of World War II. So, I think my statement still goes: that there is a difference in occupation and a difference in having bases where they are there in a noncombat situation, and many where they are requested by the parent country.

The President. No, because the lease for that was made many years ago, and it still has many years to run, and we're perfectly legal in our right to be there. It is fenced off; there is no contact with the people or the main island of Cuba at all.

Q. Mr. President, you have mentioned Afghanistan. I would like to say that in Afghanistan, Soviet troops are there at the invitation of the Afghan Government to defend the Afghan revolution against the incursions of forces from abroad that are funded and supported by the United States.

United States has not attempted to use force but has fostered the process of democracy by peaceful means. Now, how does this reply fit in with the use of force by the United States in many countries abroad, beginning with Vietnam, where seven million tons of weapons were dropped -- seven million tons more than were in the Second World War, and, also, Grenada? I ask this not to dwell on the past, but simply to clarify this issue.

The President. And it can be clarified, yes. First of all, with regard to Afghanistan, the government which invited the Soviet troops in didn't have any choice because the government was put there by the Soviet Union and put there with the force of arms to guarantee. And in fact, the man who was the head of that government is the second choice. The first one wasn't satisfactory to the Soviet Union, and they came in with armed forces and threw him out and installed their second choice, who continues to be the governor. Now, there are no outside forces fighting in there. But, as a matter of fact, I think there are some things that, if they were more widely known, would shock everyone worldwide. For example, one of the weapons being used against the people of Afghanistan consists of toys -- dolls, little toy trucks, things that are appealing to children. They're scattered in the air, but when the children pick them up, their hands are blown off. They are what we call boobytraps; they're like landmines. This is hardly consistent with the kind of armed warfare that has occurred between nations.

Vietnam? Yes, when Vietnam -- or let's say, French Indochina -- was given up as a colony, an international forum in Geneva, meeting in Geneva, established a North Vietnam and a South Vietnam. The North Vietnam was already governed by a Communist group and had a government in place during the Japanese occupation of French Indochina. South Vietnam had to start and create a government. We were invited, with instructors, to help them establish something they had never had before, which was a military. And our instructors went in in civilian clothes; their families went with them; and they started with a country that didn't have any military schools or things of this kind to create an armed force for the Government of South Vietnam. They were harassed by terrorists from the very beginning. Finally, it was necessary to send the families home.

Schools were being bombed. There was even a practice of rolling bombs down the aisles of movie theaters and killing countless people that were simply enjoying a movie. And finally, changes were made that our people were allowed to arm themselves for their own protection.

And then, it is true that President Kennedy sent in a unit of troops to provide protection. This grew into the war of Vietnam. At no time did the allied force, and it was allied -- there were more in there than just American troops -- at no time did we try for victory. Maybe that's what was wrong. We simply tried to maintain a demilitarized zone between North and South Vietnam. And we know the result that has occurred now. And it is all one state of Vietnam. It was conquered in violation of a treaty that was signed in Paris between North and South Vietnam. We left South Vietnam, and North Vietnam swept down, conquered the country, as I say, in violation of a treaty.

The President. Grenada. Ah, we had some several hundred young American medical students there. Our intelligence revealed that they were threatened as potential hostages and the Government of Grenada requested help, military help, not only from the United States but from the other Commonwealth nations -- island nations in the Caribbean -- from Jamaica, from Dominica, a number of these others. They in turn relayed the request to us because they did not have armed forces in sufficient strength. And, yes, we landed, and we found warehouses filled with weapons, and they were of Soviet manufacture. We found hundreds of Cubans there; there was a brief engagement. We freed the island. And in a very short time, our troops came home after rescuing our students, rescuing the island. There are no American troops there now.

And there is the contrast: The Soviet troops have been in Afghanistan for 6 years now, fighting all that time. We did what we were asked to do -- the request of the Government of Grenada -- and came home.

Q. Mr. President, with relation to the ABM treaty, which was signed in 1972, article V of that treaty indicates, and I quote, ``that each side will not develop or test or deploy antiballistic missile components or systems which are sea-based, air-based, space-based, or mobile land-based.'' Now, some administration representatives say that the treaty is such that it permits all of these things -- the development, the testing, and deployment of ABM systems. Such an interpretation of that treaty certainly cannot help achieve agreement. What is the true position of the American administration with regard to the interpretation of this treaty? Will the U.S. abide by the treaty or not? And certainly the results of your meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev will depend a great deal on that fact.

The President. There are two varying interpretations of the treaty. There is an additional clause in the treaty that would seem to be more liberal than that paragraph 5 -- or clause 5. The other hand, we have made it plain that we are going to stay within a strict definition of the treaty, and what we are doing with regard to research -- and that would include testing -- is within the treaty.

Now, with regard to deployment, as I said earlier, no, we are doing what is within the treaty and which the Soviet Union has already been doing for quite some time, same kind of research and development. But when it comes to deployment, I don't know what the Soviet Union was going to do when and if their research developed such a weapon, or still if it does. But I do know what we're going to do, and I have stated it already. We would not deploy -- it is not my purpose for deployment -- until we sit down with the other nations of the world and those that have nuclear arsenals and see if we cannot come to an agreement on which there will be deployment only if there is elimination of the nuclear weapons.

Now, you might say if we're going to eliminate the nuclear weapons, then why do we need the defense? Well, I repeat what I said earlier. We all know how to make them, the weapons; so it is possible that some day a madman could arise in the world -- we were both allies in a war that came about because of such a madman -- and therefore, it would be like in Geneva after World War I when the nations all got together and said no more poison gas, but we all kept our gas masks. Well, this weapon, if such can be developed, would be today's gas mask. But we would want it for everyone, and the terms for getting it and the terms for our own deployment would be the elimination of the offensive weapons, a switch to maintain trust and peace between us of having defense systems that gave us security, not the threat of annihilation -- that one or the other of us would annihilate the other with nuclear weapons.

The President. All right. We haven't covered -- I guess I've filibustered on too many of these questions here with lengthy answers. I know you had more questions there. I'm sorry that we haven't time for them.

Union, let us say Russia and the United States have been allies in two wars -- the Soviet Union and the United States, allies in one, the last and greatest war, World War II. Americans and Russians died side by side, fighting the same enemy. There are Americans buried on Soviet soil.

Q. You know, it's an interesting phenomenon, because in '79, after 7 years of very severe -- I would say the researching in SALT II, President Carter and other specialists told that there was a parity in strategic and military. And then you came to the power, and you said it sounded that the Soviet Union is much ahead. Then, recently, in September, you said almost the same, though the Joint Chiefs of Staffs told this year that there is a parity. What is the contradiction?

The President. No, there really isn't. Somebody might say that with the sense of that we have sufficient for a deterrent, that, in other words, we would have enough to make it uncomfortable if someone attacked us. But, no, your arsenal does outcount ours by a great number.

Q. The forthcoming meeting between General Secretary Gorbachev and you, Mr. President, is for obvious reasons looked upon as an event of special importance. Both sides have stated their intention to make an effort to improve relations between our two countries, to better the overall international situation. The Soviet Union has, over a period of time, put forward a whole set of concrete proposals and has unilaterally taken steps in various areas directly aimed at achieving this goal. What is the U.S., for its part, going to do?

The President. I fully agree that my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev has special significance, and I am personally looking forward to it very much. I sincerely hope that we will be able to put relations between our two countries on a safer and more secure course. I, for my part, will certainly do all I can to make that possible.

We, of course, study every Soviet proposal carefully, and when we find them promising, we are happy to say so. If, on the other hand, we find them one-sided in their effect, we explain why we feel as we do. At the same time we, too, have made concrete proposals, dozens of them, which also cover every sphere of our relationship, from the elimination of chemical weapons and resolution of regional conflicts to the expansion of contacts and exchanges, and we hope these receive the same careful attention that we give to Soviet proposals. Let me give you a few examples.

One thing that has created enormous tension in U.S.-Soviet relations over the last few years has been attempts to settle problems around the world by using military force. The resort to arms, whether it be in Afghanistan, Cambodia, or in Africa, has contributed nothing to the prospects for peace or the resolution of indigenous problems and has only brought additional suffering to the peoples of these regions. This is also dangerous, and we need to find a way to stop attempts to solve problems by force. So, I have proposed that both our countries encourage parties to these conflicts to lay down their arms and negotiate solutions, and if they are willing to do that, our countries should find a way to agree to support a peaceful solution and refrain from providing military support to the warring parties. And if peace can be achieved, the United States will contribute generously to an international effort to restore war-ravaged economies, just as we did after the Second World War, contributing to the recovery of friends and erstwhile foes alike, and as we have done on countless other occasions.

Both of our governments agree that our nuclear arsenals are much too large. We are both committed to radical arms reductions. So, the United States has made concrete proposals for such reductions: to bring ballistic missile warheads down to 5,000 on each side and to eliminate a whole category of intermediate-range missiles from our arsenals altogether. These have not been take-it-or-leave-it proposals. We are prepared to negotiate, since we know that negotiation is necessary if we are to reach a solution under which neither side feels threatened. We are willing to eliminate our advantages if you will agree to eliminate yours. The important thing is to begin reducing these terrible weapons in a way that both sides will feel secure and to continue that process until we have eliminated them altogether.

Events of the past 10 to 15 years have greatly increased mistrust between our countries. If we are to solve the key problems in our relationship, we have to do something to restore confidence in dealing with each other. This requires better communication, more contact, and close attention to make sure that both parties fulfill agreements reached. That is why we have made literally 40 to 50 proposals to improve our working relationship, expand communication, and build confidence.

But most of all, ordinary people in both countries should have more contact, particularly our young people. The future, after all, belongs to them. I'd like to see us sending thousands of students to each other's country every year, to get to know each other, to learn from each other, and most of all to come to understand that, even with our different philosophies, we can and must live in peace.

Obviously, we are not going to solve all the differences between us at one meeting, but we would like to take some concrete steps forward. Above all, I hope that our meeting will give momentum to a genuine process of problemsolving and that we can agree on a course to take us toward a safer world for all and growing cooperation between our countries.

Q. The Soviet Union stands for peaceful coexistence with countries which have different social systems, including the U.S. In some of your statements, the point has been made that in spite of differences between our countries, it is necessary to avoid a military confrontation. In other words, we must learn how to live in peace. Thus, both sides recognize the fact that the issue of arms limitation and reduction is and will be determining in these relations. The special responsibility of the U.S. and U.S.S.R. for the fate of the world is an objective fact. What in your opinion can be achieved in the area of security in your meeting with Gorbachev?

The President. Well, first of all, I would say that we think all countries should live together in peace, whether they have the same or different social systems. Even if social systems are similar, this shouldn't give a country the right to use force against another.

But you are absolutely right when you say that we must learn to live in peace. As I have said many times, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. And this means that our countries must not fight any type of war. You are also right when you say that our countries bear a special responsibility before the world. This is the case not only because we possess enormous nuclear arsenals but because as great powers, whether we like it or not, our example and actions affect all those around us.

Often we are accused by your country of interfering in your internal affairs on such questions as human rights, but this is a case in point: Ten years ago we both became participants in the Helsinki accords and committed ourselves to certain standards of conduct. We are living up to those commitments and expect others to do so also. Soviet-American relations affect, as well regional conflicts, political relations among our friends and allies, and many other areas.

The fact that our countries have the largest and most destructive nuclear arsenals obliges us not only to make sure they are never used but to lead the world toward the elimination of these awesome weapons. I think that my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev can start us on the road toward the goal our countries have set: the radical reduction of nuclear weapons and steps to achieve their complete elimination. We can do this by finding concrete ways to overcome roadblocks in the negotiating process and thus give a real impetus to our negotiators. Of course we will also have to deal with other problems, because it will be very hard to make great progress in arms control unless we can also act to lower tensions, reduce the use and threat of force, and build confidence in our ability to deal constructively with each other.

Q. As is well known, the U.S. and the U.S.S.R. reached an understanding last January in Geneva that the top priority of the new negotiations must be the prevention of the arms race in space, but now the American delegation in Geneva is trying to limit the discussion to consideration of the question of nuclear arms and is refusing to talk about the prevention of the arms race in space.

First, we believe that the most threatening weapons facing mankind today are nuclear weapons of mass destruction. These are offensive weapons, and they exist today in numbers that are much too high. Our most urgent task therefore is to begin to reduce them radically and to create conditions so that they can eventually be eliminated. Since most of these weapons pass through space to reach their targets, reducing them is as important to prevent an arms race in space as it is to terminate an arms race on Earth. As I noted earlier, we have made concrete, specific proposals to achieve this. Recently your government finally made some counterproposals, and we will be responding in a genuine spirit of give-and-take in an effort to move toward practical solutions both countries can agree on.

Second, we believe that offensive and defensive systems are closely interrelated and that these issues should be treated, as our Foreign Ministers agreed, as interrelated. Our proposals are fully consistent with this understanding. We are seeking right now with Soviet negotiators in Geneva a thorough discussion of how a balance of offensive and defensive systems could be achieved and how, if scientists are able to develop effective defenses in the future, we might both use them to protect our countries and allies without threatening the other. And if we ever succeed in eliminating nuclear weapons, countries are going to require a defense against them, in case some madman gets his hands on some and tries to blackmail other countries.

On strategic nuclear arms, a reduction of each side's nuclear forces down to 5,000 warheads on ballistic missiles -- that would be a very dramatic lowering of force levels in a way that would greatly enhance strategic stability. We have also offered to negotiate strict limits on other kinds of weapons. Because our force structures are different and because the Soviet Union has complained about having to reconfigure its forces, we have offered to seek agreements which would balance these differing areas of American and Soviet strength.

On intermediate-range nuclear forces, we believe the best course is to eliminate that entire category of forces, which includes the 441 SS - 20 missiles the Soviet Union has deployed and our Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles. If this is not immediately acceptable, we have also offered an interim agreement, which would establish an equal number of warheads on U.S. and Soviet missiles in this category at the lowest possible level.

In the area of space and defense, we are seeking to discuss with Soviet negotiators the possibility that new technology might allow both sides to carry out a transition to greater reliance on defensive weapons, rather than basing security on offensive nuclear forces. So that there would be no misunderstandings about our research program on new defensive systems, which is being carried out in full compliance with the ABM treaty, I sent the director of our strategic defense research program to Geneva to brief Soviet negotiators. Unfortunately, we have not had a comparable description of your research in this area, which we know is longstanding and quite extensive.

Frankly, I have difficulty understanding why some people have misunderstood and misinterpreted our position. The research we are conducting in the United States regarding strategic defense is in precisely the same areas as the research being conducted in the Soviet Union. There are only two differences: First, the Soviet Union has been conducting research in many of these areas longer than we have and is ahead in some; second, we are openly discussing our program, because our political system requires open debate before such decisions are made. But these differences in approaches to policy decisions should not lead to erroneous conclusions. Both sides are involved in similar research, and there is nothing wrong in that; however, this does make it rather hard for us to understand why we should be accused of all sorts of aggressive intentions when we are doing nothing more than you are. The important thing is for us to discuss these issues candidly.

In sum, what we are seeking is a balanced, fair, verifiable agreement -- or series of agreements that will permit us to do what was agreed in Geneva in January: to terminate the arms race on Earth and prevent it in space. The United States has no tricks up its sleeve, and we have no desire to threaten the Soviet Union in any way. Frankly, if the Soviet Union would take a comparable attitude, we would be able to make very rapid progress toward an agreement.

The President. Your assertion about U.S. actions is totally unfounded. From your question, one might think that the United States was engaged in a war in some other country and in so doing had set itself against the majority of the people who want self-determination. I can assure you that this is not the case. I am proud, as are all Americans, that not a single American soldier is in combat anywhere in the world. If every country could say the same, we would truly live in a world of less tension and danger.

Yes, we are very supportive of democracy. It is the basis of our political system and our whole philosophy. Our nation was not founded on the basis of one ethnic group or culture, as are many other countries, but on the basis of the democratic ideal. For example, we believe that governments are legitimate only if they are created by the people and that they are subordinate to the people, who select in free elections those who govern them. But democracy is more than elections in which all who wish can compete. In our view there are many things that even properly elected governments have no right to do. No American government can restrict freedom of speech or of religion, and no American government can tell its people where they must live or whether they can leave the country or not. These and the other individual freedoms enshrined in our Constitution are the most precious gift our forefathers bequeathed us, and we will defend them so long as we exist as a nation.

We respond with force only as a last resort and only when we or our allies are the victims of aggression. For example, in World War II we took a full and vigorous part in the successful fight against Hitlerism, even though our country was not invaded by the Nazis. We still remember our wartime alliance and the heroism the peoples of the Soviet Union displayed in that struggle. And we also remember that we never used our position as one of the victors to add territory or to attempt to dominate others. Rather we helped rebuild the devastated countries, friends and erstwhile foes alike, and helped foster democracy where there was once totalitarianism. Have we not all benefited from the fact that Japan and the Federal Republic of Germany are today flourishing democracies and strong pillars of a stable and humane world order? Well, the German and Japanese people deserve the most credit for this, but we believe we helped along the way.

In the areas you mention, we are heartened by trends we see, although there are still many troubling areas. In the southern part of Africa, Angola is torn by civil war, yet we have determined not to supply arms to either side and to urge a peaceful settlement. In South Africa the system of apartheid is repugnant to all Americans, but here as well, we seek a peaceful solution, and for many years we have refused to supply arms or police equipment to the South African Government. In Latin America great progress in the transition from authoritarian to democratic societies has been made, and now on that continent there exist only four countries that do not have democratically elected governments. Since 1979 seven Latin American countries have made major strides from authoritarian to democratic systems. Over the years we have been a leading voice for decolonization and have used our influence with our closest friends and allies to hasten this process. We are gratified by the nearly completed process of decolonization and take pride in our role.

I should emphasize that our aim has been to encourage the process of democratization through peaceful means. And not just the American government but the American people as a whole have supported this process with actions and deeds.

American society has long been characterized by its spirit of voluntarism and by its compassion for the less fortunate. At home we are proud of our record of support for those who cannot manage for themselves. It is not simply that the government but the American people, through a host of voluntary organizations, who bring help to the needy -- the victims of floods and fires, the old, the infirm, and the handicapped. Americans have been no less generous in giving to other peoples. I remember the efforts of Herbert Hoover in organizing the American relief effort to feed Soviet victims of famine in the 1920's. And these efforts continue to this day, whether it be food for the victims of famine in Ethiopia or of earthquakes in Mexico.

Q. The Soviet Union has unilaterally taken a series of major steps. It has pledged not to be the first to use nuclear weapons. It has undertaken a moratorium on any kind of nuclear tests. It has stopped deployment of intermediate-range missiles in the European part of its territory and has even reduced their number. Why hasn't the U.S. done anything comparable?

The President. Actually, we have frequently taken steps intended to lower tension and to show our good will, though these were rarely reciprocated. Immediately after World War II, when we were the only country with nuclear weapons, we proposed giving them up altogether to an international authority so that no country would have such destructive power at its disposal. What a pity that this idea was not accepted. Not only did we not use our nuclear monopoly against others, we signaled our peaceful intent by demobilizing our armed forces in an extraordinarily rapid way. At the end of the war in 1945, we had 12 million men under arms, but by the beginning of 1948 we had reduced our forces to one-tenth of that number -- 1.2 million. Since the 1960's we have unilaterally cut back our own nuclear arsenal. We now have considerably fewer weapons than in 1969 and only one-third of the destructive power which we had at that time.

The United States and the NATO allies have repeatedly said that we will never use our arms, conventional or nuclear, unless we are attacked. Let me add something that might not be widely known in the Soviet Union. In agreement with the NATO countries, the United States since 1979 has removed from Europe well over 1,000 nuclear warheads. When all of our withdrawals have been completed, the total number of warheads withdrawn will be over 2,400. That's a withdrawal of about 5 nuclear weapons for every intermediate-range missile we plan to deploy. It will bring our nuclear forces in Europe to the lowest level in some 20 years. We have seen no comparable Soviet restraint.

If the Soviet Union is now reducing its intermediate-range missiles in Europe, that's a long overdue step. The Soviet Union has now deployed 441 SS - 20 missiles, each with 3 warheads -- that is 1,323 warheads. I don't have to remind you that this Soviet deployment began when NATO had no comparable systems in Europe. We first attempted to negotiate an end to these systems, but when we could not reach agreement NATO proceeded with a limited response which will take place gradually. Today the Soviet Union commands an advantage in warheads of 7 to 1 on missiles already deployed. Our position remains as it has always been: that it would be better to negotiate an end to all of these types of missiles. But even if our hopes for an agreement are disappointed and NATO has to go to full deployment, this will only be a maximum of 572 single-warhead missiles.

Moreover, President Carter canceled both the enhanced-radiation warhead and the B - 1 bomber in 1978, and the Soviet Union made no corresponding move. In fact, when asked what the Soviet Union would reduce in response, one of your officials said, ``We are not philanthropists.'' In 1977 and 1978 the United States also tried to negotiate a ban on developing antisatellite weapons; the Soviet Union refused a ban and proceeded to develop and test an antisatellite weapon. Having already established an operational antisatellite system, the Soviet Union now proposes a freeze before the U.S. can test its own system. Obviously that sort of freeze does not look very fair to us. If the shoe were on the other foot, it wouldn't look very fair to you either.

The issues between our two countries are of such importance that the positions of each government should be communicated accurately to the people of both countries. In this process the media of both countries have an important role to play. We should not attempt to score points against each other, and the media should not distort our positions. We are committed to examining every Soviet proposal with care, seeking to find areas of agreement. It is important that the Soviet Government do the same in regard to our proposals. The important thing is that we both deal seriously with each other's proposals and make a genuine effort to bridge our differences in a way which serves the interests of both countries and the world as a whole. It is in this spirit that I will be approaching my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev.

Daniloff. I'd like to add one thing if I may -- and that is this was a very complex situation, and if it hadn't been for President Reagan's taking a very deep and personal interest in my case, it would probably be some years before I could stand in front of you and say thank you, Mr.

I am pleased to sign into law enrolled bill H.R. 3358, which extends the authorization of appropriations contained in the Atlantic Striped Bass Conservation Act of 1984 and makes certain other changes to that act. This law will continue the effective Federal enforcement of efforts designed to protect and conserve the stock of Atlantic striped bass. In signing this legislation, I note that section 2 preserves in full the discretion of the Secretaries of Commerce and the Interior to determine whether a State is in compliance with the interstate fisheries management plan and, therefore, whether a moratorium should be imposed. While the statute provides that the Secretaries shall carefully consider the comments of the Atlantic States Fisheries Commission, the actual determination is theirs to make.

Any interpretation of the statute that would vest the Atlantic States Fisheries Commission, a body composed of State officials, with the authority to limit the exercise of enforcement discretion under Federal law by executive branch officials would raise a serious constitutional question. I sign this bill with the understanding that it grants no such authority and that if it were interpreted in such a restrictive fashion it would contravene the Constitution.

After long and intense debate, we have set a responsible course of action by taking another important step forward, building on improvements underway since 1981, and affirming the basic wisdom of those who came before us -- the Forrestals, Bradleys, Radfords, and Eisenhowers -- advancing their legacy in the light of our own experience.

President today announced his intention to nominate James G. Stearns to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Securities Investor Protection Corporation for a term expiring December 31, 1988. This is a reappointment, and upon confirmation, he will be redesignated Chairman.

Inter-American Investment Corporation, is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges and immunities that such organization has acquired or may acquire by treaty or congressional action. This designation shall not affect in any way the applicability of Sections 3 and 9 of Article VII of the Agreement.

Alternatives to the Panama Canal is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges, exemptions, or immunities that such organization may have acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by congressional action.

Sec. 4. The Pacific Salmon Commission is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges, exemptions, or immunities that such organization may have acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by congressional action.

By the authority vested in me as President by the laws of the United States of America, including section 301 of Title 3 of the United States Code, it is ordered that the Secretary of Defense and, as designated by him for this purpose, any of the Secretaries, Under Secretaries, and Assistant Secretaries of the Military Departments, are hereby empowered to exercise the discretionary authority granted to the President by subsection 806(a)(2) of the Department of Defense Authorization Act of 1986, Public Law No. 99 - 145, to give preference in hiring for positions in nonappropriated fund activities to qualified spouses of members of the Armed Forces stationed in the same geographical area as the nonappropriated fund activity for positions in wage grade UA - 8 and below and equivalent positions and for positions paid at hourly rates.

Senate vote should not be viewed as the final chapter in America's efforts, along with our allies, to address the plight of the people of South Africa. Instead, it underscores that America -- and that means all of us -- opposes apartheid, a malevolent and archaic system totally alien to our ideals. The debate, which culminated in today's vote, was not whether or not to oppose apartheid but, instead, how best to oppose it and how best to bring freedom to that troubled country.

I deeply regret that Congress has seen fit to override my veto of the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986. Punitive sanctions, I believe, are not the best course of action; they hurt the very people they are intended to help. My hope is that these punitive sanctions do not lead to more violence and more repression. Our administration will, nevertheless, implement the law. It must be recognized, however, that this will not solve the serious problems that plague that country. The United States must also move forward with positive measures to encourage peaceful change and advance the cause of democracy in South Africa.

Now is the time for South Africa's Government to act with courage and good sense to avert a crisis. Moderate black leaders who are committed to democracy and oppose revolutionary violence are ready to work for peaceful change. They should not be kept waiting. It would be tragic to lose this opportunity to create a truly free society which respects the rights of the majority, the minority, and the individual. There is still time for orderly change and peaceful reform. South Africans of good will, black and white, should seize the moment.

Two weeks ago, on the 199th anniversary of the signing of the Constitution, I urged all Americans to support the work of the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States Constitution. Today I had the pleasure of meeting with Dwayne Andreas, a private citizen who has heeded that call and decided to take an active personal role in assisting the Bicentennial Commission in planning, implementing, and financing activities designed to celebrate the Constitution over the next 3 years. At the request of retired Chief Justice Warren E.

Foundation for the Commemoration of the United States Constitution. The foundation will be a fundamental link between the Commission and the private sector. It is a nongovernmental, nonprofit corporation working alongside the Commission with the same worthy goal of honoring the Constitution in the manner the Nation deserves.

Andreas has long been involved in sparking the private sector's initiative to share in the responsibility for projects of great importance to the community and the Nation. He served as Chairman of my Task Force on International Private Enterprise from 1983 to 1984. I am delighted that he has once again volunteered his services for an important enterprise that will benefit the country. I encourage other private citizens and organizations to join in the celebration of our constitutional heritage by supporting the Bicentennial Commission and the Foundation for the Commemoration of the United States Constitution in their efforts to plan a fitting and exciting tribute to our Constitution.

The President. Oh, the 25 -- more than half, according to the figures I have, have gone home. We have granted them until October 14th on others that they have presented a case that there was hardship, difficulty with families and all, and being able to move, but the 25 will go by October 14th.

Mr. President, to followup on your comment about the story in the Post this morning: There is a memo quoted there that says that there is not evidence of Qadhafi's planning any operations, that he seems to be quiescent. Yet the press was told at the time that he apparently was planning new activities. Now, did the White House disinform the press or did it not in this instance?

The President. Well, we've been keeping track, of course, as well as we can, with regard to intelligence information as to whether or not he's planning additional moves or terrorist acts and so forth. And so, yes, there are memos back and forth about that and what the information is, and so when I challenge the veracity of that whole story, I can't deny that here and there they're going to have something to hang it on.

Well, Mr. President, just to followup on this: The main burden of the story suggests that your White House, specifically your national security adviser, constructed an operation whereby the free press in this country was going to be used to convey a false story to the world, namely, that Qadhafi was planning new terrorist operations and that we were going to hit him again -- or we might hit him again -- full well knowing that this was not true. Now, if that's the case, then the press is being used, and we will in the future not know -- when we're being told information from the White House -- whether it's true or it's not.

The President. Well, any time you get any of those leaks, call me. [Laughter] I'll be happy to tell you which ones are honest or not. But no, this was wrong and false. Our position has been one of which -- after we took the action we felt we had to take and I still believe was the correct thing to do -- our position has been one in which we would just as soon have Mr. Qadhafi go to bed every night wondering what we might do. And I think that's the best position for anyone like that to be in. Certainly, we did not intend any program in which we were going to suggest or encourage him to do more things, or conduct more terrorist attacks. We would hope that the one thing that we have done will have turned him off on that for good.

The President. I used this same term once when there used to be arguments -- and I wasn't in this office at the time -- in another office -- there used to be arguments about nuclear weapons in Vietnam during that conflict.

And I said at the time that, while we knew that we were never going to use nuclear weapons there, we should never say that. We should just let them go to bed every night wondering whether we might use those weapons. Well, the same thing is true with someone like Qadhafi and with all the speculation that was going on in the media throughout the world about whether our action would tempt him into further acts or not. And constantly there were questions -- aimed at me as to were we planning anything else. I wouldn't answer those questions. My feeling was just the same thing: He should go to bed every night wondering what we might do.

That was my question, Mr. President. This Woodward story is based on an alleged memorandum from your national security adviser with lengthy quotes. Are those quotes accurate, and does this memorandum exist?

United States approaches the Iceland meetings with a deep sense of serious purpose. Our goal in Iceland is to narrow the differences that separate the United States and the Soviet Union. The President believes that face-to-face private discussions with General Secretary Gorbachev are the best way to seek progress at this critical juncture in our relationship. The President's goal is that both sides will gain a better understanding of each other's position at this time and move forward toward a summit in the United States. We will be satisfied with the Iceland meetings if we accomplish better understanding.

Arms control is important to both nations, indeed, to the world. We will be diligent in our efforts to seek a common ground that can provide the basis for progress at Geneva, but our agenda is broader than arms control. On regional issues -- the tensions in Afghanistan, Africa, the Caribbean, the Middle East, and Southeast Asia contribute to tensions between the two superpowers and build mistrust that makes an arms buildup a dangerous fact of life in today's world. Elimination of regional tensions will go to the cause of mistrust between the United States and Soviet Union. On human rights -- as Americans we share with freedom-loving people everywhere a deep concern over human rights on a worldwide basis, and human rights in the Soviet Union is a major cause of concern to the President. Bilateral relations -- improving government-to-government and people-to-people exchanges in the fields of arts, education, and science can improve understanding among the citizens and contribute to the cause of peace.

President believes that this is not the time for public rhetoric, but, instead, for private talk. The President goes to Iceland with a continuing commitment to seeking understanding that hopefully can lead to agreements that will benefit both the United States and the Soviet Union.

Americans can take pride in this, and in our unwavering support for the state of Israel, which was born out of the ashes of the Holocaust and which to this day is a refuge from persecution and a beacon of hope for Jewish people throughout the world. Our deep commitment to Israel's security is one with our commitment to freedom of religion in our own country. Underlying both are the unchanging moral and spiritual values to which Jews and Judaism continue to make an incalculable contribution.

It is therefore a great pleasure for Nancy and me to extend our warmest greetings for the New Year of 5747 to Jews here and throughout the world. May your names be written in the Book of Life, and may the Lord bless you with health and happiness from generation to generation.

I'm sure many of you have heard that a week from now in Reykjavik, Iceland, I'll be meeting with the leader of the Soviet Union, General Secretary Gorbachev. Though the meeting will be relatively brief, our discussions will be of critical importance: We'll be laying the groundwork for Mr. Gorbachev's upcoming visit to the United States and the summit talks that will take place then. Now, as President, I get all sorts of briefings when talks like these are scheduled, but I thought today I'd change things around a bit and give a briefing of my own to those who I think are equally important participants in the summit process -- you, the people.

I know it's true that some here in the Capital think the people can't be trusted with such complex matters as foreign policy. But along with our Founding Fathers, I've always believed that the intuitive wisdom of the people is far more dependable over the long run than the temporary insights or parochial pursuits of the Washington experts. And that's why I've said right from the start that the first obligation of democratic leaders is to keep the people informed and seek their support on public policy. So, today I want to take a few moments to bring you up to date on the meeting in Iceland and ask your support for our objectives there. In particular, I want to ask your help in removing a grave obstacle to our chances for progress at these talks and the others to follow. It's an obstacle created by partisan divisions here at home, so I do think it's a problem you can help me solve.

Perhaps you remember, Mr. Gorbachev and I first met a year ago in Geneva. We spent about 5 hours alone and more than 15 hours together with the rest of our delegations. Believe me, we learned, again, the truth of the statement: Nations don't mistrust each other because they're armed; they're armed because they mistrust each other. On this point, I was very blunt and candid with Mr.

Gorbachev and told him that in our view the source of that mistrust was the Soviet Union's record of seeking to impose its ideology and rule on others. But I also made it clear that while the United States remains committed to freedom and self-determination for all the nations of the world, we also want to work with the Soviet Union to prevent war and maintain peace.

We believe the twin goals of world peace and freedom can be furthered by making progress with the Soviet Union in four thorny but closely related areas: respect for human rights, arms reductions, the resolution of regional conflicts, and expanded bilateral contacts between our nations. And to achieve progress on such a broad agenda, we believe personal meetings between our leaders can be very useful. First, as I said, to dispel illusions -- to make sure the Soviets avoid miscalculation, that they know where we stand. And second, the simple fact is that heads of state can frequently resolve matters far more quickly than other negotiators can.

On this point, I like to tell a story about the Geneva summit. Our experts thought the scheduling of any future meetings was a difficult, delicate subject best left to later in the discussions. Yet as we were walking together after our first meeting, I mentioned to Mr. Gorbachev how much I would like him to visit the United States. So, I invited him, and he said, ``I accept.'' And then he told me how much he'd like me to see the Soviet Union. So, he invited me, and I said, ``I accept.'' And there it was, as simple as that. So, face-to-face talks can be helpful. And when the Soviet Foreign Minister met with me 2 weeks ago, he carried a letter from Mr. Gorbachev. Part of the letter was the suggestion that we meet in a third country, like Iceland, for preparatory talks on the upcoming summit here in the United States. I accepted.

I want you to know that next week during the talks in Iceland, we will be taking the same balanced approach we took in Geneva. On one hand, we'll make it clear we seek negotiations and serious progress with the Soviets on a wide range of issues. On the other, we'll make it clear that we will not sacrifice our values, principles, or vital interests for the sake of merely signing agreements. And that's just another way of making it clear to the Soviets we harbor no illusions about them or their geopolitical intentions.

This last point is important. You see, in the past, when agreements were reached with the Soviets, this led to much unrealistic talk about the great thaw in Soviet-American relations and even predictions about the end of the cold war. And then when the Soviets reverted to form, such as the invasion of Afghanistan, the result was shock and policy paralysis in Washington.

Now, that's the bottom line to this briefing: In order to be successful in negotiations, an American President must be perceived by the Soviets as realistic and firm and, above all, a President speaking for a united people, a united country. In the past this has been one of the Nation's noblest traditions. When it came to matters of national security, politics usually stopped at the water's edge. Americans stood together and the fabric of bipartisan cooperation was untearable, the bond of national unity unbreakable.

I mentioned when I returned last year from Geneva, rarely have the expressions of public and congressional support been more gratifying than during our negotiations with the Soviets. And so today, with a new round of negotiations underway, I'm appealing again for that support. And I'm asking the Congress to be especially alert about sending the Soviets a message of national unity. For example, we believe our 5\1/2\-year military buildup has been a principal factor in bringing the Soviets to the negotiating table. So, we need continued support for defense appropriations. So, too, some legislative restrictions passed by the House of Representatives could well jeopardize the chances for successful discussions with the Soviets.

They voted to stop us from producing a credible deterrent to modern Soviet chemical weapons. They voted to substantially cut our request for the Strategic Defense Initiatives, a program that promotes a safer future and also underpins our negotiating position in Geneva and our hopes for strategic arms reductions. They voted to deny funds to move beyond certain limits of SALT II, a treaty that couldn't be ratified and that would've expired by now if it had been ratified -- and that the Soviets have repeatedly violated. And finally, the House has prohibited essentially the testing of all nuclear weapons, which we still need to deter war.

Unless they are changed from the House-passed version, believe me, it will be vetoed. But there is an even larger issue. Every single one of these issues I outlined is under discussion with the Soviets. I cannot afford to have my hands tied in our discussions about them, nor can we fail to have the Government's appropriations resolved for next year. The Soviets must not think that delay could work to their advantage by gaining from the Congress what they cannot win at the negotiating table.

And that's why we need to send to the Soviets a consistent message of clear resolve and national unity. These upcoming negotiations are important to you, your children, and America's future. Today I'm asking your support and that of the congressional leadership. Bipartisan cooperation has been the keystone of American foreign policy, and as I've said, I'm grateful and deeply touched by the support I've received in the past from all of you. But right now that support is needed more than ever. The Members of Congress should know that, as I said at the beginning, the people are the experts in any democracy and you will hold accountable those who, for the sake of partisan advantage, trifle with our national security and the chances for peace and freedom.

These are hopeful developments. And that's why I think we can view this whole summit process soberly and yet with a reasonable degree of optimism. Thank you for your support in the past, and as we leave for the talks in Iceland, I hope I can count on you again. Make your views known in Washington and remember to keep us in your prayers as well.

Make each employee aware of the health, economic, and social costs of illegal drug use, assist employees in recognizing and combatting illegal drug use in the workplace and in homes and communities, and ensure that each employee is aware that unauthorized possession of a controlled substance is a crime.

To assist you, the Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Director of the Office of Personnel Management will provide information about the effects of drug abuse, guidelines for drug testing and treatment, training of supervisory personnel, and technical assistance in support of Employee Assistance Programs.

Secretary of Labor will work with labor leaders to promote our goal of drug-free workplaces, develop and disseminate a ``what works'' booklet on Workplaces Without Drugs, and make available a team of experts to assist management and unions in establishing drug prevention programs.

Secretary of Education, as national advocate for drug-free schools, will work with educators, parents, students, and others to ensure that everything possible is done to protect our children from the dangers of illegal drugs. The Secretary of Education will disseminate drug-related educational materials such as the booklet Schools Without Drugs.

Attorney General and the Secretary of Education will work together to ensure that local law enforcement officials and school authorities cooperate in discouraging illegal drug use and in prosecuting the so-called ``school yard laws'' against distribution or manufacture of drugs around school property.

Secretary of Health and Human Services will take the lead in encouraging States and communities to develop programs to treat specific drug-related health problems. This will be achieved by seeking an emergency expansion of services in facilities that treat drug-related health problems, and by establishing community systems development projects.

Secretary of Health and Human Services will also expand research in health-related areas such as drug testing, and bolster medical and health prevention programs by establishing a Center for Substance Abuse Prevention.

Encourage corporations, service organizations, and the media with which you interact to stimulate development of innovative community-based prevention programs and to develop prevention programs within their organizations.

Provide leadership to ensure that Americans have access to accurate and effective information about illegal drugs and strategies for getting drugs out of their homes, schools, workplaces, communities, and the Nation. The proposed Center for Substance Abuse Prevention, in the Department of Health and Human Services, will provide a toll-free number for technical assistance and referrals and will manage a speakers' bureau on illegal drug use prevention.

Secretary of Housing and Urban Development will take the lead in an effort to reduce the level of illegal drug activity in public housing authorities, and will work with the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the Secretary of Labor, and the Attorney General to achieve drug-free housing developments.

Secretary of Transportation will take the lead in an effort to ensure safe transportation of people and goods, and will work with the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the Secretary of Education, and the Attorney General to promote regulatory changes, drug-testing, prevention, and education leading to a drug-free transportation system.

I have enclosed a personal message for Executive Branch employees about our new drug abuse initiatives. Please ensure that each employee in your organization receives a copy, and feel free to communicate an additional personal message of your own.

You should institute actions on the above initiatives immediately, using existing resources or reallocating resources where necessary. I will ask for periodic progress reports through the Domestic Policy Council to ensure that we are moving toward our goal of a drug-free America.

As you know, I recently approved several new initiatives with an overriding goal of a drug-free America. This is no easy task, requiring as it does the commitment and support of all Americans. I am asking you, as citizens, parents, friends, and colleagues, to take a leading role.

As members of the Nation's largest work force, you can continue to set an example for other American workers. I know an overwhelming majority of Federal employees have never had trouble with illegal drugs, but our goal is a safe and drug-free workplace for all employees and the American public. Certainly the issue of drug testing has caused some concern, but I want to assure you that my Executive Order contains provisions to ensure that any testing program will be fair and will protect your rights as citizens.

Your efforts to increase public awareness and prevention of drug abuse are also crucial. Illegal drug use is not a ``victimless crime,'' nor is it glamorous or a matter of personal choice. Drug abuse victimizes everyone in productive time lost, lives shattered, and families and communities torn apart. We must send this message beyond the workplace to friends and neighbors and especially to our young people.

I have called upon you many times in the past, and your support and dedication have already helped us achieve so much. Now I am asking you to get personally involved in ridding our offices, schools, homes, and communities of drugs and making them better places to live and work. I know I can count on your personal help.

The proportion of disabled persons in rural areas is much higher but less concentrated than in urban areas. This means that disabled persons residing in rural areas are often isolated and far from the types of services, programs, and assistance that are available to their urban counterparts.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Unchecked, it poses a threat to our Nation. But Americans are fighting back against this insidious evil. More and more young people are choosing to ``Just Say No'' to drugs. This heartening development is due to the tireless efforts of concerned parents, private sector organizations, schools, and State and Federal government.

We cannot afford to slacken in our efforts when nearly two-thirds of all American teenagers have used an illicit drug at least once before they finish high school. Especially disturbing is the level of cocaine use among teenagers and young adults in our country.

Cocaine is especially dangerous because people tend to underestimate its harmful effects. Cocaine must be recognized for what it is: a dangerous, addictive drug. Cocaine can kill: deaths from respiratory and cardiac arrest from cocaine overdose are increasing among all age groups. Recently there has been a frightening upsurge in the use of ``crack,'' a form of cocaine that is smoked.

The most effective weapon we have against drug abuse is to dry up demand by spreading knowledge about its ruinous effects. Across the country, individuals and organizations have discovered the power of united action. The ``peer pressure'' that so often has been used to snare the unwary into ``experimenting'' with drugs is now being used to build resistance. Youth-led groups are in the forefront of our national crusade to rid our country of this evil. The vigorous action of parents, religious and community leaders, teachers, doctors, counselors, and young people themselves with their commitment of time, energy, and love, has been an inspiration to all of us. Public education media campaigns have also been effective in motivating people to ``Just Say No.'' A major portion of the Federal drug abuse prevention effort is directed toward continued research into the deleterious effects of drugs and getting this information out to those who can use it most effectively.

Everyone has a part to play in this crusade: parents, teachers, health care professionals, youth workers, and celebrities in entertainment, sports, and other fields. All America must speak with one voice. We must teach our young people to say ``no'' to the degradation of drugs and ``yes'' to the bright promise of a drug-free America. This is a battle for liberty from the enslavement of drug addiction. We can win. We must win. With God's help and a united people, we shall win.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of October 5 through October 11, 1986, as National Drug Abuse Education and Prevention Week, and October 6, 1986, as National Drug Abuse Education Day. I call upon the people of the United States to participate in drug abuse education and prevention programs in their communities. I encourage parents and children to talk and work together to prevent drug abuse in the family and to dedicate themselves to the goal of a drug-free America.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. Well, it's good to see all of you here today as we kick off National Drug Abuse Education and Prevention Week. On March 6, 1981, in my second press conference as President, I said that to be effective in stopping illegal drugs we had to focus on the user. And today our national crusade against the use of illegal drugs is gaining a powerful momentum.

All of you who have stood at the frontlines in our fight against drug abuse for the past several years have watched our numbers growing. Thousands have come forward and volunteered; many are here today. The commitment that each of you brings to our nation and our future is a powerful force for good that no one should underestimate. The will of the American people is being heard. We will no longer watch as illegal drugs infiltrate our schools, invade our factories, and terrorize our citizens. We will no longer tolerate this insidious evil threatening our values and undercutting our institutions.

Aggressive corporate and school measures to end drug abuse have met with strong support from workers, students, and the community. The media has focused its spotlight on the issue, and the private sector is pitching in to raise awareness across our nation to the perils of drug abuse. Most importantly, our young people, encouraged by a growing public outcry and their own strength of conviction, are forming peer-support groups in opposition to drug use. The expansive efforts by all levels of government, by the business community, by civic and social organizations, and most importantly by concerned individuals are making a difference. After 5 years of aggressive enforcement and a massive public awareness campaign, public attitudes are clearly against the use of illegal drugs and drug awareness is at an all-time high.

The President. Earlier today I signed a proclamation designating the week of October 5th through October 11th as National Drug Abuse Education and Prevention Week and today, October 6th, 1986, as National Drug Abuse Education Day. I'm calling on each American to seek every opportunity to educate yourself and others about drug abuse, to be strong in your intolerance of illegal drug use, and firm in your commitment to a drug-free America. We must show our intolerance for illegal drugs. And it's only by being tough that we can be compassionate, that we can reach out to the user and force him to quit using.

As we begin National Drug Abuse Education and Prevention Week, the Federal Government is also entering into the spirit of the national crusade for a drug-free America by working toward a drug-free workplace. I'm forwarding a memorandum to the head of all executive departments and agencies, along with my personal communication to each and every executive branch employee, calling upon them to take a leading role in eliminating the use of illegal drugs. And this includes doing all in their power to increase public awareness and prevention of drug abuse.

I strongly believe that if this battle is to be won -- and it must be won -- each and every one of us has to become aware of the tremendous cost of illegal drugs and then take a stand and get involved. Our stand may be as simple as not tolerating illegal drug use at a party or as complex as implementing a strong drug-free policy for a major corporation. Both approaches are effective and both are essential. When we all come together, united and committed, then those who are killing America and terrorizing it with slow but sure chemical destruction will see that they are up against the mightiest force for good that we know: the compassionate, but firm, resolve of the American people. And then they will have no dark alleyways to hide in.

Well, thank you, and I'm delighted we could meet today. First, this is a chance to say hello to all of you and compliment you on the work that you've been doing on defense- and peace-related issues. And second, knowing of your interest in this matter, I wanted to use this opportunity to offer a perspective -- the American perspective if you will -- on the meetings between Mr. Gorbachev and me later this week in Reykjavik, Iceland.

By the way, since we Americans have developed a reputation for being uncomplicated, straightforward, and not especially long-winded, I want you to know that I'll be trying to practice these national traits -- especially the last one -- in my remarks to you today. I can't resist! I've worn out a story that expressed the -- [laughter] -- that expressed the importance of brevity in a speech. It was told to me by a minister, Bill Alexander -- used to do the invocation for the Republican National Conventions, and he heard me speak once. And after he'd heard me speak, he told me about his first experience as a preacher, and I've always thought there was a connection.

But recently, as you know, there's been some speculation that the United States and the Soviet Union are about to sign important, new arms control agreements. Now, this sort of talk isn't all that unexpected. Whenever leaders of countries are about to meet, there are always those who predict landmark treaties and historical breakthroughs. Yet when I see such speculation, I can't help but think of the first administrative post that I held. And I hope you'll forgive me for reminiscing here, but as a union president, I spent a good deal of time at the bargaining table and learned one valuable lesson: Now that it's the initial phase of the negotiating process -- laying the groundwork, setting the agenda, establishing areas of agreement as well as disagreement -- that pays off in the future. Now, if that's true of labor and management negotiations here, you can imagine how relevant it is to Soviet-American bargaining sessions. After all, we both have a little more separating us than, say, General Motors and UAW. So, groundwork is essential.

And from the beginning, we've tried to make this a hallmark of administration policy. We've tried to take a prudent and a realistic and, above all, deliberate approach toward Soviet-American relations. Instead of rushing unprepared into negotiations with the Soviets, the administration took the time in its earliest days to make clear the essential elements of American foreign policy: our commitment to the twin goals of world peace and world freedom; our willingness to be realistic and candid about the Soviets; to publicly define the crucial, moral distinctions between totalitarianism and democracy; and actively assist those who are struggling for their own self-determination. Yet at the same time, we also made plain another of our essential objectives: our determination to seek ways of working with the Soviets to prevent war and to keep the peace. In pursuing this objective, we adopted a step-by-step approach toward Soviet-American negotiations, gradually expanding and intensifying the areas of both bilateral and multilateral discussion. And as we've seen, eventually summit meetings themselves became a critical part of that effort.

Now, this willingness to make painstaking preparations was what, I believe, made last year's talks in Geneva a success. Each side had a good idea of what to expect; there was an agenda. Mr. Gorbachev and I could be candid with each other. In short, we had something to work with, something to build on. And we must continue in this spirit. And that's why Iceland is not intended to be a signing ceremony or a media event, but a presummit planning session, a chance to make preparations for the serious work Mr.

And yet, while our emphasis will be on planning and preparation, not treaty papers or publicity, part of the emphasis in Iceland will be on the broad-based agenda that we've agreed to, discussion not only of critical arms reduction proposals but equally important questions such as Soviet human rights violations, military intervention by the Soviets and their proxies in regional conflicts.

On this point of the summit agenda let me add another point of background. A few years ago in a speech to the United Nations, I said that I shared the sense of urgency many felt about arms control issues, but I also suggested placing the entire burden of Soviet-American relations on arms control negotiations could be dangerous and counterproductive. I noted that problems in arms negotiations should not be permitted to thwart or imperil the entire Soviet-American relationship and, similarly, that sometimes negotiations in other areas could assist in speeding up the arms control process. In short, doing more about arms control meant talking about more than arms control. So, I proposed in my 1984 U.N. address what I called umbrella talks, negotiations with a broad-based agenda. The summit process has reflected this approach and includes a broad-based agenda. We've stressed, in addition to arms reduction, three other agenda items: respect for human rights, resolving regional conflicts, and improving bilateral contacts between the Soviets and ourselves.

Now, that first area, human rights, takes on, in view of the recent Daniloff incident, a particular reference -- or relevance, I should say. As you know, after a Soviet spy at the U.N. was arrested, the Soviets retaliated by arresting an American journalist, Nicholas Daniloff, on trumped-up charges. It was an act that held hostage not only an innocent American journalist but the future of Soviet-American relations. The United States took action in response to the Soviet use of the U.N. for intelligence activities by ordering the expulsion of 25 Soviet personnel known to be involved in such activities. That the arrest of a single spy could lead to such risk-taking by the Soviets again underscores the differences between our two systems. It was an extremely grave step, but one that could hardly surprise us. After all, human rights violations in the Soviet bloc remain unceasing, because they're institutionalized and sanctioned by the state ideology.

It's worth noting here that we agreed to exchange the Soviet spy in question for the noted Russian human rights leader Yuriy Orlov and his wife. Mr. Orlov's service to humanity, the record of his sufferings, makes him a hero for our time. Yet it is also worth noting he was persecuted simply because he led an effort to get the Soviet Government to live up to the human rights agreements it signed at Helsinki in 1975. When the Soviet State's ideology makes it a crime to advocate living up to international commitments, the rest of the world has to take notice. And this point, as well as the entire range of Soviet human rights abuses, must be addressed at future summits.

So, too, there is the issue of regional conflicts. It would be simply unthinkable for world leaders to meet in ``splendid isolation'' even as the people of Afghanistan, Central America, Africa, and Southeast Asia undergo terrible sufferings as a result of Soviet invasion or military intervention. Again, our proposals for resolving regional conflicts remain a critical agenda item. And on this point, you may have read last week that the Soviet Foreign Minister acknowledged that Afghanistan has to be discussed in Reykjavik. I wish we saw any evidence that the Soviets had made a decision to get out. They need to see that the only solution that can last is one providing self-determination for the Afghan people and a rapid, complete withdrawal of Soviet forces. Short of that, the freedom fighters will struggle on, and let me promise you, they'll have the support they need from people around the world.

And finally, there is the issue of broader contacts between the Soviet and American peoples, especially young people. We all welcome the commitment made last year in Geneva to increase contacts, notably in the cultural exchange area. This was the result of careful presummit planning, and it's our hope that our work in Iceland will speed up implementation of these programs and lay the groundwork for future progress at future summits.

These then are the difficult matters on our summit agenda: arms reduction, human rights, regional conflicts, people-to-people contacts. I think you can understand, then, when Mr. Gorbachev extended his invitation to a presummit discussion, I accepted. With such grave and complex matters, there's no such thing as too much preparation. So, I hope that in explaining all this I've done something to dispel some of the inaccurate speculation and false hopes raised about the Iceland talks. I expect these talks to be useful and successful, but only as preparation for future summit conferences. Our view is that we will proceed as we have from the start: step by step, cautiously, prudently, and realistically. And by the way, I hope this last point about our realism helps to answer some of the domestic criticisms recently of the summit process. Actually, I've got to confess that hearing suggestions that I'm getting soft on communism is for me a new -- and perhaps the word ``titillating'' -- [laughter] -- is proper for that experience.

But seriously, I would ask those of my old supporters who may have voiced doubts to simply consider three facts that I think may make the current summit process very different from that of previous decades. First, the United States has made it plain we enter these negotiations without illusions and that we will continue to be candid about the Soviet Union, the moral implications of its ideology, the grave danger of its geopolitical intentions. Second, part of this candid approach includes restatement of what I said in my 1982 speech at Westminster Palace in Great Britain: that the ultimate goal of American foreign policy is not just the prevention of war, but the extension of freedom -- to see that every nation, every people, every person someday enjoys the blessings of liberty. And finally, I would ask that some note be taken of the historical tides. America is no longer under siege -- far from it. Our economic and military power is resurgent, the Western democracies are revitalized, and all across the world, nations are turning to democratic ideas and the principles of the free market. In all of this, the United States continues to play its historical role and assist those who struggle for world freedom.

And we believe the summit process can be useful in preventing war as we move toward a world of expanding personal freedom and growing respect for human rights. We believe the summit agenda reflects the helpful changes that have occurred in the world. We're discussing not just arms control, for example, but arms reduction, as well as human rights and regional conflicts. Progress toward our twin goals of peace and freedom then will not be easy. As I mentioned in my Saturday radio talk, we seek the support of all Americans. We need your help, and we also need, as I said, some careful preparation. And that's why we agreed to the talks in Iceland and will look forward to meeting Mr. Gorbachev there. And come to think of it, it's also why I have to get back across the street to my homework and my briefing books.

For years the United States Government has expressed concern about the Government of Japan's trade barriers that have unfairly restricted American cigarette producers' access to the Japanese market. Despite some improvements, the market share of U.S. cigarette exporters in Japan remains less than three percent despite their competitiveness. Looked at as a whole, the Japanese Government's laws, policies and practices insulate an inefficient monopoly from competition and shift to imports and Japanese consumers the costs of maintaining a highly uncompetitive domestic tobacco leaf industry.

The specific unfair Japanese Government practices include: (1) the combination of a significant trade barrier (a 20 percent tariff and a high, largely ad valorem, excise tax) and an unreasonable, absolute investment barrier (a manufacturing monopoly), (2) the current discriminatory deferral of excise tax payment favoring the Japanese tobacco monopoly, (3) a price approval system that protects the Japanese tobacco monopoly against foreign competition, and (4) discriminatory or unreasonable practices by the government-controlled distribution instrumentality. All of these unfair practices burden or restrict U.S. commerce.

Representatives of the Governments of Japan and the United States held a series of consultations concerning increased access to the Japanese cigarette market. As a result of these consultations, we reached an agreement regarding actions that Japan will take to improve our firms' access. The Government of Japan will suspend the tariff, reducing it to zero. It also will end the discriminatory deferral of excise tax payment by its tobacco monopoly by April 1, 1987, and modify its price approval system to shorten the application period significantly and to make the process transparent and virtually automatic. In addition, the government-controlled distribution instrumentality has satisfactorily addressed the major existing distribution problems. When implemented, these measures should accomplish our goal of obtaining increased access for U.S. firms to Japan's cigarette market.

President today announced his intention to nominate Martin Anderson to be a member of the General Advisory Committee of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. He would succeed Shirley N. Pettis.

President today announced his intention to appoint Edwin L. Harper to be a member of the Commission on Executive, Legislative, and Judicial Salaries for the period of the 1987 fiscal year of the Federal Government. He would succeed Lloyd Norton Cutler.

Yuriy Orlov and Mrs. Orlov. Yuriy is a founding member of the independent Soviet Helsinki Monitoring Group, a man who has done more to inform the world of current Soviet human rights violations than any man on Earth -- as I said yesterday, a hero for our time. The West owes him a profound debt, both for his courage and fortitude under unspeakable conditions and for reminding us how precious are the freedoms that we sometimes take for granted.

As you all know, there has been much speculation that our upcoming meeting in Reykjavik will focus on arms control. But true peace requires respect for human rights and freedom as well as arms control. We go to Iceland in pursuit of peace, but it's important that the world and our adversaries understand what we mean when we speak of peace. Peace is not simply an absence of war, it's the presence of justice. Human rights, human freedom are its indispensable elements. These fundamental values and beliefs are matters on which we Americans cannot and will not compromise. So, our agenda for the Reykjavik meeting will deal not only with arms reductions but Soviet human rights violations, military intervention by the Soviets and their proxies in regional conflicts, and broadening contacts between our two peoples.

This meeting is not to sign agreements, but to prepare the way for a productive summit. A real improvement in the Soviet Union's human rights record is essential for such a summit. We will not sacrifice fundamental principles or vital U.S. interests to get a summit. I'll make it amply clear to Mr. Gorbachev that unless there is real Soviet movement on human rights, we will not have the kind of political atmosphere necessary to make lasting progress on other issues. There is much room for improvement -- the religious persecution, long divided families, suppression of emigration, and harassment of ethnic and cultural activists. We are realistic about the Soviet Union and have no illusions about the difficulty of making progress on these key issues, but I see no alternative to our twin policy of strength and dialog.

The President. No, he spoke of wanting to carry on the work that he was carrying on there, to continue to strive for freedom; and his goals are very much those of the people around this table already.

The appropriation authorization of $10 million for a new Federally assisted project is inappropriate and unwarranted at a time when there is a critical need to operate within severe budgetary constraints and to fund adequately higher priority programs. Although the stated purpose of the proposed Institute would be to ``revitalize the competitiveness of small business industry in America, particularly in the international marketplace, and to serve as a regional demonstration center transferring emerging technology . . . ,'' it is not clear that the Institute would provide the best means to accomplish this goal.

Additionally, in light of current budgetary constraints, it is particularly unfortunate that the bill accords special treatment to a specific institution and does not require selection on a competitive basis. Selecting recipients competitively helps to ensure that the taxpayers' money is spent on projects that address an acknowledged need and demonstrate the greatest promise of success. Legislative provisions that accord special treatment to certain applicants or, as here, identify the sole recipient of assistance are particularly objectionable. I am concerned also that the Institute, proposed as a ``regional demonstration center,'' would set an undesirable precedent for the noncompetitive establishment of additional regional centers, without a demonstrated need for a Federal role in this area.

I note that Title I of the bill would unnecessarily extend two SBA pilot programs. The goal of the pilot procurement program can be accomplished under existing authorities. The extension of the surety bond waiver program provided in Title I has proved unnecessary, as no waivers have been requested since the program was first authorized in 1978.

His talent, professionalism, and instinct for excellence were an inspiration to all of us who had the privilege to work with Hal. Hal Wallis was a special friend who we will miss. We extend our deepest sympathy to his family.

It's an honor to speak to the Republican Governors Association -- all the more so because I used to be a member myself. One of the aspects of these meetings that I used to enjoy most was the sense of diversity -- the distances between our States, the different outlooks in our people, even the regional accents. Come to think of it, this sort of diversity reminds me of a story. You'll discover when you get to be my age that quite a few things remind you of a story.

But, ladies and gentlemen, it was good to see so many of you in the Oval Office this afternoon, and I want to thank you again for inviting me to spend a few minutes with you this evening. And I want you to know that I consider myself deeply indebted to each of you, both for the wonderful work you're doing out in your States and to all the help you've given to those of us working here in Washington. Special thanks to your chairman, John Sununu of New Hampshire, to your vice chairman Tom Kean of New Jersey, and to your immediate past chairman Dick Thornburgh of Pennsylvania. To all of them, I can say congratulations on a job well done. And to Lamar Alexander of Tennessee, immediate past chairman of the National Governors' Association, you have everyone's gratitude for your leadership, especially on the NGA's recently announced education initiative.

But if I could, tonight, I'd like to take a moment or two to consider the theme taken up by this year's RGA idea book: the second stage of the revolution. Of course, first we need to be as clear as we can about just what it is that's taken place in the first stage of the revolution. There are the many changes we've been able to effect in policy -- themselves tremendously important -- changes like the lower tax rates and the more limited role of the Federal Government that have led to some 46 months now of economic growth and to the creation of more than 11\1/2\ million new jobs, and changes like the rebuilding of our national defenses and the firm reassertion of America's world role on behalf of human freedom. But beyond the policy itself, it seems to me that something still deeper and more lasting has taken place: a shift in expectations, a change in the very way the American people think about government itself. As one columnist put it: The key fact about all that has happened since our administration first took office is that we have completely altered the terms of what has been called the contemporary political conversation.

But today we've not only seen our 1981 tax cut take effect, we've seen the passage of the most sweeping and dramatic tax reform in decades. A recent headline in the Washington Post told the story: ``The Impossible Became the Inevitable.'' Consider aid to anti-Communist insurgencies. When we took office, fashionable opinion in Washington still centered on the notion of containment, or merely attempting to slow the Soviet advance. Well, the idea that we should actually offer help to those attempting to reverse that advance seemed outlandish, a deviation from established and comfortable patterns of thought. Yet today we see our country firmly on the side of freedom fighters in Afghanistan, Africa, and Cambodia. El Salvador is safely in the freedom family. When we first got here everyone was talking as if it was Vietnam -- Get out of El Salvador -- and now there's a healthy democracy there. Grenada has been finally saved.

Of course I could go on discussing national policy -- our strategic defense initiative, in particular, that represents another dramatic change, a quantum leap, if you will, in the very way we think about defending our country. But I want to focus, instead, for a moment on all that this first stage of our revolution has meant to you in your States. From the first, our administration took the concept of federalism seriously. You couldn't put a Governor back here in this job that he wouldn't take it seriously. That's the greatest strength and source of freedom in our nation: that we are a federation of sovereign States. For example, we reduced a large number of complicated programs involving the States into a much smaller number of block grants, and that whittled down an awful lot of expensive Federal overhead. We shifted certain programs from Federal to State management. And we instituted a new openness toward the States. This openness is especially visible in the contributions that so many of you have made to the studies we're now finishing on federalism, the American family, and low-income assistance. Still more recently, of course, many of you have taken a strong lead in your States in the national crusade against drug abuse.

Now, it's true that in the early days many of you faced difficulties as we cut back Federal financing of State affairs. And believe me I know what you were going through, because I've been there. But overall, these 3 and more years of economic expansion have put our States and cities alike in good economic shape.

And in the large cities that demand special attention from so many of you, a recent study by the Urban Institute concluded that budgets are by and large in good condition. Now, I wish I could say the same thing about Washington. [Laughter] Indeed, the study found, as early as the end of 1982, the Nation's cities were financially better off than they had been at any time during the 1970's.

And as we've limited government here in Washington, you in the statehouses have been taking the lead on matters that are important to your own people. In Indiana we've seen merit pay for State employees. In North Carolina we've seen the Year of the Child, a sweeping initiative to protect children from kidnaping, neglect, and other abuses. We've seen the teacher career ladder in Tennessee and New Jersey's alternate route for teacher training, a program that allows certain highly motivated college graduates to teach even if they haven't had the traditional training. We've seen job programs in Oregon, New Hampshire, Illinois, and elsewhere. And we've seen tax incentives used to promote economic growth in programs like Pennsylvania's economic revitalization tax credit.

Even though this change is already underway, most of stage one of our revolution has taken place here in Washington, as we've continued to limit the scope of the Federal Government. Now it's time for resources, initiatives, and public attention to shift back to the States still more definitely, still more dramatically -- in other words, to alter the balance of power permanently in favor of levels of government that are closer to the people. This is stage two of our revolution. And, yes, this means setting aside liberal, Democratic Governors, fixed by choice and habit alike in their dependency upon Washington -- setting them aside for Republican Governors, Governors of energy and new ideas. You know, just last month I campaigned in Detroit for Bill Lucas, one of the most impressive men I've ever met and, as you know, our candidate for Governor of Michigan. Later that day I campaigned in Omaha for Kay Orr, one of the five Republican women running for Governor this year. And I couldn't help but think that those two stops demonstrated perhaps more clearly than anything else ever could: Today it's the GOP that's the party of ideas, the party of the future, the party of opportunity for all.

But that's just what this year's State races come down to: contests for the future, contests that will help shape our life in America for our children and our children's children. So, I pledge my full commitment. If there's anything at all we can do to help, just let us know. For in the end, these statehouse races are about freedom, about whether or not freedom in America will be expanded by bringing government closer to the people, about whether or not we give to the people the freedom to dream, to dare, and the freedom to which they, as Americans, are so richly entitled. So, my friends, it's on to stage two.

Well, thank you, and God bless you all. And believe me, I'm looking forward to that majority of Republican Governors, because I know that I'll be a lot more comfortable back here. See, I'm outnumbered right now, and I'd like it the other way around. Thanks again.

The President. I have one thing I would like to say -- a little statement. We are 8 days into the fiscal year. We do not have a budget. We had a continuing resolution for a few days while the Congress continued to debate. That expires as of midnight tonight, and the Government has no funds. Now, I don't think that we should go for another short-term continuing resolution. I think it is time that we have a budget, and I think it is time that the Congress does not tie to that budget things having to do with armament and national security that will tie my hands now on the eve of going to Iceland to debate and to negotiate with the Soviet Union. And I think the message to Congress should be that it is high time that we have a budget, and a budget that deals with the financial situation and does not try to bring in their views on international relations and national security.

The President. We've been aware that there are private groups and private citizens that have been trying to help the contras -- to that extent -- but we did not know the exact particulars of what they're doing.

The President. Well, we're in a free country where private citizens have a great many freedoms -- including the fact that some years ago, many of you spoke approvingly of something called the Abraham Lincoln Brigade in the Spanish Civil War.

Thank you for taking time from your busy schedule to join me for breakfast yesterday and for the opportunity to discuss my upcoming meeting in Iceland. Your expression of support and your suggestion on resolving the obstacles relating to the Continuing Resolution were appreciated.

It is on the subject of the omnibus appropriations bill and its relation to the Iceland meetings that I write to you today. There is no doubt in my mind that all, be they Democrats or Republicans, wish success and progress in our discussions with the Soviets.

Unfortunately, merely wishing for these goals will not allow us to attain them. We have before us a genuine opportunity to advance the prospects for true arms reduction, for progress on human rights, for addressing regional conflicts, and for building on our bilateral relationship. I believe this opportunity results from the resolve shown not just by this Administration but by the Congress and most importantly by the American people.

American people understand that the Soviets will negotiate only when it is in their interest to do so and when they believe they will do better at the negotiating table than they will do through a continued arms buildup.

I want to address your suggestions on how we might reach final agreement on the Continuing Resolution. If I understood your approach, it was to seek compromise where possible on the outstanding differences of ASAT, chemical weapons, and SDI, but to put off decisions until next March on a moratorium on nuclear testing and adherence to the SALT II sublimits. In addition, you would require my commitment, in the interim, to adhere to the SALT II limitations.

You mentioned that, as Majority Leader, you were being an honest representative of the views of your Democratic colleagues and I respect the spirit in which you offered those thoughts. Nonetheless, I believe this approach would harm the prospects for success at Iceland.

Soviet leaders are very intelligent and skilled negotiators. The Soviets are careful observers of our political and legislative process. They are watching intently what decisions our government makes on issues critical to them in deciding how they should approach our meetings this weekend. Our system does not mask our differences or our debate -- a tradition of debate that is the foundation of strength in an open and free democratic society.

Specifically, the actions taken by the Congress in dealing with the Continuing Resolution will send a signal for all to see. Will we go forward maintaining our resolve or will we begin to negotiate with ourselves, jeopardizing the good work that has brought us to our current position? Now for the first time in history, the Soviets are discussing seriously not just limitations on how many more weapons we have but how we can reduce the weapons we already have.

How can I agree to Congressional restrictions on nuclear testing before we agree with the Soviets on adequate verification procedures to avoid cheating and before we agree to eliminate the nuclear weapons which now make nuclear testing necessary? How can I agree to adhere to certain limits of the unratified SALT II treaty when the Soviets have already violated some of its provisions?

Therefore, you should know that I believe any further delay in resolving the differences on the Continuing Resolution beyond the commencement of the talks in Iceland or postponing resolving those differences until sometime next year is unacceptable and could not have my support.

I cannot be forced by the Congress to accept language that restricts our bargaining position at the negotiating table. We must not send a message to the Soviets that could be construed as an incentive to delay undertaking serious discussions now because of a belief that they could get a better deal from the Congress later.

Finally, it is equally important that the outstanding and unresolved domestic issues in the Continuing Resolution also be addressed. These items are as much of an impediment to finalizing the budget as are the national security-related matters.

I have instructed my staff to continue to work earnestly with the Congress to facilitate the completion of a Continuing Resolution that I can sign. I also want to reiterate the appeal I made to you and your colleagues yesterday.

Partisan differences on national security issues must be set aside during this crucial time in our negotiations with the Soviets. I also want to restate my hope that I will go to Iceland with your trust, confidence and support -- I won't let you down.

The President. Some of you may have heard that I'm leaving on a journey tomorrow that'll take me to Iceland to meet General Secretary Gorbachev. It's a challenge any time two leaders from major powers get together. In this case, we'll be laying the foundation for a full-fledged summit which, if things go right in these preparatory sessions, will be held here in the United States. It's times like these, when diplomacy is being conducted at the highest level, that I'm particularly grateful for the way that we, as a free people, pull together.

I think the best policy is America's time-tested tradition of leaving politics at the water's edge. It's great to know when I look over my shoulder that the folks back home are with me. I won't be seeing Republicans or Democrats, I'll be seeing Americans. So, I'm just going to count on your support and prayers in the days ahead. That's a source of strength which makes all the difference for free countries like ours.

And again, it's good to be with you. As the Governor hinted, I have a soft spot in my heart for the people of North Carolina. Over my political career, I've come here on so many occasions to ask for your support. And whether I was running for the Presidency or trying to rally the public behind our economic recovery program or trying to keep tax reform alive, you've never let me down. And without you, nothing we've done would've been possible. And if we stick together, nobody, but nobody, is going to turn us back. It's fitting that I come to you now in this last election in which I will have a personal stake to ask for your help. It's a make-or-break election, and we've got a standard bearer here in North Carolina to be proud of. I'm asking you a personal favor: For North Carolina, for your country, please cast your ballot for Jim Broyhill for the United States Senate.

Broyhill has been a stalwart of our cause his entire adult life. You know, there's a story about a pig and a chicken that went to town. They were going to go look for jobs in the city. And they came to a place -- it was a restaurant -- and a sign in the window: Ham and eggs, $1.50. And the chicken suggested they go in and apply. And the pig says: ``Well, that's all right for you. For you it only requires a contribution. For me it's a total commitment.'' [Laughter] Well, Jim Broyhill has been in Congress since 1963, and it would be difficult to find an elected official who has been more totally committed to the interests of his constituents and the interests of his country.

But the liberals were in the driver's seat, and they drove America right to the edge of an economic disaster. They gave us unbearable inflation, 21-percent interest rates, business decline, swelling unemployment, and a lot of talk about how we, the American people, were to blame. Do you remember those words out of Washington, that we had to lower our expectations, that we suffered from a malaise?

It took an enormous effort -- Jim was a star player on the team -- but, together, we turned America away from decline and uncertainty and put her back on the road to more jobs and opportunity. America has now had 46 months of economic growth. And this year more people have been working and a higher percentage of our population has been employed than ever before in our history.

In view of some of the young people that are here, I think they ought to know, when they start talking about employment figures, how it's based. It is believed that the unemployment potential pool in our country consists of everybody, male and female, 16 years and up all the way. And today 61.3 percent of that potential pool is employed, and that is the highest percentage we've ever had. And you're doing better than a lot of the rest of the country because here, in North Carolina, unemployment is down to 5.4 percent. And just one thought: We accomplished this and, at the same time, kept inflation lower than it's been for over 20 years.

Representative Bill Cobey is a real champion. You can be proud of the respect and influence he's developed in such a short time. And, of course, there's an individual whose very name causes liberals to break out in a nervous rash -- [laughter] -- a friend of mine and a champion of our cause, Senator Jesse Helms. And one who is not with us today perhaps deserves the highest accolades of all. He was a gentleman, a scholar, a man of deep conviction and high principle. When the battle was hot and the outcome of the vote uncertain, he could not stand yet we all looked up to him. He will be missed. And today let us pledge we will carry on the work of Senator John East.

And no one personifies that better than the man who we're here to support -- Jim Broyhill. Jim's legislative know-how and insight into the way things get done makes him one of the most effective legislators I know. And on top of that, he works hard. And the evidence of that, as you've already been told, is here: all of this and all of you gathered here to support him. And he knew his duty in these closing days of the Congress was to be there on the floor if a vote was needed. And so, he's there. Yet, just as important as skill and diligence, Jim Broyhill shares with all of us a vision of a strong, opportunity-filled America. He's a man of high character who'll nurture those family and religious values at the heart of our society; a man who has his priorities straight.

Instead of seeking more government and controls, Jim has been one of the most dedicated warriors in our battle to invigorate America's economy and to unleash the enterprise and creativity of the market. As the ranking Republican on the House Energy and Commerce Committee, he was on the frontline of putting our economy back on track. He stood firm, and since the recovery began, over 11\1/2\ million new jobs have been created in America. Now, that's what I call a Republican jobs program. When Jim is in Washington, you're never far from his mind. For example, he's impressed on our administration the importance of tough enactment of our international trade agreements. And let me assure you that Jim's message is loud and clear. American industry deserves open markets and a level playing field. And that's why we've turned up the heat on our trading partners.

Just within the last week, we took two major actions against Japan. First, we informed them that, in response to illegal trade practices, we will cut back Japanese imports of lightweight polyester fabrics by almost 50 percent. On Monday, our unprecedented fair trade action against Japan's tobacco monopoly ended in a great success. Japan announced that it is dropping its tariff on American tobacco products. And that's the way it's going to be: Free trade means fair trade, or it's no deal. James T. Broyhill, the ``T'' must stand for textiles or tobacco.

Jim also firmly believes, as I do, that it's better for working people to keep more of what they earn than to have government tax it away and channel it into the bureaucracy. In 1982 our across-the-board tax cut reduction -- or tax rate reduction and indexing brought to a screeching halt the automatic tax hikes that had been pushing working people into higher and higher brackets. And in that battle, Jim fought tooth and nail against fierce liberal opposition in the House. As a Member of the Senate, he fought just as hard and helped win the day for tax reform. The pundits said it couldn't be done. Jim Broyhill said it had to be done. Together with the support of you, the people, we've brought down the tax rates, overhauled the system, and made the tax code more fair for every American.

The big spenders in Congress, however, have already announced plans to raise taxes the first chance they get. Jim's opponent [Terry Sanford], if he gets the chance, will be their willing accomplice because, when it comes to raising taxes, he's a pro. He was raising taxes back when I was still making movies.

The proliferation of drugs has been part of a crime epidemic that can be traced to, among other things, liberal judges who are unwilling to get tough with the criminal element in this society. We don't need a bunch of sociology majors on the bench. What we need are strong judges who will aggressively use their authority to protect our families, communities, and our way of life; judges who understand that punishing wrongdoers is our way of protecting the innocent; and judges who do not hesitate to put criminals where they belong -- behind bars.

And since coming to Washington, we've been appointing just such people to the bench. And I'm delighted to find out, with a concrete example right here today, that your good Governor, Jim Martin, has been doing the same thing. It's already beginning to have an effect. Average sentences for drug-related and other crimes are up, significantly up.

The President. You can strike a blow against the drugs, thugs, and hoodlums by casting your vote for Jim and keeping him as a force for law and order in the United States Senate. The future of our country, its safety and security, is in our hands.

And about the future, one thing is certain: The people of this State can be proud of the part that North Carolina has played and continues to play in the preservation of our freedom. You're the home of Fort Bragg, Camp Lejeune, Cherry Point, and Seymour Johnson Air Force Base. It's consistent, then, that just like North Carolina, Jim has been second to none in his support for a strong national defense. He's currently on the Senate Armed Services Committee and is a powerful force for strength and security.

We've made great progress -- with liberals kicking, screaming, and fighting us all the way -- in rebuilding our military strength. Yet what makes me especially happy is that, in these last 5\1/2\ years, we've made certain that every individual who serves his country knows how much we appreciate the job he or she is doing. We've restored pride in those who wear the military uniform of the United States. Missed me. [The President referred to a loud background noise.] [Laughter] But I don't know of anything I'm prouder of than those young people of ours that are in uniform today. God love them, they deserve our pride. We've done our best to see that those defending our country have the weapons and equipment they need. We've revitalized the Western alliance. And I'm happy to report that after 5\1/2\ years, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism.

This coming election means so much to our country. By helping determine which party controls the United States Senate, you'll determine, to a large degree, what direction our country goes. The big spenders and taxers will weaken our defense, raise taxes on our working people, send our economy back into a tailspin, and open the cage, turning the inflation monster loose on America again. But with your help, and with Jim Broyhill in the Senate, we're not going to let that happen. And now is the time to reach out to the many members of the other party who share our values and enlist them in our cause. I was a member of the other party myself, so I know it takes a little coaxing. What we're doing is too important not to make certain everyone who sympathizes with our cause joins and gets out the vote. Our ranks are being bolstered by those changing registration, and also a flood of young, first-time voters.

One thing I will always enjoy is meeting America's young people. I'm so pleased that so many of them are here today. I've seen them at rallies like this across the country, in schools, in workplaces, and on our military bases.

And you know something? General George Marshall once described our secret weapon in World War II as -- when he was asked what it was, he said, ``Just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' And do you know something? Simply put, this generation is the best darn bunch of kids we've ever had. I know we must have a few from Enloe and Sanderson High Schools and Meredith College with us today. Well, you know, they're what this election is all about -- the kind of America that we will leave to them. And I promise all of you, those of my generation pledge to you, you're going to take over in a country that's just as free and full of opportunity as it was when we took over those many years ago.

Cobey, he's among them. And just make sure that we don't let them down. Make sure that they stay right where they are. And all I can say to all of you is -- and I know there must be some Democrats in a crowd of this kind, and there must be some who once were Democrats, as I was. But that's because -- and why I still urge this change -- is because all across this country are millions of patriotic Democrats who are not content to follow the liberal leadership of their party and who find themselves more in tune with our principles today than they do with that leadership. And I just want you to know if you're here: You sure are welcome. We're pleased to have you.

The President. Thank you very much. If they'd have done that in Hollywood, I might have stuck around. [Laughter] Well, thank you all very much. And thank you very much. We have to have Mack Mattingly back there, because we'd be lost without that smile in Washington. I want you to know that the fellow you see standing before you considers himself one lucky man. You see, this is my second visit to Georgia in just less than a week. I guess you could say that, like an old sweet song, I've got Georgia on my mind.

And it's good to be in the home State of a member of the Cabinet, our Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Jim Miller. He was going to be here today, because this is his home, but just like Mack and the others, he had to stay there to keep counting when they start talking budget, as they're talking in the Congress. Somebody's got to watch them. But I thank you, State Chairman Paul Coverdell, for allowing me to be here to campaign for Guy Davis and the entire Republican ticket and to commend the Georgia GOP for all the fine work it's doing.

The President. What? Louder? He was driving down through the South, and there was an accident. And the southern gentleman whose car he'd hit got out of his car, and he got out. And neither one of them were hurt, and the cars weren't too badly damaged. And then the southerner, with true southern hospitality, said, ``You look a little shook up. Wait a minute.'' Reached back in his car and came out with a bottle and said, ``Here, take a slug of this. I think it'll make you feel better.'' So, the Yankee did, and then he was urged to do it again and take another one. He said, ``Really, it'll settle your nerves.'' And so he did.

Well, it was good to take off on Air Force One this morning -- good to leave behind the big government and special interests of Washington -- to come here to Atlanta and the real America: the America of hard work, patriotism, and the kind of peaches that just don't grow along the Potomac. But it was a matter of great importance that brought me, a matter that will directly affect the lives of every Georgian and, indeed, of every citizen of the United States. For what happens in this great State on election day will help determine the kinds of jobs that you and all Americans can get, the taxes we pay, and the kinds of schools our children and grandchildren will be able to attend.

This brings me to a man that I have the feeling happens to have a few friends here today, a certain United States Senator by the name of Mack Mattingly. Mack Mattingly is a hard-working man of integrity and one of those rare figures in our public life who's more interested in results than headlines. Like me, Mack spent most of his life in the private sector. He knows what it means to earn a paycheck and meet a payroll and raise a family on a balanced budget. I guess that's one reason that Mack and I have become such good friends. He has a quality that some would call old-fashioned, but that I just have to believe is more important today than ever. That quality is called character. And don't you believe it's important to keep character in our government? [Applause] And a second reason that Mack and I have become good friends is that we were elected in the same year, 1980. And ever since, we've worked side by side to revive our economy, rebuild our defenses, and restore the American spirit. I've relied on Mack in the battle to balance the Federal budget by passing the line-item veto.

And we're going to keep on trying until it gets done. Forty-three Governors in this country have it; the President should have it. In the more than a hundred years since the line-item veto was first proposed, no one has come closer to getting it passed than Mack. And I just have to believe we need Mack Mattingly back in the Senate, so we can finally get the line-item veto and restore common sense to the budget process once and for all.

I want to tell you, having been a Governor myself, I've been shocked. This country's budget process at the national level is a mess. Congress has had 8 months to come up with a budget and has failed to do so. And now, we're 8 days into the new fiscal year. Now, hours before my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev, the House Democrats are trying to tie my hands with restrictive language on foreign policy issues -- issues that should be decided at a negotiating table with the Soviets, not at a congressional committee table. I could look across the table in Iceland in a couple of days at a man who could be sitting there thinking: If they had their way, he doesn't have to negotiate with me, he'll just wait for Congress to get him what he wants. I call on the House Democrats to act on the budget now. They should act responsibly, they should stop playing politics and jeopardizing the success of our Icelandic talks.

In the crusade against drugs, Mack has proven invaluable, passing legislation that authorizes the President to withhold funds from any country not cooperating in our antidrug effort. And I want you to know that Mack's wife, Carolyn, is the founder and president of the bipartisan Congressional Families for Drug-Free Youth. Carolyn and Nancy have traveled and worked together in this crusade against drugs. And Carolyn, Nancy wanted me to be sure and say hello.

And so it's been, throughout these nearly 6 years -- in all the great battles and accomplishments -- Mack Mattingly has been right there working for Georgia every day. And back in 1980 when Mack and I were elected, the American economy was the worst mess since the Great Depression. Government was everywhere: running up taxes, causing inflation, raising interest rates, and taking bigger and bigger shares of your earnings. To get big government off your backs and out of your pockets, we slowed government growth, slashed needless regulations, and enacted an across-the-board personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. Then we indexed taxes, making it impossible for inflation to push you into higher and higher tax brackets ever again. Congress was sitting back and knew, until the indexing took place, that every time a worker got a cost-of-living pay raise that didn't make him any richer; just kept him even with the growing inflation. But the number of dollars determines the bracket of the income tax that you're in. And so, he would wind up poorer because he'd wind up paying more income tax, even though he hadn't improved himself one bit.

Now, critics dubbed our plan Reaganomics and predicted economic ruin. Let's look at what's happened instead. Inflation has fallen from more than 12 percent to less than 2 percent. Interest rates are down. Mortgage rates are down and housing starts are up, helping industries like timber. And just listen to this: During these nearly 4 years of economic growth, we've seen the creation of more than 11\1/2\ million jobs in the United States. Now, that is more jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in the last 10 years. You know, I could tell our economic program was working when they stopped calling it Reaganomics. [Laughter] In the midst of this economic expansion, it's true that certain sectors of our economy had lagged behind -- sectors like farming, for example. But I pledge to you today that I will not rest, and Mack will not rest, until every region of our country and every sector of our economy share in the national prosperity.

Perhaps the most important aspect of our economic efforts involves all that Mack and others like him have done to promote growth by giving our nation a comprehensive tax reform -- a tax reform that will make our entire tax system simpler and fairer and enable some 8 out of 10 Americans to pay Federal income taxes of 15 percent or less. Sounds pretty good to me.

How does it sound to you? [Applause] Now, the Democratic leadership has been saying that once our tax reform program is in place, the rates will be raised to pay for more spending. Well, that would be an intolerable breach of faith with the American people. We didn't achieve this historic tax reform to have it undermined by the big taxers. I pledge today to oppose any effort to raise the tax rates and negate the hard-fought progress that we've made, and I'm calling on all Members of the Congress to take that same pledge. Ask them to do something that I know Mack's more than happy to do himself. Ask them to take that pledge on tax rates -- that they will be held at 15 and 28 percent for individuals and 34 percent for the corporations.

And if I could add something here, in the House of Representatives, your fellow Georgian, Newt Gingrich, is a leader in the fight against any tax increase. And Pat Swindall was among the first to take the pledge.

In foreign affairs, Mack and I've worked to make America strong and respected once again. We've begun the rebuilding of our nation's defenses. In the Navy alone, we've gone from fewer than 480 battle-ready ships to more than 550, well on the way to our goal of 600. And we've seen morale soar among our men and women in uniform as we've provided them with the pay and training that they've always deserved. You know, if I could interject something here -- as we landed today at Dobbins Air Force Base and saw those fine service families, it occurred to me that you here in Georgia have always treated our Armed Services with esteem, even when some in other parts of the country thought it was somehow unstylish or old-fashioned. The good people of this great State have never been ashamed of the flag. And, my friends, isn't it good to have the rest of the country join you again in treating our men and women in uniform with respect? [Applause] It's still a difficult and dangerous world, but with Mack's help -- especially as chairman of the subcommittee that handles military construction -- we've made America stronger and better prepared to deal with it. And something else -- I just have to believe that every nickel-and-dime dictator and terrorist knows that if he chooses to tangle with the United States of America, he'll have to pay a price. And those young people that I mentioned a moment ago, they are the peacekeepers. And would you be interested in knowing something? We have the highest percentage of high school graduates in uniform that we have ever had in the history of this country, even when we had the draft.

And listen to this: In 1982, every member of the Georgia delegation voted in favor of a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution -- except one. So, let me ask you: Which one is Mack's opponent? [Laughter] That's right, the one who voted wrong. In the early 1980's every member of the Georgia delegation voted in favor of strengthening our defenses by building the much-needed B - 1 bomber -- except one. Which one is Mack's opponent? The one who voted wrong. Earlier this year, Georgia Senator Sam Nunn and Georgia Congressman Richard Ray led the effort to send aid to the freedom fighters of Nicaragua, brave men and women who are struggling against Communists for the liberty of their homeland. Every member of the Georgia delegation voted for that aid -- except one. And who do you suppose is Mack's opponent? The one who voted wrong.

Well, it's happened again and again and again. On 147 different occasions, Mack's opponent was the only member of the Georgia delegation to cast the wrong vote. Put his record together and a clear profile emerges. Mack's opponent wants more big government. He's voted to make America weaker. And believe me, he wants the Government to take more of your money. He's out of step with our administration, but more important, he's out of step with Georgia, and he's out of step with you. Come to think of it, Mack's opponent has voted against our administration just about as often as Teddy Kennedy has. You wouldn't want a Senator who's as liberal as Teddy Kennedy, would you?

The President. You know, less than 2 weeks ago I spoke in Michigan and Nebraska, and not long before that in Alabama and Louisiana. And everywhere I've gone, I've seen something that touched me, something that gives heart to all who can still remember the self-doubt and weakness at home and abroad that marked so much of the sixties and seventies. Today, here in Atlanta, I see it again. Call it confidence, self-assurance, what you will. It's a renewed understanding that, for all our faults, ours is a nation of goodness and greatness; that despite our mistakes in the world, we've stood for human freedom with greater consistency and courage than any other nation in history; that if only we have faith, if only we look not to government but to ourselves, we can create a new and lasting era of opportunity and prosperity. And come to think of it, what I've seen has a name. It's called love of country.

You can feel this new spirit everywhere. Right here in Georgia, there's an especially moving story of neighbor helping neighbor in the best American tradition. In the north Georgia town of Gainesville, population 15,200, virtually the entire community has come together to help seven motherless boys hold their family together. When Terry, the oldest O'Kelley boy, was only 15, his mother died. When his father disappeared, Terry and his brothers moved in with their grandfather. Terry dropped out of high school to work 70 hours a week at a poultry plant to keep the boys together. But when their grandfather died, the four youngest brothers had to be committed to foster care.

American sense of can-do, this sense that with a little gumption the future can be made better -- this is what Mack Mattingly, and I believe our nation, stands for. And so it is that I ask you to cast a vote that will help me to be the President you elected me to be. But even more, I ask you to cast a vote for yourselves, for your children, and for your children's children. You know, I'm so delighted when I come to a rally like this and see all these young people that are here because whether they know it or not, they're what these elections are all about. We of my generation have to pledge to them that when it comes their turn to take over, they're going to take over a country that has as much freedom and opportunity as we had when we started and took over.

My friends, send your Republican slate into the offices, the statehouse, and to the Congress. And I ask you, send Mack Mattingly back to the United States Senate. Thank you very much, and God bless you all.

Because of the fear and ignorance of some Americans, the mentally ill often are reluctant to seek the treatments that could alleviate their physical symptoms and emotional pain. Many who are being deprived of a happy and productive future because their mental disorders go unrecognized or ignored could be helped with appropriate mental health treatment. Our Nation can no longer afford the price of the stigma against the mentally ill.

The emotional and physical price paid by the mentally ill and their families is incalculable. It is time to bring about change. We must understand that mental illnesses are real -- not imaginary or self-inflicted -- and that some are caused by biochemical or brain dysfunctions that require medical attention in addition to supportive services.

We must also become more aware that appropriate treatment can lift depression, ameliorate hallucinations and delusions, relieve panic and anxiety, and overcome dysfunctional behavior and thinking patterns. We must also realize that treatment of mental illness restores productivity to the treated, reduces their use of other health services, and increases their social independence.

New technologies have permitted study of the living brain and elucidated its linkages to normal and abnormal behaviors. Such research has profound implications for all of us because it offers hope for those with the most devastating and resistant disorders and because it provides clues to the bases of human behavior.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of October 5 through October 11, 1986, as Mental Illness Awareness Week. I call upon all people of the United States to observe such week with ceremonies and activities designed to exchange fear of mental illness for knowledge of its causes and treatments and to replace stigma against the mentally ill with understanding of their needs and suffering.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Nation's fire fighters protect our lives, our families, and the economic life of our communities from the threat of fire. Many valiant fire fighters have given their lives, and all daily risk death or injury, to preserve the lives of others and to protect our property and resources from destruction.

Our more than 2 million professional and volunteer fire fighters make countless contributions and sacrifices for their fellow citizens. In 1984, these fire fighters responded to more than 2 million fires and more than 8 million non-fire emergencies. These brave Americans well deserve our gratitude and public recognition.

Pulaski died on October 11, 1779, from wounds suffered while he led a cavalry charge during the siege of Savannah. Forced to flee his homeland of Poland after struggling for his country's independence, he generously put his skills as a soldier and military tactician at the service of our fledgling Nation.

Pulaski asked to be buried at sea, that the waves might carry him back to his native Poland. Polish Americans recognize and revere his abiding ties to a Poland where faith, sacrifice, and selfless toil for liberty are the bedrock of that nation's proud traditions. General Pulaski's heroism is an inspiration as well to all Americans. He recognized no barriers of culture, language, or history in humanity's universal search for individual rights and for political and religious liberty.

Pulaski's spirit survives today -- in our hearts and in the rights enshrined in our Constitution. We can enjoy our freedoms because of the enduring vision for which Casimir Pulaski fought and died. We stand for these rights in our dialogue with other nations, where each released political prisoner, every gain for a free press or freedom of worship, or any progress toward freedom of speech and assembly is a new victory in the struggle General Pulaski undertook more than 200 years ago.

Each year, we are privileged to honor Christopher Columbus, whose epic voyages of discovery shaped the development of the Western Hemisphere. This great explorer won a place in history and in the hearts of all Americans because he challenged the unknown and thereby found a New World.

With his faith, vision, and courage, he could navigate beyond his world's horizons. He left a wide wake for all those to follow who would dream as he dreamed, who would defy the naysayers and dare to strive for new goals. Follow him they did; and may they ever do so, those who would make the New World ever new with all the ingenuity, energy, and boldness they have.

Americans of Italian descent are proud to say that Columbus, a son of Genoa, was the first of many Italians to come to America and a powerful reason the United States and Italy share the unique friendship they do. Those of Spanish descent likewise point out that Spain made Columbus's voyages possible and that he is the first link in the friendship of the United States and Spain. All Americans share in this just pride.

We are nearing the year 1992, when the world will celebrate the 500th anniversary of Columbus's first voyage to the Americas. The Christopher Columbus Quincentenary Jubilee Commission, a distinguished group of Americans aided by representatives from Spain and Italy, held its initial working sessions in Chicago, Miami, and San Juan, cities that are planning major commemorative events in 1992. It also began a report to the Congress, to be delivered in September 1987, that will make recommendations about our Nation's observance of the celebration.

October 13, 1986, as Columbus Day. I invite the people of this Nation to observe that day with appropriate ceremonies in honor of this great explorer. I also direct that the flag of the United States be displayed on all public buildings on the appointed day in honor of Christopher Columbus.

Liver diseases claim 50,000 lives in the United States each year and are the fourth leading cause of death of Americans between the ages of 15 and 65. There are more than 100 liver disorders. Some of these are progressively debilitating and often fatal. Liver diseases strike infants, children, adolescents, and adults, regardless of sex, race, or economic status. Unfortunately, people with liver disease suffer not only physically from the disease, but also emotionally from the unjust stigma placed on them by the common, but mistaken, notion that liver disease is caused only by alcoholism.

Through the American Liver Foundation, a network of volunteers, families, researchers, and health care professionals throughout the United States has dedicated itself to funding and increasing research to find the causes, treatments, cures, and ways to prevent these devastating diseases. The American Liver Foundation, the only national organization to focus on all types of liver disease, is committed to promoting the health of all Americans by increasing public awareness of all conditions that can lead to liver disease and by supporting and enhancing the quality of life for those individuals and their families who must cope with a liver disease.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1986 as American Liver Foundation National Liver Awareness Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical, and health care organizations and professionals to learn more about the liver, to support appropriate efforts to discover the causes and cures of all types of liver disease, and to aid those who suffer from the crushing physical, psychological, and financial burden of a liver disease.

Over the last decade, Americans have become more aware of the accomplishments and the potential of developmentally disabled people, particularly those with Down Syndrome, thanks to the efforts of concerned physicians, teachers, and parents' groups such as the National Down Syndrome Congress and the National Down Syndrome Society.

As a result, we have programs to educate new parents of babies with Down Syndrome, special education classes within mainstreamed programs in schools, vocational training for competitive employment in the work force, and preparation for young adults with Down Syndrome for independent living in the community.

Paralleling these improvements in educational opportunities are advances in medical treatment that are enhancing the outlook for those born with this condition. In addition, the public is showing increased acceptance of people with Down Syndrome. We must continue our efforts to dispel myths about Down Syndrome and the degree to which it is disabling.

Because we live, regrettably, in an age when some people no longer value every human life regardless of condition, we must be vigilant in recalling that ``all men are created equal'' and that people with Down Syndrome have the same rights to ``Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness'' that we all do. We have a duty to see that they receive all the help they need, before birth, in the nursery, and throughout life. Our heritage as Americans bids us do no less.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1986 as National Down Syndrome Month. I invite all concerned citizens, agencies, and organizations to unite during October with appropriate observances and activities directed toward assisting affected individuals and their families to enjoy to the fullest the blessings of life.

Spina bifida strikes one to two of every one thousand babies born in the United States. It is the most common crippler of newborns. When this disease occurs, the baby's spinal cord forms abnormally and the arches of the vertebrae, the bones that surround the cord, fail to develop. The spinal cord or its protective tissue may be displaced outside the spinal canal. Nerves supplying the legs, bladder, and bowel are incompletely developed or damaged.

The nerve damage resulting from this disease can have devastating consequences, including muscle paralysis, loss of sensation in the skin, and spine and limb deformities. Most babies with spina bifida also develop hydrocephalus -- a potentially dangerous buildup of fluid pressure within the brain.

But thanks to important advances in neurosurgery and antibiotic therapy, a baby born with spina bifida today has between an 80 and 95 percent chance for survival. And the development of new surgical and bracing procedures and devices to compensate for lost function have made it possible for patients to lead more active and normal lives.

Much of this work is being done by scientists supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The economy of the United States, in the midst of one of the longest sustained periods of growth since World War II, is creating a record number of new jobs. More Americans are at work now than ever before.

Technological advances in all areas of American industry are contributing not only to the growth in the number of jobs, but to sustained growth in productivity. The dynamic changes occurring in our own marketplace as well as in the global economy will place an even greater emphasis on the development of new job skills.

National School Lunch Program demonstrates our commitment to the promotion of the health and well-being of our youth. Under its auspices, more than 23 million lunches are served daily in nearly 90,000 schools throughout our country. The success of this effort is largely due to resourceful and creative food service managers and staff working in cooperation with government personnel, parents, teachers, and members of civic groups.

Millions of people in the United States trace their origins to the Nordic countries. Their ancestors came here in search of new land, new opportunity, and the ability to work and prosper in this land of freedom and justice. Courage and an adventurous spirit brought them here; strength and determination have brought success to a great many. Those characteristics well describe Leif Erikson, the first Nordic we know to have visited North America.

Erikson was sent by King Olav in the year 1000 to convert the Nordic settlers of southern Greenland to Christianity; he also sailed much farther west and came upon a new land. ``Leif the Lucky,'' as he was known, described North America for his countrymen, and kindled the enthusiasm that brought other European explorers, missionaries, settlers, and adventurers to North America in the years to follow. Today, the cultures of Denmark, Finland, Iceland, Norway, and Sweden are intertwined with the American culture and are an important part of our national heritage. The Nordic people have added their traditions of courage and adventure to our national characteristics, giving us pride in the knowledge that the spirit of Leif Erikson still lives among all Americans.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Resolution, including provisions that warrant my veto. As I had previously made clear, the provision included in this resolution providing for the rehire of air traffic controllers who engaged in the 1981 strike is totally unacceptable.

Administration will continue to work closely with the Congress to reach agreement on an acceptable full-year Continuing Resolution. The Congress has had over eight months to do its job, and complete action on FY 1987 appropriations. The time for action is long past due.

Thank you all for coming to see us off. As you know, I'm off this morning on an important foreign policy mission, but before I make any remarks on that subject, the events of late yesterday compel me to discuss with you first the critical business of Congress and the budget resolutions. I have to say at this point that I cannot see need for further temporary extensions of the continuing resolution. Congress has had 8 months now to debate these issues and send us a budget. I've made it perfectly clear that what is necessary in order for me to sign a bill into law, and I've already signed two stopgap funding measures.

October 3 the United States Senate passed a generally acceptable appropriations bill for the fiscal year that began October 1. So, my message to the House is that I've had enough. I will not and cannot countenance any further delay in getting our budget done. Any more procrastination can only serve to undercut our mission.

I'm leaving today for Iceland for a meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev of the Soviet Union. This will be essentially a private meeting between the two of us. We will not have large staffs with us nor is it planned that we sign substantive agreements. We will, rather, review the subjects that we intend to pursue, with redoubled effort, afterward, looking toward a possible full-scale summit. We'll be talking frankly about the differences between our countries on the major issues on the East-West agenda: arms reduction, human rights, regional conflicts, and bilateral contacts. We'll be talking about how we can -- while recognizing those differences -- still take steps further to make progress on those items and to make the world safer and keep the peace.

Let me say here -- and this is particularly fitting because this is Leif Erikson Day -- how much the United States appreciates the hospitality on this occasion of the Icelandic Government and the people of Iceland. The United States and Iceland have been allies for more than 40 years -- first, in the defense of freedom and democracy during World War II and, now, in working in NATO to defend peace and freedom and democracy. There can be no better testimony to the enduring commitment of the Icelandic people and Government to the search for a just peace, a lasting peace, than their gracious consent to host these meetings.

And when I look back on the success of Geneva, I find myself feeling the real credit belongs to the American people. I knew at every step that I had our nation's unified support. I knew that Americans of both parties had said that differences stopped at the water's edge. Last Saturday I asked again for unified national support as I head for a second meeting with the Soviet leader.

And let me say now how much I appreciate the support that I have received over the years from the American people. Few things have been more gratifying or more important to our success. I'll need this same support through the negotiations of the coming year.

Together we Americans settled this great continent that God put between two oceans for free men and women all over the world to find and cherish. Together we're transforming the world with our technology, making life longer with greater opportunities and more fulfilling for millions all over the Earth. And most of all, together we've led the forces of freedom around the world in this century. In World War II, and still today, we've been the great friend of mankind's dreams of freedom, whether in Europe or the Americas or Africa or Afghanistan. And together we can be true to the cause of freedom even while we're true to the cause of peace.

Tuesday, a group of human rights leaders reminded me of how important America's missions of both peace and freedom are. And among them was Yuriy Orlov, who was released only a week ago from Siberian exile where he was being kept for the crime of wanting his government to respect basic human rights. We didn't forget him, and we must never forget those like him. They're our inspiration, and we are their hope. So, we go to Reykjavik for peace. We go to this meeting for freedom, and we go in hope. As a great American who knew the extremes of hope and despair, Robert E. Lee, once said, ``History teaches us to hope.'' Today we're making history, and we're turning the tide of history to peace and freedom and hope.

I've long believed that if we're to be successful in pursuing peace, we must face the tough issues directly and honestly and with hope. We cannot pretend the differences aren't there, seek to dash off a few quick agreements, and then give speeches about the spirit of Reykjavik. In fact, we have serious problems with the Soviet positions on a great many issues, and success is not guaranteed. But if Mr. Gorbachev comes to Iceland in a truly cooperative spirit, I think we can make some progress. And that's my goal, and that's my purpose in going to Iceland. The goals of the United States, peace and freedom throughout the world, are great goals; but like all things worth achieving, they are not easy to attain. Reykjavik can be a step, a useful step; and if we persevere, the goal of a better, safer world will someday be ours and all the world's.

As the President meets this week with General Secretary Gorbachev in Reykjavik, Iceland, he believes it is crucial that all Americans join with him in forging a strong, bipartisan consensus on a nuclear testing policy that promotes our national security interests and advances longstanding U.S. arms control objectives.

In recent weeks there has been substantial disagreement in the Congress and in the nation over the best approach to reach the goal we all seek -- a world in which there will be no nuclear testing because the need for it has vanished. The dispute threatened to give General Secretary Gorbachev the false impression of a divided America. The President did not believe it was in the best interests of our nation to create this impression.

United States policy on nuclear testing limitations is clear. Our highest arms control priority in the area of nuclear testing has been, and remains, to seek the necessary verification improvements to the existing threshold test ban treaty (TTBT) and peaceful nuclear explosions treaty (PNET). Once our verification concerns have been satisfied and the treaties have been ratified, and in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons, we are prepared to engage in discussions on ways to implement a step-by-step, parallel program of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear testing. We remain committed to the ultimate goal of the total elimination of nuclear testing, but only when we do not need to depend on nuclear deterrence to ensure international security and stability; and when we have achieved broad, deep, and verifiable arms reductions, substantially improved verification capabilities, expanded confidence-building measures, and greater balance in conventional forces.

First, the President will inform General Secretary Gorbachev in Reykjavik that if the Soviet Union will, prior to the initiation of ratification proceedings in the Senate next year, agree to essential TTBT/PNET verification procedures which could be submitted to the Senate for its consideration in the form of a protocol or other appropriate codicil -- the President will, as a first order of business for the 100th Congress, request the advice and consent of the Senate to ratification of the TTBT and PNET. However, if the Soviet Union fails to agree to the required package of verification improvements prior to the convening of the 100th Congress, the President will still seek Senate advice and consent, but with an appropriate reservation to the treaties that would ensure they would not take effect until they are effectively verifiable.

Second, the President will inform the General Secretary that, once our TTBT/PNET verification concerns have been satisfied and the treaties have been ratified, the President will propose that the United States and the Soviet Union immediately engage in negotiations on ways to implement a step-by-step, parallel program -- in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons -- of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear testing.

The congressional leadership has responded to the President's decision in a bipartisan spirit and is supporting the President's proposal. The President is grateful for this show of unity. As a result, the President can make it clear to General Secretary Gorbachev that America is united in its determination to take prompt, practical steps to limit nuclear testing, that the first requirement is for him to act now to resolve the verification problems with the existing treaties, and that the United States and the world are awaiting his response. While the President believes these new steps will allow progress in this area, they must not divert us from the primary goal: elimination of the weapons themselves. Broad, deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in offensive arms remain our highest priority. Here, too, we have made significant proposals and await a constructive Soviet response. If they are willing, the road to a safer world is open before us.

I was saddened and distressed to hear of the earthquake that has hit El Salvador. You know my thoughts are with you and your countrymen in this tragic moment. Please accept our promise to help in any way we can. I have directed all U.S. government agencies to provide assistance as appropriate. I know you are doing all you can to help your nation in this sad hour. Please remember we will do our utmost to help.

I am signing H.J. Res. 751, further continuing appropriations for the fiscal year 1987, allowing the Government to operate for 5 more days until the Congress can agree on a full year's budget. I do this with great reluctance. The Congress has had over 8 months to pass the necessary appropriations bills. The new fiscal year began nearly 2 weeks ago. I have already signed two temporary funding extensions and made it clear what steps are necessary for the Congress to pass an acceptable full-year budget.

Yet, due largely to the desire of the House of Representatives to use an omnibus appropriations bill as a vehicle for unnecessary spending and other harmful initiatives that could not be enacted through the normal legislative process, agreement has not been reached. This is no way to run the Federal Government.

Well, the talks we've just concluded were hard and tough, and yet I have to say extremely useful. We spoke about arms control, human rights, and regional conflicts. And of course, Mr. Gorbachev and I were frank about our disagreements. We had to be. In several critical areas, we made more progress than we anticipated when we came to Iceland. We moved toward agreement on drastically reduced numbers of intermediate-range nuclear missiles in both Europe and Asia. We approached agreement on sharply reduced strategic arsenals for both our countries. We made progress in the area of nuclear testing. But there remained, at the end of our talks, one area of disagreement.

While both sides seek reduction in the number of nuclear missiles and warheads threatening the world, the Soviet Union insisted that we sign an agreement that would deny to me and to future Presidents for 10 years the right to develop, test, and deploy a defense against nuclear missiles for the people of the free world. This, we could not and will not do. So, late this afternoon, I made to the General Secretary an entirely new proposal: a 10-year delay in deployment of SDI in exchange for the complete elimination of all ballistic missiles from the respective arsenals of both nations. So long as both the United States and the Soviet Union prove their good faith by destroying nuclear missiles year by year, we would not deploy SDI. The General Secretary said he would consider our offer, but only if we restricted all work on SDI to laboratory research, which would have killed our defensive shield.

We came to Iceland to advance the cause of peace, and though we put on the table the most far-reaching arms control proposal in history, the General Secretary rejected it. However, we made great strides in Iceland in resolving most of our differences, and we're going to continue the effort.

But this brings me to my main reason in coming to Keflavik today -- to see you all and express my gratitude, gratitude for a job well done. I hope you all know the importance of your mission here. Iceland has always held a strategic position in the Atlantic, commanding, if you will, the sea between the Old World and the New. Since this is Columbus Day -- I have to be careful of this -- but many of those who believe that the Vikings were the first Europeans to discover the Americas hold that the ancient Norse sailors first heard of North America from an Icelander.

War II, Iceland played a crucial role in the battle for freedom. Early in the war, German U-boats began to exact a devastating toll, including the shipping that supplied the British people with food from the United States. Between March and December 1941 the Germans sank ships, totaling more than a million tons.

Churchill watched with growing disquiet as his nation was pushed closer and closer to starvation. In April of 1941 the British established bases on this island for escort groups and aircraft. In July we joined them, with the consent of the Icelandic authorities, with bases of our own. These operations, staged from this very island, proved decisive in the balance of the entire struggle.

I cite all this history because if Iceland was crucial to the cause of freedom then, it is even more important today. The U.S. and Iceland are joined together as members of NATO. And here you are, thousands of miles from home, closer, indeed, to the Soviet naval bases on the Kola Peninsula than to our own east coast. And in view of those naval bases and other potential threats, you serve as a vanguard for Iceland, the United States, and all the NATO allies. You monitor military air traffic, you track submarines, and you monitor shipping movements in the vital sealanes between the United States, Iceland, and Europe. You perform all these tasks with efficiency and dedication -- in short, with a keen sense of duty.

I can't resist telling you a little story that I've just told the marine guard at the Embassy. The story has to do with saluting. I was a second lieutenant of horse cavalry back in the World War II days. As I told the admiral, I wound up flying a desk for the Army Air Force. And so, I know all the rules about not saluting in civilian clothes and so forth, and when you should or shouldn't.

But in closing, let me say simply this: You are not here on NATO's frontline, you're not making the sacrifice of leaving home and friends so far behind merely to keep the world from getting worse. You're here to make it better, for you're here in the name of liberty. Yes, the ultimate goal of American foreign policy is not just the prevention of war, but the expansion of freedom -- to see that every nation, every people, every person, some day enjoys the blessings of liberty. All that you do has strengthened world peace, the peace in which the flame of freedom can continue to burn and spread its light throughout the world.

I have to tell you that of all the things that I'm proud of in this job, none match the pride that I have in those of you who are wearing the uniform of your country -- you young men and women. God bless you.

October, we celebrate Polish American Heritage Month in the United States. Our Nation owes an immeasurable debt of gratitude to the millions of freedom-loving Poles who have come to our shores to build a new land. Polish Americans can be justly proud of the vital contributions people of Polish descent have made to our Nation in the arts, the sciences, religion, scholarship, and every area of endeavor.

The military genius of Kosciuszko and Pulaski was essential in the defense of our freedoms in the Revolutionary War. Since then, millions of Poland's sons and daughters have helped build our country's prosperity and defend our liberty.

Mankind's desire for liberty is universal. We are, as a country, linked with the Polish people in love for individual liberty, faith, and defense of the family. We share unstinting devotion to political and religious freedom, as expressed so courageously by Pope John Paul II and Lech Walesa.

We have supported the aspirations of Poles in recent years for a greater voice in determining their nation's destiny. We welcome the recent general amnesty for political prisoners in Poland as a positive step. We reaffirm our solidarity with these brave Polish citizens who, at great risk to themselves, have sought to expand liberty and to promote justice in their homeland.

Polish Americans celebrate their cultural and spiritual values across the country during Polish American Heritage Month, all Americans can express gratitude for Poland's heroic example of faith and sacrifice through the centuries and for Polish Americans' manifest contributions to our Nation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Television is a medium of enormous potential capable of bringing a myriad of sights and sounds into our homes, schools, and places of work. Parental involvement and guidance can ensure that this miracle of modern technology can be used as an innovative tool of learning to enhance and enrich the education of our children.

The advent of cable television and video cassette recorders has created a technological revolution in the television industry that affords producers and broadcasters virtually limitless possibilities to improve and enrich TV programming. Quality television programming can open wide the windows of curiosity for children and enable them to share in the wonder of man's experience -- whether in history, politics, religion, culture, or sports.

Television can also be a powerful tool in convincing children to say ``no'' to illegal drugs and ``yes'' to life. Parents now have a wonderful opportunity to work closely with schools, churches, libraries, and community groups to encourage and foster programming that will nurture the intellect and imagination of our children while at the same time promoting and reinforcing parental values that strengthen the family unit. Although television can never replace the adventure of good books, the two can serve to stimulate and reinforce each other while preparing our children to take up the exciting challenges that lie before them.

As more and more blind and visually handicapped Americans enter the mainstream of society to live and work among sighted people, all of us should reflect on the significance of the white cane. Through the aid of a white cane and an informed public, many blind and visually handicapped people can better enjoy the fullness of life.

The white cane guides its users and signals others -- but it also symbolizes the ability of blind and visually impaired citizens to enjoy the freedom and independence meant for all Americans. Sighted people should be aware that many white cane users lead independent lives and that others are well on their way to doing so. White cane bearers should always receive friendliness, consideration, and respect on the street, on the job, and everywhere else Americans' paths cross.

One of the most inspiring portrayals of American history is that of George Washington on his knees in the snow at Valley Forge. That moving image personifies and testifies to our Founders' dependence upon Divine Providence during the darkest hours of our Revolutionary struggle. It was then -- when our mettle as a Nation was tested most severely -- that the Sovereign and Judge of nations heard our plea and came to our assistance in the form of aid from France. Thereupon General Washington immediately called for a special day of thanksgiving among his troops.

Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, in the spirit of George Washington and the Founders, do hereby proclaim Thursday, November 27, 1986, as a National Day of Thanksgiving, and I call upon every citizen of this great Nation to gather together in homes and places of worship on that day of thanks to affirm by their prayers and their gratitude the many blessings bestowed upon this land and its people.

The bill will allow the Bureau of the Census to provide reliable and timely data on these important industries. These industries are large and important employers, experience volatile production patterns, and face strong foreign competition.

It is essential that those responsible for the administration of our textile and apparel programs have the information they need to determine if, and to what extent, such imports disrupt domestic markets within the meaning of the appropriate statutes. Accordingly, I ask the Nation's textile and apparel firms to give the Census Bureau their fullest cooperation and to respond to its surveys fully, honestly, and quickly.

House. It is a particular pleasure to have you here so soon after returning from a meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev, and that meeting marked new progress in U.S.-Soviet relations. For the first time on the highest level we and the Soviets came close to an agreement on real reductions of both strategic and intermediate-range weapons. For the first time we got Soviet agreement to a worldwide figure of 100 intermediate-range warheads for each side -- a drastic cut. For the first time we began to hammer out details of a 50-percent cut in strategic forces over 5 years. We were just a sentence or two away from agreeing to new talks on nuclear testing. And maybe most important, we were in sight of an historic agreement on completely eliminating the threat of offensive ballistic missiles by 1996.

I can't help remembering being told just a few years ago that radical arms reduction was an impossible dream, but now it's on the agenda for both sides. I think the first thing that's important to do is to put these talks and what occurred into perspective. You'll recall that just over a week ago in talking about going to Iceland I said that we did not seek nor did we expect agreements. We described our trip as a base camp before the summit to be held here in the United States. And if there was a surprise in Reykjavik, it was that we discussed so much and moved so far. No one a week ago would have thought there could have been agreement in so many areas. While we didn't sign a document and there remain significant differences, we must not mistake the absence of a final agreement for the absence of progress. Historic gains were achieved. As you know, after a great deal of discussion, our talks came down to the Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI.

I offered to delay deployment of advanced strategic defense for 10 years while both sides eliminated all ballistic missiles, but General Secretary Gorbachev said that his demand that we give up all but laboratory research on SDI -- in effect kill the program -- was nonnegotiable. Now, the Soviets have made a strategic defense program for years. They've breached the ABM treaty and, as I noted last night, may be preparing to put in place a nationwide ABM system. For us to abandon SDI would leave them with an immediate, permanent advantage, and a dangerous one, and this I would not do. Abandoning SDI would also leave us without an insurance policy that the Soviets will live up to arms reduction agreements. Strategic defense is the key to making arms reduction work. It protects us against the possibility that at some point, when the elimination of ballistic missiles is not yet complete, that the Soviets may change their minds. I'm confident that the Soviets understand our position. They may try to see if they can make us back off our proposals, and I am convinced that they'll come back to the table and talk.

So, here's how I would sum up my meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Iceland. We addressed the important areas of human rights, regional conflicts, and our bilateral relationship. And we moved the U.S.-Soviet dialog on arms reduction to a new plane. We laid a strong and promising foundation for our negotiators in Geneva to build on. And I'm disappointed, of course, that Mr. Gorbachev decided to hold all agreements hostage to an agreement on SDI. But during our Geneva summit we agreed to move forward where we had found common ground, especially on a 50-percent reduction in strategic arsenals and an INF agreement. I hope he'll at least remember that commitment in the next few weeks, because for our part, we'll seek right away in Geneva to build on the democratic -- or the dramatic progress that we made in Iceland.

Mr. President, before going to Reykjavik, you characterized Mr. Gorbachev as one of the more frank Soviet leaders with whom you have had dealings. Do you stand by that characterization, or do you think Mr. Gorbachev has perhaps engaged in a little duplicity in Reykjavik?

The President. Well, I'm not going to use the word ``duplicity'' there, but I do say, having had an opportunity in these past several years, and before him, to speak to -- while not their outright leaders, their general secretaries, because they kept disappearing -- talked to other Russian leaders. And I think the very nature of the talks that we had in this one and the fact that we were finding ourselves in agreement in the extent to which we would disarm and all -- but, yes, he was more open than I have experienced before. And it wasn't until we then got down to this proposal of theirs with SDI that we ran into a roadblock, and he made it plain then that everything that we'd been talking about was contingent on our agreeing to that one phase. But I'm not saying to you he's an easy mark in any way. He's totally dedicated to their system, and frankly, I think he believes sincerely their propaganda about us: that we're beholden to industrial and military complexes and so forth.

Mr. President, now that you've met that base camp, how important right now is this summit that was originally scheduled for after the election? Is there a chance that there will be a summit, or doesn't it matter?

The President. Well, he brought up the matter of summit and referred to it several times as if he was expecting to be here for the summit. I have to say that our arms negotiators have gone back to Geneva. All of these things have gone with them, and it contains all of the notes and memorandums from all of the meetings as to the extent of the agreement that we had reached with regard to the various types of missiles and so forth. And so I have to believe that as they continue to look at that and see that there was only one major point of disagreement that we had that -- I'm going to continue to be optimistic.

Mr. President, on the subject of the one sticking point that looms so large, if you could just explain to us your reasons for the way you handled it, on one point in particular? When it became apparent that all of the concessions that General Secretary Gorbachev was willing to make in the offensive area were contingent on this demand with regard to SDI, did you feel that you had an option of saying: We'll get back to you. We'll study this. We'll turn it over to our experts. I'll give it some more thought? If you had that option, you clearly didn't take it. You decided to make clear to him, then and there, and subsequently in public, that you were rejecting it. Why was that necessary, particularly given the fact that you told us here only a week or so ago that no great agreements were expected out of this meeting? It's not as though we were all out there waiting for you to come out with either a big agreement or a big disagreement.

The President. No, actually, as a matter of fact, he himself from the very beginning had said that what we were talking about is the necessity for coming to some agreements that would then lead to being able to sign things and finalize things at the forthcoming summit. So, actually, we progressed in those discussions farther than I think either one of us had anticipated we would. And with SDI, I think that is the absolute guarantee. First of all, I'd pledged to the American people that there was no way that I would give away SDI. And looking at their own record -- the ABM treaty -- they're in violation of that now.

Now, the ABM treaty, which he kept referring to as if it was the Holy Grail -- I asked him once what was so great about a treaty that had our governments saying to our people: We won't protect you from a nuclear attack? That's basically what the ABM treaty says. On the other hand, we know and have evidence that they have been going beyond the restrictions of the ABM treaty with their Krasnoyarsk radar, which shows the possibility of being able to provide radar-directed missiles in a defense not just for one spot -- Moscow -- as the treaty had provided. We never, of course, took advantage of the fact that we could defend one spot. We didn't think that was a very practical idea.

But that they are embarked on a strategic defense initiative of their own. And we feel that, first of all, there are other countries, other individuals, that now that everybody knows how to make a ballistic missile that could be and that are -- well, some have them already, others developing. It's true that we are the two that endanger the world most with the great arsenals that we have. But this would be the guarantee against cheating. You wouldn't have to be suspiciously watching each other to see if they were starting to replace missiles. This would be the guarantee against -- in the future -- a madman coming along. I've likened it -- and I explained it to him in this way -- that right after World War I -- and I reminded him that I was the only one there old enough to remember these times -- the nations got together in Geneva to outlaw poison gas, but we kept our gas masks. And thank heaven we did, because now, years later, poison gas is being more and more recognized as a legitimate weapon.

The President. I can't say that I'm confident, that I have any practical evidence other than the fact that he several times referred to the forthcoming summit that would take place here in the United States.

The President. I'm not going to use that word or say that because where this came up was both of us finally at a point proposed that -- on Saturday night -- that our teams take all of these voluminous notes that had been taken in all of the meetings and discussions with all of the things that had been discussed, and they go to work that night -- and they did, and they worked all night -- in two groups. Well, I mean there were two -- their groups and our groups, but two on each side. One of our groups was dedicated to putting together all the discussion that we'd had on human rights and regional conflicts and so forth. They worked until, as I understand it, about 3:30 in the morning. And the other group was to go through all the things, to come back and find where had we really been in agreement, where there was no problem between us, and where were the sticking points that had not been resolved. And I guess that group worked until about 6 in the morning, didn't they? And then Sunday we went into what was supposed to be a 2-hour meeting and wound up being an all-day meeting.

They put together the things that we had all proposed and that seemed that we could agree on and the places where we were stuck. And that was the first time, really, that it became evident about SDI, because what I had proposed early on was what I talked about here. I told him that what we were proposing with SDI was that once we reached the testing stage we would -- well, before that, that right now we were ready and willing to sign a treaty, a binding treaty, that said when we reached the testing stage that both sides would proceed.

Because we told him frankly that we knew they were researching also on defense -- nor was that ever denied. And we said we both will go forward with what we're doing. When we reach the testing stage, if it's us, we'll invite you to participate and see the tests. And if it develops that we have -- or I said if you have perfected a system that can be this kind of defense that we're talking about, then we share, so that there won't be one side having this plus offensive weapons, but that we eliminate the offensive weapons and then we make available to all who feel a need for it or want it, this defensive system, so that safety is guaranteed for the future.

Mr. President, you don't want to use the word ``deceit,'' but I'm still puzzled. It seems to me that you wouldn't have agreed with Mr. Gorbachev as you agreed if you'd known that once you got to the 11th hour he would spring this all on SDI or nothing at all.

The President. Well, I think this came out of the summary, then, that came back from our teams to us, where all of this was put together in kind of an agreement. And they weren't denying SDI openly. What they were doing was framing it in such a way that in a 10-year delay they would literally kill SDI, and there just wouldn't be any.

The President. I'm trying to remember all the things that were said. It was just that they were adamant, that -- and the use of words, it came down to the use of words. And their words would have made it not just a 10-year delay, but would have meant that we would come to the end of the reducing the weapons and we -- well, SDI would have been killed.

Well, thank you very much, and welcome to the White House complex. I wanted all of you to come over this afternoon to hear firsthand about our meetings in Iceland, and I have a terrible feeling that almost anything I say is going to have already been said about that trip.

But before I turn to my report, let me first say that I couldn't have gone to Reykjavik without the hard work and dedication, above and beyond the call of duty, of you men and women that I see before me. You labored night and day to get us ready for that first meeting, and I know we sort of sprung it on you at the last minute. I'm grateful to all of you for the fine work you did, and let me say thanks as well to the members of that small team that I took with me to the meeting. They worked around the clock -- and I mean that literally. A few of them got no sleep at all while we were there. I've long had great respect for every one of them, and that respect grew even stronger in these 4 days. They were an outstanding team, and all Americans can be proud of them and of the work they did. And you can be proud of the fruit that your work is bearing, for the Reykjavik meeting may have set the stage for a major advance in the U.S.-Soviet relationship.

Reykjavik the Soviet Union went farther than ever before in accepting our goal of deep reductions in the level of nuclear weapons. For the first time, we got Soviet agreement to a figure of 100 intermediate-range missiles -- warheads for each side worldwide, and that was a truly drastic cut. And for the first time we began to hammer out the details of a 50-percent cut in strategic forces over 5 years. And we were just a sentence or two away from agreeing to new talks on nuclear testing. And maybe most important, we were in sight of an historic agreement on completely eliminating the threat of offensive ballistic missiles by 1996. Believe me, the significance of that meeting at Reykjavik is not that we didn't sign agreements in the end; the significance is that we got as close as we did.

On issue after issue, particularly in the area of arms reduction, we saw that General Secretary Gorbachev was ready for serious bargaining on real arms reductions. And for me, this was especially gratifying. Just 5\1/2\ years ago, when we came into office, I said that our objective must be -- well, it must not be regulating the growth in nuclear weapons, which is what arms control, as it was known, had been all about. No, I said that our goal must be reducing the number of nuclear weapons, that we had to work to make the world safer, not just control the pace at which it became more dangerous. And now the Soviets, too, are talking about real arms reductions. And let me say that this wouldn't have been possible without the support that we've had from the American people over the last 5\1/2\ years. Because the American people have stood behind us as we worked over the years to rebuild our nation's defenses. We went to the Iceland meeting in a position of strength. The Soviets knew that we had the support, not only of a strong America but a united NATO alliance that was going ahead with deployment of Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles. So, yes, it was this strength and unity that brought the Soviets to the bargaining table.

And particularly important, of course, was America's support for the Strategic Defense Initiative. Now, as you know, I offered Mr. Gorbachev an important concession on SDI. I offered to put off deployment for a decade, and I coupled that with a 10-year plan for eliminating all Soviet and American ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth. This may have been the most sweeping and important arms reduction proposal in the history of the world, but it wasn't good enough for Mr. Gorbachev -- he wanted more. He wanted us to accept even tighter limits on SDI than the ABM treaty now requires; that is to stop all but laboratory research. He knew this meant killing strategic defense entirely, which has been a Soviet goal from the start. And, of course, the Soviet Union has long been engaged in extensive strategic defense programs of its own. And unlike ours, the Soviet program goes well beyond research, even to deployment. The Soviet proposal would've given them an immediate, one-sided advantage, and a dangerous one. And I could not and would not agree to that. I won't settle for anything unless it's in the interest of America's security.

America and the West need SDI for long-run insurance. It protects us against the possibility that at some point, when the elimination of ballistic missiles is not yet complete, the Soviets may change their mind. We know the Soviet record of playing fast and loose with past agreements. America can't afford to take a chance on waking up in 10 years and finding that the Soviets have an advanced defense system and are ready to put in place more missiles -- or more modern missiles. And we have no defense of our own and our deterrence is obsolete because of the Soviet defense system. If arms reduction is to help bring lasting peace, we must be able to maintain the vital strategic balance which for so long has kept the peace. Nothing could more threaten world peace than arms reduction agreements with loopholes that would leave the West naked to a massive and sudden Soviet buildup in offensive and defensive weapons.

My guess is that the Soviets understand this but want to see how much farther they can push us in public before they once again get down to brass tacks. So, here's how I see the meeting in Iceland adding up. We addressed the important issues of human rights, regional conflicts, and our bilateral relationship. And Mr. Gorbachev and I got awfully close to historic agreements in the arms reduction process. We took discussions into areas where they had never been before. The United States put good, fair ideas out on the table, and they won't go away. Good ideas, after all, have a life of their own. The next step will be in Geneva, where our negotiators will work to build on this progress.

The biggest disappointment in Iceland was that Mr. Gorbachev decided to make our progress hostage to his demand that we kill our strategic defense program. But, you know, I've had some experience with this kind of thing. One of my past jobs was as a negotiator of labor agreements in the motion picture industry, and I got used to one side or another walking out of contract talks. It didn't mean that relations had collapsed or that we'd reached an insurmountable impasse. It sometimes meant that a little maneuvering was going on.

Well, it's important for us right now to see the real progress that we made at Reykjavik and to unite so that we'll be strong for the next stage in negotiations. And if we do that, I believe that we have it within our grasp to achieve some truly historic breakthroughs. Last week I described Iceland as a base camp on our way to the summit. Well, this week I want to report to you that I believe there exists the opportunity to plant a permanent flag of peace at that summit. And I call on the Soviets not to miss this opportunity. The Soviets must not throw this away, must not slip back into a greater arms buildup. The American people don't mistake the absence of a final agreement for the absence of progress. We made progress; we must be patient. We made historic advances; we will not turn back.

Secretary Gorbachev's report to the Soviet people was unprecedented in its detail. He emphasized the same areas of progress upon which U.S. officials have commented over the past 2 days, namely, strategic arms reductions and potential agreement on intermediate nuclear forces. He also clearly indicated, just as we have done, that the sticking point which prevented an overall agreement in Iceland was the Soviet Union's demand for an end to the U.S. program on strategic defense. It is our view that the agreements and positions reached in Iceland remain on the table.

The meetings, which reconvene in Geneva today, will begin where we left off in Iceland. The Iceland talks were a very important and significant step in moving negotiations forward. We want to build upon the groundwork of Reykjavik.

We take note of some of the political rhetoric in the General Secretary's speech, but that was expected and unexceptional. What was remarkable was General Secretary Gorbachev's explanation of the progress made. We are pleased to note that, both at his press conference in Reykjavik and his address to the Soviet people, General Secretary Gorbachev stated that the work that was done in Reykjavik will not go to waste, and the way has now been cleared for further movement towards significant arms reduction. That is our view.

We believe we can go forward from this moment in a businesslike way. We must listen to each other, each explore the views of the other, and seek common approaches and agree on solutions. We think that goal was accomplished at Rekyjavik and should be the goal whenever we meet. We, like the General Secretary, believe that the meeting overcame obstructions and minute details and that new approaches have been developed. We believe there is no going back on what was developed at this meeting, and we look forward to continued negotiations which will build on the progress achieved in Reykjavik.

Well, during the Second World War, General Marshall, who later became Secretary of State and was the creator of the Marshall plan, he was asked at the beginning of the war, what was our secret weapon in World War II. And the General said, ``Just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' I've had a feeling for some time now that that can be said again about your generation. I've met a lot of you all around the country and been very proud of what I've seen. An important reason why some of us older types are still active, instead of being up on a certain ranch in California, is that we want to make certain that when it comes your turn to take over you have the same kind of a country with as much opportunity and as much freedom as we had when it was our turn to take over.

This is a fitting location to speak about our country's security and my recent talks with General Secretary Gorbachev. The British had already burned Washington by the time their fleet arrived at Fort McHenry back in 1814, and they would have continued their drive capturing and possibly destroying the metropolitan centers of our young country had they not been stopped. And what saved the day was the skill and bravery of those who fought here; some, undoubtedly, were no older than you are. The defenders of Fort McHenry withstood a tremendous naval bombardment and stopped the enemy cold. They were heroes. But in retrospect, credit must also be given to those farsighted individuals who made certain the fort was ready for action and who equipped the fort's defenders with reliable weapons. And it shouldn't be forgotten that this fort was built in 1799 -- during a time of peace.

I understand you're here today as part of your study in American history. And I have to tell you, I'm delighted that that is so, because there has been a period, not too long ago, when history sort of fell out of fashion in many of our schools and people like yourselves were allowed to grow up without too much knowledge of the past.

Fort McHenry, as I say, was built as a means of defending our country against the deadliest weapon of that time, which was the warship with its cannons. And no one could imagine then what accomplishments were to follow for peace and, regrettably, for war. And again today we can't imagine what the future holds. We hope and pray that there will always be peace. But like those who built this fort in the time of peace, so, too, we must be prepared to defend against those who would attempt to deny our freedom. We must be prepared. Unfortunately, today most Americans don't realize that our country has no defense at all against the deadliest weapons of our day: nuclear-tipped missiles, intercontinental ballistic missiles. Somebody pushes a button, and a half hour later our world is blowing up.

Defense Initiative -- you've heard those letters SDI over and over again -- well that's what it's all about. We're engaging some of our country's best minds to find out if it isn't possible to build a system that would provide a shield to protect all of us from a missile attack, as this fort shielded Baltimore from cannon attack. And by the time you high school students are finished with your education, a new technology may be available that will make this a far safer world than the one that we're living in today, one in which the danger of nuclear war will not cast a shadow over your lives as it has over ours.

I met with General Secretary Gorbachev over the weekend, as I'm sure you know, in Iceland. We spoke about human rights and certain conflicts in the world and a more open relationship between our two countries. We proposed the most sweeping and generous arms control proposal in history. We offered the complete elimination of all nuclear ballistic missiles -- Soviet and American -- from the face of the Earth by 1996. While we parted company with this American offer still on the table, we're closer than ever before to agreements that could lead to a safer world without nuclear weapons. I'm always aware that, as President, I'm not just making decisions for today's Americans, but tomorrow's Americans as well. I was not about to bargain away a safer world for you tomorrow.

It's my sincere hope that Mr. Gorbachev will review the great strides we made in Iceland and join with us in reducing nuclear weapons and in building technology that protects lives rather than destroying them. That's the only protection we have today. The policy is called the MAD policy, and really because the words are mutual assured destruction.

But it really is a mad policy, a treaty called the ABM, and in reality, what it says is neither side will protect our people from a possible nuclear attack and, therefore, will be so scared of shooting at each other that we won't do it. Well, I don't place an awful lot of confidence in that. And I think if we can come up with a weapon that says to them, if you push that button your weapons can't get here -- and I offered to share that weapon with them, so they could say the same thing about ours. But, well, we'll keep on working at that.

SDI is our policy, our insurance policy, to protect against a madman in the world or an attack by the Soviet Union. So, let's look forward and seek agreements and not look back and place blame. I repeat my offer to Mr. Gorbachev. Our proposals are serious. They remain on the table, and our negotiators are there in Geneva looking at them. So, we're ready to pick up where we left off. There's a unique opportunity to achieve real arms reductions, and it shouldn't be missed. Technology and freedom are opening new possibilities every day. And, clearly, I think the future is on our side.

But right now I know I have to go, and I'm taking up too much of your time, but I'd just like to mention something else to you as history students. You know, I've read a lot of constitutions. I guess every country in the world has got a constitution. The Soviet Union's Constitution I have read. And if you look at it, you will see many things in there that are in ours -- the freedom to speak and the freedom to assemble and so forth. Of course, if anybody in Russia tries to do that, they get arrested. But it's in their Constitution.

Well, there's a difference that is so little, tiny, that you hardly notice it, and yet it is so great it tells the whole story. All those other constitutions are written by governments that in their constitutions say to their people: Here are the privileges, and here are the rights which we guarantee to you. Our Constitution says: Here are the rights and the privileges that we the people grant to government, and government can have no other rights or privileges that are not mentioned unless they are mentioned specifically in this Constitution.

When our Revolution took place, a few years before this fort was built, other revolutions had taken place in the world, time immemorial and up to today. All those other revolutions simply exchanged one set of rulers for another set of rulers. Ours was the first philosophical revolution. Ours said governments are not the masters of the people; they are the servants of the people. And government can do nothing unless the people tell government specifically that government can do that.

I don't know whether you'd thought about that, but in the very near future we're going to be recognizing and celebrating in this country the 200th birthday of the United States Constitution. And I just couldn't resist, in case you hadn't gotten to it in history, making sure that you knew about it.

Well, listen, it's good to see all of you here, and I know I've got to -- incidentally, in addition to that history and everything else, you keep up with your studies; but also those of you who are 18 and those of you who are approaching 18, remember that this government of, by, and for the people won't work unless the people perform their duty, which is to vote every time there's an election. And try to make up your minds as to what the issues are and what your feeling is about them. And don't just get bothered by labels and think you've got to vote one way because you belong to a certain party or something.

Vote on the basis of what you think and what you feel. There was a man, a great humorist, named Will Rogers some years ago -- he's dead now -- but Will Rogers said that the people that we elect to office -- public office -- are no better and no worse than the rest of us, but they're all better than those who don't vote at all. So, keep in mind that that's the privilege you've got. Use that privilege.

Thank you very much. It's a pleasure to be here with you in support of a courageous and hard-working individual, the type of person you will be proud to have as your United States Senator -- Linda Chavez.

Seriously, though, it is an honor for me to be here. Linda, as you are aware, used to work for me in the White House, and now she wants to work for you. Do us both a favor: Give her the job. She's worth it. Linda will follow in the tradition of outstanding Republican Members of Congress from Maryland: Mac Mathias, Helen Bentley, and Marjorie Holt -- I've respected them all. And I'll miss Marjorie next year. But the GOP has a great candidate to succeed her, State Representative Bob Neall. He's got some mighty big shoes to fill, but I know he can do it. Connie Morella is also running in the 8th district, and I hope you will send Bob and Connie to help me in Congress.

All this is in stark contrast to her wily, liberal opponent who still talks like Federal spending is the answer to just about every problem, and never seems to mention the Federal controls that come with those Federal dollars or just who, when all is said and done, pays the bill. Well, I think the days of the big spenders are over. The last thing America needs is another liberal Senator congenitally unable to say no to the special interest groups.

This November I predict the voters all over this country, including Maryland, are going to give thumbs-down to the last remnants of the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend crowd -- sending them the way of the Edsel, the hula hoop, and the all-asparagus diet.

In these last 5\1/2\ years we've struggled to overcome the legacy of the last decade, when liberals dominated American Government. It's time to close that sad, irresponsible chapter once and for all. In Maryland that means electing a Senator of the future, rather than an advocate of the failed policies of the past. Linda's opponent, as is clear from her voting record and from her positions in this campaign, still has this same tax, spend, and inflate mind-set. Her election to the Senate could well give control of that august body to the over-the-hill gang that gave our country murderous inflation, sky-high interest rates, business decline, ever-increasing taxes, and swelling unemployment. Does anyone really want to go back to those bad old days?

This is a make-or-break election. Losing control of the Senate will mean more than just economic hardship for our people. The safety of our neighborhoods and the security of our country are also at stake. Linda's opponent can't even get herself to vote for a limited use of the death penalty for certain drug-related murders. This permissive attitude is one of the root causes for the crime epidemic that plagues this country. And pardon me, but I think America has had about enough of this kind of lighter-than-air liberalism. As a United States Senator, Linda can be counted on to support the appointment of tough law-and-order judges. We don't need a bunch of sociology majors on the bench. We need strong judges who'll do everything they can within the law to protect you and your families, and to put criminals where they belong -- behind bars.

Perhaps one of the greatest responsibilities of any elected official is to see to the security needs of the United States. Back in the 1970's, when Linda's opponent and the other disciples of weakness were running the show, they permitted America's military strength to erode. Do you know that on any given day half our military planes couldn't take off for lack of spare parts; half of our naval vessels couldn't leave port, either for lack of the same kind of parts or lack of crew? Linda Chavez was part of a team that has been rebuilding America's military strength. It would be hard to find a Member of Congress who more consistently opposed our efforts to meet America's security needs than Linda's opponent. Had her views carried the day during these last 5\1/2\ years, we would have no B - 1 bomber, no MX missile, no nuclear modernization in Europe, no modernization of our conventional forces anywhere.

Forty-eight hours after we came home from Reykjavik, however, some on Capitol Hill were already promising to take a meat ax and chop up America's Strategic Defense Initiative, which is exactly what Mr. Gorbachev is hoping that Congress will do. Let me state it plainly: It would be a terrible tragedy for this country and for our children's future if those on Capitol Hill opposed to SDI are allowed to hand over to the Soviet Union, free of charge, what we refused to hand over across the negotiating table in Reykjavik. SDI is America's insurance policy that the Soviets will begin living up to the arms control agreements that they've agreed to. SDI is one of the chief reasons the Soviets went to the summit and one of the primary reasons they'll come back again. SDI is the key to a world free of nuclear blackmail. Don't let liberals in Congress throw it away. And if we have a new Congress with leaders like Linda Chavez, we will never throw it away.

Where does Linda's opponent stand? Does she repudiate those trying to kill SDI, or does she stand with those who are trying to build a system that protects people and doesn't kill them -- because that's where Linda Chavez stands.

Linda Chavez on our team, and with the support of you, the people, America has made great strides in these last 5\1/2\ years. The United States has again resumed its leadership role. The Western alliance is again united, unified, and confident.

The forces of freedom are on the move. One thing I'm especially proud of: In these last 5\1/2\ years, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism. In fact, one small country, Grenada, has been returned to the family of free nations.

The future is up to us. Linda Chavez believes in meeting challenges, rather than ignoring them. In Central America, for example, Linda supports our efforts to provide our friends what they need to defend themselves against Communist aggression. Linda's opponent would by default, by doing nothing, permit that area to fall under Soviet domination. Linda's opponent actually voted against military aid to the fledgling democracy in El Salvador. I remember when we first came here -- El Salvador struggling against the Communist guerrillas and how many people of the liberal bent were saying we should just turn our backs on that. We had no business trying to be of any help to them. And today they're a democracy. Linda's opponent actually voted against military aid, as I say, to that fledgling democracy. Had her view held sway, the people of El Salvador might be under the heel of a Communist dictatorship right now; the rest of Central America, perhaps even Mexico, might be in turmoil; and a flood of refugees could well be headed toward our southern border.

In the next 3 weeks, it behooves all of us to open the eyes of our fellow citizens as to what is at stake in this election. In Linda Chavez, we have a standard bearer to be proud of. An American of Hispanic descent, her life reflects the America we believe in -- a land where every individual is free to follow his or her star, a land where people who work hard can go as far and as high as their talents will take them.

Ginger Rogers' partner, Fred Astaire -- he was getting all the credit. And suddenly he began to realize Ginger was doing the same thing on high heels and backward. [Laughter] Today Linda offers her talent, hard work, and dedication to the people of Maryland. And for Maryland's sake, and for our country's sake, I hope you do everything in your power to help her win. Maryland and America deserve the best.

And let me just conclude with another word about this thing of parties. I know that even in this gathering, and in this place, there must be many who have been, as we have been, members of the other party or who perhaps still are. But all across the country I've been speaking to groups in which that was true, because all across the country there are millions of fine, patriotic Democrats who are totally out of step with the liberal leadership of their party. And that's what we're talking about; not the rank and file that want the same things that we want -- that want a limited government, that want freedom for the people, that want a strong United States, that want an end to make-work programs that waste our money and that don't provide.

Do you know that the method of discussing unemployment and employment in our country has to do with what is called the available labor pool? And that, in our country, is defined as everyone, male and female, from 16 years of age on up for the ultimate limit. And today 61.3 percent of that available pool is employed, which is the highest percentage in the history of our country.

But thank you all. And listen, you send these candidates that I've mentioned. But above all, we could not have accomplished any of the things that have been accomplished in these 5\1/2\ years if we had not had control of at least one House of the Legislature, the United States Senate.

National Institutes of Health, which began as a one-room laboratory at the Marine Hospital on Staten Island in 1887, has become the world's foremost biomedical research center. Its investigators are at the forefront of discoveries that contribute to better health for mankind.

In addition to conducting investigations in its own laboratories, the NIH supports the activities of non-Federal scientists in universities, medical schools, hospitals, and other public, private, and voluntary research institutions. It plays a crucial role in training our Nation's biomedical research scientists and fosters biomedical communication throughout our country and abroad. The NIH facilitates international assemblies of scientists and promotes the exchange of scientists and scientific information between the United States and other countries.

The efforts of biomedical scientists have contributed to bringing our Nation's death rate to an all-time low. Survival rates have improved for patients with seven of the ten major forms of cancer. The death rate for cardiovascular diseases has declined more rapidly than has that for all other causes of death combined. New methods of hypertension control have reduced the incidence of stroke. Dramatic progress has taken place in prevention of blindness through laser technology and in the understanding and treatment of genetic diseases.

Despite the significant improvements in health over the past century, many health-related mysteries remain. The National Institutes of Health will continue to play a vital role in solving these problems. The NIH is opening exciting new opportunities at nearly every level of biomedical research, and our Nation is proud of this great institution and its accomplishments.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The greatness of our Nation is paralleled by the greatness of our forests. By providing food, water, shelter, fuel, and the raw materials for thousands of products, the forests sustained the pioneers, provided for our Nation's growth, and assisted in our defense. Today our country, and indeed the entire world, continues to need the products of our forests to meet social, economic, and industrial demands.

We have been blessed with an abundance of natural resources, and we have the responsibility to be good stewards of our land. Throughout our history, when people have cared for the forests, using them wisely and replenishing them in a timely way, the forests and the Nation alike have prospered.

A forest is a wondrous environment, with an amazing number of checks and balances that maintain its vitality. Human intervention by knowledgeable, caring people benefits forest productivity. Advances brought about through research and implemented by professional land managers have significantly increased the productivity of our forested lands.

Evidence that productive forests benefit the people is all around us. Wood is an essential component of the houses we live in, the furniture we sit on, the newspapers we read, and countless other products we use every day. The jobs generated by processing forest products are an important part of our economic prosperity. The water most of us use is generated and purified by forest ecosystems, and forests provide essential habitats for fish and wildlife.

Additionally, the recreation opportunities afforded by forests provide visitors with rejuvenating experiences and help fuel thousands of business enterprises that cater to our recreation needs. In short, proper use of our forest resources can significantly increase the economic, social, and environmental wealth and strength of our Nation.

I have signed H.R. 5548, the Export-Import Bank Act Amendments of 1986, which extends the Bank's charter for 6 more years. This sends an important signal to both our exporting community and foreign suppliers that American exporters will continue to be able to compete vigorously for business throughout the world. I am pleased that this bill gives the Bank the authority for the tied-aid war chest that I requested in September 1985. This authority will give the United States needed leverage for use in negotiations to eliminate predatory financing practices whereby countries mix official export financing with concessional foreign aid in an effort to undercut bids on major overseas projects.

I have signed this bill, I must express some reservations about several of its provisions. I am disappointed that the bill sets severe restrictions on the new authority for the interest rate matching program (I-Match) I proposed in the budgets for both fiscal years 1986 and 1987. Section 8 of H.R. 5548 redefines eligibility standards for Export-Import Bank programs to exclude specified Marxist-Leninist countries, expanding the current statutory definition of Communist countries that are ineligible to participate in the Bank's programs.

I note that some of the countries deemed ineligible under the new definition have been making substantial progress in redirecting their economic and political systems towards Western models. Since my administration agrees that access of Communist states to Eximbank programs should continue to be treated with special care, I am directing the Secretary of State to review the new list expeditiously and to advise me which, if any, of those countries should not be treated as Marxist-Leninist for purposes of this legislation. I note that Tibet is listed as a country in section 8. The United States recognizes Tibet as part of the People's Republic of China. I interpret Tibet's inclusion as a separate country to be a technical oversight.

Thank you all very much. Thank you, Jack. When I met with Mr. Gorbachev last November in Geneva, we decided that it would be valuable for our two peoples to have a more open personal relationship with each other. And the trip that you are about to embark on is just the sort of exchange that we had in mind. Well, there are many fundamental differences between our two peoples and -- our countries, I should say, and our political and economic systems. Yet being different does not preclude better relations.

Who knows, our two peoples, if we do this, may find out that they have much more in common than their governments do. Each one of you, then, going is a special ambassador for America. By being a member of the Young Astronauts program, you've already proven that you have a keen mind and an inquisitive spirit, so we have absolute confidence in you.

The Soviet leader demanded terms that would, in effect, kill SDI and scuttle our chances to develop technology that may someday protect you and your families from nuclear missiles. It might have been Columbus Day, but I wasn't about to give away the store for a deal that we couldn't afford. I couldn't give up your future.

Ward Beecher once wrote: ``He who invents a machine augments the power of a man and the well-being of mankind.'' Well, America and the other free nations of the world are on the edge of a new era of technology and progress, one in which the well-being of mankind will soar as never before. Now, we can't be held back because of Soviet demands. What we can do -- as in the case of SDI -- is to share in the benefits of our innovations, even with our adversaries, to help make this a safer world. And that is exactly what I offered to him. But even when we finally had such a plan worked out -- yes, we would share so that neither one of us would have to live in fear, again. But we can't hold back the future or deny progress.

Consequently, even had the explosive nothing to carry, it has only one-tenth of the energy necessary to escape the Earth gravity. Hence, the proposition appears to be basically impossible.'' And then there was a man that stepped off from a spacecraft and said something about one giant step for mankind as he took the first step of a human being on the Moon. Well, what I read was written back in 1926. Now, I admit I really didn't read this at the time, but it points out the importance of making decisions based on the future. In this century we have gone from Kitty Hawk to the Moon, from telegraph to satellites, and from pencils to computers. And I'm absolutely certain that you'll see even more change. The only question is whether it is for good or bad, more sophisticated missiles capable of killing more and more people or a new defense system to prevent war and save lives.

And that is what SDI is all about: the future, a future of innovations that we cannot now imagine. There are those like that physics professor I quoted who will label anything ``impossible'' because it cannot be done today. Well, we must not let them or our adversaries hold us back. In this case, I say it's better to build a defensive system, to have an insurance policy, that protects us from attack than to base the peace on mutual assured destruction. Mutual assured destruction -- those three words -- that is the system that was adopted by our two governments a few years ago.

That is the ABM treaty. And what it says is: If we're both able to blow each other up, then we'll be afraid to try it, and we won't do it. And as Washington is prone to do, that shortened down to its initials; mutual assured destruction comes out a MAD policy. And that's just what it is: stark, staring, mad policy. It's little more than a threatened slaughter of millions of innocent people.

Reykjavik was a crossroads, not between having or not having an agreement, but rather between believing nothing can change or believing a future that offers hope that our world will someday be free of the awesome fear of nuclear attack.

Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall conduct the government-to-government relations of the United States with the Republic of the Marshall Islands, the Federated States of Micronesia, and the Republic of Palau (the ``Freely Associated States''), including any subdivisions, officials or persons thereof, and may delegate or allocate such of his authority under this Order to such other United States officials as he may from time to time deem desirable. The authority of the Secretary of State shall include, consistent with Article V of Title One of the Compact and section 105(b)(1) of the Act, the establishment and maintenance of representative offices in the Freely Associated States and supervision of the United States representatives and their staff. The Secretary also shall provide, in accordance with applicable law, for appropriate privileges, immunities, and assistance to representatives to the United States designated by the Governments of the Freely Associated States, together with their officers and staff. In accordance with applicable law and the provisions of this Order, the Secretary also shall have the authority and responsibility to take such other actions as may be necessary and appropriate to ensure that the authorities and obligations of the United States set forth in the Compact and its related agreements and in the laws of the United States as they relate to the conduct of government-to-government relations with the Freely Associated States are carried out. The Secretary shall provide from appropriations made to the Department of State such funds as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Order in relation to the activities of the Department of State.

Secretary of the Interior. The Secretary of the Interior shall be responsible for seeking the appropriation of funds for and, in accordance with the laws of the United States, shall make available to the Freely Associated States the United States economic and financial assistance appropriated pursuant to Article I of Title Two of the Compact; the grant, service, and program assistance appropriated pursuant to Article II of Title Two of the Compact; and all other United States assistance appropriated pursuant to the Compact and its related agreements. The Secretary shall coordinate and monitor any program or any activity by any department or agency of the United States provided to the Freely Associated States and shall coordinate and monitor related economic development planning. This Section shall not apply to services provided by the Department of Defense to the Freely Associated States or to activities pursuant to Section 1 of this Order, including activities under the Peace Corps Act.

There is established an Interagency Group on Freely Associated State Affairs for the purpose of providing guidance and oversight with respect to the establishment and implementation of policy concerning the Compact and United States relations with the Freely Associated States.

The Interagency Group shall consist of the Secretary of State or his designee, who shall chair the Group, and of the principal officers or their designees from the Departments of the Interior, Defense, Commerce, Energy, and Justice, the Organization of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the Office of Management and Budget, the National Security Council, and such other departments and agencies as may from time to time be appropriate.

The Interagency Group shall make such recommendations as it shall deem appropriate to the President, through the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs, concerning United States relations with the Freely Associated States. The Interagency Group also shall provide such guidance as it deems appropriate to departments and agencies delegated authority by this Order concerning administration of laws with respect to the Freely Associated States.

Freely Associated States concludes that noncompliance sanctions pursuant to section 105(g) of the Act are appropriate, it shall make appropriate recommendations to the Interagency Group. The Interagency Group shall consider these recommendations and report its findings to the President for his review in making that determination.

The Office shall be headed by a Director designated by the Secretary of State, to whom the Secretaries of State, Defense, and the Interior may, to the extent permitted by law, delegate any or all of their respective authorities and responsibilities as described in this Order, including the authority to supervise the United States representatives referred to in Section 4 of this Order. The Director shall serve as Executive Secretary of the Interagency Group.

Personnel additional to that provided by the Secretary of State may be detailed to the Office by the Executive departments and agencies that are members of the Interagency Group, and by other agencies as appropriate. Executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide such information, advice, and administrative services and facilities as may be necessary for the fulfillment of the functions of the Office.

Compact shall represent the Government of the United States in an official capacity in that Freely Associated State, and shall supervise the actions of any Executive department or agency personnel assigned permanently or temporarily to that Freely Associated State.

The Interagency Group and Office of Freely Associated State Affairs shall facilitate such cooperative measures. Nothing in this Order shall be construed to impair the authority and responsibility of the Secretary of Defense for security and defense matters in or relating to the Freely Associated States.

Causing an annual audit to be conducted of the annual financial statements of the Government of the Federated States of Micronesia and the Government of the Marshall Islands, pursuant to section 110(b) of the Act.

Subject to the provisions of Section 9 of this Order, prior Executive orders concerning the former Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands are hereby superseded and rendered inapplicable, except that the authority of the Secretary of the Interior as provided in applicable provisions of Executive Order No. 11021, as amended, shall remain in effect, in a manner consistent with this Order and pursuant to section 105(c)(2) of the Act, to terminate the trust territory government and discharge its responsibilities, at which time the entirety of Executive Order No. 11021 shall be superseded.

Nothing in this Order shall be construed as modifying the rights or obligations of the United States under the provisions of the Compact or as affecting or modifying the responsibility of the Secretary of State and the Attorney General to interpret the rights and obligations of the United States arising out of or concerning the Compact.

I have signed S. 2069, the Job Training Partnership Act Amendments of 1986. Four years ago I signed into law the Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA). This law put into motion a new public-private partnership to address the job-training needs of disadvantaged young people and adults and displaced workers who have lost their jobs because of technological changes in modern industry. JTPA marked a major departure from earlier programs by shifting authority to the States, focusing resources on meaningful job training, emphasizing performance, and, most important, involving employers in all phases of the design and implementation of the program.

I believe that the JTPA has more than fulfilled our expectations. It has helped millions of youth and adults. States have shown that they can manage the training and employment system under a block grant approach. Thousands of private sector volunteers have donated their time and energies to make sure that the training provided meets the real needs of employers. This has paid off in terms of the performance of the program: About two-thirds of those assisted find jobs in the private sector.

Job Training Partnership Act Amendments I have approved are the first revisions to the law since the program began. Consistent with the proposal in my 1987 budget request for the summer youth employment and training program, this legislation promotes literacy training for individuals in the program who need it in order to be able to find and hold a job. States and local areas should be concerned about the problems of illiteracy and lack of basic educational skills. Those who are entering the workplace need to be able to read, write, compute, and reason in order to get along in today's jobs. The amendment to the summer youth program directs resources toward those problems and continues flexibility for the States and local areas in deciding how to structure their programs under the JTPA to address them. The other changes made by the Job Training Partnership Act Amendments fine-tune the program, but in no way compromise the sound principles on which the JTPA is based. They should make the program work even better, and I commend the Congress for the bipartisan support it has given the JTPA.

I -- incidentally, of course, all the signs, and some of them of welcome to me -- I was told when I was a pledge at Eureka College that Tau Kappa Epsilon was a fraternity for life, and I'm glad my fraters are here. But before I start my prepared remarks, I want to make one brief announcement. The danger of toxic wastes is perhaps the most pressing environmental problem confronting our country. And on my way here today, on Air Force One, I signed the Superfund legislation to accelerate the cleanup of the Nation's hazardous waste sites. The bill's financing has real concerns, but the health and safety of Americans is among the highest priorities of government, so we will not allow an interruption in the cleanup process.

And now, I want to say hi to the students of Thompson High School. Sorry I couldn't accept your invitation, but I hope that this makes up for it. And also to the young astronauts who are here today. I just said goodbye yesterday to 10 of their number who are now on their way to the Soviet Union in an exchange with their young astronauts who will be coming here visiting our country.

But it's wonderful to be here in North Dakota. You know, as I said to my staff when we were taking off in Air Force One, it's great to be out of Washington and back to where the real people are. I wish I could stay longer, but as you know, Congress is in session, and with Mark Andrews here with me, well, I don't think we should be leaving the rest of them alone too long. Now, I'm not reflecting on the Congress as an institution, but most of us must be aware that there are some elements there that need watching. I think I can describe them best by a story about three fellows that came out of a building, found they'd locked themselves out of their car. And one of them said, ``Get me a wire coathanger.

You know, the truth is, the liberal Democrat leaders never met a tax they didn't like. And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, those liberals act like they've got your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. Well, you're the people who pay the taxes, and you know that we don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little, we have a deficit because Congress spends too much. It's about time that Congress took care of the Federal budget and left the family budget alone.

There's another issue that Mark Andrews and I feel strongly about, and I'll bet you do, too: that's keeping America strong and proud and peaceful and free. As you know, I just recently returned from my meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Iceland. That meeting was a breakthrough in our discussions with the Soviets. We're no longer talking about arms control; we're talking about arms reductions, possibly, even the complete elimination of ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth. That's an historic turnaround for the Soviets, and it wouldn't have been possible without the firm support of the American people, whose hard work and support have enabled us to rebuild our military might. The American people know that the only way to negotiate for peace is from a position of strength. We're closer to real arms reductions than ever before, and it's because America today is once again strong and united. But one major obstacle remained in Iceland: Unfortunately, Mr.

Gorbachev decided to make all of our progress hostage to his demand that we kill our Strategic Defense Initiative. Now, I had to remind him of my pledge to the American people on SDI: that in America when you give your word, you give your word -- and that stands up no matter what the time or place. SDI is our insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madmen that might come along or some other country that develops ballistic missiles or in case the Soviets don't keep their side of the bargain.

You know, before World War II, the British were developing a new defense system; it was called radar. And without radar, it's possible that the Royal Air Force wouldn't have been able to beat back the Nazi air assault on England. If you'll recall -- you won't recall, you weren't here at the time, but those of us who do -- but you've perhaps read that when Winston Churchill acknowledged what that little band of fighter pilots had done from England, and to save England, and with the help of that radar, when he said, ``Never in the course of human events have so many owed so much to so few.'' Well, I couldn't help but think that giving up SDI would have been like Chamberlain giving up radar, as well as Czechoslovakia, at Munich -- a tragic blunder that might have spelled the end to freedom in Europe.

SDI is a purely defensive and purely peaceful technology. If the Soviets honestly want progress toward a world free of nuclear weapons, they have nothing to fear from SDI. The Soviets are hard bargainers. America must be even more patient and determined and united. And America must speak with one voice, saying loud and clear: We'll walk the extra mile for peace, but we'll never gamble with America's safety. And I hope you all realize that when he was saying no to this SDI, this was after I had told him we would sign a binding treaty right now, that if and when we had developed that system and it was practical, we would share it with them so that neither one of us ever had to be afraid of the other country. And still, they said no. So, I want to ask you a question: Can I count on your support to keep America strong and united and on the road to peace?

And it's because of the quality of the men and women in our Armed Forces, and the quality of the weapons that they carry in defense of this country that every nickel-and-dime dictator the world over knows that if it tangles with the United States of America, he will pay a price.

America is moving forward, but that doesn't mean that we don't recognize that some sectors of our country are not sharing fully in this expansion. I understand the problems facing the American energy industry in States like North Dakota. And I recognize that in the midst of bountiful harvests, American agriculture is going through a difficult transition. In Illinois and South Dakota, and today here in Grand Forks, whenever I get a chance, I've been meeting with farm leaders to talk about the problems facing American agriculture. As I've said to them, and as I say to you now: Government will stand by you during these hard times. And that's why this administration is providing more financial help to our America's farmers than the last five administrations all put together. And falling interest rates and inflation have been cutting production costs for farmers. The last thing farmers need is to return to the party that gave them grain embargoes, outrageous inflation, and 21\1/2\ percent interest rates.

I know there are things in the farm bill that Mark doesn't like. And there are some things in it I don't like. But we both agree that government programs ought to be better targeted to the family farmers who need it most. Right now some subsidies operate to make rich farmers richer, and we're opposed to that.

I'm not talking about Hollywood now, I was raised in Dixon, Illinois -- I understand farmers don't want to live on subsidies; they want free access to foreign markets and the chance to make a fair profit. And we're making sure that they get that chance. Imperfect as it is, this farm bill moves us in that direction.

And we say to our friends in the energy industry: We know your problems. But no problems, however great, are going to be solved by turning the United States Senate over to the kind of people who thought the way to solve the energy crisis was to ration gasoline, control the price of oil, and win votes by demagoging about ``obscene profits.'' The liberals who imposed that vindictive windfall profits tax in the heyday of Democratic power are not the friends of energy States like North Dakota.

Now, it's time to get the facts straight about Mark Andrews' opponent. North Dakota doesn't need a Senator who criticizes but doesn't offer any solutions. North Dakota doesn't need a Senator whose campaign is funded by ultraliberal, antimilitary crowd all over the nation who would give us a weaker America. The big spenders know that Mark's opponent will be their ally. And believe me, the last thing we need is another tax collector in the United States Senate. In Mark Andrews, North Dakota has a Senator who knows what it's like to meet a payroll. He is not a lifetime bureaucrat who doesn't know the difference between a cow and a combine. [Laughter] America and North Dakota need a Senator with experience and clout, a man of independence, strength, and proven leadership who fights and wins for North Dakota. We need Mark Andrews in the United States Senate.

Mark's election could very well decide whether we keep control of the Senate or lose it to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's the difference between 2 more years of progress or 2 years of paralysis. I didn't seek reelection to be a 6-year President. There are too many exciting challenges still before us and too much business that still must be completed.

I cannot, and I will not, have my hands tied by a Congress that is totally hostile to all that we're trying to do. You know, my name will never be on the ballot again, but don't think you can't vote for me. If you want to vote for me, vote for Mark Andrews, so that we can have a Republican Senate that will work with me instead of against me and be around after I'm gone.

Senator you elect will help determine your future, America's future. So, before I go let, me just conduct an informal poll. [Laughter] I won't mind if you speak up loudly so that all of America can hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

I have signed S. 1965, the Higher Education Amendments of 1986. This bill extends and amends through fiscal year 1991 the Higher Education Act of 1965, a source of Federal assistance to millions of American students and thousands of educational institutions. This administration has always supported, and will continue to support, programs properly designed to help our neediest young people acquire higher education.

Several program improvements and cost-saving measures have been included in this bill, including provisions to reduce and better focus student loan subsidies, as well as to improve student loan collections and reduce defaults. I am particularly pleased that S. 1965 includes authority for an income-contingent direct student loan demonstration project, based upon proposals made by the administration. I believe this project, which allows borrowers to finance more of their own college costs more easily out of their long-term earnings, may signal an important, new direction in the financing of postsecondary education.

I do have serious concerns about S. 1965, however. The bill does little to meet the administration's major objectives for higher education: restoring more appropriate and equitable student aid funding roles to States, schools, students, and their families; targeting assistance on truly needy students; and eliminating excessive subsidies to intermediary institutions such as banks, schools, and loan guarantee agencies. S. 1965 also fails to simplify and streamline the major student aid programs; to reduce fraud and error; and to cut the extremely burdensome and unnecessary redtape with which students, parents, schools, lenders, and others now struggle. In the same vein, S. 1965 improperly limits the discretion of the Secretary of Education to manage these programs effectively, particularly in areas such as controlling the use of federally tax-exempt instruments to finance student aid and verifying the accuracy of basic aid application information. Making excessively complex programs even more complicated, and then denying their chief administrator the tools to operate them efficiently and effectively, is an invitation to program abuse.

In this time of continued need for budgetary restraint, S. 1965 ignores the serious question of how the taxpayer would finance the cost of new and expanded programs. This bill authorizes the appropriation of over $57 billion for the 5-year authorization period, which is $13 billion, or 30 percent, more than what would be needed to fund higher education programs under current law. S.

There are many other provisions of this bill I do not support -- unnecessary new programs and special projects for individual schools, for example. I am signing this bill because the basic Higher Education Act authorities provide aid to deserving students and support important programs. However, the administration remains committed to improving the higher education programs and to reducing their costs to the American taxpayer. We will continue to propose necessary changes and cost savings.

I have today signed the reauthorization legislation of the Superfund program. My overriding concern has been the continuation of our progress to clean up hazardous waste sites that endanger the health and safety of our citizens. All Americans can expect no less from their government. While I approve of the programmatic changes in the Superfund legislation, I have expressed concern in the past regarding the level of funding and the funding mechanism itself. I am assured by the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency that the Agency will spend only what is necessary to accomplish the objectives of the program and no more.

I have always been opposed to any broad-based tax as a new revenue source for Superfund; therefore, I have carefully studied the taxing provisions of the current Superfund legislation. First, it is not a general tax on all American businesses, but affects only larger corporations that have to pay the alternative minimum tax -- that is, corporations who, because of special deductions, exemptions, etc., do not pay the normal tax rate which under the tax reform act will be 34 percent. Additionally, this tax applies only to corporations with an alternative minimum tax of $2 million and over, and this tax is deductible from regular taxable income. Moreover, this environmental tax is earmarked only for Superfund and goes into a trust fund set up for that purpose alone. It is not a tax that can be used for general revenue purposes.

I have been assured by Senator Dole, Senator Stafford, and 48 other Senators that they will support my vetoing of either a general purpose broad-based tax or an increase in the amount of this special purpose tax to provide funding for the Superfund program. It is important that the Federal Government continue the work of environmental cleanup in a manner consistent with our overall objectives. I believe that this legislation, although at some variance with our original proposals, meets these objectives.

More than 20,000 Americans are afflicted with Gaucher's disease, the most common of a group of genetic disorders known as lipid storage disease. Because of a defective gene, people with this disease do not produce enough enzymes to break down fatty substances called lipids. The lipids accumulate in the body's cells. In victims of Gaucher's disease, the spleen and liver become enlarged, the abdomen distends, and bones erode.

Gaucher's disease is hereditary. Children who inherit a defective gene from both parents develop the disease; children who inherit the gene from only one parent become carriers capable of passing the gene on to their own children. Gaucher's disease can afflict anyone, but it is particularly prevalent among people of Ashkenazi Jewish ancestry.

Until recently, there seemed little cause for optimism. But today, modern genetic engineering techniques are unraveling the mysteries of Gaucher's disease and other hereditary disorders. Scientists supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke have identified the gene that is defective in Gaucher's disease and are now able to reproduce it in large enough quantities for study.

It is also now possible for physicians to confirm a diagnosis of Gaucher's disease through simple blood and skin biopsy tests. Physicians can predict the severity of the disease in each patient, allowing those affected to make better informed health care plans for the future.

In addition, scientists have developed a method for replacing the enzyme that Gaucher's patients lack. Growing knowledge about genetic structure may someday enable scientists to transplant a normal gene into a patient's cells to replace the defective gene. But more remains to be learned before such procedures are perfected.

Voluntary agencies work side by side with government scientists in the effort to promote research on ways to treat and ultimately cure Gaucher's disease. In the work of these agencies, and that of the investigators they sponsor, lies the hope that we will one day conquer this genetic disorder.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

It seems hard to believe that only a week ago at this time, I was in Iceland, engaged in historic talks with Mr. Gorbachev, the leader of the Soviet Union. As I reported to you on Monday, we made great progress at that meeting. Some are now saying that we made more progress in these few days than negotiators between our countries have made in the last few years. And a great deal of the credit for that belongs to you, the American people, because, you see, I took with me to Reykjavik the strength that can only come from a free and democratic people.

Well, in just a few weeks, we Americans are once again going to show the world the one thing that, more than any other, is the source of our strength. We'll go to the polls, and as a free people, we'll vote. This year we'll be casting ballots in many States for Senators, Governors, and other officials; and everywhere we'll be voting for a new House of Representatives. But just as important as how we vote is that we vote. Every vote cast on election day means that we the people have taken a hand in shaping our nation's future.

Every time we vote we're grabbing a hold of a lifeline that's 3,000 miles long and more than two centuries old and, with millions of others, helping to pull America forward into the future. Yes, every time we vote we're standing up, side by side, with the Founding Fathers, with the men of Valley Forge, with patriots and pioneers throughout our history, with all those who dedicated their lives to making this a nation of the people, by the people, and for the people. Every time we vote we help to make America stronger.

I'm sure you've heard friends say, ``Oh, my vote won't matter.'' Well, the next time someone says that to you, I hope you'll remember that time and again, over the years, elections have turned on a handful of ballots. In 1960 President Kennedy was elected by a margin of just one vote in each precinct around the nation. In 1976 the Presidential election turned on two States: one was won by six votes a precinct; the other by only a single vote a precinct. And in the last 26 years more than 50 U.S. Senate and House races have been won by fewer than a thousand votes. But even when elections aren't that close, your ballot counts, because in voting, you're accepting your part in the greatest decisionmaking body the world has ever known, the American electorate. And as someone who's stayed up late on many election nights waiting to hear how the American people had decided, I can tell you that from where I sit -- whether elections are close or not -- every vote is important.

A little more than 2 years ago, I walked along a beach in France where American and other forces first landed in 1944 to begin their crusade in Europe. Those Americans fought, and many of them died, for the freedom that we cherish today. Every one of them knew, and we must never forget, that freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction. They knew that freedom is something that we all must join together to preserve, protect, and defend. And our first line of defense is not our weapons or our military, but our right to decide who governs us. That's a right the soldiers who fought against our men at Normandy didn't have. That's a right that those on the other side of the Iron Curtain today don't have.

I've visited our men and women in uniform all over the world. It's the part of this job I like best. They're some of the best we've ever had. And if you're one of them, let me say to you that helping to protect America includes helping to decide America's future, and that begins with voting. I've also visited with many young people around our country. Nothing could be more inspiring than to hear them talk about the future. And yet I've found that too many of them don't vote. If you're one of our nation's young people, I hope you'll remember that America needs your optimism, your patriotism and idealism, your thirst for opportunity in shaping the decisions of the years to come. Those decisions are going to shape your life, too. And they're too important for you to give up any part of your role in making them. So, please vote.

Nancy and I voted last night. We won't be home on election day, so we got absentee ballots. We filled them out, signed them, and sent them on their way. If, like us, you're going to be away on November 4th, why not arrange for your own absentee ballot? Call your local election officials, or if you're in the military, talk to your commanding officer or voting assistance officer.

Voting is a precious right that for two centuries Americans have fought and died to protect. Let's all honor that sacrifice this election day. Whether you're Republican, Democrat, or Independent, circle November 4th on your calendar and then show that you care about America's future and get out and vote.

Today the President signed the instrument of ratification to the treaty between the United States and the Republic of Iceland to facilitate our defense relationship. The Senate gave its advice and consent to ratify the treaty on October 8, 1986.

This treaty provides an exception to existing cargo preference laws between the United States and Iceland. Under the treaty, transportation of defense cargo will be open to both U.S. and Icelandic vessels on a competitive basis. Contract awards will ensure that both U.S. flag carriers and Icelandic shipping companies are able to maintain a viable presence in this trade route.

NATO allies. During the past 37 years it has made important contributions to the protection of the alliance's northern flank. However, Iceland's contribution is not limited to the common defense but also extends to the search for a just peace.

There can be no better testimony to Iceland's commitment to this goal than its willingness to host on very short notice the meeting between the President and General Secretary Gorbachev. The President would again like to express his thanks to President Finnbogadottir and the people of Iceland for all their efforts and the exceptional job they did as hosts.

The freedom fighters, as they were called by a world amazed at their heroism and idealism, fought almost barehanded against heavy odds, and soon fell victim to treachery and ruthless suppression. But they lit a candle of hope and inspiration that can never be extinguished.

Its motivations were humanity's universal longings to live, worship, and work in peace and to determine one's own destiny. The Hungarian Revolution forever gave the lie to communism's claims to represent the people, and it told the world that brave hearts still exist to challenge injustice.

Hungarian freedom fighters of 1956 perished or suffered exile, but their sacrifice lives on in the memory of the Hungarian people. Their example lives on as well, for we see brave people -- we call them freedom fighters too -- in genuine popular revolutions against communist oppression around the world. Let us honor the Hungarian freedom fighters of 1956 with renewed dedication to our own freedom and with continued assistance for those who follow in their footsteps today.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Veterans Day approaches, it is appropriate to honor a small but growing segment of our veteran population -- the 1.2 million women veterans. These women who served in uniform now comprise approximately 4.2 percent of the total veteran population, and they have demonstrated their dedication and their patriotism in situations that often entailed great hardship and danger. Their contribution to our national security continues to grow as the number and proportion of women in all branches of service continue to increase.

Through their sacrifices in behalf of all Americans, women in the Armed Forces have a record of achievement of which they can be justly proud. And we should all be proud of them. Their courage, dedication to duty, and unswerving fidelity to our Nation's ideals deserve our sincere gratitude.

During the past few years, great progress has been made in the effort to honor women veterans and to recognize their special needs and concerns. It is fitting that we, as a Nation, express our great appreciation to our women veterans for their vital contribution to our national security.

The President. Today it's an honor to welcome Chancellor Kohl. This marks his sixth visit to us as leader of the German Federal Republic. He and his fellow citizens are friends and partners with whom we share a desire for peace and a commitment to the principles of human freedom. Our nations' solid bilateral ties, our resolve to maintain the viability of the Western alliance, and our dedication to the values and ideals which are the underpinning of political and economic freedom have been a great boon to the German and American peoples. The great German writer-philosopher Gotthold Lessing once wrote: ``Nothing under the sun is ever accidental.'' Well, 40 years of European peace have been no accident. The good fortune can be traced, to a great degree, to the solidarity and cooperation between our two peoples and governments.

When a buildup of intermediate-range missiles by our adversary threatened the peace, our alliance was put to the test. Chancellor Kohl and his government stood firm in the face of a well-orchestrated international and domestic propaganda campaign aimed at paralyzing our ability to respond. The deployment, however, of weapons is not an end in itself; it is a means to an end. What we seek is the security of our countries, the freedom of our peoples, and the peace of the world. Our strength of purpose, as well as our military might, are vehicles in the search for a lasting peace.

There is, as I will explain, ample reason for optimism. Whatever progress is made, it will be based on the solid foundation Germans and Americans have built together, particularly in the last half decade.

Building on the diplomacy of interceding years as well as the deployment of our cruise and Pershings, General Secretary Gorbachev and I came close in Iceland to reaching an agreement that would have drastically reduced these missiles on both sides. We are now striving to build upon the progress achieved in Reykjavik. And it should not escape anyone's attention that the Soviet Union and the United States are now seriously talking about reducing offensive weapons. This is a giant step forward from the time, not so long ago, when arms talks merely put a cap on weapons at high levels, permitting the building of more missiles and more warheads.

When the next agreement is finally reached with the Soviet Union -- and I say when, not if -- it will not be the result of weakness or timidity on the part of Western nations. Instead, it will flow from our strength, realism, and unity. Our allies in these last few years have withstood intimidation and brazen interference in their domestic political processes. Our adversaries misjudged individuals like Chancellor Kohl and the other leaders of the Western democracies. Under intense pressure, they did what was necessary: held firm. And because of their fortitude, the free world is now neither vulnerable nor subservient.

The record of the European peoples is long and glorious. In so many ways, Europe is the cradle of modern civilization. The indomitable spirit demonstrated by our European neighbors and allies in the postwar era -- from the Berlin Airlift to our solidarity leading to my recent meetings in Iceland -- has made the difference. The tide has been met, the tide turned, and the flow of history is now on the side of the free. We in the West are now engaged in a great technological revolution: in medicine, electronics, physics, and so many fields of human endeavor. More has been discovered in the 20th century than in all the preceding centuries put together.

Our scientists, at this moment, are making great strides toward developing technology that can protect mankind against ballistic missiles, and that protection applies to the United States, our allies, and, yes, even our adversaries, if need be. A purely defensive system that makes these missiles ineffective also makes them more negotiable. A defensive system makes an arms reduction agreement more likely because it offers protection against cheating.

This and not trust will lead to reducing, and we hope ultimately eliminating, the nuclear arsenals that now threaten all humanity. If a defensive system was not a viable option, the Soviet Union would not be committing so much of its own resources in developing and deploying strategic defenses of its own.

Technology can open up new doors to peace and security, and that's what our Strategic Defense Initiative is all about. The time has come to rechannel the efforts of some of our best minds to develop tools which can be used to maintain peace, tools that protect rather than kill. The United States stands ready, as I assured Mr. Gorbachev in Iceland and reaffirm today, to negotiate seriously about safeguards that will enable the Soviet Union to share in the benefits of strategic defense. What we in the West have done to rebuild our strength and revitalize our alliance has guaranteed the peace, but a lasting peace cannot be based simply on an arms agreement. Better relations must include more and open, freer contacts between people and governments, a respect for human rights, and an end to those regional conflicts that continue to plague mankind.

Kohl and the German people have been steadfast in their support and in their friendship for many years. They know, as we do, that our destinies and those of all free people are tied. We strive for a free, secure, and prosperous world -- a world at peace; and we do it, together, with our friends and allies, the German people. So, it gives me great pleasure to welcome Chancellor Helmut Kohl, a partner, colleague, and friend.

Reagan, Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, let me thank you in my own name and on behalf of my wife and my delegation for the friendly and warm welcome you have extended to us. I'm delighted to be in Washington again, and I feel that this wonderful fall day, with its sunshine, is a very true symbol standing for the nature of the relationship between our two countries.

And it gives me particular pleasure, Mr. President, to see you again -- a good friend of our country and an esteemed personal friend. This is the seventh time that we have met since I took over the office of Federal Chancellor back in 1982, and this figure alone gives an indication of the intensity and closeness of the relations between our two countries and governments. And in addition, we have often been in contact, consulting each other by letter or telephone. And I would like to take this opportunity before the public of your country, here, to express my appreciation and my great gratitude for this trustful cooperation. I thank you for this form of close cooperation which is based on mutual trust, and it is a token of a friendship and partnership underpinned by shared values, ideals, and interests.

Germans and Americans are united with the British, the French, the Italians, and others in the Atlantic alliance, an alliance of historical dimension. It is a community based on reciprocity, a defensive alliance against aggression and political blackmail, an alliance for the preservation of democracy, freedom, and human rights. The security of the Federal Republic of Germany is indissolubly linked with this alliance and through our partnership with the United States of America. Only with the assistance of the United States can the security of Western Europe be assured. The American troops in the Federal Republic of Germany are defending our common freedom together with our troops, and they are welcome in our country. Mr.

President, you and your fellow citizens in this country should know that the vast majority of the citizens of the Federal Republic of Germany are in favor of the presence of these troops, and they regard them as their friends. And we know that we can rely on each other.

It remains our goal -- and I know that I share it with you, Mr. President -- to create peace and security with ever fewer weapons. In Reykjavik, thanks to your serious and consistent efforts in pursuit of peace, a major step was taken in this direction; and we must now take the opportunities that present themselves without endangering our defensive capability. Your meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev confirmed that the Soviet Union, too, is interested in an improvement of the relations between West and East. And we should take the Soviet Union at its word and sound out at the negotiating table where real progress could be made. My government is contributing actively to the efforts to promote dialog and cooperation, confidence, understanding, and reconciliation. The world is looking hopefully to the two superpowers, but the small- and medium-sized states must play their part and make their contributions as well.

Castle, in my home district, in 1985, you said: ``The future belongs to the free.'' Let us continue to work together for this goal. We must convince the young people, the young generation, in the United States, in the Federal Republic of Germany, all over the world, that it is worthwhile to stand up for our values for freedom, democracy, and the rule of law. You have been persuasive and vigorous, Mr. President, in your support of an increase in youth exchanges between our peoples. For that, I am grateful to you, and we will discuss this subject further. Together, we shall create conditions under which even more young people from our two countries will have the chance to get to know one another.

America has rediscovered self-confidence and regained a spirit of enterprising leadership. As in the past, these are the qualities that will enable the American Nation to master the challenges of the future. The Federal Republic of Germany, with all its citizens, will be a loyal friend and partner to the United States of America as it goes about this task.

The President spoke at 10:05 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House, where Chancellor Kohl was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. Chancellor Kohl spoke in German, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter. Following the ceremony, the President and Chancellor Kohl met in the Oval Office and then in the Cabinet Room with members of their staffs.

U.S.-German friendship and cooperation enhance our mutual interests. We are convinced that youth exchange of all kinds will help ensure that this friendship will flourish in the future. We agree on the need to have our succeeding generations play an increasingly active role in promoting this friendship. In recent decades there have been many youth exchanges between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany.

Recently, with the impetus of the Presidential Youth Exchange Initiative of 1982 and subsequent important contributions from the Federal Republic of Germany, bilateral exchanges have nearly tripled. To ensure that these exchanges will thrive, we have agreed to the creation of a U.S.-German Youth Exchange Council. Our two governments, as well as non-governmental organizations and individuals who have been involved in youth exchanges, or those who have played a leading role in U.S.-German relations, will be represented. The Council will provide advice on improving youth exchange programs, suggest new exchange initiatives, and explore additional funding resources. The Council will meet at least once a year in Washington or Bonn in connection with the cultural exchange talks between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany.

Act. The special services made available through these programs help disabled persons, including the most severely disabled, attain productive employment and achieve greater economic and personal independence. This legislation can further assist disabled persons in their efforts to achieve those goals.

I am signing H.R. 5300, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986, which implements instructions of the budget committees to the substantive committees to reduce the fiscal year 1987 deficit and raises the debt ceiling to $2.3 trillion. I am pleased that the Congress, in passing reconciliation, has addressed many of the concerns raised by the administration. In particular, the sale of Conrail is an important step. I would note, however, that the tax provisions relating to Conrail are burdensome and may interfere with obtaining the best price for the railroad.

It is disturbing and disappointing that this reconciliation bill, which is supposed to reduce spending, not only has few outlay reductions but actually incorporates substantial program expansions, mainly in the Medicare area -- increasing outlays on the order of $2 billion in fiscal year 1987 and even more annually thereafter. I sincerely hope that the Congress will endeavor to use reconciliation next year for the purpose generally envisioned: to reduce spending, not to increase revenues.

I have approved S. 2048, the R.M.S. Titanic Maritime Memorial Act of 1986, the purpose of which is to encourage international negotiations to: (1) designate the R.M.S. Titanic as an international maritime memorial and (2) develop and implement guidelines for conducting research on, exploration of, and if appropriate, salvage of the R.M.S. Titanic. Such agreements and guidelines would serve to enhance public knowledge of the Titanic's scientific, cultural, and historical significance. The R.M.S. Titanic is the premier symbol in modern times of both the perils of the sea and the need for high standards of ship safety. The significance of the R.M.S. Titanic stems not only from the durable imprint of the disaster upon the consciousness of succeeding generations but also from the enormous strides made by the international community in promoting safety of life at sea, the study and observation of ice conditions, the maintenance of ice patrols in the North Atlantic Ocean, and the development and improvement of standards for the design and construction of vessels.

I support the purpose of this act, I must register my objections to two of its provisions. Section 5(a) directs the Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration to enter into consultations with foreign nations; section 6(a) directs the Secretary of State to enter into negotiations with foreign nations. If interpreted literally, these requirements would contravene my constitutional authority to conduct foreign relations. To avoid this constitutional difficulty, these provisions must be viewed as discretionary.

Titanic is, of course, dependent on the willingness of those nations to support the development of the international agreement and guidelines encouraged by this act. I invite interested nations to join us in this endeavor.

The President. Well now, normally I would just start saying thank you, and one of the nicer parts of the job I've got is getting to know the leaders of other countries. But I know that the leader of the other country will forgive me for a little American thing that has to be said right now: At the top of the 4th, the New York Mets are 4, the Boston Red Sox, 1 [The President referred to the third game of the World Series].

But tonight we honor one of those foreign leaders who's been a joy to know; a man who has achieved great power and influence, yet has remained unpretentious and who, as Nancy would say, is just simply charming.

German philosopher, Heinrich Heine, once said, ``The worst poison is to despair of one's own power.'' Well, despair is not in Chancellor Kohl's vocabulary. He sets his goals and goes about achieving them with great gusto. Chancellor Kohl is a realist, yet he has not lost touch with his ideals. Carl Schurz, born a German, an adopted American, a champion of human freedom, once wrote: ``Ideals are like the stars; we never reach them. But like the mariners of the sea, we chart our course by them.'' Chancellor Kohl charts his course guided by the ideals of liberty and justice. This is the source of his sense of purpose, the source from which democracy draws its strength, a power beyond the reach of tyrants.

Today the Western democracies face challenges that, at times, seem overwhelming. Yet we persevere, and in the end, freedom will triumph. Our victory will not be realized in the crossing of borders by well-equipped armies, certainly not in the launching of missiles or the occupation of other countries. Our victory will come, perhaps little by little, as walls are torn down, missiles dismantled, and as people are freed. Free peoples everywhere share this vision. The friendship and comradery of Chancellor Kohl's visit is testimony that the world we seek is already being built.

In a few short years, the world will not only enter a new century but also a new millennium. And so I would ask you all to join me now in a toast to friends, close partners who are working with us to ensure that the time ahead will be an age of peace, prosperity, and freedom: To Chancellor Kohl and Mrs. Kohl and the German people.

Reagan, Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen, it's a source of particular pleasure for my wife, my colleagues, and my delegation to be your guests here tonight. With warmth and elegance you, Mrs. Reagan, have extended to us such magnificent hospitality. And as always, we appreciate the cordiality of your welcome and the very friendly and intimate atmosphere that prevails here. And all those who have preserved for themselves a sense of history will certainly enjoy these hours here in this house.

Well, my last appointment before coming to this hospitable occasion here in the White House was meeting with Youth for Understanding. And there I met with young Germans who have come here to this country to spend 1 year in American families, and with young Americans who have just returned from Germany. And I feel, Mr. President, that both these occasions, my visit with Youth for Understanding and this dinner here tonight, go together and belong together.

This day, with the serious and important conversations we had when we tried to take stock after the Reykjavik conference, that what we are doing and what we are discussing is serving the purpose only for coming generations. And it is true in 14 years from now we arrive in the year 2000.

This is a new century and will be a new millennium. And that is the reason why what we are doing now, what we start to set in motion, is so important for the young generation. And I consider it to be important to make a remark of that kind in this very house which has seen so many historic events and, over the last 100 years, also world historic events. And it is important for my fellow countrymen, Mr. President, in Germany -- in both parts of Germany -- it is important for them to know that we have friends here in this country -- we, as Germans. And they should know that we in Germany can rely on those friends. This is a solid friendship, and this friendship is based on shared ideals and values. And I think this is more important and matters more than anything else. Because material conditions may change, but when we continue to share the same values, then we will also have a common future.

I would like to thank you once again, as I have done already today, for having seized this opportunity in Reykjavik. And both of us are without any illusion. We know with whom we are talking. But we know that these talks are necessary and that, in reality, there is no alternative to these talks and that the time has now come to get over this watershed, as [Secretary of State] George Shultz has put it -- there, where you can take the responsibility for it, with a sense of realism, but also with a sense of courage. And I'm saying this as a German, a German who lives, more than a national of another country, in the shadow of the dividing line between East and West.

And I'm making these remarks as somebody who knows that peace and freedom cannot be had for nothing and as somebody who is asking for greater sacrifices from the young generation of his own country than perhaps in other countries.

President, we had good talks. And I think I may say, with your permission, what characterizes and what is best in our talks is that we don't make so many words to make ourselves understood to each other. World statisticians who are looking into a good many things claim that in 1953, when Konrad Adenauer, the first Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany, paid his first visit to the United States of America, had spoken during various addresses and statements a total of 288,000 words. At that time, we didn't have computers yet -- [laughter] -- and I think nobody checked on that figure. But it sounds well.

We required fewer words today, because it was not necessary to us to make ourselves understood. And this, Mr. President, I think is a good omen, and I hope things will stay like this. You may rely on your friends in Germany as we -- and I myself, personally -- have gone through the experience that we may rely and count on you.

International terrorism has taken the lives of thousands of people around the world and continues to claim lives. It is most fitting that we set aside a time of remembrance for the victims of terrorism.

United States has a clear policy of combatting terrorism and of refusing to make concessions to terrorists. We have sought cooperation with all nations, on both a bilateral and a multilateral basis, to fight terrorism. We have put those who would instigate acts of terrorism against U.S. citizens or property on notice that we will vigorously confront this criminal behavior in every way -- diplomatically, economically, legally, and, when necessary, militarily. We have demonstrated our resolve.

We observe our time of remembrance for victims of terrorism on October 23. That is the third anniversary of the terrorist bombing of the United States compound in Beirut, Lebanon, in which 241 American servicemen, defenders of freedom and peace, lost their lives. As we mourn these men and all other victims of terrorism, as we honor them, and as we offer our heartfelt condolences to the families of victims, let us remind the world that our reflection and remembrance fortify our determination to deter and defeat terrorism.

I call upon and authorize all departments and agencies of the United States and interested organizations, groups, and individuals to fly United States flags at half staff on October 23 in memory of the victims and in the hope that the desire for genuine peace and freedom will take firm root in every person and nation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

In his address to the Soviet people today, General Secretary Gorbachev expressed optimism about arms reductions and characterized the Reykjavik meeting as an important political event. We believe an historic breakthrough occurred in Reykjavik, and there is no turning back. For the first time, there is serious discussion of arms reductions rather than arms control.

United States has reentered the nuclear and space talks in Geneva with renewed dedication and optimism for the goal of achieving agreements on significant nuclear arms reductions. The United States has made clear its intention to place all of the proposals made in Iceland on the negotiating table in Geneva. We are pleased that General Secretary Gorbachev also stated the Soviet desire to move forward from where the two sides left off at Reykjavik. Much hard work remains, but we are ready to get on with it.

United Nations Charter and to celebrate mankind's progress toward the kind of world the framers of that Charter longed for and planned for in the aftermath of the Second World War. That world is one founded upon universal and reciprocal respect for human rights and the peaceful resolution of differences.

When we reflect on the record of the world's governments in this twentieth century in bringing to fruition mankind's dreams of peace, human rights, freedom, and justice, we can only conclude that much remains to be done. Our century has witnessed the rise of totalitarian systems, the two world wars, mass annihilations, incessant local and regional conflicts, and systematic violations of human rights. Mankind clearly stands in need of help in learning to live in peace and cooperation.

This is the kind of help that the ideals and institutions of the United Nations offer. But we must also help ourselves, and we can continue to do so by resolving to live up to the ideals of the U.N. Charter. The United Nations today faces a crisis of cash and credibility. The opportunity exists, during the 41st General Assembly, for the member states to consider and adopt a program of reforms; strengthen the U.N.'s ability to reach and help humanity, particularly the poorest and most defenseless; and reinforce the U.N.'s mission to keep the peace and promote human rights. If all the members of this universal organization decide to seize the moment and turn the rhetoric of reform into reality, the future of the United Nations will be secure.

We have a better world today because of the United Nations and its various international organizations, such as the United Nations International Children's Emergency Fund (UNICEF) -- now celebrating its 40th anniversary of serving the world's children through eradicating disease, lowering the rate of infant mortality, and focusing the world's attention on children in need. We will have a better world tomorrow the more we remain faithful to the vision and the promise of the Charter framed in San Francisco 41 years ago.

They have a decision to make on November 4th: whether or not to support candidates for the Senate and for Congress and for the governorships and State legislatures of this country -- candidates who will support the greatest President that I think we've seen in this nation in this century.

It is a decision as to whether or not the great advances and changes and positiveness of the last 6 years will be fought in the last 2. We don't want that. And I'm so very, very pleased to introduce to you the greatest asset of the Republican Party, who in the next 12 days will be traveling across this country on behalf of our candidates and the Reagan revolution, ladies and gentlemen, the President of the United States, Ronald Wilson Reagan.

The President. Well, I thank Frank for that very kind introduction, those generous words, and I thank each and every one of you for coming out for this send-off. You know, this beats getting an Oscar. [Laughter] Today the 1986 campaign begins in earnest. I'm headed out for several days of campaigning. We're going to bring to the American people a message of hope about their future, but also a message of concern about the threat to all that we've accomplished together and all that we hope to do together.

We've got a great story to tell. Due to our efforts and the support of the American people, we've put our country back on the path to jobs, opportunity, growth, and security. And inflation has reached its lowest level in 20 years. Interest rates are less than half of what they were. And since the recovery began, almost 11.7 million jobs have been created -- these are new jobs. Now, that's what I call a Republican jobs program, and it didn't happen by accident.

There's never been a race where the choices are so clear and the differences so distinct. Just yesterday I signed into law an historic piece of legislation that overhauls the tax code, makes it fairer, and brings down the tax rates.

The liberals have already announced that they plan to undermine the spirit of that legislation and risk throwing our country back into recession by raising taxes. By election day, we've got to make certain the voter knows that this is a race between the tax, tax, spend, spend crowd and responsible Republicans who would rather protect the family budget than protect the Federal budget. It's a make-or-break election that will determine not only whether America is prosperous but whether our people will be safe and our nation secure. Again, the differences between the parties are glaring. A vote for Republicans is a vote for tough law and tough judges. We pledge that if the American people continue to put their faith in us, we'll continue to put on the bench judges who will do everything they can to protect the citizenry and put the criminals where they belong -- behind bars.

Another area of disagreement: We believe there's no greater asset for world peace than an America that is strong, confident, and united. We appreciate that the real purpose of our military is not to fight a war but to protect the peace. And in protecting human freedom and preserving the peace, I think our country has a record second to none. The relationship between peace and strength was nowhere more apparent than during my recent meetings in Iceland. By rebuilding our defenses, we were able to negotiate with confidence, and today we're closer than ever before to an agreement that would dramatically reduce the number of ballistic missiles that threaten mankind, and someday, perhaps, even eliminate them totally. If we hadn't begun to rebuild our defenses, there would have been no negotiations. It's only through strength that we can protect the peace and rid the world of nuclear weapons.

Well, this will be our message in the coming days. And I'll be asking the American people: Do you want to extend and complete economic recovery or see it stifled through tax increases by the same people who nearly ruined our economy the last time they had the chance? Do you want to move toward a peaceful world of ensured defense against nuclear missiles or remain stuck in a world of permanent nuclear terror? I have every confidence our fellow citizens will reject the advocates of the failed policies of the past and keep our country moving forward. Young people deserve an America as secure, free, and filled with opportunity as the one that we were given. That's what this election is all about. So, let the campaign begin! We Republicans have standard bearers out there that we can all be very proud of.

I'm going to start out in Wisconsin and be in Missouri in the middle and Oklahoma by nightfall and Florida tomorrow before we come home. And I'm very proud of the people I'm going to be representing there -- or talking to about there -- to their constituents. So, let's all do our best. And the most important thing, when you're talking to your friends and neighbors, and particularly those younger voters -- they're very much with us, except they also have a rather high percentage of not getting to the polls on election day -- so, tell everyone the most important thing is vote. God bless you all.

Today we observe the 30th anniversary of that unforgettable day, October 23, 1956, when the people of Budapest -- workers, students, soldiers -- rose up in revolt against communism and Soviet occupation, and for freedom and nationhood. Today we commemorate the shining example of idealism, patriotism, and sheer courage that is the immortal legacy of the freedom fighters of the Hungarian Revolution.

In an age when most nations enjoy independence, and free institutions are spreading, the peoples of Eastern Europe cannot be permanently denied their birthrights. We reject such defeatism; more important, East Europeans reject it, too. We see proof of this in the courageous document issued last week in Budapest, East Berlin, Prague, and Warsaw, and signed by 122 prominent people. The signers wrote: ``The traditions and experiences of the Hungarian revolution remain our common heritage and inspiration.'' Recounting that revolt, the workers uprising in East Germany in 1953, the Prague spring of 1968, and Poland's Solidarity trade union movement, the signers pledged to continue to seek democracy, independence, pluralism based on the principle of self-government, and peaceful reunification of a divided Europe.

This declaration tells all of us that brave hearts still beat for the work of true justice among the people. On this 30th anniversary of the Hungarian Revolution of 1956, let all Americans honor the Hungarian freedom fighters with profound gratitude for our own freedom and with renewed solidarity with everyone whose dream is the noble one of freedom.

But it's great to be here with so many old friends: Wisconsin's excellent Congressman, James Sensenbrenner, and Governor Tommy Thompson. You know, having been a Governor myself for 8 years, I think I recognize good Governor material when I see it, and believe me, Tommy Thompson is the best. I became Governor of California after a liberal, free-spending, high-taxing administration like Tony Earl's. I made tough choices and hard decisions, and I know that Tommy Thompson will do the same here in Wisconsin. We've turned the country around, and now it's time to bring the revolution home to Wisconsin and elect Tommy Thompson as your next Governor.

I signed a piece of historic legislation to overhaul our country's tax code, making it fairer and simpler and cutting taxes for almost every individual taxpayer. But wouldn't you know it, even before the bill reached my desk, the liberal Democrat leadership came out and said they wanted to raise your taxes and to turn tax reform into a tax hike. Well, Bob was one of the first Senators pushing for fairer and lower taxes, and he agrees with me that raising tax rates now would be an intolerable breach of faith with the American people. And that's why I've asked every candidate for national office to sign a pledge not to raise the rates on tax reform, to keep them low and fair. But I think you should know Bob Kasten signed up right away, but so far his opponent has refused to sign. I think that tells the whole story right there.

The truth is, the liberal Democratic leaders never met a tax they didn't like. [Laughter] And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, those liberals act like they've got your credit card in their pocket; and believe me, they never leave home without it.

But, you know, even the liberals who've bottled up our tough anticrime bills for years have begun to climb aboard our campaign to rid America of the scourge of drugs. We have much more to do in this area. We'll need to back up the new drug legislation with strict enforcement, perhaps even stiffer penalties, and the kind of no-nonsense judges that we will put on the bench unless we're denied that chance by a Democratic Senate. We need the Republican Senate. We need Bob Kasten.

Now, there's another issue that Bob and I feel strongly about, and I bet you do, too: that's keeping America strong and proud and peaceful and free. As you know, I just recently returned from my meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Iceland. That meeting was a breakthrough in our discussions with the Soviets. We're no longer talking about arms control; we're talking about arms reductions, possibly even the complete elimination of ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth. Now, that's an historic turnaround for the Soviets, and it wouldn't have been possible without the firm support of you, the American people, whose hard work and support have enabled us to rebuild our military might. The American people know that the only way to negotiate for peace is from a position of strength. We're closer to real arms reductions than ever before, and it's because America today is once again strong and united.

Gorbachev decided to make all our progress hostage to his demand that we kill our Strategic Defense Initiative. I had to remind him of my pledge to the American people on SDI and that in America when you give your word, you keep your word, and that stands up no matter what the time or place.

SDI is our insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madman or some other country that develops ballistic missiles, or in case of the Soviets who don't keep their side of the bargain. No responsible President could rely on Soviet promises for his country's safety. The record on their treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises, and each has its own track record. I'll bet on American technology any day.

One thing that's come out of all this discussion, now, since that trip, about SDI is that a great many Americans, I don't think, quite understood what we were talking about with those initials. SDI, Strategic Defense Initiative, is a purely defensive and purely peaceful technology. If the Soviets honestly want progress toward a world free of nuclear weapons, they have nothing to fear from SDI. Soviets are hard bargainers. We must even be more patient and determined and united. We must speak with one voice, saying, loud and clear, we'll walk the extra mile for peace, but we'll never gamble with America's safety. So, I want to ask you a question. I'll bet I know the answer. Can I count on your support to keep America strong and united and on the road to peace?

If we must ever ask them to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, they deserve the finest weapons and equipment that money can buy; and I'm going to do my best, and so is Bob, and so is Congressman Sensenbrenner here, to see that they get that kind of equipment. And it's because of the quality of the men and women in our Armed Forces and the quality of the weapons they carry in defense of this country today that every nickel-and-dime dictator the world over knows that if he tangles with the United States of America he will have a price to pay.

I just know that a State whose motto is ``Forward'' and whose official song is ``On Wisconsin'' is going to want a fighter and a man with bold vision for the future and the talent, imagination, and willpower to take us there. I just know that Wisconsin is going to send Bob Kasten back to the United States Senate. I don't think Wisconsin wants a Senator like Bob's opponent who belongs to the tax-and-spend liberal wing of the Democratic Party.

The President. He's offering nothing positive in his campaign, and I'm just proud that Bob is going forward with his record of achievement. You know, very few freshman Senators have made the mark Bob Kasten has -- a pioneer in tax reform and one of the leaders in putting America back on track to strength abroad and prosperity at home. In the Senate and in the White House, Bob Kasten's opinions count. He's earned the respect and admiration of his colleagues, and he's earned Wisconsin's vote. And we need him to stay right where he is: in the Senate.

The President. Thank you. I hope you mean you hope I'll live 4 more years. [Laughter] The Constitution speaks to the other. But if you want to vote for me, vote for Bob Kasten, so that we can have a Republican Senate that will work with me instead of against me and be around after I'm gone. And I'm not just asking that for me.

Senator you elect will determine the future, your future, America's future. So, before I go, let me just conduct an informal poll. [Laughter] Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

So, when it comes to election time, I hope you'll remember how important that your vote is, because it's your future that's being voted in this election, America's future. And I just want to tell you one thing, though, that -- a reminder here. Now, I know that none of you are guilty or you wouldn't be here. We find out from all the polling that in the age group from 18 to 24 that's where our party stands with the strongest support -- the most. But that happens to be the voting group that has the smallest percentage of going to the polls and voting. So, when you go home and when you talk to your friends -- if they're 18 or over -- tell them they've got to get there. Go the polls on election day.

October 20, 1986, negotiators from the United States and 16 Pacific island nations reached agreement on a regional fisheries treaty that will give American tuna vessels access to some 10 million square miles of rich fishing grounds in the South Pacific Ocean. The agreement provides just and fair compensation to the islands for the resource and offers the parties to the treaty a substantial development assistance package that will continue the long tradition of close and productive relations between the United States and the island states.

The agreement came after 10 sessions of difficult negotiations over 2 years stemming from seizures of U.S. tuna boats in the region. The agreement is not only an expression of a mutual desire to reduce the friction these seizures generated but offers another concrete example of U.S. interest in the sustained development of the democratic nations of the area.

The agreement calls for the United States to provide a minimum of $12 million each year for at least 5 years to the South Pacific Forum Fisheries Agency, a regional organization representing the 16 nations. The U.S. tuna fishing industry will contribute $1.75 million in license fees plus $250,000 in technical assistance. The U.S. Government will provide $10 million annually in economic assistance. The treaty also will help island States develop their own fishing industries through joint ventures and technical assistance from the U.S. industry, the most advanced in the world. In many instances, fisheries are the only natural resource available for development by the island nations.

Many thousands of Americans who suffer from irreversible kidney disease have obtained treatment through the End Stage Renal Disease (ESRD) Program. This program has assured that Americans affected with otherwise fatal kidney failure will have access to lifesaving dialysis or transplantation therapy.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

And while I'm at it, permit me a quick wink at the Sugar Bears. And if that wasn't enough, now if the rest of you and if the rest on fraternity row will forgive me for some recognition here, they told me back in Eureka when I was a TKE back there at Eureka College that TKE was a fraternity for life, and I guess it is. Thank you.

But it's good to be here in Missouri, away from Washington and out in the real America. And it's especially good to be here at Southwest Missouri State, a university with a long and proud history. Indeed, Southwest Missouri State was established all of 81 years ago, and believe me, I'm always happy to celebrate something older than I am. [Laughter] And special thanks to the Bruin Pride Band, the Willard High Band, the Springfield Kickapoo High Band, and the Parkview High Band. But with so many young people here today, I have a special message for you from my roommate. [Laughter] Nancy insisted that when it comes to drugs, please, for yourselves, your families, your future, and your country, just say no. By the way, Nancy's impressed me so much with that the other day in Iceland, as you've heard, even though it didn't have to do with drugs, I just had to say no.

But it's an honor to share this podium today with so many of Missouri's finest. I'm sorry that your fine Governor, John Ashcroft, can't be with us. His mother died recently, and I know you all join me in extending our sympathy. But greetings to three men I work with and depend upon every day back in Washington: your outstanding Congressman, Gene Taylor and the Congressman from the 8th District, Bill Emerson, and though he's not here, I want to mention the Congressman from the 6th District, Tom Coleman, and your tremendously effective Senator, Jack Danforth. That's what I call the Missouri A-Team.

This brings me to my friend, Kit Bond. Now, of course, I could refer to Kit as your former Governor. But doesn't it seem just a little bit better to talk about Kit Bond, the next United States Senator from the great State of Missouri? [Applause] Kit understands Missouri. His family has been here for six generations. And Kit understands good government. As Governor, he started out in 1981 with an inherited deficit of $270 million. He went on to balance the budget every year and leave Missouri with a $300 million surplus. But perhaps most important, Kit understands economic growth and jobs.

Well, now Kit's running for the Senate in a crucial election that could decide control of the Senate itself. As you may know, back in Washington last week -- 2 weeks late -- the Congress finally adjourned. I'll pause a moment while you all heave a sigh of relief. [Laughter] And not because any of these on this platform decided that they would leave; there are some others there that give us a great deal of worry. [Laughter] But now that the legislative year has at last come to an end, it's time for the campaign of 1986 to begin in earnest, time to look in more detail at the issues of the day and all we hope to accomplish for America in the years ahead.

Kit and I believe that today our nation faces an historic opportunity to ensure world peace and lead the entire globe to greater prosperity and freedom. We see the opportunity for new jobs, better education, rising incomes, and lower taxes. We see the American dream taking place and taking new shape and rising to new heights, and we say yes to the future, yes to the greatness of Missouri and our nation. Liberal Democrats, like Kit's opponent, say no -- no to success, no to prosperity, no to all that we've already done to get big government off your backs and out of your pockets. This, then, is the choice: forward or back. You know, standing here today, I have the feeling that Missouri will not only say yes to the future but go for it.

You'll remember that when we took control of the White House and Senate just 5\1/2\ years ago, we inherited an economy that the liberal Democrat leadership had turned into the worst mess since the Great Depression. Their policy of tax and tax and spend and spend was beginning to throw Americans out of work all over the country, including far too many right here in Missouri. It had given us double-digit inflation, as Kit told you. And it had produced the highest interest rates since -- get ready -- since the Civil War. Big government had become the Democrats' pet, but the Democrats' pet was the people's monster. To get big government off your backs, we cut government growth, slashed regulations, and enacted an across-the-board personal income tax cut of almost 25 percent. Then we indexed taxes, making it impossible for inflation to push you into higher tax brackets ever again just because you got a cost-of-living pay raise. Now, I knew I was in for it when the hostile critics dubbed our economic plan Reaganomics. They said we couldn't do it. But while the naysayers complained, we went to work.

Today inflation has fallen from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent for the last 12 months. Interest rates are down. Mortgage rates are down. And we've seen the creation of almost 11.7 million jobs in less than the last 4 years -- more jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in the past 10 years. You know, I really, though, found out our economic plan was working when they stopped calling it Reaganomics.

You're the people who pay the taxes, and you know that we don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little. We have a deficit because Congress spends too much. And it's about time they cut the Federal budget and left the family budget alone.

The contrast between us and the liberal Democratic leadership is just as apparent when it comes to judicial appointments. Since I began appointing Federal judges to be approved by the Republican Senate, the Federal judiciary has become tougher, much tougher, on criminals. Convicted criminal defendants are going to jail more often and receiving longer sentences. For example, the average sentence in drug cases has gone up by some 17 percent, from 56 to 65 months.

Now, of course, I could go on quoting you the reports and statistics, but what it all comes down to is this: Since we Republicans took the White House and Senate away from the liberal Democratic leadership -- and remember, the Senate has to confirm any judges that I appoint -- we've given America tough laws and tough judges. Even the liberals who bottled up our tough anticrime bills for years have begun to climb aboard our campaign to rid America of the source of drugs.

And if Kit Bond and other Republicans help us retain control of the Senate, we can go right on fighting crime. And you know, here and there I've heard some people, usually on the other side, try to indicate that, well, maybe there's something in the checks and balances to have a Senator from each party. If you like what Jack Danforth's been doing up there, why should you send someone up to cancel his vote? But if Kit and the other Republicans help us regain control of the Senate, we can go right on fighting crime. But if Democrats like his opponent gains control -- well, I just have to believe it's better to have a Republican running the Senate Judiciary Committee, as he will, than a liberal Democrat, Teddy Kennedy. Now, my friends, both parties talk law and order, but Republicans like Kit Bond make it happen.

America, then they deserve, at the same time, the finest, the best weapons and equipment that money can buy; and that's what we're trying to get them. And something else: I just have to believe that from now on every nickel-and-dime dictator in the world today knows that if he wants to tangle with the United States of America, he'll have to pay a price.

Gorbachev in Iceland. This meeting was a breakthrough in our negotiations, our discussions, with the Soviets. We're no longer talking arms control; we're talking arms reductions, and possibly even the complete elimination of ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth.

That's an historic turnaround for the Soviets, and it wouldn't have been possible without the firm support of the American people, whose hard work and support have enabled us to rebuild our military might. The American people know that the only way to negotiate for a true peace is from a position of strength.

We're closer to real arms reductions than ever before, and it's because America today is once again strong and united. So, I'm very optimistic. I'm just optimistic enough to believe that the question now isn't whether but when we reach agreements on reductions. And that's why it was heartening to find Mr. Gorbachev agreeing with me yesterday, that the proposals we made in Iceland are still on the table.

Unfortunately, in Iceland Mr. Gorbachev decided to make all our progress hostage to his demand that we, in effect, kill our Strategic Defense Initiative. I had to remind him of my pledge to the American people on SDI, that in America when you give your word, you keep your word, and that it stands up no matter what the time or place. SDI is our insurance policy to protect us from attack or from accidents or some madman or some other country that develops ballistic missiles, or in case the Soviets don't keep their side of the bargain. No responsible President could rely on Soviet promises for his country's safety. The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. Now, I'm not a linguist. I'm very limited in foreign languages. But I did say something in our negotiations in Iceland in Russian: Dovorey no provorey. That means trust but verify. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises, and each has its own track record.

I discovered that many people aren't quite sure of what we're talking about. It hasn't been explained to them -- SDI. It's exploring a purely defensive, purely peaceful technology. If the Soviets honestly want progress toward a world free of nuclear weapons, they have nothing to fear from SDI. The Soviets are hard bargainers. America must be even more patient and determined and united. America must speak with one voice, saying, loud and clear, we'll walk the extra mile for peace, but we'll never gamble with America's safety. So, I want to ask you a question. I think I know the answer. Can I count on your support to keep America strong and united and on the road to peace?

The President. Thank you. I kind of thought you'd say that. And the other little explanation -- if it's been overlooked -- that I want you to know, too, is that I made it very plain that we are ready to sign now a treaty that is binding as law that would say when we have rid ourselves of those ballistic missiles on both sides and if SDI has proven out to be the shield, the defensive shield we think it can be, we will be very happy to turn it over, also, and let the Soviet Union have it so that both of us can go on through history without being suspicious of each other.

Renewed prosperity, rebuilt national defenses, world peace on a more secure footing -- all this we've accomplished. But I must tell you that today that all our accomplishments, all that during these past 5\1/2\ years we've struggled so hard to achieve, is in danger. For if we lose the Senate, the liberal Democrats will march us back to the grim days of the seventies. This is my last campaign, and if you'd like to vote for me one more time, you can do it by voting for Kit Bond.

So, I urge all of you -- and again, I have you young people in high school and college especially on my mind -- to study the issues and, come November 4th, to cast your vote. Because you might be interested to know that the polls indicate that of all the various age groups in our nation, those between the ages of 18 and 24 -- a majority are on our side. But I want you to go out of here not only with what you yourselves believe, but I want you to go out of here as missionaries to all the others in your age group. Because the polls also indicate that you have the highest percentage in that age group who do not go to the polls to vote. It won't help unless you get there. And if you do, you'll be playing a major part in determining what the future is going to be for all of you in this country.

The President. Yes, it really is. I've got Oklahoma yet to do. Before leaving, I'd like to just say how delighted I was to be able to talk to all of you young people. People my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you the same freedom and the same opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. And when we look at you and when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us great heart. Way back at the time of World War II, the Chief of Army Staff, General George Marshall, he was asked did we have a secret weapon, and, if so, what was it? And General Marshall said, ``Yes, we have a secret weapon.

Team.'' And as a matter of fact, I understand that Springfield resident Viola Roemhild took home movies of that day in Springfield that have been on TV here. Well, today things have sort of repeated themselves. Ronald Reagan is back in Springfield. And the way I look at it, Kit Bond and all of you are one more winning team.

I appreciate this opportunity to be with you, and I can't think of a more inspiring place to meet. Here we are on the home turf of two real winners: Don Nickles and the University of Oklahoma football team. Now, Don is no Brian Bosworth [Linebacker for the University of Oklahoma football team]. How could there be more than one Boz? But Don is an Oklahoman that all of you should be proud of. He's been scoring points for you and for your State in the Nation's Capital. I'm here today to ask you to do me a personal favor: For Oklahoma's sake, for America's sake, please do everything you can to reelect Don Nickles to the United States Senate.

And by the way, I want to offer a great big thanks to the University Band, to the Muskogee High School Band, the McAlister High School Band, and Ponca City High School Band. Thank you very much. And also, I appreciate very much something we didn't have when I was playing football in college. Would you believe it, the cheerleaders then were always males? Your football players don't know how lucky they are. [Laughter] I can't help but see and recognize the young people here in this audience, and I have a special message to you from my roommate. She says when it comes to drugs, please, for yourselves, for your families, for your future, and for your country, just say no. I want to tell you Nancy's impressed me so much with that, that the other day in Iceland, even though it didn't have anything to do with drugs, I found myself just saying no.

But getting back to why we're here today, there's another great winner with us. And so, there's one other thing I'd ask you to do: Put Henry Bellmon back in the Governor's chair. The people of Oklahoma should take advantage of this great resource. I'm speaking of my friend, Henry Bellmon. As Oklahoma passes through a critical time, it's more important than ever that the State utilize the experience, the wisdom, and the contacts that years of public service have given Governor Bellmon. Henry Bellmon has seen government operate from both a local and a national perspective. He's had the kind of hands-on experience that is so crucial for Oklahoma. But most important, Henry Bellmon is the one man in Oklahoma today that has developed, over his distinguished political career, the kind of national contacts -- from Wall Street to the Silicon Valley -- that can help get Oklahoma turned around and headed into a bright and prosperous future. His experience, his courage and savvy, will do the job for Oklahoma. He'll be as good a Governor as Don's been a Senator, and that's saying a lot. And at the same time, when you think of him, send up there to the State capital to help him, Tim Leonard as Lieutenant Governor.

Government, controlling both Houses of the Congress, the Presidency, and all the departments and agencies. You might say Don and I were part of a cleanup crew. The tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend crowd had been on a binge that left our country with murderous inflation, sky-high interest rates, ever-increasing taxes, business decline, unemployment, and unprecedented national uncertainty.

Don and I, together with you the American people, went to work cleaning up the gigantic mess that we had inherited. It was a little like the job Noah had after the animals left the Ark. Well, it was a challenge, but with the commitment and hard work of a team of dedicated elected officials -- Don Nickles has been a real champion on that team -- we've put America's economic house in order and opened the door to growth, opportunity, and jobs. We've come a long way, and if we stick together, nobody, but nobody, is going to turn us back.

I fully appreciate that a few areas of the country, including Oklahoma, are facing some tough economic challenges right now. That's all the more reason to send Don Nickles back to the United States Senate. There isn't a harder working member of that august body than Don. He's on the job every minute, watching out for your interests. In fact, he has one of the highest attendance records in the entire Congress. He's been a leader, for example, in the efforts to keep our domestic energy industry alive and kicking. He's been a major force to repeal the Fuel Use Act. And along with Senator Gramm of Texas, Don has introduced the oil and gas revitalization bill. And just recently, he was able to obtain an additional $3 million for hydrocarbon research right here at the University and the OU Energy Center.

That liberal gang we replaced 5\1/2\ years ago used every problem -- like the ones confronting the energy business -- as an excuse to increase Federal spending, raise your taxes, and expand the power of the Washington bureaucracy. Well, Don's approach is fundamentally different. Don and our team are not trying to create more jobs for the bureaucracy in Washington; we want more jobs created by a thriving private sector right here in Oklahoma. That's what Don's working for. He's so well thought of that his Senate colleagues made him the chairman of the vitally important Energy Regulation and Conservation Subcommittee. And by the way, if the Republicans lose control of the Senate, he would then, of course, be replaced, and very likely he would be replaced as head of that powerful subcommittee by Senator Howard Metzenbaum.

President. The last thing our economy needs is the last thing the energy industry needs is to have someone who is anti-oil and anti-free enterprise elevated to such power. You can stop that disaster before it happens by reelecting Don Nickles to the United States Senate. [Applause] I was kind of hoping you'd say that.

These are hard times for many farmers, and with Don's energetic support, we've been trying to help them get out from under. Last year Don pushed through his farm protection and flexibility plan, allowing farmers to maximize farm program benefits without losing their average base. With his Landowner Protection Act, he's helped to change farm credit policy, thus curtailing farm foreclosures, whenever and wherever it's realistic to do so. This administration is determined to stand by our farmers in this difficult period, and that's why we've spent more -- believe it or not -- to help the American farmer than was spent by the last five administrations all put together -- some $26 billion this year alone. This, of course, is short term. This is help for an emergency situation. In the long haul, we know the farmers want profits rather than subsidies. And together, we can see to it that American agriculture makes a profit and that it's run by farmers and not Federal bureaucrats.

One of the gifts the liberal establishment gave farmers and the rest of the American people during the last decade was an ever-increasing tax load. Between 1976 and 1981, the Federal tax take doubled. For the farmers, the owners of small businesses, there was one especially odious tax: the estate tax. By the time we took office, it was getting so high that, in many cases, families with family businesses or farms were unable to pass on to their children what they'd spent a lifetime building. Well, with Don Nickles' help, we slashed that tax and, with an across-the-board reduction in the tax rates, we turned off the Federal tax vacuum. And we're wiping out the inheritance tax for surviving spouses.

And then, we indexed the tax rates so you wouldn't automatically be pushed into higher and higher tax brackets by getting a cost-of-living pay raise to keep pace with inflation. Most people didn't realize what was happening to them.

They would get a raise that was only meant to keep them even with the cost of living. But the income tax is based on the number of dollars you earn, not their value. So, you'd be pushed into higher and higher brackets and wind up poorer than you were, because you were paying an increased income tax. We've wiped that out, and we're going to keep it wiped out. Now, Don was a champion in these battles, and at the same time, his opponent fought us all the way.

Well, the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend crowd took the American people for granted too long. That over-the-hill gang, and Don's opponent was right there with them, came close to wrecking our economy. Well, they're waiting in the wings to come back with tax bills blazing. Come election day, you can head them off at the pass and let them know that the days of high taxes, high inflation, and high interest rates are over. And you can send that message special delivery.

As a matter of fact, Don Rickles [Nickles] will deliver it directly and personally to the United States Senate. The differences in economic philosophy between Republicans and Democratic leadership in this election are no less dramatic than the contrast in their approaches to the safety of our neighborhoods and the security of our country. The liberals who bottled up our tough anticrime bills for years have now begun to climb aboard our campaign to rid America of the scourge of drugs. But there's much more to be done in this area. We need to back up our new drug legislation, which I will sign shortly, with strict enforcement, perhaps stiffer penalties, and no-nonsense judges. Now, you know, a Democratic Senate would have a veto power over my judicial appointments. That's another vital reason to keep the Senate in responsible, Republican hands and another reason to reelect Don Nickles. If the Republicans lose the majority, the chairman of the all-important Judiciary Committee will be Teddy Kennedy.

President. Now, you know, on issues relating to national security, Don's opponent, like the liberal leadership of his party, is totally out of step with the people of Oklahoma. He voted to freeze the United States into a position of nuclear inferiority vis-a-vis the Soviet Union. And if he had his way, there would have been no need to negotiate in Iceland, because we would have had no MX missile, our strategic defense research would have been curtailed, deficit [defense] spending would have been slashed, and we would have had no leverage. You know, just a few minutes ago, over there, back in the corner there, there seemed to be Iceland being replayed all over again. And it indicated that there has been -- and I mean this seriously -- a great misunderstanding about what our Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI, is really all about and what it means.

Negotiating is important, but it must be from a position of strength. This was never more clear to me than it was in Iceland. There was immense pressure to sign an agreement, to give up hope for developing a defense against ballistic missiles, simply to have a trophy to wave. But with Don and a lot of good people like him backing me up, I was able to stand firm for a safer, more secure future. Americans realize that no deal is better than a bad deal. And it wasn't really so hard. The answer to a lot of problems is, as I told you, just say no. Well, we're working for the day when we can just say yes to a good agreement. I'm confident with all the progress we've made, that yes-day will come sooner than anyone expects. And when it happens and we're able, for the first time, to reduce the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind, it will be a result of the realism and commitment of solid individuals like Don Nickles, individuals who understand that peace through strength is not just a slogan, it's a fact of life.

And now I'd just like to interrupt my regular remarks for a second to answer one of the signs that has been held up several times over there, because I'm sure it is the result of a legitimate misunderstanding. The sign indicates that the SDI, that defense program, would be equal to a first strike of nuclear power.

Now, let me just tell you, you know, that this nation -- and for a number of years now -- has participated in a treaty called the ABM treaty which, in effect -- well, it's been termed ``the MAD policy,'' for mutual assured destruction. And that's what it means: that our safety is dependent on having so many nuclear missiles on each side aimed at each other; that each side, it will be presumed, will never resort to a strike. So, some people have thought that when we come along with a defense that could prevent those other missiles from hitting us, that that would, in effect, be saying that we're striving to prepare for a first strike -- to be able to defend ourselves, but shoot missiles at the other fellow.

Well, let me tell you what our offer was and has been from the first. I know that if we start it, if this system succeeds and we can put it together, and we just started with our missiles -- offensive missiles -- to put this in effect. I could see where an enemy would be tempted to a first strike in order to prevent us from getting the capacity for a first strike. But from the very first, our proposal has been to the Soviet Union, and made again in Iceland, that if and when such a system is developed, we will ask them to join us in watching the testing, and then we will join in both sides eliminating all nuclear missiles at the same time we share the defensive system. The whole objective is peace, not arms superiority for the sake of conquering someone else.

Now, today the United States has again resumed its leadership role. The Western alliance is unified and confident. The forces of freedom are on the move. And one thing I'm especially proud of: In these last 5\1/2\ years not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism. In fact, one small country, Grenada, has been returned to the family of free nations. What we're doing is laying the foundation for a new era of peace, prosperity, and freedom. And you know, it's a unique experience for me to be here in support of Don. He's the youngest Member of the United States Senate, and I'm, well, I'm a little older. [Laughter] Don symbolizes the new, positive, forward-looking leadership this country needs to carry us into the next century.

You know, it wasn't that long ago, just looking back a few years, when there were those who were counting America out. Our best days were behind us, they said. Word from Washington was that we should lower our expectations, because we'd never be able to live as well again as we had been in the past. Well, don't ever believe that. America will be a land of enterprise, opportunity, and hope, a shining light unto the world, as long as her people are free and her leaders have the courage to do what is right. Now, Don Nickles is a little older than many of you here, but he's like so many of the young people that I've met all over this country. On campuses like this, in workplaces, and on military bases -- this generation is the best this great country has ever produced. You aren't coming in second best to anyone. I'd like to tell you a little story. I don't know whether they still -- or mention this in history. Back when World War II started, General George Marshall was the Chief of Staff of the Army. And someone asked General Marshall, did the United States have a secret weapon, and, if so, what was it? And General Marshall said, ``Our secret weapon is just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' I think if George Marshall were here today, he'd be saying that about this generation.

Now, it's all important to feel as you do. And let me just say one other thing: I know that here in this place I couldn't be speaking to an audience like this that did not have some participation in it by Democrats or people who had been Democrats and had changed as I did. Because I was a Democrat for a great part of my adult life, and then I guess I discovered what Winston Churchill had said in the British Parliament when he changed parties. He said, ``Some men change principle for party, and some men change party for principle.'' There are millions of Democrats all across this country, good patriotic citizens who have found themselves and are finding themselves totally out of step with their leadership. That's why so often in my remarks I mention that I was criticizing the leadership. They're still going down that same old road.

These band members will be able to recognize -- I remember when I was the drum major of the YMCA Band in Dixon, Illinois. And we were asked to lead the parade on Decoration Day, Memorial Day, in a nearby town. Well, there was a marshal of the parade on a big white horse out in front of us, and so we just followed him. And the band was playing, and I was pumping that baton and so forth. But he, the marshal, rode back down to make sure everything was coming along in the line of parade. And pretty soon, I thought the music was beginning to sound a little fainter, and I turned and sneaked to look around. The marshal had arrived back just in time to turn the band to the right. I was walking down the street all by myself. [Laughter] And that's what's happened to the Democratic Party: The leadership is walking down the street all by itself; the party has turned to the right.

And you know, now I've got to tell you one thing about -- you might be interested to know that in the various age groupings in our society those from 18 to 24 are the largest -- I should say, have the largest percentage supporting us. But I want to send you away with one message: I hope you'll go out of here as missionaries, because that same age grouping, 18 to 24, has the lowest average percentage of going to the polls and voting on election day. So you not only go out of here determined to vote, but to everyone you can buttonhole, tell them the most important thing in this free system of ours is that right to go there to the polls and vote. And now, none of us up here will be mad if, when you tell them to vote, you also add to vote for Don Nickles, Henry Bellmon, Mickey Edwards, and Jim Inhofe. Your votes will make a difference.

He was introduced by Senator Nickles. Earlier, the President attended a reception for major donors to Senator Nickles' reelection campaign at the Sheraton Century Center Hotel in Oklahoma City. Following his remarks at the rally, the President traveled to Tampa, FL.

Well, the history books tell us that one of the first visitors to Tampa was Ponce de Leon. He was looking for the Fountain of Youth. And, no, it's not true that I was with him. [Laughter] If I had been, I'd have seen that he found it. [Laughter] I can't help but see the young people here in the audience and those young people in those bands. I have a special message for all of them from my roommate.

But it is wonderful to be back here in Florida. You know, as I said to my staff when we were taking off in Air Force One, it's great to get out of Washington and back where real people are. Now, I couldn't do this as much when Congress was still in session.

There's a certain element among them that -- well, Paula and I and the gentlemen I just mentioned down here, we feel we have to stay in town to keep an eye on them. I'm not reflecting on Congress as an institution; I have a great respect for it. But most of us must be aware that there are some elements there that need watching. Those elements -- I'm reminded of them in a little story about three men who came out of a building to get into the car and found they'd locked themselves out. And one of them said, ``Well, get me a wire coathanger.

Military weakness and indecision had made America a punching bag for every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world. And when it came to soaring inflation, economic stagnation, and unemployment, the liberal crowd gave us a lot of talk about how we, the American people, were to blame. They said we were suffering from malaise. Do you remember that? And then they told us the answer was to lower our expectations and accept a new era of limits.

President. And as for what Paula Hawkins and I were saying about cutting taxes and bringing America back, well, he had just had one thing to say about that -- here's what he said: ``simple-minded.'' You know, hearing that kind of lighter-than-air liberalism, I can't help but think that if you liked Jimmy Carter as President, you'll love Bob Graham as Senator. Paula's opponent and the Washington liberal crowd would like you to believe that the last 5\1/2\ years happened by accident. They'd like you to forget that inflation is at the lowest level it's been in 20 years; that interest rates are at the lowest level in 9 years and they -- are you ready for this -- they had been higher than at anytime since the Civil War; that we've created more new jobs in the United States since our recovery began, these 46 or 7 months, than Europe and Japan combined had created in the last 10 years. And this year there are more Americans at work and a greater proportion of Americans working than ever before in the history of our country. The potential employment pool of everyone that might possibly be considered as employable in our country is everyone, male and female, from 16 years of age up all the way.

Now, some of these things I've said they want you to forget, but I've got a feeling you're not going to forget. Remember, the liberals are just itching for a chance to raise taxes in Washington the way Paula's opponent has been raising taxes here in Florida. When it comes to raising taxes he's a real pro. He's got lessons that even the Washington crowd could learn.

You know, the truth is the liberal Democratic leaders never met a tax they didn't like. [Laughter] And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. [Laughter] Well, you're the people who pay the taxes, and you know that we don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little. We have a deficit because Congress spends too much. And it's about time they took care of the Federal budget and left the family budget alone. You know, for 5\1/2\ years, whenever I've needed help in cutting taxes and passing our program for rebuilding America's strength, I've known that I could count on the support in the Senate of Paula Hawkins. The votes were close at times, and the battles were hard. And there were many that, without her, we couldn't have won.

Some of them had to do with an issue that Paula Hawkins and I feel strongly about, and I bet you do, too; that's keeping America strong and proud and peaceful and free. Now, as you've just been told here today, and as you know, I just recently returned from Iceland. That meeting was a breakthrough in our discussions with the Soviets. We're no longer talking about arms control; we're talking about arms reductions, possibly even elimination of ballistic missiles from the face of the Earth. And that's an historic turnaround for the Soviets, and it wouldn't have been possible without the help of Senators like Paula and the firm support of the American people, whose hard work and support enabled us to rebuild our military might. The American people know that the only way to negotiate for peace is from a position of strength.

We came closer in Iceland to real arms reduction than ever before, but Mr. Gorbachev decided to make all of our progress hostage to his demand that we, in effect, kill our Strategic Defense Initiative.

President. I had to remind him of my pledge to the American people on strategic defense against nuclear missiles, that in America you give your word and that stands up no matter what the time or place. SDI is our insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madman that might come along or some country that develops ballistic missiles, now that we all know how to make them, or in case the Soviets don't keep their word.

You know, not everyone understands that. Frankly, Paula's opponent is on record as saying that he supports something less than full funding of SDI. Well, Florida doesn't need a Senator who wants to reserve judgment on our security insurance policy. Just a few days before I left for the meeting, the liberals in Congress were working to cut funding for SDI as far as possible. As I was about to go to the bargaining table with the Soviets, they were trying to take away one of the things that got the Soviets to that table in the first place. But then the Blame America First crowd has been trying to cut defense for years without getting a thing in return. Thanks to Paula's unwavering support, we've made great progress -- with the liberals kicking, screaming, and fighting us all the way -- in rebuilding our military strength is where we've made that progress. There's been nothing vague about Paula's commitment to a strong defense. And with her help, we've revitalized the Western alliance. And I'm happy to report that after 5\1/2\ years, not 1 square inch of property has been lost to communism. In fact, one small country, Grenada, has been brought back into the family of free nations.

Let me, if I could, just say something, because a great many people aren't quite sure or don't really understand the SDI proposal. And I'm going to interject here something about it. It is our effort -- right now we are abiding by a system that was passed a number of years ago called the MAD policy, for mutual assured destruction. And what this meant -- must be an echo in here [the President referred to shouting from the audience]. I asked the Joint Chiefs of Staff one day if it wasn't possible that we, with our technology in this country, couldn't come up with a defensive system that could start erasing those missiles as they came out of their silos and that could give us a shield to protect us.

President. They decided that we had that technology, that, yes, possibly, this could be done -- probably it could be done. And so we've been researching. And there have been numerous breakthroughs, and we're all very optimistic. But I also, at the same time, said that if we developed such a system and we're sure that it would work, we couldn't just start in with our own offensive weapons and theirs and start to install this, to deploy this system, because this would be an invitation to attack before we had it deployed. Because our opponent would think that we were trying, now, to protect ourselves and, at the same time, be able to destroy them. So, I said when and if we have that system -- and I said this in Iceland when we were there, to them -- I said we, when it is ready and it looks like that we've found it, we will sign a treaty with you that both of us are going to eliminate all our ballistic missiles and we will share this defensive system with you. I'm sorry those jokers left the room before they heard that.

And if, God forbid, we should ever have to ask them to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then, believe me, they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that money can buy. And with Paula's help, we're going to do that. It's because of those young men and women and the quality of the weapons they carry that every nickel-and-dime dictator the world over knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he will pay a price.

I've talked a lot about Paula Hawkins' support for what we've done, and, as I said, we would never have made it this far without her. But let me talk for a few moments about her leadership. Paula Hawkins has one of the most impressive records of leadership in the entire United States Senate. Take just one area: drugs. Before Paula Hawkins went to Washington, you could hardly find a Senator with a serious interest in drug abuse. Paula Hawkins changed that and, together with someone else I know, put drug abuse at the top of the national agenda. And almost singlehandedly she made it a Federal offense to sell drugs on or near a school. Paula has been the best general the United States Senate has had in the battle against drugs.

Now, to hear some people talk now you'd never know it, but she's had to fight some hard battles. Yes, the liberals who bottled up our tough anticrime bills for years have begun to climb aboard our campaign to rid America of the scourge of drugs. We have much more to do in this area, and we'll need to back up the new drug legislation with strict enforcement, perhaps even stiffer penalties, and the kind of no-nonsense judges that we will put on the bench unless we're denied the chance by a Democratic majority in the Senate -- I have to have their approval of any judge that I appoint. We need the Republican Senate. We need Paula Hawkins. Well, I'm happy to report to you that I'll shortly sign a drug abuse bill that would never have been on the agenda before Paula was a Senator. I'd hope that I may be able to bring it here and sign it here, but I think someplace there in the bureaucracy they're playing games. It's all been passed already, but somehow they just haven't put it together enough for me to get my name on it.

Paula's been a leader on many issues. She championed using diplomacy against drugs as well as issues like missing children and child abuse. Who can forget her courageous leadership against child abuse -- and you know, if she hadn't said it about me, I was going to say it about her -- or removing limits on Social Security COLA's and on establishing the voice of liberty for the oppressed nation just 115 miles from our shores, Radio Marti. Some Senators make a difference on just a vote or two. In her work against illegal drugs and for children, she's making a difference for an entire generation. Paula Hawkins is unique and irreplaceable.

You know, I've discovered about myself that every once in a while something reminds me of a story. It's always happening. [Laughter] Well, right now, Paula reminds me not of a story but of an actual happening in one of our major cities, a thing that happens all too often. This story has to do with an accident, a man lying there injured in the street. A crowd had gathered around; a woman was bending over, administering to him. And a man came along and elbowed his way through the crowd, shoved the woman aside, and said, ``Here, let me take this.

I've had first aid training.'' And she meekly stepped back, and he knelt down and started all the things that he'd learned in first aid training. And after a time, the woman touched him on the shoulder and said, ``When you come to that part about calling the doctor, I'm right here.'' [Laughter] Paula Hawkins is a fighter for Florida. Send her back to Washington, because that's where she fights for Florida. Florida and America need her there.

So, elect a Governor for the future of Florida: Bob Martinez and his running mate. You know, one thing I like about Bob Martinez is that, like me, he was once a member of the other party. Now, I know there couldn't be a meeting like this without there being a number of Democrats in the crowd, especially in these times. Throughout the United States, crisscrossing as I have done, I know there are millions of patriotic Democrats who are totally dismayed with the liberal leadership in their party today. And believe me, those of you who are or once were and have changed, as Bob and I did, believe me, you're welcome. I wouldn't be President today without your help, and I hope you'll help Bob and Paula, too.

I know it's tough to break with tradition. But I remember what Winston Churchill, as a Member of the British Parliament, said when he changed parties. And he was criticized, and he said, ``Some men change principle for party and some change party for principle.'' These many patriotic Democrats I'm talking about know that the leadership of their party has turned in a direction they just cannot follow. Well, all I'm asking of the people of Florida is to remember that the people you elect will help determine the future -- America's future. So, before I go, let me conduct an informal poll. I won't mind if you speak up so loud that all America can hear you. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

They're what this campaign is all about -- that we of older generations, and my generation, can look at them and see how well they deserve -- as they do. I've seen them all over the country, on campuses, and just three campuses yesterday and the day -- well, just yesterday, as a matter of fact. And to see them -- and I told them many times, and enjoy telling them, that they remind me of what George Marshall, as Chief of the Army Staff, said at the beginning of World War II when someone asked him if we had a secret weapon and what was it? And he said: ``Yes, we have a secret weapon. It's just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' I think he'd say it about today's young people, too. But I just want to give one caution to all of those young people here. It isn't just enough for you to go out and vote. You, the age from 18 to 24, among the voters, is the highest percentage supporting us. But you also have the highest percentage who don't go to vote. So, when you go out of here, buttonhole every friend you've got and shame them into going to the polls on November 4th.

Now, some people have noted that this is my last campaign. But this campaign is not about me; it's about you and your future. People my age have in mind, as I said, that our responsibility is to see that when it comes your turn to take over we turn over to you the same freedom, the same great opportunity that the preceding generations have turned over to us. And that's what we've sworn to do, and that's what we're going to do.

I am pleased today to sign S. 1917, a bill that, among other things, provides for immunization and oral rehydration in developing countries, promotes democracy in Haiti through economic assistance and other means, and adopts measures to protect tropical forests and biological diversity in developing countries.

I must note, however, that section 204 of the bill states that the President shall exercise certain authorities -- defined by reference to the authorities granted under the International Emergency Economic Powers Act -- to assist the Haitian Government to recover the assets it alleges were stolen by former President Jean-Claude Duvalier and his associates.

While I have no objection to assisting the Government of Haiti, I would have to object to such a provision if it mandated the specific actions to be taken by the Government because such a mandate would unreasonably detract from the flexibility necessary to formulate and conduct a sound foreign policy.

Fortunately, the bill does not directly specify which of the many executive powers referenced by the International Emergency Economic Powers Act should be employed. Therefore, the President retains the discretion to select those powers that are appropriate to carry out the legislation's purposes.

Today the British Government has broken diplomatic relations with Syria as a result of Syrian Government involvement in the attempt to bomb an El Al passenger airplane. The conviction of Nizer Hindawi and his sentencing to 45 years in prison reflects the gravity of the crime and the natural response of a civilized nation. The President notes that had it not been for the vigilance of those responsible for security at Heathrow Airport, over 400 persons, including 230 Americans, would have perished.

A state that encourages and takes part in terrorism isolates itself from the civilized world. The United States will consult and cooperate with others to bring practical meaning to that isolation -- diplomatically, politically, economically.

Her Majesty's government. We support the British decision. Our Ambassador is being withdrawn from Syria. In the coming days we will be in close consultation with Her Majesty's government and other allies regarding additional steps that we and others will take.

The compensation would be for losses the Bank claims were caused by the issuance and cancellation of a loan guarantee and the subsequent reissuance on different terms of a second loan guarantee. The need to renegotiate the terms of the loan guarantee originally extended to the Merchants National Bank of Mobile was regrettable.

While the terms of the two guarantees were different, the second loan contained some provisions that were more advantageous to the Bank than those that were included in the first guarantee, and the Bank's losses did not result from the need to cancel the first guarantee and the issuance of a second guarantee.

Wednesday, in a ceremony on the South Lawn of the White House, I signed into law the most sweeping reform of the tax code in our nation's history. That moment was a victory for fairness that will, I'm convinced, usher in a new era of growth and opportunity for America.

When this bill goes into effect, 80 percent of the American people will pay a top rate of only 15 percent or less in Federal income tax. No one will pay more than 28 percent of total income. A family of four living at the poverty level will have over $1,000 more in their pockets. In fact, millions of working poor will be dropped from the Federal income tax rolls altogether -- they won't have to pay a cent in Federal income tax. Now, that's what I call fair. As for families, at long last blessed relief. The standard deduction will increase sharply, and the personal exemption -- that's the amount of money you get to deduct for yourself and each one of your dependents -- will almost double, rising to $2,000 in 1989. I wasn't exaggerating when I said that this bill is at once the best antipoverty program, the best profamily measure, and the best jobs creation bill ever to come out of the U.S. Congress.

The day I signed this bill we also heard some extremely good news about the economy. Gross national product, the figure that measures our economy's growth, showed a strong upswing in the third quarter, coming in at 2.4 percent. Sales are up, with a sharp increase in durable goods purchases -- pointing to increased production and more jobs in the future. And U.S. exports of goods and services are up dramatically over last quarter. What does all this mean? Well, it tells us that our economy is solid and accelerating again. We're now enjoying one of the longest peacetime economic expansions in postwar history.

We're seeing record numbers of new businesses being created and nearly 11.7 million jobs created in the last 46 months. Sure there are ups and downs, and some sectors of the economy are not yet sharing fully in the expansion. But the indications are that our economy is gathering momentum for even more growth, more job creation, a narrowing trade deficit, and continued low inflation in the months ahead. Add to this the progrowth, low rate taxes -- or tax rates, I should say, of the new tax bill and you've got an economy that's ready to climb. We're headed for a second leg upward, and I believe our 4-year-long recovery will one day be recorded as one of the most remarkable peacetime expansions in the 20th century. And we're going to keep the good times rolling until they extend to every single corner of our nation.

Contrast this with the economic mess we inherited 5\1/2\ years ago. It's not for nothing those are called the days of malaise. Inflation then had skyrocketed up to 13 percent. Now it's holding at an incredible 1.8 percent. The prime rate had shot up to 21\1/2\ percent. Today we've cut it by two-thirds. When we came into office the top tax rate was 70 percent, and the middle class was paying tax rates that once were levied only on the very rich. Worse, inflation gave you an automatic tax hike every year and Congress more of your money to spend, without their having to stand up and vote for a tax hike. Well, the first thing we did was cut your taxes and index them so that wouldn't happen again. And with tax reform, that top rate of 70 has been chopped to only 28 percent of total income.

All these achievements were hard fought, believe me. But it's a funny thing, some of the same people who fought us every step of the way when we tried to cut taxes and reform our tax code -- these same people are talking down the American economy. Well, in one sense, I have to say they're right. There is a cloud hanging over the American economy, and that's the possibility that the tax-and-spend mentality will return to Washington and take us back to those bad old days of sky-high taxes, double-digit inflation, and 21\1/2\ percent interest rates. Don't think it can't happen. There are still a lot of people in Washington who have that mentality, who want to raise your taxes back up to where they were in 1980. So, unless we keep our guard up, we could find ourselves in no time returning to the policies of tax and tax, spend and spend. And we'd wake up one morning to find that all we've worked so hard for, all our progress, gone with the wind.

Now, that's why I'm talking to you, the American people. Your hard work turned America around and set it firmly on the road of prosperity -- and the numbers released this week prove it. We've come so far. With your commitment, with your support, we can keep America growing, confident, and secure. We can -- and I know we will -- keep the doors of the opportunity society wide open and keep America's future one of hope and ever-growing possibilities.

The housing industry has played a major role in our economic prosperity, especially since World War II. Thanks to our free enterprise system, to the vision of many entrepreneurs, and to sound government policies, the housing industry has created millions of jobs, increased demand for goods and services, and generated billions of dollars for our economy.

Because of this economic activity, millions of Americans have been able to provide safe, secure, and affordable housing for their families. Our communities, our Nation, and the institution of the family itself are much the stronger thereby.

It is most appropriate that Americans recognize the social and economic benefits the housing industry provides our Nation, and that we remain grateful for the free market system that provides Americans with affordable housing opportunities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Influenza and pneumonia are among the principal killers of American adults, especially the elderly. Fewer than 12 percent of the adult population are vaccinated against these diseases or against other highly infectious diseases such as measles, rubella, diphtheria, and hepatitis B. Fewer than half of Americans over sixty are vaccinated against tetanus.

Inoculation against infectious diseases is a major factor in preventive health care. The Surgeon General of the United States has repeatedly called on our Nation to prevent the massive costs associated with health care through programs of health promotion and disease prevention. Many studies by the United States Public Health Service confirm the soundness of this directive.

On behalf of the Government and people of the United States of America, I send warm wishes to the participants in the World Day of Prayer for Peace. Our prayers are with you for the success of this historic gathering. We must never lose sight of the divinity which has created mankind itself. I extend to you my heartfelt support and reiterate my personal commitment to the cause of peace.

In addition to our prayers, we must join together to take steps to ensure lasting peace. Man has created awesome weapons in this nuclear age of ours. It is my fervent goal and hope -- and that I know of all of you -- that we will some day no longer have to rely on nuclear weapons to deter aggression and assure world peace. To that end, the United States is now engaged in a serious and sustained effort to negotiate major reductions in levels of offensive nuclear weapons with the ultimate goal of eliminating these weapons from the face of the Earth. In addition, we are exploring the possibilities presented by new technologies to protect human lives from the threat of nuclear destruction through the use of strategic defenses -- which threaten no one.

In my meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev in Iceland, we made tremendous strides toward the goal of a safer and more stable world. The United States will do its full part in the negotiations in Geneva to build upon the progress which was achieved at Reykjavik.

As we seek the reduction and eventual elimination of nuclear weapons, we must also address the serious threats and imbalances in conventional and chemical weapons. Wars fought with non-nuclear weapons, including chemical, are causing suffering and death in many parts of the world. We have proposed a global ban on these chemical weapons, and call on all civilized nations to join us in ridding the world of this menace.

Universal respect for human rights and fundamental freedoms should be a cornerstone of universal peace. Among the most cherished rights is that of all persons to practice their religion or belief, free of interference or persecution. Each of us should be able to seek, unhindered, a relationship with the divinity. I commend this historic meeting for its efforts to lead humanity toward a more tolerant, just, and peaceful world.

Well, today it gives me great pleasure to sign legislation that reflects the total commitment of the American people and their government to fight the evil of drugs. Drug use extracts a high cost on America: the cost of suffering and unhappiness, particularly among the young; the cost of lost productivity at the workplace; and the cost of drug-related crime. Drug use is too costly for us not to do everything in our power, not just to fight it but to subdue it and conquer it.

The magnitude of today's drug problem can be traced to past unwillingness to recognize and confront this problem. And the vaccine that's going to end the epidemic is a combination of tough laws -- like the one we sign today -- and a dramatic change in public attitude. We must be intolerant of drug use and drug sellers. We must be intolerant of drug use on the campus and at the workplace.

We must be intolerant of drugs not because we want to punish drug users, but because we care about them and want to help them. This legislation is not intended as a means of filling our jails with drug users. What we must do as a society is identify those who use drugs, reach out to them, help them quit, and give them the support they need to live right.

Let me take a moment here and salute a special person who has turned the fight against drug abuse into a national crusade. She started long before the polls began to register our citizens' concern about drugs. She mobilized the American people, and I'm mighty proud of her. I know the work Nancy's been doing has been appreciated. And Nancy's made a special commitment to assist young people who are just getting started to quit and to prevent others from starting in the first place. One young person asked her advice about what to do if offered drugs. And she came up with a bit of simple, yet profound, wisdom. She said, ``Just say no.'' And today there are thousands of Just Say No clubs all over America. In all of our endeavors here in Washington, we're striving for a world where our young people can live happier, more opportunity-filled lives.

In the last few years, we've made much progress on the enforcement end of solving the drug problem. Interdiction is up, drug crops are being destroyed while still in the fields all over the country and overseas, organized crime is being hit and hit hard, cooperation between governments is better than ever before.

This legislation allows us to do even more. Nevertheless, today marks a major victory in our crusade against drugs -- a victory for safer neighborhoods, a victory for the protection of the American family. The American people want their government to get tough and to go on the offensive. And that's exactly what we intend, with more ferocity than ever before. But as I've said on previous occasions, we would be fooling ourselves if we thought that new money for new government programs alone will solve the problem.

Let's not forget that in America people solve problems, and no national crusade has ever succeeded without human interest. So, at the same time that government sends a long, loud, clear message, I ask each American to be strong in your intolerance of illegal drug use and firm in your commitment to a drug-free America. United, together, we can see to it that there's no sanctuary for the drug criminals who are pilfering human dignity and pandering despair.

There've been some real champions in the battle to get this legislation through Congress: Senators Bob Dole, Robert Byrd, and Strom Thurmond; Congressmen Bob Michel, Jim Wright, Benjamin Gilman, Charles Rangel, and Jerry Lewis. I'd like to single out Senator Paula Hawkins in particular. She took this battle to the public and has been a driving force behind the effort to rid our society of drug abuse. Like Nancy, she made her commitment to fighting drugs long before it was the popular thing to do. This kind of honest, hard-working leadership is what makes all the difference. And now, Paula, if you and your colleagues will join Nancy and me, we will get on with the signing of that bill, making it the law of the land.

Agency for International Development. The Administrator of the Agency for International Development shall be responsible for implementing Sections 210 (to the extent of determining the existence of food shortages only) and 505 of the Act.

Strategic Minerals. The Secretary of State shall be responsible, in consultation with the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary of Defense, for determining which articles are strategic minerals within the meaning of the Act.

Enforcement Authority. The head of each agency assigned functions by this Order is delegated authority under Sections 601 and 603 of the Act to the extent that they relate to functions delegated by this Order or conferred by the Act.

Policy Guidance. The Secretary of State is responsible for ensuring that implementation of the Act is effectively integrated with and is supportive of the foreign policy of the United States. In carrying out their respective functions and responsibilities, the head of each agency assigned responsibility under this Order shall consult with the heads of other affected agencies.

Committee. An Inter-Agency Coordinating Committee on South Africa is hereby established, under the Chairmanship of the Secretary of State. The Committee shall also include the Secretary of the Treasury, Secretary of Defense, Attorney General, Secretary of Commerce, Secretary of Transportation, Secretary of Agriculture, the United States Trade Representative, and other members as appropriate. The Committee shall serve as a forum for consultations on United States policy concerning South Africa and shall monitor implementation of the Act to ensure consistency with United States policy objectives.

Functions. All authority not expressly delegated or granted herein is retained by the President. The President retains the authority to exercise any of the authority delegated or granted in this Order.

My administration has made a concerted effort to develop cooperative water agreements that would assure the maintenance of water quality in the Sacramento-San Joaquin delta and in the Suisun Marsh, located northeast of San Francisco. Last year my administration successfully reached agreements with the State of California that will do an excellent job in protecting the water quality in these two important areas. The Federal project will meet the agreed-upon standards, and the project costs will be reimbursed by the water users. H.R. 3113 embodies the legislative authority that is necessary to implement these water quality agreements.

The bill contains one feature that could prove troublesome. Specifically, H.R. 3113 would require the Federal Government to achieve at full Federal cost any future water quality standards set unilaterally by the State of California that are stricter than those stipulated in the agreement for coordinated operation of the Central Valley Project. Contrary to longstanding administration policy, the cost of meeting any such prospective water quality standards would have to be met solely by the Federal taxpayer, rather than by the water project beneficiaries. This nonreimbursement feature represents a potential open-ended commitment against the U.S. Treasury that is essentially outside of the Federal Government's control.

I am signing this bill into law because it will allow us to implement important water quality agreements with the State of California. I must emphasize, however, that my administration cannot accept a situation in which the Federal taxpayer pays the cost of meeting prospective California water quality standards. If California acts to raise the water quality standards at Federal expense, the administration will seek remedial legislation that would make the Federal costs of meeting these higher standards reimbursable. Such action is in keeping with laudable advances that the Congress and the administration have recently achieved regarding water project cost-sharing.

I am pleased today to approve H.R. 4712, a bill that authorizes the Secretary of the Interior to promulgate regulations to increase the stock of fish in the Klamath River Basin and related areas. In signing this bill, I am stating my interpretation of certain of its provisions in order to make certain that the bill is implemented in a constitutional manner.

First, the bill requires that certain restoration work be performed by unemployed persons who are commercial fishermen, Indians, or other persons whose livelihood depends upon commercial resources in the area. If the reference to Indians were an express racial classification, a serious constitutional issue would be raised. I understand from the legislative history of the bill that this reference, however, is not to be viewed as a racial classification, but simply as a reference to one of the groups whose members are most likely to depend on the commercial resources of the area. Accordingly, I sign this bill understanding that the Secretary of the Interior will give preference in employment only to Indians whose livelihood depends on the area's resources.

Second, the bill establishes a council composed of members appointed by State Governors, Federal agencies, and an Indian organization. Because the members of the council are not appointed pursuant to the appointments clause, they cannot undertake executive functions pursuant to Federal law. Therefore, section 3(b)(1)(B) of the bill makes clear that the council has a purely advisory function, which consists of making recommendations based on a plan it establishes to manage the fish populations of the river basin and of holding hearings on these recommendations.

The bill also establishes a task force composed of members appointed by State Governors, county officials, Federal agencies, and an Indian organization. Like the council, the task force, which consults with the Secretary when he establishes and implements a program to increase the fish populations of the river basins to optimum levels, has only advisory functions. The bill requires the Secretary of the Interior and the director of the California department of fish and game to provide support for the task force. Because a serious constitutional question would be presented if the bill were interpreted as a direction to a State to place State employees directly at the disposal of the Federal Government, I interpret this provision to require the California official to provide support only for those members of the task force appointed by California State officials. Any additional assistance would necessarily be in the discretion of the State official.

Finally, the bill requires the Secretary of the Interior to enter into a memorandum of agreement with the California department of fish and game to facilitate the enforcement of fishery harvesting regulations. Since State officials, who are not appointed under the appointments clause of the U.S. Constitution, may not constitutionally perform executive functions under Federal law, I understand that the Secretary of the Interior will ensure that the agreement with California is drafted in such a way as to avoid this infirmity.

This consent is necessary because section 4 of the Act to Provide for the Admission of Hawaii into the Union, Public Law 86 - 3, 73 Stat. 4 (1959), requires that amendments to the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act be approved by the National Government. I am signing this joint resolution because I believe, as the Department of the Interior testified when the resolution was pending, that the matters with which the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act is concerned should be left entirely to the State of Hawaii. The administration of the public lands in question can be competently handled by the State government.

I also wish to express another concern. Because the act employs an express racial classification in providing that certain public lands may be leased only to persons having ``not less than one-half of the blood of the races inhabiting the Hawaiian Islands previous to 1778,'' the continued application of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, Haw. Rev. Stat. 201 et seq. (1976), raises serious equal protection questions. These difficulties are exacerbated by the amendment that reduces the native-blood requirement to one-quarter, thereby casting additional doubt on the original justification for the classification. While I am signing this resolution because it substantially defers to the State's judgment, I urge that the Congress amend section 4 of the Act to Provide for the Admission of Hawaii into the Union so that in the future the State of Hawaii may amend the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act without the consent of the United States and give further consideration to the justification for the troubling racial classification.

I am pleased to sign into law H.R. 4759, the Intelligence Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1987. This act represents another significant step forward in our effort to improve our foreign intelligence and counterintelligence capabilities. It is essential that we authorize sufficient appropriations and provide adequate authorities to enable our intelligence agencies to undertake effectively their vital mission. In this era of budget stringency, the Congress found it necessary to reduce the amounts I requested for our nation's foreign intelligence program. Despite these reductions, I am pleased that the Congress did not impose further cuts that would have seriously jeopardized the intelligence community's ability to deal with the increasingly complex and diverse challenges facing it.

I am particularly pleased with the provisions contained in title IV of the act, which enhance the counterintelligence authorities of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Department of Defense. These new authorities will enable us to detect and apprehend those who would betray our country for personal gain and improve the security of the country against hostile intelligence threats.

I am concerned, however, about the amendment of the National Security Act of 1947 to require that the House and Senate Intelligence Committees be notified of a transfer of defense articles and services in excess of $1 million. The scope of such notifications should be governed by appropriate agreement between the intelligence community and the intelligence committees of the Congress. Once an agreement has been reached, I hope that this amendment to the National Security Act of 1947 will be repealed. I also view those provisions of the bill that set forth the policy of the Congress as advisory and not binding on me as President. Despite these concerns, I believe that this legislation as a whole represents another positive step toward fulfilling our commitment to strengthen our nation's foreign intelligence capabilities.

I stated in my remarks at the signing ceremony for this bill, I am pleased to sign the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1986. One other matter concerning the act is worthy of note. This act contains several important provisions reforming the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) that will considerably enhance the ability of Federal law enforcement agencies, such as the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Drug Enforcement Administration, to combat drug offenders and other criminals.

FOIA reforms substantially broaden the law enforcement exemptions in that act, thereby increasing significantly the authority of Federal agencies to withhold sensitive law enforcement documents in their files. The statutory language changes make clear, for example, that any Federal law enforcement information relating to pending investigations or confidential sources may be withheld if its disclosure could reasonably be expected to cause an identified harm. The act also includes, for the first time, special exclusions whereby certain law enforcement records would no longer be subject to the requirements of the FOIA under particularly sensitive, specified circumstances.

Additionally, this act makes several changes with respect to the charging of fees under the FOIA. Agencies will now be able to charge and recover the full costs of processing requests for information under the FOIA, consistent with the Federal user fee concept, in the large number of cases in which FOIA requests are made for commercial purposes, a term that has been broadly construed in other contexts of the FOIA. At the same time, the act will somewhat limit the fees applicable to noncommercial educational or scientific institutions and to bona fide representatives of established news media outlets. It is important that no such special treatment is accorded to organizations engaged in the business of reselling government records or information.

Finally, the bill improves the standard governing the general waiver of FOIA fees, by mandating that such waivers be granted only where it is established that disclosure is in the ``public interest'' because it is likely to ``contribute significantly to public understanding'' of the operations or activities of the Government. This standard is intended to focus upon benefits to the public at large, rather than upon the interest of a particular segment of the public, and thus clarifies the type of public interest to be advanced.

I have signed H.R. 2032, the Government Securities Act of 1986. This important piece of legislation, which represents the culmination of 18 months of cooperative, bipartisan efforts by the Congress and the administration, will help assure the continued safety and efficiency of the markets for United States Treasury and other government-related debt. The Government Securities Act, for the first time, establishes requirements for registration, financial responsibility, customer protection, recordkeeping, and audit of brokers and dealers who transact business solely in government securities. It will be possible to know who these government securities brokers and dealers are and to assure that they are persons of integrity and appropriate financial standing.

The choice of the Department of the Treasury as rulemaker will ensure that regulations are carried out in a manner that minimizes confusion and takes into account the need to finance the Federal debt at the lowest possible cost to taxpayers. Careful and judicious implementation of this legislation will benefit both the taxpayers in general and those who individually invest in government securities. Therefore, I am pleased to sign this act.

Act for Fiscal Year 1987, I want to express a strong concern regarding one aspect of the Federal personnel provisions contained in the bill. Some of these provisions are similar to those contained in my proposed Civil Service Simplification Act as introduced in the 99th Congress.

However, unlike my proposal which requires cost-neutral implementation and which is intended to be phased in gradually governmentwide, this bill explicitly rejects cost neutrality as a requirement of implementation. Moreover, because the provisions of this bill apply to only one program, they threaten fragmentation of the Federal personnel system. This I cannot allow to happen.

I am pleased to approve S. 209, which authorizes the Attorney General to contract with private counsel in pilot program districts to collect debts owed the United States. I have been advised by the Department of Justice that two provisions of this bill raise constitutional questions. These provisions must, of course, be implemented consistent with the Constitution.

I am approving S. 209 knowing that the Attorney General will take all steps necessary to ensure that any contract entered into with private counsel contains provisions requiring ongoing supervision of the private counsel so that all fundamental decisions, including whether to initiate litigation and whether to settle or compromise a claim, are executed by an officer of the United States, as required by the Constitution.

Second, sections 3718 (b)(1)(B) and (b)(3) will require the Attorney General and all executive and legislative agencies to use their best efforts to assure that not less than 10 percent of all claims referred to private counsel will be referred to law firms owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. I am signing this bill on the understanding that those objectives will be pursued in a race-neutral manner with respect to the actual award of contracts and that the criteria for identifying socially and economically disadvantaged contractors will not contain preferences or presumptions based on race or ethnicity. Implementation of these provisions in any other manner would be of doubtful constitutional validity because the goal is not premised on findings of actual discrimination in the granting of contracts. Moreover, even if such discrimination were established, any racial or ethnic preferences provided by these sections would not be narrowly tailored to remedy such discrimination.

The very premise of America is equal opportunity without regard to irrelevant characteristics such as race. Therefore, all Americans, regardless of race, who seek one of these contracts must be allowed an equal chance to demonstrate social and economic disadvantage in order to obtain a contract.

We are in Georgia, so without taking away from the contributions of anyone else, let me say a few words about Senator Mattingly's determination and hard work and devotion to America's veterans. Mack, I know you're an Air Force veteran yourself and that you know the sacrifices so many of our veterans have made to keep America free. And I know that you feel as I do, that America has a sacred duty to care for those who have borne the battle, for their wives and for their children. I also know your quiet kind of leadership. You're more interested in results than headlines, and you don't go around doing a lot of bragging. But you did great work here. And I thought the good folks would like to know that.

Some of the proudest moments that I have had since becoming President have been when I've met with America's veterans. I spoke to a special group of them just a little more than 2 years ago at the top of a cliff overlooking a beach in Normandy in France. They were the boys who had scaled that cliff 40 years before on D-day as America and its allies began a crusade in Europe. Their story was heroic, but not unique. It was the story of millions of Americans who've served in uniform -- the story of all of those who have been prepared to make the supreme sacrifice, should duty call, to protect liberty, to protect democracy, and to protect this blessed land that we call America.

Nor was it a new story. It began at Lexington and Concord, and, yes, it continues to this very hour. It's the story of Fort McHenry and San Juan Hill, of the Marne and Guadalcanal, the Chosen Reservoir and Khesanh and Grenada. It's the story of the spirit of freedom and the battle against tyranny, and part of the pride of every American is that it's the story of American spirit at its finest. Today we honor those who have given us all this legacy of devotion. And we honor what they have done, and we acknowledge our eternal debt to them. So, in closing, let me say to all you veterans who have come here to be part of this moment, I know I speak for all the Nation when I say thank you, and God bless you.

And to those of you who've come over here today from Alabama, I just want to say that you have a true American hero for your Senator, Jeremiah Denton. And I'll be seeing him in my next stop in Birmingham later today. And, you know, looking at all these signs and everything, you'll forgive me, I have to mention one. It's way back in a little school called Eureka College in Illinois many years ago. A fraternity named Tau Kappa Epsilon not only made me a member, they gave me a job waiting tables or I couldn't have gone to school.

I can't help but see the young people who are here in the audience, and I have a special message to all of you from my roommate. [Laughter] When it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future and your country -- just say no. [Applause] Thank you.

You know, it's wonderful to be here in Georgia. And, you know, as I often say to my staff when we're taking off in Air Force One: It's great to get out of Washington and get back to where the real people are. You know, I probably couldn't do this much traveling when Congress was in session. As Mack Mattingly will tell you, that's because some of those folks need watching. [Laughter] Now, I have great respect for the institution, it's just some of the individuals that Mack and I criticize, as he has already, some of them need watching, really. Some of them remind me of that little story about three fellows who came out of a building and found they'd locked themselves out of their car. And one of them said, ``Well, get me a wire coathanger and I can straighten it out and figure out how to trip the handle with it.'' And the second one said, ``You can't do that. Someone will see us and think you're stealing the car.'' And the third one said, ``Well, we better do something quick, because it's starting to rain and the top's down.'' [Laughter] And that story says so much about the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend policies that left our country just a few short years ago with negative growth, double-digit inflation, the highest interest rates since -- get ready -- the War Between the States.

And so, as a part of the 1980 cleanup crew for the worst economic mess since the Great Depression, Mack Mattingly and I headed for Washington. And as he told you, we cut government growth, we slashed regulations, we cut income taxes -- yes, almost 25 percent. And today we're enjoying one of the longest economic expansions in history. In the last 47 months we have created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs, more jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in the past 10 years. Inflation, as Mack told you, has come down. It's plummeted from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent. The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loan rates are down. And, you know, I got the idea that our ideas were working when the opponents stopped calling it Reaganomics. Now, just a few days ago we learned that the figure that represents the country's economic growth -- gross national product, GNP -- and some other indicators show our economy gathering momentum for even more growth, higher take-home pay, and more new jobs. In short, we're headed for a second boom. And I'm determined to see that those who still are not sharing fully in our nation's prosperity do so. I give you my pledge: Neither Mack nor I will be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and until every American who wants a job has a job.

To broaden our expansion, I signed into law last week the most sweeping reform of the tax code in our nation's history. For more than 80 percent of Americans, it means a top tax rate of 15 percent or less -- and that's why I call it Tax Cut II. But wouldn't you know it, even before this fair share tax plan reached my desk, the Democratic leadership in Congress was saying that they wanted to break faith with the American people and turn tax reform into a tax hike. You know, the truth is those folks never met a tax they didn't like. [Laughter] When it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. [Laughter] But you, the American people, you know the truth. We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little. We have a deficit because Congress spends too much. Now, isn't it about time the Congress started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

The contrast between us and the leaders of the other party is just as apparent when it comes to judicial appointments. Now, you know a President appoints judges, but they have to be confirmed by the United States Senate, or they don't become a judge. Since I began appointing Federal judges to be approved by people like Mack Mattingly in the Republican Senate, the Federal judiciary has become tougher, much tougher, on criminals. Criminals are going to jail more often, and they're receiving longer sentences. Over and over, the Democratic leadership has tried in the Senate to torpedo our choices for judges. And that's where Mack Mattingly can make all the difference. Without him and the Republican majority in the Senate, we'll find liberals like Joe Biden and a certain fellow from Massachusetts deciding who our judges are. I'll bet you will agree: I'd rather have a Judiciary Committee headed by Strom Thurmond than one run by Joe Biden or Teddy Kennedy.

You know, I can't resist telling another story here. There was a Democratic fundraiser. And when the people were coming out of the affair at the end of it, there was a kid outside with some puppies. And he was holding up these puppies one by one, and he was saying, ``Pups for sale. Democratic pups for sale.'' And 2 weeks later the Republicans held a fundraiser in the same place, and the same kid was there with the puppies. And he was now holding up Republican puppies for sale. And a newspaper reporter who had seen him 2 weeks before said, ``Hey, kid, wait a minute.

Ladies and gentlemen, we've come now to an issue that transcends in importance even all the other crucial matters that I've mentioned: my most solemn duty as President, the safety of the American people and the security of these United States. Here, too, because of the support of men like Mack Mattingly, we've been able to restore America's strength, as he told you. There's nothing I'm prouder of than the 2 million young men and women who make up the Armed Forces of the United States. The only place where our opponents try to cut spending is with regard to the defense budget. And let me tell you, if we ever have to ask those young people to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that money can buy. And we're going to see that they get them. Because of our young men and women in uniform, things really have changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. We threw that sign away, and it now reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he will have to pay a price.

And finally, there's another special accomplishment. We must never forget that it was our decision to move ahead with SDI, that's Strategic Defense Initiative -- a defense initiative against ballistic missiles. It's that that brought the Soviet Union to the negotiating table, the bargaining table. And today we're dealing with the Soviet Union from a position of strength. And let me pledge to you today: Our goal today is to save the West from mutual nuclear terror, to make ballistic missiles obsolete, and ultimately to eliminate them from the face of the Earth. In Iceland we came closer to real arms reduction than ever before, but Mr. Gorbachev decided to make progress hostage to demands that we kill SDI. I had to remind him that SDI is America's insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madman who might come along, as they have in past history, or just in case the Soviets don't keep their side of the bargain.

Well, and keeping my word was what I tried to do in Iceland. What we need in Washington is a Congress that won't give away at the conference table what we refused to surrender at the negotiating table in Reykjavik, Iceland. No responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for his country's safety. As a matter of fact, a good friend of mine and a great student of history has written a book I recommend, certainly to anyone in public life. It's called ``The Treaty Trap,'' and it is a history of treaties going clear back beyond the birth of Chirst. And history shows that any nation that depended on paper, a treaty, to protect its interests instead of keeping its hardware up -- that nation didn't stay around very long to write many of our pages in history. No responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for this country's safety. The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises, and each has its own track record. And I'll bet on our technology any time.

I know this crowd couldn't be here in this place unless among you there were a number of Democrats. No, I want you to know. No, I know that during these past 6 years as President I have relied again and again upon the support of Democrats like those who would be present at this gathering. And I thank them.

Here in Georgia the choice couldn't be any clearer this year. While Mack and I have been a team, Mack's opponent [Wyche Fowler, Jr.] has voted against me more often than any other member of the Georgia delegation. He was the only Georgian opposed to the balanced budget amendment and he voted against the B - 1 bomber, the Peacekeeper missile, strategic defense, and 13 times against helping the freedom fighters in Central America. And according to the Veterans of Foreign Wars, he voted against veterans more often than anyone in the entire United States Congress.

Ladies and gentlemen, the eyes of America are on you and your great State. Will you choose the Democratic leaders who in 1980 weakened our nation and nearly brought our economy to its knees, who raised your taxes and have announced their plans to do so again, who oppose our efforts to build a defense to protect us from attack by nuclear ballistic missiles? Or will you choose to give the cleanup crew of 1980 a chance to finish the job? Well, now, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct an informal poll. [Laughter] So, speak up loudly, and let all America hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

The President. Thank you. You just made my day, and you didn't make Mack unhappy either. You know, my name will never appear on a ballot again, but if you'd like to vote for me one more time, you can do so by voting for Mack Mattingly.

Well, it's time to go now. But before leaving, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young people, you young Americans, the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. Sometimes those of us -- my own generation and generations between mine and yours -- sometimes we slipped up and let things get out of hand, as we did several years ago. But that has to be our sacred pledge. And when we look at you -- when we see your openness, your enthusiam for America and for life itself -- it gives us heart. My friends, in casting your vote for Mack Mattingly, you'll be winning one for yourselves, for Georgia, and for America. Thank you. God bless you. Thank you very much.

Just days ago we learned that the figure that represents the country's economic growth, the gross national product, and some other indicators show our economy gathering momentum for even more growth, higher take-home pay, and more new jobs. In short, we're headed for a second boom. I'm determined to see that those who still are not sharing fully in our nation's prosperity do so. And I give you my pledge: Neither Jerry nor I will be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and until every American who wants a job has a job.

And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. [Laughter] The American people know the truth: We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little; we have a deficit because Congress spends too much. Isn't it about time the Congress started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

I don't know why, but around about here I always feel like telling a story. And maybe some of you have heard it, but then you've got to remember that after you pass 40, you begin telling stories over and over again. [Laughter] This is a story about a Democratic fundraiser in a downtown hotel. And when they started coming out of the fundraiser, there was a kid outside with a bunch of puppies.

Because of our young men and women in uniform, things have really changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. We threw that sign away. Now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' It's still a difficult and dangerous world out there, but with Jerry's help, we've made ourselves stronger and better prepared to deal with it. And I just have to believe that with Jeremiah Denton chairing the Senate Subcommittee on Security and Terrorism every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he will have a price to pay. Another thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been set free.

Iceland we came closer to real arms reduction than ever before, but Mr. Gorbachev decided to make progress hostage to demands that we kill SDI. I had to remind him that SDI is America's insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madman who might come along, as a Hitler came along, or just in case the Soviets don't keep their side of the bargain. And I had to remind Mr. Gorbachev of my pledge to the American people to never abandon SDI and that in America when you give your word, you keep your word. So, that's all I did in Iceland was try to keep my word. What we need in Washington is a Congress that won't give away at the conference table what we refused to surrender at the negotiating table in Reykjavik, Iceland. No responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for his country's safety. The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. Each has its own track record. And I'll bet on American technology any time.

I want you to know that during these past 6 years as President I've relied again and again upon the support of Democrats like you who are here today, and I thank you. As you may know, I used to be a Democrat myself until I learned that the liberal leadership of that party had become completely out of step with the hard-working and patriotic men and women who make up the Democratic Party across this nation. I know how tough it can be to break with tradition. As a matter of fact, after I had decided that I could no longer follow that leadership and I began campaigning for Republican candidates, I still hadn't gotten around to reregistering. And then one night I was speaking to a Republican fundraiser.

You know, my name will never appear on a ballot again, but if you'd like to vote for me one more time, you can do so by voting for Jerry. But important as this election will be to me, it'll be even more important to you, and especially to you young people, because it's going to shape our nation's future. And every poll shows that the age group from 18 to 24 has the highest percentage of that group on our side. But every poll shows just as clearly that in that same age group, 18 to 24, you have the lowest voter turnout. So, to you young people here: Not only go out prepared to vote, but go out as missionaries and buttonhole your friends and tell them to get on the ball and vote. That's the only way you're going to have a voice in what kind of a country you're going to live in. Now, exercise your sacred right as Americans and participate in shaping history itself. And, as I say, do it by casting your vote.

Well, it's coming on time to go now. But before leaving, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us when it came our turn. And when we look at you and when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us heart.

The President. Thank you all. And before I get into my remarks here -- I've just learned upon arrival that many of our friends in South Carolina are with us today by way of radio and television, so if you'll permit me, I'd just like to extend my best wishes to two outstanding Congressmen, the next Governor and Lieutenant Governor of South Carolina, Carroll Campbell and Tommy Harnett.

But thank you, Jim, for that kind introduction. And I want you and every one here to know what an honor it is to share this platform with so many of North Carolina's finest public officials devoted to their State and Nation -- my friends, Governor Jim Martin and Congressmen Alex McMillan and Bill Hendon. And since you and I both need Alex McMillan in Washington, could I ask the people of this congressional district a favor? On November 4th, send him back -- send them both back. And I violated protocol there in the order of reading them off, but also Senator Jesse Helms.

I can't help but see the young people here in the audience, and I have a special message to you from my roommate. [Laughter] She said to tell you when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future and your country -- just say no.

But that story says so much about how the tax-and-tax, spend-and-spend policies left our country just a few short years ago: negative growth, double-digit inflation, the highest interest rates since -- get ready -- the War Between the States. And so, as part of that 1980 cleanup crew for the worst economic mess since the Great Depression, Jim Broyhill and I headed for Washington. We cut government growth, slashed regulations, and cut income taxes almost 25 percent. Today we're enjoying one of the longest economic recoveries -- expansions, I should say, not recovery anymore, in history, creating over 11\1/2\ million new jobs in the last 47 months. That's more jobs than Western Europe and Japan combined have created in the past 10 years. Inflation has plummeted from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent. The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loans are down. And, you know, all of those people that didn't like it and were making fun of it and criticizing me and so forth -- I could tell it was succeeding when they stopped calling it Reaganomics.

Now, just days ago we learned that the figure that represents the country's economic growth, the gross national product, and some other indications show our economy gathering momentum for even more growth, higher take-home pay, and more new jobs. In short, we're headed for a second boom. And I'm determined to see that those who still are not sharing fully in our nation's prosperity do so. And I give you my pledge: Neither Jim nor I will be satisfied, nor these others here on the platform, until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and until every American who wants a job gets one.

When it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pockets. And believe me, they never leave home without it. [Laughter] The American people know the truth: We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little; we have a deficit because Congress spends too much. Isn't it about time that they start protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

But, ladies and gentlemen, we've come now to an issue that transcends in importance even all the other crucial matters that I've mentioned: my most solemn duty as President, the safety of the American people and the security of these United States. Here, too, because of the support of men like Jim Broyhill, we've been able to restore America's strength. There's nothing I'm prouder of than the 2 million young men and women who make up the Armed Forces of the United States. And with all those who would hack away at the budget for the Defense Department, let me tell you: If we must ever ask these young people to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that money can buy and Jim Broyhill's help.

You know, because of our young men and women in uniform, things really have changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we threw that sign away. Now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he'll have to pay a price. One other thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been set free.

What we need in Washington is a Congress that won't give away at the conference table what we refused to surrender at the negotiating table in Reykjavik, Iceland. Now, no responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for his country's safety. To those of you who might like some heavy reading, a friend of mine and a great student of history, Larry Beilenson, authored a book some years ago called ``The Treaty Trap.'' He had done exhaustive research on the history of treaties going back thousands of years. And he had found that no country which ever put its faith in the paper of a treaty and let its hardware go away ever stayed around very long to add more pages to history. So, no responsible President should rely solely on a piece of paper for his country's safety. The record of Soviet treaty violation is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. Each has its own track record. I'll bet on American technology any day.

With all these bands around, I have to tell you a little thing that helps illustrate this. I was the drum major of a boys band in Dixon, Illinois, when we were invited to lead the parade in a nearby town on Decoration Day. And the marshal of the parade on a big white horse was up in front, but then he turned and galloped back down the parade to see that everything was coming along all right. And I was out in front pumping my baton, and the band was playing, and we were marching down the street. And suddenly I began to think the music was sounding fainter and fainter. [Laughter] And I turned around, took a look. It seems he had ridden back up just in time to turn the band down the street to the right -- [laughter] -- and I, like the Democratic leaders of today, was going down the street all by myself.

And if I could interject something here: One position taken by Jim's opponent really touched my temperature control. As Commander in Chief, every day I see the threats posed by terrorists and strongmen to our men and women in uniform.

Then I learn that Jim's opponent has stated that in foreign policy America behaves like a bullyboy in the schoolyard. Imagine that, Jim's opponent still believes in blaming America first. Well, I don't believe the people of this great State want a Senator like that.

Senator like Jim Broyhill, a Senator who believes in peace through strength. And this, then, is what it comes down to. In Jim's opponent you have a man who would vote to raise your taxes, vote to weaken our defenses, and vote to blame America first. But in Jim Broyhill you have a Senator with more than two decades of experience at getting things done for the people of North Carolina; a Senator who believes, as I say, in peace through strength, who led the fight to cut your taxes and create new jobs; and a Senator who believes in the goodness and decency of the American people and in the greatness of our nation. The truth is, the best man for the job is already on the job. Ladies and gentlemen, the eyes of America are on you and your great State. Will you choose the Democratic leaders who in 1980 weakened our nation and nearly brought our economy to its knees, who raised your taxes and have announced their plans to do so again, and who opposed efforts to build a defense to protect us from attack by nuclear ballistic missiles? Or will you choose to give the cleanup crew of 1980 a chance to finish the job?

But important as this election will be to me, it'll be even more important to you, and especially to all you young people, for it'll shape our nation's future. Every poll shows that the age group between 18 and 24 gives us and what we're doing the highest support of any age group. But now -- wait a minute, there's more -- every poll shows just as clearly that it's that same age group, 18 to 24, that has the lowest voter turnout. So, to you young people who are in that group: Exercise your sacred right as an American, participate in shaping history itself by going to the polls and casting your vote.

Marshall, if the United States had a secret weapon, and if so, what was it. And General Marshall said, ``Yes, we have a secret weapon. It's the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' And I've been all over the country, and I've seen your fellows of your generation. And I want to tell you if General Marshall was around today he'd say, once again, you are the best blankety-blank kids in the world.

In reality, even to the youngest of you here, you're what this election is all about. The people of my age, and those generations between mine and yours -- sometimes we've slowed down and let things get out of hand in this country. And then we've brought them back into line, because we have a sacred trust, and we have a pledge that we have to make. And that is that when it's your turn to take over the country that we will be able to turn over to you the same kind of country of opportunity and freedom and strength that was turned over to us by our parents and grandparents. And when we look at you, when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us heart to continue keeping that pledge to you. My friends, in casting your vote for Jim Broyhill, you'll be winning one for yourselves, you'll be winning one for North Carolina, and you'll be winning one for America. And will you forgive me if I say, you'll be winning one for the Gipper! Thank you all. God bless you all.

I am disapproving H.R. 4175 because it would not repeal the Maritime Administration's Title XI loan program, as I proposed in the 1987 Budget. This program is one of several Federal credit programs that I proposed to reduce or phase out in order to limit the government's intervention in the Nation's lending market.

Achievement of our credit reform goals is important to the maritime industry and the economy as a whole. The maritime industry must be encouraged to rely on the private credit market, without Federal intervention, as its source of capital if we are to continue our progress toward restoring that industry to full health. Borrowers in general must be freed from the government's preemptive allocation of credit, which forces unsubsidized borrowers to pay more for credit and may result in some borrowers being ``crowded out'' entirely.

I am also not approving H.R. 4175 because it would continue to authorize appropriations for financial assistance to State maritime schools. Such an authorization of appropriations is entirely inappropriate during this time of necessary fiscal restraint.

You know, Rick, and all of those nice things that you said about your good people here -- I owe a tremendous debt to the people of Indiana. In the Presidential primaries and elections of 1976, 1980, and 1984, you were always very supportive, and I just want you all to know that I was grateful then and I'm grateful today. And there's another reason why I and many Americans feel gratitude to you. Incidentally, before I go on in my remarks, too, I'm sorry that out there in the motorcade I had to miss Joan Moore's singing of our national anthem.

Well, there's another reason why I feel gratitude to all of you: You've sent to Washington some of the finest Representatives in the Capital. And I refer here to Senators Dick Lugar, Dan Quayle, and a great Congressman like Dan Burton. And, as you know, I'm here today because I was hoping you could right a great injustice and send us one more Republican to the next section [session] of the Congress. And I promise, I'll get to that in just a few moments. And believe me, as a farmer says, I intend to throw some hay down here where the goats can get at it.

I can't help but see these young people here in the audience, and I have a special message for all of you from my roommate. [Laughter] She said to tell you that when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future, and your country -- just say no.

Well, it's wonderful to be here in Indiana. As you know, as I often say to my staff when we're taking off in Air Force One, it's great to get out of Washington and get back to where the real people are. Now, you probably know I couldn't do this much traveling when Congress was in session. As Rick McIntyre will tell you, that's because some of the folks back there need watching. [Laughter] Now, I am not taking a crack at the institution of the Congress; it's fine.

I'm talking about some individuals there. You know, they remind me, in the way they do governmental business -- these ones I'm talking about -- of the three fellows that came out of a building and found they'd locked themselves out of their car. And one of them said, ``Get me a wire coathanger.

That story says so much about how the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend policies left our country, just a few short years ago, with negative growth, double-digit inflation, the highest rates since -- get ready -- the highest rates since the Civil War. And so, as a part of that 1980 cleanup crew for the worst economic mess since the Great Depression, we Republicans headed for Washington. We cut government growth, we slashed regulations, and cut income taxes almost 25 percent. Today we're enjoying one of the longest economic expansions in our history. The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loan rates are down. Inflation has plummeted from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent. And we've created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs in a little less than 4 years. That's more jobs than Western Europe and Japan combined have created in the past 10 years. And you know, our economic recovery programs were widely criticized by some of those people I was talking about a moment ago in Washington. And they were taking cracks at them and even making fun of them. I really could tell when our plan was beginning to work because they stopped calling it Reaganomics.

Rick's opponent [Frank McCloskey] is a card-carrying member of the tax-and-spend crew. He has voted repeatedly to block our cuts in the Federal budget and for higher and higher taxes. But Rick McIntyre and the American people know the truth. They know we don't have a deficit because Congress spends too much -- or I mean, we don't have it because we're taxed too little; we do have it because Congress spends too much. Made a slip there. I was trying to read that sign they're holding up. Isn't it about time that the Congress started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

And finally, there's another special accomplishment. We remain committed to our decision to move ahead with our Strategic Defense Initiative against ballistic missiles, the thing we call SDI. Today we're dealing with the Soviet Union from a position of strength, and it was SDI that brought the Soviet Union to the bargaining table. And let me pledge to you: Our goal is to keep America strong, to save the West from mutual nuclear terror, to make ballistic missiles obsolete, and ultimately to eliminate them from the face of the Earth. SDI is America's insurance policy to protect us against accidents or some madman like a Hitler or a Qadhafi who might come along, or just in case the Soviets don't keep their side of a bargain. The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. And I'll bet on American technology every time.

Now, I knew there were those who had their doubts, but flying back from Iceland, I knew the American people would support firmness with the Soviet Union. So, I couldn't come here today without thanking each one of you for that support.

The President. No, no, now wait a minute. No, no, hear me out. I couldn't come here today without thanking them for their support. I want you to know that during these past 6 years as President, I've relied again and again when the chips were down, on the support of some of the Democrats like those who are probably here. And I thank them, because, as you may know, I used to be a Democrat myself. Yes -- wait a minute -- until I learned that the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party had gone a direction that took them completely out of step with millions of hard-working, patriotic men and women who make up the Democratic Party across the country.

With all these bands present I have to tell you that I was once the drum major of a boys band in Dixon, Illinois. And I had a little experience that now seems to me like what I've seen happening to the Democratic Party. We were invited to a neighboring town to lead their parade on Memorial Day. Really leading the parade, of course, was the parade marshal on a big white horse out in front of me there. We're going down the street and suddenly he turned and rode back down the parade to make sure everything was coming along all right. And I'm pumping that baton and the band is playing, and suddenly, music began to sound a little faint. [Laughter] And I kind of sneaked a look over my shoulder. The man on the horse had gotten back just in time to turn my band to the right down an intersection and I was all alone, going up the street by myself. [Laughter] Well, that's what's happened with the Democratic Party.

And there's no better example than what happened to Rick McIntyre. Twice -- twice the votes showed that he was certified as the duly elected representative of this district, but the Democrats in the House, on a strictly partisan vote, simply refused to seat him. It was an act of unprecedented arrogance. If there's one thing that makes this country of ours great and strong, it is that we are a federation of sovereign States. And this is unique in most all the world. But these individuals, these Democrat leaders, would like to make the States into just administrative districts of the Federal Government. Well, don't let that happen.

You, the people of Indiana, said officially, and in keeping with your rules and regulations of elections, that you had elected Rick McIntyre. And a little group in the Congress of the United States said no and overrode your State. Well, they threw your votes out the window and, in a naked display of power politics, as you know, just turned the district over to someone else.

Ladies and gentlemen, the eyes of America are on you and your great State. If you've often thought about all that could be achieved if we had more Republicans to join that gallant band of 180 that we now have in the House, I ask you: Will you choose the Democratic leaders who in 1980 weakened our nation and nearly brought our economy to its knees, who raised your taxes and have announced their plans to do so again, who oppose our efforts to pursue a defense to protect us from attack by nuclear ballistic missiles? Or will you choose to give the cleanup crew of 1980 a chance to finish the job?

The President. I'm due out in South Dakota. Before leaving, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. When we look at you -- when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself -- it gives us heart and it strengthens our pledge. My generation and those other generations in here that are between mine and yours -- that is our obligation.

There have been times in recent years when some in the Government have shaken our faith that that might continue and be true. But now it is, and we're pledged to see that we give you that kind of country when it's your turn -- that, as I say, our parents and grandparents gave to us.

The President. I was told that Tau Kappa Epsilon was a fraternity for life. And I found out they not only made me a member at Eureka, but they gave me a job so I could go to school -- waiting tables in the fraternity house.

The President. Thank you. And, Jim, thank you for that most generous introduction. My thanks also to some bands that have been making beautiful music: the Central High Band, the Douglas High Band, and the Stevens High Band. You know, it's an honor to be here today in Rapid City, not so far from the places that President Theodore Roosevelt used to visit back around the turn of the century. Teddy told me how grateful he was that I'd suggested he come here.

And would you forgive me if I say a special word to a young man seated out there in the audience? Not long ago, a third grader at the Cleghorn School mailed me a letter asking me to visit his class for show-and-tell. [Laughter] Well, time wouldn't permit. I wasn't able to go to the class, so the class came here. And greetings, then, to my young friend, Kent Powell, and to the entire third grade class from the Cleghorn School. And to all the young people here in the audience, I have a special message to you from my roommate.

Well, it's wonderful to be here in Rapid City. And you know, as I often say to my staff when we're getting into Air Force One and taking off in Washington, it's great to get out of Washington and get back to where the real people are. Now, you probably know I couldn't do this much traveling when Congress was in session, as Jim Abdnor will tell you. That's because some of those folks need watching. [Laughter] Now, I'm not complaining about the institution of the Congress; that I respect very much.

But that story says so much about how the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend policies left our country just a few short years ago: negative growth, double-digit inflation, the highest rates since -- and get ready -- the highest rates since the Civil War. And so, as a part of that 1980 cleanup crew for the worst economic mess since the Great Depression, Jim and I headed for Washington. We cut government growth, slashed regulations, and cut income taxes almost 25 percent. And today we're enjoying one of the longest economic expansions in our history. The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loan rates are down.

Inflation has plummeted from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent. And we've created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs in a little less than 4 years -- more jobs than Western Europe and Japan combined have created in the past 10 years. And you know, when we started that economic plan for recovery and expansion, there were a lot of people critical of it back there and making fun of it and so forth. And I could tell that the plan was working when those people stopped calling it Reaganomics.

And I give you my pledge that neither Jim nor I will be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and every home in America and until every American who wants a job has a job.

American people know the truth: We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little; we have a deficit because the Congress spends too much. Now, isn't it about time they started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

Two weeks later the Republicans held a fundraiser in the same place. People were coming out, and there was the same kid with the puppies, saying, ``Buy a Republican pup. Buy a Republican puppy.'' And a newspaperman that had seen him there 2 weeks before said, ``Hey, kid, wait a minute. Two weeks ago you were trying to sell those pups as Democrats. Now you're selling them as Republicans.

Finally, there's another special accomplishment. We remain committed to our decision to move ahead with our Strategic Defense Initiative against ballistic missiles, the SDI. Today we're dealing with the Soviet Union from a position of strength, and it was SDI that brought the Soviet Union to the bargaining table. And let me pledge to you: I pledge to you our goal is to keep America strong, to save the West from nuclear terror, to make ballistic missiles obsolete, and ultimately to eliminate them from the face of the Earth. SDI is America's insurance policy to protect us from accidents, or just in case -- well, or any madman who might come along, like a Hitler or a Qadhafi, or just in case the Soviets don't keep their side of a bargain. The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. And each has its own track record. I'll bet on American technology any time.

I knew that there were those who had their doubts, but flying back from Iceland, I knew the American people would support firmness with the Soviet Union. So, I couldn't come here today without thanking each one of you for that support. And I also want to make an announcement. Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze will meet next week in Vienna. These meetings will be a followup to the discussions Mr. Gorbachev and I had at Reykjavik, Iceland, 2 weeks ago. I have directed Secretary Shultz to tell Mr. Shevardnadze the proposals we put on the table in Iceland remain on the table and we're ready to take up where we left off in Reykjavik. We want to confirm and build on the agreements reached there. We hope the Soviets are prepared to join us to reduce the threat of nuclear weapons. And I believe this is a unique opportunity for progress if the Soviets are willing to move forward.

Here in South Dakota the choice couldn't be any clearer. Jim Abdnor has voted to cut your taxes and keep America strong. He's a man who stands where he says he stands. And then there's Jim's opponent [Thomas A.

Daschle], who talks moderate at home but votes liberal in Washington. Whether the issue is national defense or highway funding, the people of South Dakota deserve better than a man who votes against the views and interests of his constituents and then tries to alibi his way out of it. Jim Abdnor is one of the most effective Members of the entire Senate, the original sponsor of 7 bills that have become law, the author of more than 50 amendments. The list of his legislative achievements goes on. Just today, Air Force One landed on a new runway at Ellsworth Air Force Base. It was built to accommodate the B - 1's Jim has worked so hard to bring here -- B - 1's that Jim's opponent voted to cripple by cutting their funding. And in coming days, I'll be signing into law Jim's water development bill, a bill that breaks a more than decade-long stalemate in water development projects built by the Corps of Engineers.

Well, this, then, is what it comes down to. In Jim's opponent you have a man who would vote to raise your taxes, vote to weaken our defenses, and vote to take us back to the grim days of the seventies. But in Jim Abdnor you have a Senator with 6 years of experience in the Senate at getting things done for the people of South Dakota. He is a Senator who believes in peace through strength; a Senator who led the fight to cut your taxes and create new jobs; and a Senator who believes in the goodness and decency of the American people and, just as you heard up here, in the greatness of this nation. My friends, let's come together to see to it that this once -- just this once -- the nice guy finishes first. Ladies and gentlemen, the eyes of America are on you and your great State. Will you choose the Democratic leaders who in 1980 weakened our nation and nearly brought our economy to its knees, who raised your taxes and have announced their plans to do so again, who oppose our efforts to pursue a defense to protect us from attack by nuclear ballistic missiles? Or will you choose to give the cleanup crew of 1980 a chance to finish the job?

Now, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct an informal poll. Speak up loudly so that all America can hear you. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans a country with the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed to us. And every generation between mine and yours in this room -- we all have the same pledge.

That's what we're going to do: to give you the kind of America -- sometimes we've slipped a little over the years when some of those people I've talked about before have their way, but we always come back. And right now, here again, it is that kind of a country. And when it's your turn to take charge, that's what we're going to turn over to you. When we look at you, we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, and it gives us heart.

The President. Thank you all. And Ken Kramer, thank you very much for that most gracious and generous introduction. And you know, the way all of you have been cheering, I thought maybe the Broncos had come in. But it is a pleasure to come here to Colorado Springs, home of one of our nation's finest and proudest institutions, the Air Force Academy. You know, I did a little research and discovered that the Academy was founded in 1954. Now, how do you like that? An august institution of higher learning that's younger than I am. In fact, flying in yesterday we had kind of an exciting moment. Our pilot, Air Force Colonel Ruddick wanted to do a loop-to-loop to show off to everybody down below. [Laughter] But there's a name for the pride and courage that the Academy instills, and the way I see it, it applies to all of Colorado Springs. It's called the right stuff.

Now, since I used to be a drum major of a boys band myself, I'd like to give some credit and my thanks to some groups that have been making beautiful music: the Cheyenne Mountain High School Band and the Colorado Springs Children's Chorale.

And now, I can't help but see the young people here in the audience. And I have a special message for all of you. It's from my roommate. [Laughter] She says to tell you that when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future and your country -- just say no.

The President. I've got to make a kind of personal greeting here, also, when I'm recognizing everyone. Because right down here in front with a sign, I've got some fraternity brothers -- TKE. I've discovered it really was what they told me: a fraternity for life.

The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loan rates are down. Inflation has plummeted from more than the double-digit figure that Ken told you about to, now, 1.8 percent. And we've created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs in a little less than 4 years. Now, that's more new jobs than Japan and all of our friends in Western Europe combined have created in the last 10 years. You know, when we started this economic recovery program of ours, there were a lot of people against it and some making fun and some bitterly criticizing it; but I really realized it was working when those people stopped calling it Reaganomics.

Now, to broaden our expansion, I signed into law last week the most sweeping reform of the tax code in our nation's history. For more than 80 percent of Americans, it means a top tax rate of 15 percent or less, and that's why I'm calling it Tax Cut II. But wouldn't you know it, even before this fair share tax plan reached my desk, the Democratic leadership in Congress was saying that they wanted to break faith with the American people and turn tax reform into a tax increase. You know, the truth is, those folks never met a tax they didn't like.

Now, the contrast between us and the leaders of the other party is just as apparent when it comes to judicial appointments. Since I began appointing Federal judges, which is one of my jobs -- they then have to be approved by the Senate, and in this case, the Republican Senate -- the Federal judiciary has become tougher, much tougher, on criminals. Criminals are going to jail more often and receiving longer sentences. But over and over the Democratic leadership has tried in the Senate to torpedo our choices for judges, and that's where Ken can make all the difference. Without him and the Republican majority in the Senate, we'll find liberals, like a certain fellow from Massachusetts, deciding who our judges are. And why do I think that you'll agree when I say that I'd rather have a Judiciary Committee headed, as it is, by Strom Thurmond than one headed by Teddy Kennedy any day?

You know -- in these partisan politics -- you know, there was a Democratic fundraising event at a downtown hotel. And as the people were coming out from the event, there was a boy, a kid out there with a bunch of puppies. And he was holding them up for sale, and he was saying, ``Buy a Democrat puppy. Buy a Democrat puppy.'' But 2 weeks later the Republicans held a fundraiser there.

America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that we can produce. Ken's opponent and those like him would do their best to continue hacking away at the defense budget to where that wouldn't be true. Well, we're going to see that those young men and women in uniform get the tools they need. You know, because of those young men and women in uniform, things really have changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we've thrown that one away, and now the sign reads ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America he will have a price to pay. And one other thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been freed.

And finally, there's another special issue. We remain committed to our decision to move ahead with our Strategic Defense Initiative against ballistic missiles, the SDI. Today we're dealing with the Soviet Union from a position of strength, and it was SDI that brought the Soviet Union to the bargaining table. And let me pledge to you: Our goal is to keep America strong, to save the West from mutual nuclear terror, to make ballistic missiles obsolete, and ultimately to remove them from the face of the Earth. SDI is America's insurance policy to protect us from accidents or some madman who might come along, as a Hitler did or a Qadhafi, or just in case the Soviets don't keep their side of a bargain. Now, the record on Soviet treaty violations is clear.

Each has its own track record. And as for me, I'm going to bet on American technology every time. Now, I knew there were those who had their doubts, but flying back from Iceland, I just knew the American people would support firmness with the Soviet Union. So, I couldn't come here today without thanking each one of you for that support.

There are some people that don't quite understand about SDI and what it really amounts to. And I think I'd just like to say very simply what our -- from the very beginning of our thinking of it. It is a shield that we believe, and our scientists believe, can protect a nation against incoming nuclear missiles. Our present defense policy is the one called the MAD policy, mutual assured destruction, meaning that if we've got a lot of missiles and they've got a lot of missiles, well, we're both so scared of each other that maybe we'll never shoot them. That's a little flimsy. Now, we are researching and studying and have made breakthroughs in this SDI program. But to those people who don't quite understand it -- and I've seen a couple of signs around here that indicate that they don't -- [laughter] -- let me point out what our proposal was to the Soviet Union -- and still is. If and when we have developed that system, that we know we have a defensive shield, we will then appeal to the Soviet Union to join us in eliminating all the strategic and intermediate-range nuclear missiles. And then we will share SDI with them, so that we can both live in comfort, go down through the years without having to be suspicious of each other. I told that to Mr. Gorbachev. I haven't quite been able to convince him I mean it.

But a liberal in moderate's clothing -- that's Ken's opponent all over. But if you want a Senator who talks down-to-earth common sense in Colorado, then votes that way in Washington, well, then Ken Kramer is your candidate. Again and again, Ken has proven crucial in our efforts to cut your taxes and get big government off your backs. He's been central in our efforts to rebuild the nation's defenses. From the beginning he's been a strong supporter of our Strategic Defense Initiative. And he helped convince the administration to put the major research center that will be the brains of SDI right here in Colorado. As Ken understands, our Strategic Defense Initiative will open the door to a new technological age.

Just as America's space program created new jobs and industries, SDI could open whole new fields of technology and industry, providing jobs for thousands, as Ken said, right here in Colorado and improving the quality of life in America and around the world.

At the same time, Ken has been tireless in his efforts to preserve the environment. He believes, as I do, that a big part of being conservative is conserving things like clean air and water and the natural beauty of this Rocky Mountain State. To this end, Ken was a leader in seeing that the Superfund for cleaning toxic waste sites was reenacted. And I know you'll also be glad to hear that, with his support and direction, we're making the cleanup job at the Rocky Mountain Arsenal a number one priority.

Well, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct a kind of an informal poll. [Laughter] Now, I want you to speak up loudly so all America can hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

The President. Thank you. If you'd like to vote for me one more time, you can do so by voting for Ken Kramer. But important as this election is to me, it'll be even more important to you, and especially to you young people, for it will shape our nation's history. Every poll shows that the age group between 18 and 24 has the highest percentage of any age group in supporting what we're doing. But, now, there's one other thing, though. The polls also show that in that particular age group, you have the lowest percentage of voters who are turning out on election day to vote.

Go to the polls and cast your vote. But more than that, go out of here as missionaries and buttonhole your friends in that age group and tell them they've got to do the same thing. You know, at the beginning of World War II someone asked the Chief of Staff of the United States Army, General George C. Marshall, if the United States was going into the war with a secret weapon and, if so, what was it? And George Marshall said: ``Yes, we have a secret weapon. It's just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' Well, I've been all over the country, back and forth. I've been on campuses. I've been in high schools. I've seen the young people in the service. I see all of you. And I have to tell you, if General George Marshall were here today, he'd say you're the best blankety-blank kids in the world.

The President. I have to go over to Nevada yet today. They've got somebody running over there, too. [Laughter] But before I go, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed over to us. And when we look at you, and when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us heart. My generation and all the generations in here between mine and yours -- this is our obligation. There have been times over the years when we've faltered and when America seemed to lose some of those great values that are so precious. But we have them back in action now.

You know, there's one thing in this election. I've heard some people here, and they're talking about checks and balances and so forth in government. And they're a little mixed up. If you like what Chic Hecht has been doing up there -- and he's been doing like Paul Laxalt has been doing -- why should you send a Senator up there with him to cancel his vote?

Send someone who will vote with him. And now, having been Governor myself for some time, I think I recognize good Governor material when I see it, and believe me, Patty Cafferata and her running mate, Joe Brown, are the very best. And I know that her running mate will do a good job in filling the shoes of Robert Cashell, who's the outgoing Lieutenant Governor.

It's wonderful to be here in Nevada. And, you know, as I often say to my staff when we're taking off in Air Force One, it's great to get out of Washington and get back where the real people are. Now, you probably know that I couldn't do this much traveling when Congress was in session, as Jim Santini will tell you. That's because some of those folks need watching. Now, I am not saying anything against the institution of the Congress; I respect it highly.

But there are some people up there that -- well, those individuals, their approach to doing government business reminds me of the three fellows that came out of a building one day and found they'd locked themselves out of their car.

Inflation has plummeted from more than 12 percent when we got there to 1.8 percent. And we've created more than 11\1/2\ million new jobs in less than 4 years -- more jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in 10 years. Of course, you know when we started that economic program for recovery and expansion there were a lot of criticism and a lot of people making fun and some of them downright angry. And yet I knew that the program was working when they stopped calling it Reaganomics.

I go any further, I want to give you some good news. Following last week's announcements showing gross national product -- that's the figure, GNP, that represents the country's economic growth -- and other indicators show our economy is gathering momentum. Just this morning we learned the trade deficit in September declined for the second month in a row and is down now 30 percent from its high. This is particularly good news for our manufacturing industries. We also learned new home sales in September were up over 10 percent. The stock market today went in a sharp upswing and is now almost touching the all-time high. I believe the economy is on a roll and think it's a sure bet that we're about to hit another jackpot. Now, we pulled the handle, and it came up jobs, jobs, jobs. And I'm determined to see that those who still are not sharing fully in our nation's prosperity do so. And I give you my pledge: Neither Jim Santini nor I will be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and every home in America and until every American who wants a job has a job.

The President. You're right. You know, the truth is, those folks never met a tax they didn't like. And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pocket. And believe me, they never leave home without it. The American people know the truth: We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little; we have a deficit because Congress spends too much. Now, isn't it about time they started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

Now the contrast between us and the leaders of the other party is just as apparent when it comes to judicial appointments. Now, you know the President appoints the Federal judges, but they have to be approved by the United States Senate.

You know, because of our young men and women in uniform, things have really changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we threw that sign away, and now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America he will have a price to pay. And one other thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been freed from communist tyranny.

Their record on treaty violations is very clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. Each has its own track record. And I'll bet on American technology any time. Now, I knew there were those who had their doubts, but flying back from Iceland, I knew the American people would support firmness with the Soviet Union. So, I couldn't come here today without thanking each of you for that support. To you students, I have to confess I'm not a linguist, but I was very proud of one little foray I made into the use of a foreign language while we were in Iceland. I spoke Russian. I said to General Secretary Gorbachev, ``Dovorey no provorey.'' It means trust but verify.

That may tell you we never could have come this far without the support of people like Jim Santini. I remember back in 1981 when we needed all the help we could get to cut your taxes and get this economic expansion rolling. Jim was a Democrat back then, but despite threats from the liberal Democratic Party leadership, Jim Santini promised me his support. And Jim Santini is as good as his word. He came through with the votes. Just as over and over again, Jim Santini has come through for the great State of Nevada.

It's time we got some facts out about Jim's opponent. I don't think the seriously independent people of Nevada want as their Senator a tax-and-spend liberal who's against a balanced budget amendment. And I don't want anybody to think I'm taking this personally. But Jim's opponent voted against me more often than Teddy Kennedy, and that's saying something.

I know I couldn't be speaking to a crowd like this without there being a number of Democrats and Independents present here in the audience. And I know these Democrats -- and I've seen them all across the country -- as hard-working, patriotic people whose support I've relied on during these past 6 years. But to those Nevada Democrats: I used to be a Democrat myself, just like Jim. And I must tell you from my heart that Jim Santini represents your views far better than the liberals who run the Democratic Party in Washington -- and, yes, right here in Nevada. So, I ask all Nevada Democrats whether just maybe they ought to join the Republican Party as Jim and I did. I know it isn't easy, but as Winston Churchill, that great British statesman -- when he was in the Parliament, Churchill changed parties and was criticized and maligned for doing so. And Churchill summed it all up. He said, ``Some men change principle for party, and others change party for principle.'' And even if you can't quite bring yourself to change parties, well, you can still send the liberals a message by voting for Jim Santini.

I have to tell you a little experience I had that sort of fits what I've seen happen to the party that Jim and I once belonged to and why I know that there must be some Democrats here -- because I've met them all across the country -- who know that they're out of step with the leadership. When I was that drum major, that I mentioned, in that band, we were taken to a little neighboring town to lead the Decoration Day parade. Well, the real leader, of course, was the marshal of the parade on a big white horse up in front. But we're going down the street. I'm pumping the baton, the band is playing. And he gallops back down the line of parade to see if everything's coming along all right. And pretty soon, I think the music is sounding fainter, and I sneaked a look over my shoulder. The man on the horse had gotten back just far enough to turn the band to the right, down an intersection where the parade was to go, and I was marching up the street all by myself. [Laughter] And that's an apt description of the Democratic Party. The membership of the party by the millions, long ago, has turned to the right, and they're still the leadership marching down the street.

You know, the eyes of America are on you and your great State. Will you choose the Democratic leaders, who in 1980 weakened our nation and nearly brought our economy to its knees, who raised your taxes and have announced their plans to do so again, who oppose our efforts to pursue a defense to protect us from attack by nuclear ballistic missiles? Or will you choose to give Jim and me a chance to finish the job?

Now, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct an informal poll. And I want you to speak up loudly and let all America hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

You know, back at the beginning of World War II, as we entered that terrible war, General George C. Marshall, the Chief of Staff of the United States Army, was asked if we had a secret weapon and, if so, what it might be? And George Marshall said: ``Yes, we do have a secret weapon. It's just the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' Well, I think if George Marshall were here today he'd look at your generation and say, yes, you are the best blankety-blank kids in the world. Before leaving, I'd just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents handed on to us. And those between my generation and yours who are here in this hall today -- they share that same feeling and make that same pledge. There have been times in, over recent years, when things have slipped, as they did a few years ago, and when it didn't seem as if we were going to turn over that kind of an America. But now it's back in stride, and it is there. And we're determined that when it's your turn that's the kind of America that we're going to hand to you. And when we look at you, when we see your openness, your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, it gives us heart.

I've said thank you and God bless you, but I just have to add, if any of you've been wondering what does it feel like to hear you, I'll tell you: It's a very humbling experience, and I'll do my best to try to deserve all of it. Thank you very much.

Mr. Santini. Following his remarks, the President met with major donors to the Nevada State Republican Party at the university. He then traveled to Spokane, WA. A tape was not available for verification of the content of these remarks.

The provisions I signed into law on October 18 remain the law of the land. The Supreme Court has held that transmission errors of this sort do not in any way vitiate the legal effect of a President's signature. Accordingly, that which was signed became law. H.J. Res. 738 has since been properly enrolled and has been presented to me for signature. My signing of H.J. Res. 738 today will enable the provisions previously omitted to become law as well.

And today we're enjoying one of the longest economic expansions in history. The prime interest rate has fallen by two-thirds. Mortgage and auto loan rates are down. Inflation has plummeted from more than 12 percent to 1.8 percent. And we've created in just a little less than 4 years over 11\1/2\ million new jobs.

Just days ago, we learned that the figure that represents the country's economic growth -- GNP, the gross national product -- and some other indicators show our economy gathering momentum for even more growth, higher take-home pay, and more new jobs. And more recently, we learned the trade deficit in September declined for the second month in a row and is down now 30 percent lower than its peak.

Now, this is particularly good news for our manufacturing industries. And we also learned that September sales of single-family homes were up over 10 percent. And just this morning, we learned that the Nation's leading economic indicators were up four-tenths of 1 percent in September. Now, there are three more indications that we're headed for more prosperity. And I'm determined to see that those who still are not sharing fully in our nation's prosperity do so. And I give you my pledge: Neither Slade nor I will be satisfied until this expansion reaches every sector of our economy and every home in America and until every American who wants a job has a job.

And to broaden our expansion, I signed into law last week the most sweeping reform of the tax code in our nation's history. For more than 80 percent of Americans, it means a top rate of 15 percent or less. But wouldn't you know it, even before this fair share tax plan reached my desk, the Democratic leadership in Congress was saying they wanted to break faith with the American people and turn the tax reform into a tax increase. You know, the truth is those folks never met a tax they didn't like. [Laughter] And when it comes to spending your hard-earned money, they act like they've got your credit card in their pocket.

And believe me, they never leave home without it. But you, the American people, know the truth: We don't have a deficit because we're taxed too little; we have a deficit because the Congress spends too much. Isn't it about time the Congress started protecting the family budget instead of fattening the Federal budget?

The President. And here, too, because of the support of a Senator like Slade Gorton, we've been able to restore America's strength. There is nothing I'm prouder of in this job than the 2 million young men and women who are in our military forces. And you know, the arguments that rage and how many people on the other side, politically, back in Washington, are always trying to whittle down the defense budget -- well, let me tell you about those young people in uniform. If we must ever ask them to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that we can produce. And we're going to see they get them.

And by the way, all of you in the Spokane area have a special reason for pride. Just 2 days ago airmen from Fairchild Air Force Base walked away with the trophy at the Strategic Air Command competition. So, as Commander in Chief, I'd like to give them a special salute.

You know, you find out some things about my job. I got to Washington, and then I found those young men, those marines, for example, at the helicopter and everything, would always salute. And I was an officer in World War II. In civilian clothes, I know I'm not supposed to salute, so I'd try to nod and say hello and hope they'd drop their hand. But they wouldn't; they kept it up there. And one night over at the Marine headquarters, I said to General Kelley, the Commandant of the Marines -- I told him about this. And I said there ought to be a regulation that even though if I'm the Commander in Chief, even though I'm in civilian clothes, that I can return a salute. He taught me something. He said, ``I think if you did it, no one would say anything.'' [Laughter] So, I salute every time I see a uniform. [Laughter] Well, because of our young men and women in uniform, things have really changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we threw that away, and now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' And today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he'll have a price to pay. One other thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been set free.

The record on Soviet treaty violations is clear. We can either bet on American technology to keep us safe or on Soviet promises. And each has its own track record. I'll bet on American technology any day. Now, I knew there were those who had their doubts, but flying back from Iceland a few weeks ago, I knew the American people would support firmness with the Soviet Union. So, I couldn't come here today without thanking you, each of you, for that support.

The President. Yes, now, wait a minute! Wait! Wait! Going across this country, I've seen millions of fine, patriotic Democrats who have come to realize that their leadership is totally out of step with their beliefs. And since we're outnumbered in the House of Representatives, if it hadn't been for the support of some of those Democrats like those who might be here today, we couldn't have achieved what we've achieved in these programs. Now, as you may know, I used to be a Democrat myself until I learned that the liberal leadership of that party had become completely out of step with the hard-working and patriotic men and women who make up the Democratic Party.

With all these bands here that I recognized, I have to tell you a little personal story because it kind of fits in right here. I was a drum major of the Dixon, Illinois, Boys Band. And we were invited to a neighboring town to lead their Memorial Day parade. Well, we didn't exactly lead it, because in front of us was the parade leader on a big white horse. And we're going down the street. And the band is playing, and I'm pumping the baton. And he turned and rode back down the line of the parade to make sure everthing was coming along all right. And pretty soon, I began to think the music was sounding faint -- [laughter] -- and I glanced over my shoulder. He had come back up and caught up just in time to turn the band to the right down an intersection. I was walking up the street all by myself. [Laughter] And that's what happened to the Democratic Party. The party had turned to the right; the leadership is still walking to the left.

And that's what the election here in Washington State is all about this year: principle. Slade Gorton is a man of principle and integrity, a man who is devoted to his State and the people he represents, one of the Nation's most respected and effective Senators. You know, every time Slade walks into the Oval Office, I can't help thinking of another great Senator from your State, Washington: Scoop Jackson. And like Scoop, when Slade sits across a table from you, he has the courage and honesty to tell you what he believes, whether he agrees with you or not. I've seen him in action, making a reality of Scoop's longtime dream of a home port for the Navy at Everett. And, believe me, he's about the most effective fighter any State has on Capitol Hill.

A perfect example is the issue of selecting potential sites for a nuclear waste repository. Slade has told me about his deep concern for the health and safety of Washingtonians, particularly as it relates to this issue. On this point, Slade has gotten the ears of everyone back in the Nation's Capital.

The President. Now, as you know, there were plans to begin work at Hanford this fiscal year. Well, Slade, working with Dan Evans and Mark Hatfield, persuaded the Congress to adopt a provision that stops the drilling of an exploratory shaft for 12 months. And Slade has alerted me that some people have suggested that this administration might intentionally circumvent the law. Well, that's the kind of thing that touches my temperature control. [Laughter] And let me tell you that I will see to it that the law on this issue is followed to the letter, and let no one tell you differently.

I also remember how, for 3 years, Slade and I and Scoop Jackson worked together for a stronger America. Slade's opponent [Brock Adams] has a different goal. He's joined the most liberal elements in the Congress in opposing our strategic defense against nuclear ballistic missiles. Even after I returned from Iceland, he said he was -- in his words -- ``dead against SDI.'' Well, we're dead set against a weaker America. We're going to keep our insurance policy for peace. With Slade Gorton in the Senate, we're going to negotiate for peace from a position of strength.

Slade Gorton was a leader on the team that brought America back. Slade's opponent was an all-star player on the team that got us in the mess in the first place, and he hasn't changed his uniform yet. So, please, on election day, keep our team on the field. Go to the polls. Get everyone you know to go there, too. And send Slade Gorton back to the Senate.

I leave all this subject of strength and everything, let me just explain, if I could, for some who might not understand -- and I've come across many people who don't understand -- SDI and what the whole proposal is about. We don't believe that the world should go on with a policy of mutual assured destruction, in which our only defense against nuclear missiles is to have so many on each side that both sides are afraid to start the fight. We believe that if there is a defensive shield that can make those weapons obsolete we should put that in place, but not put it in place while we have our great arsenal of nuclear offensive weapons. In Iceland and since then, my proposal to the Soviet Union was that when we come to the point that we have developed and know we have this defensive shield then they and the United States come together. We agree to eliminate all offensive nuclear weapons, and we, in return, give them the same shield we have so that we can live together with no suspicion that each other might be cheating.

The President. Now, you've gotten ahead of me a little bit here, because I thought I'd conduct an informal poll and you would speak up loudly and let all America hear. For example: Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

The President. Yes. I've got to go over and visit Steve Symms in Idaho. But before leaving, I would just like to say that people my age deeply believe that it's our duty to turn over to you young Americans the same freedom and opportunity that our parents and grandparents turned over to us when it was our turn to take charge.

And speaking for other generations, those between my generation and yours: All of us feel that same way. Now, there've been times -- just a few years ago was one of them -- when we have been careless and things have slipped for America. But we've always gotten back on track, as we are now. And so, I pledge to you, that that's what we want to do, and we're going to turn over to you that kind of a free and opportune-offering society here in America. When we look at you and see your openness and your enthusiasm for America and for life itself, believe me, it gives us heart.

I've come here today in support of a champion on the team that put the American economy back on track, rebuilt her military strength, and restored her confidence. He's made a difference for Idaho and our country, and I hope you'll do everything in your power to see that Steve Symms is reelected to the United States Senate. And I'm pleased that coming here gives me a chance to say hello to another great Senator, a strong ally of our administration and a good friend, Jim McClure.

And when you're casting your ballot on Tuesday for Steve, don't forget to vote for Dave Leroy and Butch Otter for Governor and Lieutenant Governor. And I'm very pleased that your State chairman of the Republican Party, Blake Hall, is here with us, too. You know, you've also got a Congressman to be proud of in Larry Craig. And for Pete's sake, please send me Mel Richardson to Congress to work with him. I need a Congressman who will support me, instead of someone who opposes me 60 percent of the time.

President. All right. Now, I have a special message for all you young people from my roommate. She said to tell you when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, for your families, for your future, and for your country -- just say no.

You know, it's wonderful to be here in Idaho, and you know, as I often say to my staff when we're getting on Air Force One to take off, it's great to get out of Washington and get back to where the real people are. Now, you probably know I couldn't do this much traveling when Congress was in session, as Steve Symms will tell you. That's because some of those folks up there need watching.

And the contrast between us and the leaders of the other party is just as apparent when it comes to judicial appointments. You know the President appoints the Federal judges, but the Senate has to approve them. And the contrast between us and the leaders of the other party, as I say, well, sum it up: Since I began appointing Federal judges to be approved by people like Steve Symms in the Republican Senate, the Federal judiciary has become tougher, much tougher, on criminals. Convicted criminals are going to jail more often, and they're receiving longer sentences. But over and over -- and you perhaps saw some of this on television -- the Democratic leadership has tried in the Senate to torpedo our choices for judges, and that's where Steve Symms can make all the difference. Without him and the Republican majority in the Senate, we'll find liberals, like a certain fellow from Massachusetts, who will be deciding who our judges are.

But, ladies and gentlemen, we come now to an issue that transcends in importance even all the other crucial matters that I've mentioned: my most solemn duty as President, the safety of the American people and the security of these United States. Here, too, because of the support of men like Steve Symms, we've been able to restore America's strength. There is nothing in this job that I'm prouder of than the 2 million young men and women who are in the Armed Forces of the United States today. And you've heard, of course, of the contest and how mainly our opponents keep trying to cut back on our defense spending. Well, let me tell you: If we must ever ask those young people to put their lives on the line for the United States of America, then they deserve to have the finest weapons and equipment that we can produce. And with Steve Symms' help, we're going to see they get it. You know, because of these young men and women in uniform, things have really changed around the world. You know, America used to wear a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we've thrown that one away, and now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' Today every nickel-and-dime dictator around the world knows that if he tangles with the United States of America, he will have a price to pay.

And one other thing I'm especially proud of: After 6 years of this administration, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to communism, and one small country, Grenada, has been set free.

Now, you know, in a crowd like this, there must be a number of Democrats. No, really, because I want you to know that during these past 6 years as President I've had to rely again and again upon the support of Democrats like those who might be here today, and I want to thank each and every one of you for that.

You know, I used to be a Democrat myself until I learned that the liberal leadership of that party had become completely out of step with the hard-working and patriotic men and women who make up the Democratic Party.

If you don't mind a little personal story: When I was a kid in Dixon, Illinois, I was a drum major of the Dixon Boys Band. And one day we were asked to lead the Memorial Day parade at a nearby town. And the parade marshal on a big white horse was out in front, and then it was us -- me with the baton and the band and the parade. Well, we started down the street. And the band was playing, and I was pumping the baton.

The rank-and-file members have turned to the right, and the leadership is still going up that trail that they've been on for so many years. Now, maybe some are ex-Democrats, as I am, but maybe some haven't reregistered. It's tough to break with tradition, but remember what Winston Churchill, that great British statesman, said. He was in Parliament, and he changed parties. And he was roundly criticized for doing so. And then he answered with a simple sentence.

Here in Idaho the choice couldn't be any clearer this year. Steve's opponent is a world-class big taxer, who has proposed increasing State taxes and, at a Governors' conference, called for raising Federal taxes. Steve does not see costly new Federal programs and high taxes as solutions. He's been working with me to help the lumber industry and to see to it that the Japanese don't dump computer chips on the market. He's also been championing the plight of the farmer. By the way, we have produced more assistance -- or provided more assistance to America's farmers than the last five administrations combined -- $26 billion this last year alone. But Steve and I see this only as a stopgap. In the long haul, we've got to put the profit back in farming and get the Federal bureaucrats out.

President. Now, just to be sure where you stand, I thought I'd conduct an informal poll. Speak up loudly and let all America hear. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

Cocaine poses a serious threat to our Nation. Long masquerading as glamorous and relatively harmless, cocaine has revealed its own deadly truth -- cocaine is a killer. It can cause seizures, heart attacks, and strokes. It is indifferent in its destruction, striking regular users and initiates alike. The tragic deaths this past summer of two promising young athletes force us to recognize the terrible price this deadly drug exacts.

The tragedy of ruined lives and lost opportunities for personal growth and productivity cannot be adequately measured in dollars. It is too heavy a price for our citizens and for our Nation. As the consequences of cocaine use have been revealed, public awareness of the cocaine problem has increased. Yet many individuals continue to use cocaine, whether out of ignorance or unwillingness to believe its high risk. More than 22 million Americans have tried the drug at some time, and 5.8 million are current users.

Despite the best efforts by law enforcement officials, cocaine continues to come into our country at alarming levels, supplied by ruthless criminals who draw their power from public acquiescence. Bigger supplies and lower prices have put cocaine in the hands of people who were never before tempted to use it.

Today an even more devastating form of cocaine -- ``crack'' -- has appeared. Crack is smoked, producing immediate effects in the user. It is relatively inexpensive, but is so powerfully addictive that the user, even a first-time user, feels an overwhelming compulsion for more. Crack is used by people of all ages. Tragically, it is sold to and used by even 11- and 12-year-olds. To mothers and fathers, boys and girls at this age are children. To a cocaine dealer, they are just another market.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1986 as Crack/Cocaine Awareness Month. I call on each American to seek every opportunity to educate yourself and others about cocaine and to be unyielding in your intolerance of cocaine users and inflexible in your commitment to a drug-free America.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirty-first day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

American people are becoming increasingly aware of the incidence of abduction and exploitation of the children of the United States. In order to combat this threat, many private organizations and their dedicated volunteers have established programs to teach safety measures to children.

All across our country, in towns, cities, and rural areas alike, corporations, civic associations, church groups, and individual citizens are working together to strengthen the American family. Too often, we neglect to warn and protect these families from the most devastating blow they can suffer, the discovery that a child is missing. Many communities have neighborhood watch programs to help guard their possessions from theft. Should we do anything less for our children? Protecting the lives of these innocents is a community-wide responsibility. As part of this effort, many parents have established fingerprint and other identification records that will aid in locating their children should the unthinkable ever happen.

Soil and Water Resources Conservation Act of 1977 (RCA) requires the Secretary of Agriculture to appraise the condition of the soil, water, and related resources on the non-Federal lands of the Nation, and to develop a national soil and water conservation program for assisting landowners and land users in their future conservation activities on these lands.

The first program report, a National Program for Soil and Water Conservation, was completed in 1982. It set national conservation objectives and priorities, focused corrective action on the areas of the country with the most critical problems, and strengthened the existing partnership among local and State agencies, organizations, and the Federal Government for dealing with resource problems. Guided by this program, USDA has extended more technical and financial assistance than ever before in areas with the most serious problems of soil erosion and dwindling water supplies.

This annual report summarizes fiscal year 1986 soil and water conservation programs and activities, and progress being made under the 1982 National Program for Soil and Water Conservation. Accomplishment data included in the report are consistent with those reported in the 1988 budget request and the accompanying explanatory notes. I would like to reaffirm my support for the ongoing effort against soil erosion and other resource problems. I am confident that further progress can be made towards the goal of reasonable and judicious use of this country's important natural resources.

In the 27 years our Nation has observed National Poison Prevention Week, thousands of children under age five have been saved from accidental poisonings thanks to greater public awareness of poison prevention and the use of child-resistant bottle and container closures. This success story is due to the combined efforts of consumers, health professionals, and government and industry. All these groups are represented on the Poison Prevention Week Council. Through the annual observance of National Poison Prevention Week, parents have been urged to keep household chemicals and medicines out of the reach of young children. Poison control centers have helped save lives by offering emergency advice to consumers who call when a poisoning occurs. The United States Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) has required that potentially hazardous household chemicals and medicines be packaged with effective child-resistant closures.

Data recently compiled by CPSC show that the number of child poisonings has decreased since child-resistant packaging began to be used. In 1972, when the first drugs were required to have child-resistant packaging, 96 children died from accidental drug ingestion. By 1974, the first year in which child-resistant packaging was required for most prescription drugs, there were 57 fatalities.

In subsequent years, other products were required to have child-resistant packaging, and the number of deaths due to ingestion of these drugs continued to decline. In 1984, the last full year for which we have received information on drug ingestion fatalities, there were 31 deaths.

Child-resistant packaging has saved many lives, but there is more to do. We must remind new parents and grandparents of the need to keep medicines and household chemicals out of the reach of children. Underlying our poison prevention program is the assumption that virtually all childhood poisonings are preventable.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

During the Senate Judiciary Committee hearings on the confirmation of U.S. Court of Appeals Judge Robert Bork to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court, which concluded yesterday, 63 individuals appeared in his behalf. These 63 individuals and the groups they represent demonstrate the broad-based support Judge Bork's confirmation enjoys. Endorsements from such an impressive array of, among others, former high government officials, members of the legal establishment, and academics are a testament to Judge Bork's outstanding qualifications to serve as an Associate Justice and conclusively illustrate the great respect his judicial philosophy commands.

The President. I don't know what his decision was based on, but I think that four former Attorneys General, a former Chief Justice of the United States Supreme Court, and their wholehearted endorsements of the qualifications of Robert Bork are something that should be heeded -- plus the fact that every national law enforcement group, such as the whole National Society of Police Chiefs and things of this kind, have all endorsed Robert Bork.

Once, childhood diseases such as diphtheria, polio, and tetanus claimed the lives of thousands of American youngsters each year. Now, vaccines developed through biomedical research have virtually eliminated these killers from the United States. In addition to their contributions to the creation of these and many other vaccines, U.S. medical researchers have designed new drugs and surgical techniques and identified environmental and life-style factors that lead to illness. All of these advances have helped to bring America's death rate to an all-time low and its life expectancy rates to all-time highs.

Research conducted in this country has contributed enormously to the worldwide control of epidemic diseases such as cholera, smallpox, yellow fever, and bubonic plague. The common goal of better health for all has helped to foster a productive research partnership among government, academia, industry, and voluntary organizations.

America's preeminence in biomedical and behavioral medical research is greatly encouraged by more than a century of continuing commitment by the Government of the United States. For example, this year marks the 100th anniversary of the National Institutes of Health, our Nation's largest biomedical research agency. The returns from the cooperative efforts of the Federal government and the private sector in medical research -- in terms of reduced illness and improved individual productivity for many Americans -- are immense. More than 90 Americans have been rewarded with international recognition in the form of the award of Nobel Prizes for work in physiology, medicine, and chemistry.

Someday, these inquiries into the fundamental aspects of life may unravel the mysteries of cancer, AIDS, Alzheimer's disease, heart and lung diseases, mental illnesses, and many other diseases that claim or severely impair the lives of Americans. To fulfill the promise of current investigations and to ensure that the caliber of American medical research remains high, it is imperative that the United States continue to foster the training of the scientists of the future.

We all acknowledge with pride the accomplishments of America's medical researchers and look to them for continued progress in relieving human suffering. In recognition of the many successes of the American medical research enterprise, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 142, has designated October 1, 1987, as ``National Medical Research Day'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this occasion.

General Casimir Pulaski, because on that date in 1779 this young Polish count and cavalry officer, wounded two days before while leading a charge during the siege of Savannah, gave his life for our country.

Before casting his lot with America, Casimir Pulaski had fought bravely against tyranny and foreign domination in his beloved Poland and had been forced into exile. He and other Polish freedom fighters well understood that humanity's battle for liberty and self-government is indivisible around the world; with the immortal cry, ``For Your Freedom and Ours,'' they went forth to many nations in support of freedom, justice, independence, and individual rights. These ideals are forever part of Poland's heritage; they are dear to the Polish people, and this devotion continues to inspire America and the rest of the world.

October the people of the United States celebrate the day nearly 500 autumns ago when Christopher Columbus and the crews of the Nina, the Pinta, and the Santa Maria found a New World. That world is our Western Hemisphere, and we in the United States trace the history and development of our country and our culture back to Columbus and his daring exploration, his initiative, his faith, and his courage.

Columbus continues to inspire the United States and the rest of the world for almost half a thousand years because of his great understanding and vision and because of his single-minded determination to let no disappointment, ridicule, or risk keep him from a goal he knew to be sensible, feasible, and of great promise. He viewed the unknown as an opportunity, not as a danger.

Admiral of the Ocean Seas is remembered as well for challenging the horizons of his time and place, for his spirit of reaching beyond the obvious, for defying the pessimists and expanding the frontiers of knowledge. That spirit animated those who followed him to the New World through the centuries and brought untold energy, boldness, and ingenuity with them. We Americans are risk-takers; like Columbus, we have a vision of the world as it can be, and of the future as an opportunity and a challenge.

This tribute also has special meaning for Americans of Spanish descent. Without Spanish support, Columbus's voyage of discovery would not have been possible. Spain's contribution to the New World and to its cultural and economic heritage went on to be even larger, as the recent visit by Their Majesties King Juan Carlos and Queen Sofia of Spain to the American Southwest reminded us.

The year 1992 will be the 500th anniversary of Columbus's first voyage to the Americas. The Christopher Columbus Quincentenary Jubilee Commission, a distinguished group of Americans aided by representatives from Spain and Italy, prepared a report that I transmitted to the Congress in September of this year, making recommendations for our Nation's observance of the Quincentenary, including themes that embody the broad significance of this anniversary and suggestions for Quincentenary programs that will extend to communities, organizations, and institutions around the United States.

October 12, 1987, as Columbus Day. I invite the people of this Nation to observe that day with appropriate ceremonies in honor of this great explorer. I also direct that the flag of the United States be displayed on all public buildings on the appointed day in honor of Christopher Columbus.

Pursuant to Section 501(b) of the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986, I hereby transmit the first annual report on the extent to which significant progress has been made toward ending the system of apartheid.

Pursuant to Section 501 of the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986 (The Act), the President has transmitted to the Speaker of the House and the Chairman of the Committee on Foreign Relations of the Senate, a report on the extent to which significant progress has been made toward ending the system of apartheid and establishing a nonracial democracy in South Africa. Included is the President's recommendation on which suggested additional measures, if any, should be imposed on that country.

The report concludes that there has not been significant progress toward ending apartheid since October, 1986, and that none of the goals outlined in Title I of the Act -- goals that are shared by the Administration and the Congress -- have been fulfilled. Moreover, the South African Government's response to the Act over the past year gives little ground for hope that this trend will soon be reversed or that additional measures will produce better results.

In reviewing the twelve-month period since the Act became law, the report describes a continuing bleak situation for blacks in South Africa who face increased repression, harassment, and -- even in the case of a significant number of minors -- imprisonment. Press censorship has been intensified, and illegal cross border raids by South African security forces into neighboring countries have resulted in the loss of innocent lives.

In the economic area, the report points out that sanctions have had minimal impact on interrupting South Africa's external trade because of that country's ability to find substitute markets for its products outside the United States. Where there has been a significant impact, notably in the coal and sugar industries, the loss of export markets in the United States has caused hardship among black workers who are experiencing greater rates of unemployment.

Overall, South Africa's economic performance has not been robust due to the poor investment climate, unfavorable international conditions, and drought in the farming areas. Sanctions have incrementally exacerbated an already existing problem.

The report also takes note of considerable disinvestment by American companies since the beginning of the recent unrest in South Africa. The report points out that the most painful impact of this trend toward disinvestment has been the disappearance of company-funded social, housing, educational, and job training programs designed to improve living standards and career opportunities for black South Africans.

In political terms, the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986, which followed selective measures instituted by Executive Order in 1985, sent a strong message of abhorrence of apartheid on the part of the American people. The immediate result, however, was a marked reduction in our ability to persuade the South African Government to act responsibly on human rights issues and to restrain its behavior in the region. Perhaps the single ray of hope during the period under review was the appearance of ferment within the Afrikaner community where there is increasing public discussion of ``power sharing.'' While this and similar terms being discussed are still devoid of quantifiable substance, they may be a precursor to eventual negotiations between the South African Government and the black leadership, a goal which the U.S. Government will be seeking to promote.

Administration agree, and his conviction that additional measures would be counterproductive, the President recommends against the imposition of any additional measures at this time, including those mentioned in Section 501(c) of the Act, and continues to believe that the current punitive sanctions against South Africa are not the best way to bring freedom to that country.

What the United States now needs is a period of active and creative diplomacy -- bilaterally as well as in consultation with our allies and with our friends in southern Africa -- focusing on doing all that is possible to bring the peoples of South Africa together for meaningful negotiations leading to the creation of a democratic society. The essence of this process is to state clearly what goals and values the West supports, rather than simply to reiterate what it opposes. This was the purpose of Secretary Shultz's public articulation on September 29 of the concepts which must be addressed by all South Africans to undergird a settlement of political grievances and the formation of a just, constitutional, and democratic order in South Africa. His statement delineates precisely the values that the West stands for and wishes to see negotiated by South Africans as they chart a future free of apartheid.

Pursuant to Section 501 of the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986 (the Act), I am transmitting to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Chairman of the Committee on Foreign Relations of the Senate, a report on the extent to which significant progress has been made toward ending the system of apartheid and establishing a nonracial democracy in that country. Included also is my recommendation on which suggested additional measures, if any, should be imposed on South Africa.

Executive Order 12571, I directed all affected executive departments and agencies to take all steps necessary, consistent with the Constitution, to implement the requirements of the Act. I am pleased to be able to report that the Act has been implemented fully and faithfully. Executive departments and agencies are to be complimented for their excellent work in carrying out this complex piece of legislation.

I regret that I am unable to report significant progress leading to the end of apartheid and the establishment of a nonracial democracy in South Africa. Indeed, the following review of events in South Africa since October, 1986 provides very little hope for optimism about the immediate future.

Instead, the earlier decree was toughened, press restrictions were tightened, and an increasing number of foreign journalists (including Americans) were expelled. Nelson Mandela, Govan Mbeki, Walter Sisulu, and other key prisoners have not been released.

South Africa is not any closer in late 1987 to respecting free speech and free political participation by all its citizens than it was one year ago. No timetable has been set for the elimination of the remaining apartheid laws. No clear and credible plan has been devised for negotiating a future political system involving all people equally in South Africa, and many of the legitimate representatives of the majority in that country are still ``banned,'' in hiding, or in detention. The Government of South Africa has not ended military and paramilitary activities aimed at neighboring states. Instead, such activities have been stepped up, as can be seen by Pretoria's April, 1987 raid against targets in Livingstone, Zambia; its May, 1987 incursion into Maputo, the capital of Mozambique; and the increase in unexplained deaths and disappearances of anti-apartheid activists throughout the region. The cycle of violence and counterviolence between the South African Government and its opponents has, if anything, gotten worse.

In the recent whites-only election in South Africa, the National Party attempted to exploit a nationalistic backlash to foreign interference. Without any doubt, external factors played some role in the sizable vote totals for the National Party's right-wing opposition as well as for the ruling party itself.

This round of massive unrest, which began in 1984, has been put down with harsh states of emergency. The detentions and other measures taken by the security forces during this period severely damaged the opposition groups inside the country, particularly the United Democratic Front, an umbrella organization committed to the non-violent end of apartheid. The State of Emergency has resulted in the detention of much of the UDF leadership and the silencing of much of the organization's political expression. While the State of Emergency has failed to crush the organization, it has nevertheless powerfully affected its strategies and put the organization on the defensive.

Indaba, a convention representing all racial groups and a wide range of social and political organizations in the Natal Province. For many months the Indaba participants have been wrestling on a provincial basis with the great questions that must be addressed by South Africans, including the creation of a nonracial legislature and the drafting of a bill of rights. This process has shown that South Africans are capable of difficult mutual accommodation to advance the cause of racial justice and representative government. Regrettably, the government has been slow to see the wisdom of encouraging such efforts at negotiated change.

Equally disturbing has been the increase in regional tensions triggered in part by a sharp expansion of South African military, para-military, and covert operations. South African security forces have in the last year raided Livingstone in Zambia and Maputo in Mozambique, in violation of international law and, in the case of Mozambique, in violation of the Nkomati Accords (which established a regime of peaceful cooperation between the South African and Mozambican Governments). These raids, purportedly directed at the African National Congress, resulted in the deaths of innocent civilians. South African forces have also been engaged in a variety of other largely covert efforts in Swaziland, Botswana, and Zimbabwe aimed at keeping their neighbors off-balance and deflecting public attention away from the imperative of change at home and toward foreign sources of support for its opponents. Our sanctions were followed by an increase in such ill-considered actions. We have made our views known clearly, but Pretoria appears less inclined to consider external views than was previously the case.

A positive development has been the continuing ferment in the white South African community, reflecting, among many other internal and external factors, the messages of outrage and frustration sent by the United States and other interested nations.

Particularly notable is the debate occuring within the subcommunity of Afrikaans-speakers. The last year has seen the candidates (during the May elections) of the ``independents'' who broke away from their traditional philosophical home in the ruling National Party; the ``revolt'' of the University of Stellenbosch academics who deserted the National Party as a show of protest against apartheid; the increasing visibility of the extraparliamentary opposition, exemplified by the former head of the Progressive Federal Party, Frederick van Zyl Slabbert; and, most recently, the meeting in Dakar between leading Afrikaners and representatives of the exiled African National Congress, sponsored by Slabbert's Institute for a Democratic Alternative for South Africa (IDASA), and hosted by Senegal's President Diouf.

Even within the government, there have been hesitant, heavily qualified statements from the Cabinet concerning ``power sharing'' and the need to negotiate with black leaders. South Africans have not yet identified a realistic formula on which to base and begin serious negotiations, but the issue is surfacing publicly and is being discussed. Such developments suggest that despite all the negative things that have occurred in recent years -- the violence, killings, and repression -- there continue to be forces at work in South Africa that yet may lead to progress toward a negotiated settlement. South Africans are continuing to seek ways out of the impasse. Today, it is clearer than ever that the travesty of apartheid is South Africa's to solve.

South Africa's economy is ``open'' by world standards in the sense that a relatively high percentage of its gross domestic product derives from a combination of exports and imports. South Africa is a trading nation, which suggests that its economy would be relatively vulnerable to our sanctions. Yet this is not necessarily the case. The nature of South Africa's exports is such that the majority of export earnings come from sales of primary products -- gold and other metals and minerals -- that have a ready market internationally whether or not we choose to buy them.

After years of contending with embargoes on arms and oil, South Africa has shown itself adept at evading sanctions. The easiest way to avoid sanctions is completely overt -- simply shift to new export markets. The evidence available to us indicates that South Africa has been largely successful at developing new markets, both because of their willingness to undercut competitors' prices and because of the quality of their products and the perception by much of the world that South Africa is a reliable supplier.

Although the sanctions voted by Congress in 1986 potentially affect a large percentage of South African industries, many still operate at capacity -- albeit with somewhat lowered profit margins -- because of their success in developing new export markets. New export markets for South African agricultural products, metals, and textiles have been found in the Far East, parts of the Middle East, and Latin America and, most ironic, in the rest of Africa. In fact, South Africa's trade surplus has risen, not fallen, since we and our major allies imposed trade sanctions last year.

On the other hand, many of the commodities covered by U.S. sanctions were already facing difficult international market conditions and chronic oversupply. It seems clear that sanctions exacerbated these problems and that some of the South African export industries have suffered some damage, including the sugar, coal, and iron and steel sectors.

South Africa is slowly recovering from an economic recession that began in 1981. This recession and sanctions, combined with the absence of business confidence and the resulting decline in new investments, have been major elements in the country's poor economic performance. It is important to appreciate, moreover, that although the South African Government has been able to avoid some of the economic effects of our sanctions in the short term, the long-term effect on unemployment and growth rates may well be more serious. There is a growing consensus among economists that a combination of sanctions, South Africa's inability to attract foreign capital, and a variety of other factors will mean that, at best, South Africa's gross domestic product growth will likely hover between 2.5 and 3.5 percent per annum for the foreseeable future. Yet studies indicate that annual real growth of 5 to 6 percent will be necessary to create jobs for the 350,000 new workers who will enter the labor force each year. To the extent that our sanctions contribute to a slowdown in real growth, we will have contributed both to an increase in unemployment that will hit blacks hardest, as population growth continues to outstrip economic growth, and to an erosion of prospects for economic progress by blacks in the future, once apartheid has ended.

In fact, economic growth and the openness of the South African economy have been among the major forces eroding apartheid. They also offer the best chance of bringing about its end. Black economic empowerment is one of the keys to progress. An open and dynamic economy provides jobs and skills for the majority of the population, provides the indispensable base for trade unions to address their grievances, and inevitably will improve educational possibilities for blacks as economic growth demands a better educated labor force.

In the overall economic context, a phenomenon worthy of note is the trend toward disinvestment among American-owned business firms in South Africa. The value of U.S. direct investment in South Africa has been cut nearly in half by disinvestment -- from $2.4 billion in 1982 to approximately $1.3 billion in 1986. By now, it is probably less than $1 billion. In most cases, U.S. firms have sold their South African holdings to their local managers and/or employees. Most of the rest have been sold to other firms, usually South African white-owned competitors, at fire-sale prices. In very few cases have these companies pulled up stakes altogether. Despite disinvestments, the products and services of departing U.S. firms remain generally available in South Africa. The main impact of disinvestment has been to damage fair labor standards programs. There is no question but that many projects in education, training, and community improvement funded by major foreign investors have been damaged or eliminated.

During the past decade, U.S. companies have spent nearly $200 million on such projects. Because of disinvestment, this vital source of manpower and community development assistance has been severely cut back.

The concentration through disinvestment of more of South Africa's wealth in local white hands has, at least in the short term, marginally enlarged the economic gap between the races. Blacks at present control only a minute fraction of the country's physical capital and share equity. Black-owned enterprises contribute only about 1 percent to the nation's gross domestic product (although much more black economic activity takes place in the informal sector and goes unrecorded), and we doubt that black ownership totals more than about 2 percent of South Africa's capital stock.

The two sets of economic sanctions imposed against South Africa to date -- by Executive Order in 1985 and by statute in 1986 -- have sent a clear message to the ruling white community that the American people are outraged by the institutional injustice of apartheid and the basic denial of human rights that it embodies. Although the South African white leadership has reacted defiantly toward these measures, and has chilled the bilateral diplomatic relationship as a result, the message has clearly been registered. The American people have made their feelings clear.

Yet the most important goal of the Act was to pressure the South African Government to meet the unambiguous prescriptions laid out in the Act itself. As indicated above, significant progress has not been made toward ending the system of apartheid and establishing a nonracial democracy in South Africa in the twelve month period since the enactment of the Act.

I have reviewed the suggested additional measures listed in Section 501(c) in light of what we hope to achieve in South Africa as well as the impact of those measures already taken. My conclusion is that the imposition of additional economic sanctions at this time would not be helpful in the achievement of the objectives which Congress, the American people, and I share.

While the measures imposed by the 1986 Act have registered an important message to the white South African community, and have contributed to our efforts to broaden our contacts with black opposition groups, the impact has been more negative than positive. I am particularly concerned by evidence that these measures have caused increasing unemployment for black South African workers, especially in such industries as sugar production and coal mining. While our sanctions have accentuated the overall economic stagnation in South Africa, it is clear to me that their impact on the government itself and its political choices have not advanced our goals. The ability of that country to evade sanctions by finding alternate markets for its exports indicates that it would be futile to impose additional measures that would also be harmful to United States strategic or economic interests. In addition, our sanctions measures have made it more difficult for the United States to persuade the South African Government to act responsibly on human rights issues, to move toward negotiations, and to restrain its behavior in the region. I believe that the imposition of additional measures, including those listed in Section 501(c), would exacerbate these negative developments without adding any additional positive benefits in support of our objectives. For these reasons, moreover, I continue to believe that punitive sanctions are not the best way to bring freedom to South Africa.

This experience has illustrated once again the very real constraints on the United States, or any other nation, that tries to impose its own solutions to South Africa's problems. It is clear that in the heat of debate over sanctions against South Africa, Americans on both sides of the issue overestimated the importance of the United States as a factor in the South African matrix. The impact of American sanctions to date has been significant neither in hastening the demise of racism in South Africa nor in punishing the South African Government.

What is needed on the part of the United States is a period of active and creative diplomacy bilaterally as well as in consultation with our allies and friends in Africa focusing on doing all that is possible to bring the peoples of South Africa together for meaningful negotiations leading to the building of a democratic society. The essence of this process is to state clearly what goals and values we in the West support, rather than simply to reiterate what we oppose.

This was the purpose of Secretary Shultz' public articulation on September 29th of the principles we believe must undergird a settlement of political grievances and the formation of a just, constitutional, and democratic order in South Africa. His statement delineates precisely the values that we in the West stand for and wish to see addressed by South Africans as they chart a future free of apartheid. It constitutes an attempt to challenge all parties in the equation with a positive vision of a post-apartheid South Africa, and to lend our moral weight to those many South Africans -- a majority, I believe -- who have not given up hope.

It is crucial in the coming period that we work with and, where possible, coordinate policies with our principal OECD partners. Aside from the question of the 1986 sanctions measures -- which few of our key allies have adopted -- our positions and policies are complementary with those of the OECD countries, particularly the United Kingdom, the Federal Republic of Germany, and Japan. We must work with these nations and others to buttress the Front Line States and the region against destabilization and economic decay. We must support and encourage those South Africans, white and black, that are already at work breaking down the barriers of fear, mistrust, and ignorance of each other. We must continue to strive together through public and private endeavors to assist the non-white communities in South Africa to prepare themselves for their rightful role after the inevitable end of apartheid. Most importantly, we must, together, push firmly for progress, change, and negotiation in South Africa, leading to a just and democratic future for that troubled nation.

Nations Day is an opportunity for us to reemphasize the principles upon which the United Nations was founded. The framers of the United Nations Charter envisioned a world where nations live together in freedom, justice, and peace, a world with universal and reciprocal respect for human rights and human dignity.

United Nations General Assembly took a historic first step last year by adopting reforms aimed at strengthening the organization's effectiveness and efficiency. The ideals of the United Nations are important to the United States. We are committed to working closely with other member states and with the Secretary General to see that the reforms are faithfully implemented and to secure the organization's future.

We are pleased that reform efforts are extending to the specialized and technical agencies of the United Nations. These agencies are not well-known, but do affect us directly and on a daily basis. For instance, the Weather Watch of the World Meteorological Organization helps us know when and where storms will hit American cities. The International Maritime Organization and International Civil Aviation Organization work for safety on the seas and in the skies for American travelers. The Food and Agricultural Organization saves U.S. farmers, foresters, and fishermen countless dollars in damage every year. The International Atomic Energy Agency helps promote international cooperation and safeguards regarding nuclear technology, and the World Health Organization coordinates global efforts against AIDS.

One of the youngest specialized agencies, the International Fund for Agricultural Development (IFAD), was established to mobilize financial resources and make them available for agricultural projects specifically designed to improve food production systems in the poorest food-deficient regions of the world. In just 10 years, IFAD has financed more than 200 projects in developing countries that, when fully implemented, will boost food production by more than 22 million tons a year.

Our world -- every nation, every people, every individual -- can know the blessings of peace and see the light of freedom and justice in the future if we have the courage to build on the hope of the past -- the hope upon which the United Nations was built.

U.S.C. 2436(b)(2)) requires that if import relief consists of, or includes, an orderly marketing agreement, then such agreement shall be entered into within 60 days after a presidential determination to provide relief.

U.S.C. 2253(k) (1)), I have considered the relation of such action to the international obligations of the United States. Since February 1, 1980, the United States and the PRC have had in effect a bilateral trade agreement under which I have determined, pursuant to section 405 of the Trade Act (19 U.S.C. 2435), a satisfactory balance of concessions has been maintained during the life of such agreement, and for which I reconfirm that actual or foreseeable reductions in U.S. tariffs and nontariff barriers to trade resulting from multilateral negotiations are, and continuously have been, satisfactorily reciprocated by the PRC. The present agreement for orderly trade is within the parameters of the safeguard measures envisioned by the bilateral trade agreement.

States as may be necessary concerning the administration, implementation, modification, amendment or termination of the agreement described in paragraph (1) of this Proclamation, and any action that may be subsequently required to implement paragraph (3) of this Proclamation. In carrying out his responsibilities under this paragraph, the USTR is authorized to direct and delegate to appropriate officials or agencies of the United States, authority to perform any functions necessary for the administration and implementation of the agreement, or in the event he determines the agreement to be no longer effective, such further action as he deems necessary and appropriate consistent with this Proclamation. The USTR is authorized to make any changes in part 2 of the Appendix to the TSUS that may be necessary to carry out the agreement or such other action as may be required should he determine the agreement to be no longer effective. Any such changes in the agreement shall be effective after their publication in the Federal Register.

The U.S. Customs Service shall take such actions as the USTR shall determine are necessary to carry out the agreement described in paragraph (1) of this Proclamation, or to implement any import relief implemented pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of this Proclamation, or any modification thereof, with respect to the entry, or withdrawal from warehouse for consumption, into the United States of products covered by such agreement or by such other import relief.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Earlier today the U.S. Senate passed the defense authorization bill for fiscal years 1988 - 1989. Included in this bill are specific provisions which undercut my efforts to negotiate equitable and verifiable arms reductions and undermine U.S. national security. The first legislates unilateral U.S. adherence to the narrow interpretation of the ABM treaty, despite the fact that a broader one is fully justified.

A broader interpretation would enable us to save time and money in developing effective defenses against a potential Soviet missile attack. The second provision would force the United States to comply with certain provisions of the unratified and expired SALT II agreement, which was negotiated by the last administration.

Any bill that includes these provisions will be vetoed. These amendments would undermine our negotiators in Geneva at a particularly crucial time. I regret the action of the Senate, and I commend all Senators who had the courage to vote against passage of the bill on these grounds. This vote by the Senate is particularly ironic in view of the actions taken in recent days by the Soviet Union close to U.S. territory. We have protested these Soviet actions as both unacceptable to this country and inconsistent with General Secretary Gorbachev's claim to seek a long-term improvement in our relationship.

Since that time, German-Americans have helped forge the ideals and dreams that have built our nation. It was a German-American, John Peter Zenger, who first fought for and established the tradition of freedom of the press on this continent. The Colonial Governor charged Zenger with libel, and Zenger's defense was that he had printed the truth. He won, and the principle he established lives to this day: that the press can and must be free to tell the truth.

But, yes, America's genuine [German] heritage is rich. It is deep and fertile. It's helped nourish and cultivate our national heritage, our national accomplishments, and our national ideals. And that's why I'm so happy to have all of you here today. I remember back when I was a boy in Illinois, up near the Wisconsin border. The German heritage was displayed with pride. The German language, at that time, was the second most widely spoken language in the Nation. Here in America, German-Americans have helped give our nation its freedom, optimism, enterprise, and its love of peace. Today this heritage is Germany's, as well. A common dedication to democracy, freedom, and peace ties America and Germany together. It is the bedrock upon which our alliance has been built.

And it's why our people have made the sacrifices to build and maintain our military strength in the face of the missiles and armies of the Warsaw Pact. In the last 6\1/2\ years, we've stood firmly together, and now, as a result, America may be on the eve of an historic agreement with the Soviet Union. I remember -- too many times to count -- that my arms reduction proposals were not serious. After all, the Soviets would never agree to actual arms reductions, certainly not to the zero option for U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range, ground-launched nuclear weapons.

The agreement toward which America and the Soviets are now moving is not happening because we -- America, Germany, and our allies -- have been weak, but because we've been strong. And it is, as you know, nothing short of historic. Never before has an agreement actually abolished an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. Never before has either side retired top-of-the-line, spanking-new, mint-quality missiles. I don't know just when I'll sit down with General Secretary Gorbachev to sign this agreement, but I look forward to that day.

None of us should ever forget, however, that all that we've achieved for world peace could never have happened without the strong alliance and friendship between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany.

Now, though, let me say a brief word of purely domestic interest. As you know, I've nominated Judge Robert Bork to the Supreme Court. I've been very clear about why I want Judge Bork on the high bench. Robert Bork believes that judges should interpret the law, not make it. And he believes that it's time the courts showed less compassion for criminals and more for the victims of crime.

It's time to say a few words about the way the confirmation hearings have been conducted. Our Founding Fathers intended the courts to be above partisan politics. But in the last few weeks we've seen an attempt to turn the confirmation of a Justice into a partisan issue. No expense has been spared, and we all know the reason. A few special interests consider the courts their private preserve. Communities all over the Nation have seen how these special interests get through the courts what they can't get through the ballot box.

Now the special interests are determined to pack the Supreme Court and to distort the reputation of anyone who disagrees. Some say they're compromising and demeaning the judicial selection process. I hope we haven't come to a time when good men and women are afraid to accept nominations to the bench for fear of the kind of treatment we've seen the last few weeks.

This is no longer a battle over whether the most qualified man nominated in a century is confirmed to the Supreme Court. At stake here is the integrity and independence of the American system of justice. So, I hope that before you leave Washington all of you will take time to let your Senators know that you want to see Robert Bork on the Supreme Court.

Americans trace their heritage back to German ancestry than to any other nationality. More than seven million Germans have come to our shores through the years, and today some 60 million Americans -- one in four -- are of German descent. Few people have blended so completely into the multicultural tapestry of American society and yet have made such singular economic, political, social, scientific, and cultural contributions to the growth and success of these United States as have Americans of German extraction.

United States has embraced a vast array of German traditions, institutions, and influences. Many of these have become so accepted as parts of our way of life that their ethnic origin has been obscured. For instance, Christmas trees and Broadway musicals are familiar features of American society. Our kindergartens, graduate schools, the social security system, and labor unions are all based on models derived from Germany.

In architecture and design, German contributions include the modern suspension bridge, Bauhaus, and Jugendstil. German-American scientists have helped make the United States the world's pioneer in research and technology. The American work ethic, a major factor in the rapid rise of the United States to preeminence in agriculture and industry, owes much to German-Americans' commitment to excellence.

For more than 3 centuries, Germans have helped build, invigorate, and strengthen this country. But the United States has given as well as received. Just a generation ago, America conceived of and swiftly implemented the Marshall Plan, which helped the new German democracy rise from the rubble of war to become a beacon of democracy in Central Europe. The Berlin Airlift demonstrated the American commitment to the defense of freedom when, still recovering from war, Berlin was threatened by strangulation from the Soviets.

Today, the Federal Republic of Germany is a bulwark of democracy in the heart of a divided Europe. Germans and Americans are rightfully proud of our common values as well as our shared heritage. For more than 3 decades the German-American partnership has been a linchpin in the Western Alliance. Thanks to it, a whole generation of Americans and Europeans has grown up free to enjoy the fruits of liberty.

Our histories are thus intertwined. We now contribute to each other's trade, enjoy each other's cultures, and learn from each other's experiences. The German-American Friendship Garden, which will be dedicated in the District of Columbia in the near future, is symbolic of the close and amicable relations between West Germany and the United States.

October 6, 1987, as German-American Day. I urge all Americans to learn more about the contributions of German immigrants to the life and culture of the United States and to observe this day with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

I'd like to give you some background you won't get from other Washington sources about a story that's been in the headlines. But first I'd like to take a minute and tell you about a story that hasn't been in the headlines but should be. In May of this year, a tornado ripped through the west Texas town of Saragosa, killing 30 people, injuring 120 more, and destroying two-thirds of the buildings.

Many believed that spring tornado would make a ghost town of Saragosa, but this past Labor Day, a private sector initiative proved the doomsayers wrong. Over the holiday weekend, 700 volunteers from all over our country, with mostly donated materials, built 15 new homes in a single weekend, and plans are underway for even more. Today the townspeople and volunteers join together to celebrate this fine example of the great American spirit of neighbor helping neighbor. On behalf of all Americans, I join in commending this noble effort.

I think most of you know that this sort of voluntarism is something the administration has worked hard to encourage during the past few years. It's been part of our policy of cutting back government while giving free markets and free people a chance to work their magic. And the results have been economic magic.

But strange as it seems, while most Americans are delighted by our growth, some people are embarrassed and even resentful. They're the folks who insisted that this administration's domestic program would lead to economic ruin for everyone, especially the poor. Instead, our program led to booming prosperity and a 3-year decline in the poverty rate. And these same folks also said our policy of being firm with the Soviets wouldn't work. But they were wrong again; our toughness stopped Soviet expansionism, restored America's stature, and moved us toward the first major arms reduction treaty in many years.

So, you see, America has prospered, and our foreign stature has grown. And this has happened because, on almost every single issue, we've done exactly the opposite of what the old-time liberals here in Washington recommended. But while these have been hard years for the Washington establishment, there was always one area they'd controlled so long they never thought they would have to give it up. They thought of it as a sort of private preserve -- and that was appointments to the Federal courts. Many of them viewed the courts as a place to put judges who would further their agenda -- even if it meant being soft on crime, interpreting the Constitution to please the special interests, and encouraging jurists to make laws that would never be passed by your elected representatives or approved by you, the people.

That's why, when a vacancy recently occurred on the United States Supreme Court, I nominated Judge Robert Bork, a man who would be faithful to the kind of judicial restraint envisioned by our Founding Fathers; a judiciary that was independent and strong, yes, but one whose power would also be confined within the boundaries of the Constitution and the laws of the land. For the Founding Fathers the issue was not: Will we have liberal or conservative courts? They knew that the courts, like the Constitution itself, must not be politicized; they knew that the question was, and is: Will we have government by the people?

And that's why over the years both progressive and conservative judges have understood the importance of judicial restraint -- the principle that says the highest exercise of judicial duty is to subordinate the judge's private views to what the law permits or determines.

But now liberal special interest groups seek to politicize the court system; to exercise a chilling effect on judges; to intimidate them into making decisions, not on the basis of the law or the merits of the case, but on the basis of a litmus test or a response to political pressure. These special interests are gravely concerned that Judge Bork's appointment will mean a Supreme Court that practices judicial restraint as our forefathers intended.

And that's why the nomination of Judge Bork, a distinguished jurist, has become a distorted, unseemly political campaign. Judge Bork deserves a careful, highly civil examination of his record, but he has been subjected to a constant litany of character assassination and intentional misrepresentation. They are determined to thwart the desire of the American people for judges who understand the real role of the judiciary; judges who seek to interpret the law, not make it; judges who will enforce the law and bring criminals to justice, not turn them loose and make our streets unsafe.

In accordance with the procedures specified in the Act, I will submit any such agreement that I sign, together with implementing legislation and statements of administrative action, for Congressional approval in accordance with the fast track legislative procedures set forth in section 151 of the Act.

Last night, I notified the Congress that I intend to enter into a free trade agreement with Canada on January 2, 1988, contingent upon a successful completion of the negotiations. The essential elements have been agreed to, and we expect that final details can be hammered out in the next few days.

This historic agreement will strengthen both our economies and over time create thousands of jobs in both countries. It will serve as an important model for other nations seeking to improve their trading relationships. In many respects it will also serve as a model for the Uruguay round of multilateral trade negotiations.

The people of the United States and Canada have had a long and harmonious friendship that is the envy of the world. Now, in addition to sharing the world's longest undefended border, we will share membership in the world's largest free trade area. This agreement will provide enormous benefits for the United States. It will remove all Canadian tariffs, secure improved access to Canada's market for our manufacturing, agriculture, high technology and financial sectors, and improve our security through additional access to Canadian energy supplies. We have also gained important investment opportunities in Canada and resolved many vexing trade issues.

I congratulate Prime Minister Mulroney for his courage and foresight in seeking this free trade area. It will strengthen the bonds between our nations and improve the economic performance and competitiveness of both countries. The agreement will provide an enduring legacy of which both nations can be proud.

Well, it's an honor to have all of you here today as we recognize America's outstanding public and private secondary schools with the Department of Education's most prestigious award. You've all done a remarkable job, and I'm particularly delighted to mention that four of the schools being honored today are repeat winners in the Secondary School Recognition Program.

I'd like to see each one of you come back here again and again. You're here because your schools are part of what's right with American education. Not too long ago, although we put more money into our schools each year, much of the news we got back was bad. Graduation rates, test scores declined while violence, pregnancy, and drug abuse increased. In a real sense we were failing our children. But today I'm happy to report that across the country the situation is being turned around. Excellence is on the rise in our schools, and drugs are on their way out. Schools like yours are showing the country how to achieve excellence by setting high standards, maintaining discipline, and emphasizing the basics. What you accomplished wasn't bought with Federal dollars or engineered from Washington. The credit belongs to administrators who provided leadership, parents who got involved, teachers who inspired, and students who studied.

One way of helping all our schools is by bringing more accountability into the educational system. That means merit pay to reward our best teachers, competency testing to maintain a high quality of instruction, achievement testing to measure the performance of schools and students, greater parental choice in determining their children's education, and programs like this that recognize the best schools in America. A Gallup Poll released last month found that the American people are solidly behind the goals of the education reform movement. Three out of four adults want our schools to focus on the fundamentals like math, English, history, and science, and to raise their academic requirements.

The majority of Americans also want to see our schools once again building character, and I agree with them. A critical part of the rebirth of American education and getting back to basics is having our schools again teach old-fashioned ideas like right and wrong. Teaching traditional values does not trap our children into the past. These values are a bedrock from which young people will be able to launch themselves into the future, feeling secure in a world of change because they've been taught truths which never change: honor, justice, loyalty, and courage.

The original Constitution is preserved here in Washington in the National Archives, as you know. And the ink of the parchment has faded from time and exposure, but the strength of its message has not faded from the day it was signed. And what gives the document its power and its permanence is that its words are taught and spoken in every classroom in America. As John Marshall said: ``The people made the Constitution. It lives only by their will.'' Well, let's make sure that it lives forever. As I see it, our schools shape America's future one student at a time. So, the men who wrote our Constitution -- well, they're counting on you.

Under our system, it's not the Federal Government that runs the schools, but the men and women who come out of our local schools -- they run the government. When I read the writings of our Founding Fathers, who designed our system, I always note how openly they gave praise to God and sought His guidance. And I just can't believe that it was ever their intention to expel Him from our schools.

I must say before I go on, someone has once said that, actually, as long as there are final exams there will be prayer in schools. [Laughter] In the beginning, I was joking about being called to the principal's office, but the truth is I have a warm spot in my heart for principals. I was in the principal's office once in Dixon High School. And I wasn't there just to pass the time of day. At one point, he said to me, ``You know, I don't care what you think of me now. I'm only interested in what you'll think of me 15 years from now.'' Well, I didn't have to wait 15 years to appreciate him and let him know what he'd meant to me. In fact, he was a remarkable friend. We kept in close contact until his death. And what you've accomplished, to be here today -- from what your students have achieved, I don't think your students will have to wait 15 years either to let you know what you've done for them.

October the people of the United States recognize and rejoice in the many accomplishments of generations of Polish Americans. From the founding of our Republic to the present day, Poles have enriched, strengthened, and defended our Nation. Millions of Polish Americans have attained great success in the arts, sciences, scholarship, and every other field of endeavor, but perhaps their most special gifts to America have been the faith and love of liberty Poles have cherished through the centuries.

American Revolution when Polish freedom fighters such as Kosciuszko and Pulaski stood with us for independence. They knew the profound truth that freedom's cause is universal, that in struggling for our freedom they were working for Poland's freedom and for all mankind's. They knew that once America had fired ``the shot heard 'round the world'' no tyrant could ever again rest easy.

Today, as always, Americans stand in solidarity with the continuing Polish struggle for political, religious, and economic liberty. By advocating these precious freedoms so eloquently and forthrightly, His Holiness John Paul II and Lech Walesa have come to symbolize hope, justice, and human dignity to all Americans and to countless millions around the world. Their idealism, self-sacrifice, and devotion inspire us as we express our thanks to Polish Americans and our pride in our country's Polish heritage.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America and two hundred and twelfth.

A little-known but debilitating neuromuscular disease produces functional blindness in thousands of Americans. The disorder, benign essential blepharospasm, causes involuntary and usually uncontrollable spasms of the muscles around the eyes that force the eyelids shut. As the disease progresses, the spasms become almost continuous.

Most of them first experience symptoms in their fifth or sixth decade, although younger people are also affected. In the early stages of the disease, when the patient experiences an occasional extra wink or blink, there is only a slight impact on the quality of life. But when the spasms are more frequent, the patient cannot perform simple tasks such as reading or cooking, and ordinary activities such as driving a car become dangerous.

Treatment with drugs or surgery can temporarily relieve the symptoms of benign essential blepharospasm, but as yet there is no cure. Scientists are attempting to find improved treatments and to learn more about the causes of this condition. Three biomedical research agencies -- the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke, the National Eye Institute, and the National Institute of Mental Health -- lead the Federal research attack. Support for research is also provided by the Benign Essential Blepharospasm Research Foundation, Inc., a voluntary agency known for its efforts to assist patients and their families.

Nation sets aside October 9 each year to honor Leif Erikson and to celebrate our country's Nordic heritage. Almost a thousand years ago this young Viking explorer set out from Norway to convert Greenlanders to Christianity. He eventually reached North America and brought back reports of places he called Helluland, Markland, and Vinland. The explorers, missionaries, settlers, and adventurers who followed him in later centuries shared his bold spirit. The memory of Leif Erikson continues to inspire all who would chart new territory for the good of mankind.

They and their descendants have truly contributed much to our national heritage; the strength of character and spirit of adventure they trace to their ancestors, including Leif Erikson, are traits Americans will always revere as quintessentially American.

The President. Well, thank you all for coming down this morning. As you know, the Senate Judiciary Committee will act on my nomination of Judge Bork to the Supreme Court. His opponents have made this a political contest by using tactics and distortions that I think are deplorable. And I could say more in that same tone, but time is of the essence.

Court that we've ever had, and I am going to continue to do everything I can to get him confirmed. Our work is cut out for us, and we have a lot to do before the floor vote. We simply have to work together on this.

Thank you very much, and welcome to the White House. As you well know, this week, in a celebration called ``We the People,'' America is honoring minority business owners and recognizing their contributions to our country.

Actually, that reminds me of an old story. There was a small businessman who had been doing business with the Government for many years. I think a lot of you know what sort of paperwork that can entail. So, with the files and records really piling up, he wrote the Government and asked for permission, and if it was necessary to keep all of the old documents or could he get rid of some of them?

But in all seriousness, in this bicentennial of our Constitution we should reflect upon how blessed we truly are. Under our system, government is strong enough to defend justice, but limited enough to guarantee freedom. Our Founding Fathers saw economic rights as an essential part of freedom. Alexander Hamilton observed that ``Power over a man's subsistence amounts to a power over his will.'' Well, by protecting life, liberty, and property, and assuring the civil rights of all Americans, our Constitution has made our country free and prosperous and produced on this continent the greatest nation on Earth.

As you know, I recently nominated to the Supreme Court, Judge Robert Bork, a distinguished member of the U.S. Court of Appeals whose deference to law and precedent is so clear and whose scholarship is so exemplary that no decision rendered by him has ever been overturned by the Supreme Court. If confirmed, Judge Bork would join our eight sitting Justices in their dedication to preserving the rights of every American under the Constitution. I have no doubt that Judge Bork would be a widely respected force for justice and civil rights on our highest court. But unfortunately, not everyone agrees with me on that.

Free enterprise and equal opportunity have given America the most dynamic economy in the world. In the last 5 years, the United States has created nearly 14 million new jobs -- that's more jobs than all of Western Europe and Japan combined have created in more than a decade. And over 4 million jobs have gone to black and Hispanic workers. It's not the Government that created that explosion of jobs, but private businesses like yours.

Actually, we did do one thing here in Washington to help in that -- we got out of the way. We did that by cutting taxes, eliminating excessive regulations, and reducing the growth of government spending. And the result is America is heading toward a new record for the longest peacetime economic expansion in our history. And unlike the expansion of '75 to '79, when black family income actually declined, during this expansion the incomes of black American families have grown by 14 percent.

I think we all understand that our economy is not statistics, but people. And when we hear good news like that we have to appreciate what that means for people's lives. I believe that when it comes to making sure that all Americans -- from every walk of life, every color, every religion -- have the chance to make it big, there's no better way than that to keep the economy sparkling and the opportunities expanding for all our citizens. But we all know that misguided government policies can reduce opportunity.

For example, raising the minimum wage laws, most economists agree, reduces employment. And it's minorities, young people, and the poor that are hit the hardest. But some in Congress, under pressure from special interests, are pushing legislation to hike the minimum wage. Our Labor Department has estimated that every 10-percent increase in the minimum wage will mean 100,000 to 200,000 fewer jobs. Now, some in Congress want to raise the minimum wage more than 38 percent over the next 3 years. That could mean 800,000 jobs down the drain -- jobs that already exist, or jobs, hope, and opportunity that will never be created.

This administration wants no part of a bill that will put people out of work or keep teenagers and young adults from getting their first job. We want to help people move up the economic ladder, not hoist the lower rungs out of their reach. You and all the rest of America's entrepreneurs make a vital contribution in bringing people into the work force and, through training and job experience, helping them to advance and grow.

Drucker has said that whenever you see a successful business, someone once made a courageous decision. Those words ring particularly true during Minority Enterprise Development Week, when we honor courageous people who overcame difficult odds and achieved success through hard work, vision, and prayer. By working so hard to realize your dreams, you also help other people's dreams to come true: the employees you hire, the suppliers you give business to, the charities you support, and all those inspired by the example of accomplishment, dignity, and self-reliance that you set in your economy -- or community, I should say.

Minority business is an important force in the economy and a vital part of our communities. If the dream of America is to be strengthened, we must not waste the genius of one mind or the strength of one body or the spirit of one soul. As entrepreneurs you are creators. You help create for the future in America and that will be even greater than it is today. You give life to the American dream.

The President. Judge, I'm only going to speak for a moment or two because I know there aren't many in this group of friends and colleagues who need to be reminded of your accomplishments. But I do think it's important to formally note here the debt that this nation owes to you for a lifetime of devoted service.

The simple fact is that you've had one of the most distinguished careers in the history of the American judiciary. Not only that, you've handled some of the most important cases of our times, but you've handled them with distinction and character. And it's for this that history will remember you; and for this, today, that your countrymen thank you.

For example, only a short walk from here is the office where President Eisenhower told you that of all the crises in his own life, and he specifically mentioned the Normandy invasion, he had never felt so much public pressure as he did during the international campaign to thwart the course of justice in the Rosenberg espionage case. But President Eisenhower also told you that whenever he considered weakening or giving in to that political pressure, he thought of the courage that you had shown during the trial and sentencing, and I know he told you he took inspiration from that. Judge Kaufman, keeping a judiciary independent and protecting the courts from political pressures is both noble and heroic work, and you certainly earned both of those adjectives. And by the way, it's certainly worth noting one comment you made during the sentence hearing, you said then that betraying a nation's secrets was a crime worse than murder. Well, sadly, we've learned in recent years how utterly appropriate and far-seeing those words were.

You have, of course, been at the center of many other important moments in recent judicial history: the Appalachian crime trial, the Taylor v. Board of Education desegregation case, the Pentagon Papers case, and many others. And during all of these proceedings your conduct and decisions showed always a level of fairness and excellence that was frequently remarked upon by court observers and, yes, sometimes even by the contending parties themselves. It's true you insisted on high standards, that you've always asked the best of those who appeared before you or worked with you. But then you had a right to make such demands -- because you made even greater demands on yourself.

I think you know I owe you a special debt of gratitude here. Judge, one of my greatest hopes for this administration was a crackdown on organized crime of historic proportions -- a full declaration of war that would lead to not just occasional tactical victories against the mob but a systematic strategic approach that would break apart the nationwide syndicates and, once and for all, take this terrible blot from American history. In many ways now, we are approaching that goal -- we have set in place both the strategy and the machinery to accomplish this. And all of this was due in no small part to the 3 years of work done by the President's Commission on Organized Crime that you so graciously agreed to chair. I won't list all the accomplishments of the Commission, but from examining the role of drugs to finances to new emerging groups to the legal community, the Commission did extraordinary work -- work that is routinely and frequently quoted now, whenever organized crime is discussed in the media or the Government or the academy [academia].

And that's what it comes down to, Judge. I don't know how many people about whom this can be said. But the truth is that in your career you took on the mob, the international Communist conspiracy, and even the United States Government bureaucracy, and they, not you, came up second best. So, we salute you today, not only for your intellect and achievement but for your courage and persistence as well. We salute you for your unconditional commitment to a cause you perceived as worthy of such selflessness and the cause of justice.

Robert Kaufman became an assistant Federal prosecutor at the age of 25. More than five decades later, both his energy and his devotion to the rule of law remain utterly unflagging. Assistant Federal prosecutor, Special Assistant to the United States Attorney General, District Court judge, judge on the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, member of countless panels and commissions, including the leadership of the President's Commission on Organized Crime -- Judge Kaufman has brought to each his practical skills, his zeal for justice, and, again, that remarkable energy. He is a distinguished jurist and a great American.

President, I'm very grateful to you. You've always been so gracious and, of course, I know you always will be. And give my best to your dear wife. And, of course, I'm honored to accept this Medal of Freedom from the President and to be recognized by the Nation I have served for nearly half a century. I suppose I've been fortunate to have served with some very capable Attorneys General.

All my life, I have sought to preserve and protect the core of our heritage. As embodied in our Constitution, our nation is one of laws -- not merely men -- and that is the genius of America. The Constitution is our beacon and, so long as it guides the ship of state, we need not fear the rocks and shoals. And to that end, I have dedicated my heart and soul. And I take this award as confirmation, Mr. President, that in the eyes of my countrymen, I have helped keep the beacon burning. I thank you, Mr. President, and I accept with pleasure.

President, Mr. Secretary General, Ambassadors, and ladies and gentlemen: It's a great honor to have this opportunity to address this session of the Organization of American States. I confess to a feeling of great pride at being here today, for this is no ordinary diplomatic event, but what must be the largest assemblage of Ambassadors from democratic countries in the history of the hemisphere.

As we gather here today, the hopes and dreams that built this hall and formed this organization have never been so near fulfillment. The work of our forefathers, honored in the Hall of Heroes, has never been so close to completion. We come together as the representatives not of one country nor of a single continent but of a hemisphere dedicated to the cause of human freedom and democratic government. This last decade has witnessed the triumph of freedom in the Americas. Ten years ago, the great majority of people in Latin America lived under oppression.

Many here in this room today have been a part of it. It's a story of courage, statesmanship, perseverance, of heroism and, yes, sometimes, martyrdom. It is the story of men such as Victor Pax Estenssoro, fighting terrorists, drug traffickers, and sheer poverty to keep Bolivia free. It is the story of Raul Alfonsin raising Argentina from defeat and dictatorship to a new democracy. It is the story of Jose Napoleon Duarte, detained, tortured, and exiled after winning El Salvador's Presidency in 1972.

He had the courage to return home, face down his torturers, and prevail. It is the story of all the valiant statesmen of Central and South America who struggle to establish and maintain democracy in their countries.

Well, that's the voice of the Americas, the proud voice of the descendants of Simon Bolivar who demand freedom as their birthright. ``The veil has been torn asunder,'' Bolivar once wrote. ``We have already seen the light, and it is not our desire to be thrust back into the darkness.'' Yes, the Americas have come far into the light of liberty, and we have no intention of falling back into the shadows of oppression and tyranny. But for all the heroism and perseverance, our journey is not yet complete. Today we're called upon to face one of the most serious challenges that has ever confronted our hemisphere. It will demand from all our nations the same statesmanship, the same courage, and the absolute commitment to freedom that has brought us so far.

I'm talking about the efforts of the democratic nations of Central, South, and North America to bring Nicaragua into the embrace of freedom, to sever its ties from an expansionist, colonial force, and to secure for the people of Nicaragua the fulfillment of the promises of democracy and human rights that were made to the OAS in 1979.

We are now at a critical juncture. The Guatemala peace accord, an historic agreement signed by the five Central American Presidents on August 7th, contains many of the elements necessary to bring both lasting peace and enduring democracy to the region. The accord calls on all parties to end the fighting and insist on true democracy and human rights in Nicaragua, including freedom of the press, freedom of worship, the right of free political association, and full, free, and fair elections. The accord makes clear: Democracy is the bottom line; there can be no compromise on that point.

President Arias has stated that it is only with true democracy in Nicaragua that peace will survive. ``If democracy doesn't take hold in Nicaragua,'' he said, ``the armed struggle will continue.'' And of the Sandinistas, he has said: ``It is true they are Marxists. It is true if they consolidate themselves they're going to try to export the revolution, to undermine Costa Rica, to try to create subversion in this country.'' Well, we share President Arias's hope and aspirations, but also his skepticism of the Communist Sandinistas -- a skepticism born of a long record of Sandinista deceit and broken promises. I think skeptics may be excused if they ask: Just where will Daniel Ortega be on November 7th, the day the accord goes into effect?

We cannot forget that there already exists a negotiated settlement with the Sandinistas that predates the Guatemala plan: the settlement of 1979, in which this organization, in an unprecedented action, removed recognition from a sitting government, the government of Anastasio Somoza, and helped bring the Sandinistas to power. As part of that settlement, the Sandinistas agreed to implement genuine democracy, with free elections and full civil liberties. Each nation here, as a member of the Organization of American States, is a party to that negotiated settlement.

We know now that the Sandinistas never intended to carry out those promises. Just a few months later, the Sandinistas met in secret and drafted what has come to be known as the 72-hour document, in which they spelled out their plans for building another Cuba in Nicaragua. And even as the United States was sending the new Nicaraguan Government millions of dollars in aid -- more aid than any other nation -- the Sandinistas were busy smuggling arms to the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador.

But although the Sandinistas have reneged on their commitment to that negotiated settlement, this organization must not. Those promises of democracy and peace were promises we made, as well -- promises to the people of Nicaragua that their hopes for freedom would not be disappointed. We gave our word of honor, and we can't walk away from it. Those promises still form the absolute base of any negotiated settlement with the Sandinista Communists. Full, free, and fair elections and the open society that alone can make them possible, including full human rights and expulsion of all Soviet and Cuban forces -- these must be the bedrock conditions upon which any further agreement with the Sandinistas is built.

This is why, as we press on toward negotiations, we must remain steadfast in our commitment to bring true democracy to Nicaragua and clear-eyed and realistic about who and what the Sandinistas are. In response to the Guatemala accord, the Sandinistas have taken a few initial steps toward compliance, but these welcome steps are only a beginning. La Prensa and Radio Catolica have been allowed to reopen, but the other independent papers remain closed. The dozen other radio stations are still not allowed to broadcast.

Recently the Social Christian Party held its 30th anniversary celebration in Managua. In a demonstration of the internal opposition to the Sandinistas, some 4,000 people attended the rally. The Sandinistas allowed the rally to take place but immediately detained 18 of the Social Christian Party members on trumped-up charges. The former President of Venezuela, Luis Herrera Campins, who was there as a special guest, called the arrests a blatant act of political harassment.

Sandinistas must learn that democracy doesn't mean allowing a rally to take place and then arresting those who take part; it means hundreds of such rallies, free from harassment, either by the secret police or by what the Sandinistas call the divine mobs. Democracy doesn't mean opening one newspaper and one radio station, but opening them all. Democracy doesn't mean releasing a few political prisoners, but all 10,000 of them, some of whom have been imprisoned for as long as 8 years. Democracy doesn't mean selectively granting temporary freedoms in order to placate world opinion, but permanent, across-the-board human rights, guaranteed by a constitution and protected by the checks and balances of democratic government.

All we're asking for is true democracy. Anyone who demands anything less is not serving the cause of peace in Nicaragua. And let me just say there are no new demands here. It is all spelled out in the Guatemala accord and the Wright-Reagan peace plan. Tell me, how can you have democracy when thousands are arrested for political reasons? How can you have a democracy when individuals who displease the Sandinistas are punished by withholding the ration cards that allow them to buy food and other necessities? How can you have democracy with a secret police force, commanded by dedicated Leninists, that keeps tabs on every citizen through the so-called block committees? How can you have democracy when the entire society is being militarized with the military under the control of one political party and its Cuban and Soviet advisers?

Democracy is made up of specifics -- day-to-day freedoms -- just as tyranny is made up of day-to-day oppressions. Is it sincere to talk about democracy but ignore the specific markers by which we can tell if democracy truly exists? I don't think so. That's why the march toward peace in Central America must be a march -- step-by-step, perhaps, but still relentless -- toward democratic freedom.

Along with democratic reforms, the Guatemala accord calls for national reconciliation in Nicaragua through a negotiated cease-fire and a full amnesty. Just this week, President Duarte has called for a spirit of national reconciliation in his country, urging all Salvadorans to, in his words, ``Forgive all those whose acts -- or those acts that have touched our hearts with pain.'' Despite the violence done to him and his family by the guerrillas, he has begun negotiations with them. President Cerezo of Guatemala, too, has responded to the call for reconciliation, and his government will soon be meeting with the guerrillas there. They've done so because they want the Guatemala accord to work. If the Sandinistas truly want the accord to work, isn't it time they sat down and negotiated with the Nicaraguan freedom fighters?

I'd like to take a moment now to address myself to the ladies and gentlemen of the press. As the process of national reconciliation moves forward, your profession bears a special responsibility to see that the terms of the peace process are fully carried out and democracy finds a permanent home in Nicaragua. Sometimes in the past, the media has been criticized for having a double standard. As the story unfolds in Nicaragua, there can be no double standard, only one single and absolute standard: democracy. You must keep watch on the progress of democracy in Nicaragua; train all your investigatory abilities, all your skepticism on the Sandinista government.

I said, the Guatemala accord is a positive movement in the continuing effort, begun with the OAS-negotiated settlement in 1979, to bring democracy and peace to Nicaragua. But although the accord is a step in the right direction, it does not address U.S. security concerns in the region: the growing Soviet-Cuban presence that seeks to establish a Soviet beachhead on the American mainland and the rapid and destabilizing growth of the Sandinista armed forces that threatens Nicaragua's democratic neighbors.

However, these security concerns are addressed in the Wright-Reagan peace plan. The first paragraphs of that plan state in no uncertain terms ``that there be no Soviet, Cuban, or Communist-bloc bases in Nicaragua'' and ``that Nicaragua pose no threat to its neighbor countries nor provide a staging ground for subversion in this hemisphere.'' In other words, the Soviet-bloc and Cuban forces must leave. We will not tolerate Communist colonialism on the American mainland. Freedom in Nicaragua, liberation from all tyrants, domestic and foreign -- that is the commitment of the United States, a bipartisan consensus on the conditions that will satisfy U.S. security interests. And let me add, those security interests are shared by every democratic nation in the hemisphere. From the first Congress of American States, convened by Simon Bolivar, and the Treaty of Perpetual Union, League and Confederation, the peoples of the American hemisphere have insisted on the sovereignty and independence of member states against foreign imperialism.

Today these same forces grip Nicaragua, but there is an anticolonial struggle that has arisen and that can throw off the imperialist yoke. The fact is that there's only one reason why the Communist subversion of the Central American democracies has been, for the moment, blocked. There is only one reason why the democratic process envisioned in the Guatemala plan still has a hope for success, and that is the brave Nicaraguan freedom fighters who are battling and dying to bring freedom and justice to their homeland.

Most are young men, barely in their twenties, only children when the Somoza regime was toppled. They have heard of the promises of 1979 -- of freedom, human rights -- but they've known only tyranny, the steadily growing stranglehold of the new dictators on their society. They have seen their freedoms choked off one by one, their farms confiscated, their priests harassed. They have seen arbitrary arrests, beatings, and official murder become the order of the day.

They've seen other young Nicaraguans drafted to serve under Soviet and Cuban so-called advisers, pawns in their war to impose a foreign tyranny on the American mainland. Yes, these Nicaraguans have known only tyranny. They have seen one dictator fall only to be replaced by nine Commandantes who are far worse, and they have rebelled. Their hearts demand freedom. In the spirit of the American freedom fighters of earlier centuries, they are fighting for liberty, they're fighting for independence.

There are now well over 15,000 Nicaraguan freedom fighters -- three times the number that overthrew Somoza -- operating throughout the entire length of Nicaragua. They would not have survived without the friendship and help of the Nicaraguan people. For 7 years now the freedom fighters have prevented the consolidation of totalitarian power in Nicaragua. For now, the billions of dollars in Soviet-bloc military aid pouring into Managua have been aimed primarily at defeating the freedom fighters so that later they may attack the surrounding democracies.

All of us in public life should remember it is the freedom fighters -- most of them poor farmers fighting against overwhelming odds in the jungles of Nicaragua -- it is their blood and courage that have stemmed the tide of Communist expansion in Central America. Without the freedom fighters, the Sandinistas never would have signed the Guatemala accord, and there would be no pressure on the Sandinistas to reform. Their totalitarian grip on Nicaragua would only grow tighter and, with all dissent quashed at home, the Sandinistas would soon turn their attention to their neighbors. The huge Sandinista military machine, equipped and staffed by Cubans and Soviet-bloc advisers, would spread its shadow across all of Central America. Their proven subversion of the surrounding democracies, only temporarily slowed, would continue apace. In fact, even now, in the middle of the peace process, with all world opinion focused on the Sandinistas, they still continue to supply weapons to the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador.

We want to see the freedom fighters able to go home to live in peace and freedom in Nicaragua. The Congress of the United States has made a moral commitment to these men; it cannot just walk away. I've made a personal commitment to them, and I will not walk away. They are fighting in the jungles of Nicaragua not only for their own freedom but for your freedom and mine. And I make a solemn vow: As long as there is breath in this body, I will speak and work, strive and struggle, for the cause of the Nicaraguan freedom fighters.

But continuing aid to the democratic resistance is not only a moral obligation, it is the essential guarantee that the Sandinistas will live up to the democratic conditions of the Guatemala accord and that the democratic countries of the Americas will be safe from Sandinista subversion. We must ask: Would the Sandinistas have signed the accord if it weren't for the freedom fighters? If the United States Congress had voted against aid to the freedom fighters last year, would we be talking about democratic reforms in Nicaragua today? The answer is clearly no.

For these reasons, I will request and fight for a $270 million package of renewed military and humanitarian assistance for the freedom fighters that will be spread over an 18-month period. The renewed assistance will continue until the Sandinistas, negotiating with the freedom fighters, conclude an agreement for a cease-fire and full democracy is established in Nicaragua. Once a cease-fire is fully in effect, only that support necessary to maintain the freedom fighters as a viable force will be delivered. Then we -- and they -- will be watching to see how genuine the democratic reforms in Nicaragua are. The best indicator will be when the freedom fighters are allowed to contest power politically without retribution rather than through force of arms. As that happens, our support levels to the resistance forces will decrease proportionately, and the assistance money will then be redirected to strengthening the democratic process underway in Nicaragua.

Liberty for one and all -- that might be the motto of this organization. During the laying of the cornerstone of this building, the Brazilian statesman Joaquim Nabuco talked of the special destiny of the American hemisphere and the unique purpose of the OAS: ``It seems evident that a decree of providence made the western shore of the Atlantic appear late in history as the chosen land for a great renewal of mankind.'' That is the solemn trust of this organization: to keep watch over this chosen land, to keep it secure from alien powers and colonial despotisms, so that man may renew himself here in freedom.

That is why in 1979 this organization, and many of the American states individually, reached out to the Nicaraguan people and pledged to them true freedom and full human rights. Now we must simply hold to that promise, just as we hold to our love of liberty, not for the few but, as Jose Marti said: liberty, for one and for all.

Reagan. Mr. President, it's been a real pleasure to welcome you once again to the White House and to the United States. President Kaunda is a senior and highly respected statesman of Africa and the world. As chairman of the frontline states, his counsel is especially valuable as we work together for peace and economic development in southern Africa. President Kaunda's recent election for a second term as Chairman of the Organization of African Unity attests to the high esteem in which he's held throughout that vast continent.

Our talks today covered the full range of international issues. We reaffirmed our shared determination to work for the earliest possible end of apartheid in South Africa and its replacement by a truly democratic government. The United States will continue to do everything in its power to bring about a negotiated settlement involving the independence of Namibia and the departure of all foreign forces from Angola. I told President Kaunda of my meetings this week with President Chissano and of our support for his efforts to work for peace in Mozambique. I expressed our appreciation for President Kaunda's efforts on behalf of peace in the Persian Gulf and North Africa and his support for efforts to achieve real arms reduction agreements between the United States and the Soviet Union.

Today, also, we reaffirmed the long tradition of warm and productive relations between the United States and Zambia and the other states of southern Africa and their efforts to expand trade, pursue economic reform, and develop their transportation networks. The United States has a stake in African economic progress. We've set a goal of ending the hunger that now plagues sub-Saharan Africa and to do this by the year 2000. Accomplishing this will require growth-oriented reform in Africa and assistance from the United States. We Americans are ready and willing to do our part, but setting things right will also require a commitment for tangible reform from African governments.

We welcome the opportunity to join with you, President Kaunda, in helping to build a future of peace, prosperity, and freedom for Africa and for Zambia. It was a pleasure to have you as our guest, and we wish you a pleasant time in our country for the rest of your stay.

Kaunda. Mr. President, may I once again thank you, your government, and the people for receiving my delegation and myself so well. I have found our discussions particularly useful. I'm taking back to Africa a message of hope and promise. I'm taking back to Africa a message of cooperation and not confrontation. I'm taking back to Africa a message of love based on truth, social justice, and fairplay from this country.

We have our differences of approach, but not differences of principle. This is important in itself. I can assure you, Mr. President, that when I report back to the summit of the OAU, November 30 and December 1, God willing, of this year, it will be a message which will lend more to cooperation and not confrontation.

Once again, Mr. President, thank you for the exchange of views, which have been very, very fruitful, indeed, and have helped me a lot to appreciate the stand taken by your country on many international issues. I can only end by saying I wish you God's blessings as you come to the end of the term of your very onerous job. I must once again emphasize our gratitude to you and General Secretary Gorbachev on the recently agreed, new approach to the problems of nuclear weapons on this Earth. Again, may God bless you and guide you. Thank you, Mr.

The President. I don't know any conservatives who say that. I think it's very apparent whose fault it is. We saw that in the committee hearings. I would like to call your attention to the fact that some of the same individuals who were participating in that had much the same attitude toward my nomination of Justice Rehnquist.

The President. I'm delighted to announce today my nominee for the post of Secretary of Transportation, James Burnley. Jim came to Washington in 1981, where he first served as Director of VISTA and then went to the Justice Department as an Associate Deputy Attorney General. He then moved over to Transportation where he served first as General Counsel and then Deputy Secretary. Now, obviously, this sort of upward mobility represents a remarkable Washington success story. In just a few short years, Jim has moved from being a prominent North Carolina trial lawyer to a United States Cabinet nominee, and there's certainly a reason for this success.

Since his days in the Yale University Political Union -- where, by the way, he reminds me he had to listen to a speech from a certain newly elected Governor of California -- [laughter] -- Jim has shown not just sound political instincts -- he also belonged to the Conservative Party in the Union -- but a desire to enter public service and influence our national life. Add to his grasp of public policy his personal integrity and easy manner, and you can understand how he earned his reputation as both a sound policymaker and excellent administrator.

I'm also delighted to tell you today that Mimi Dawson is our nominee for Deputy Secretary of Transportation. Mimi, too, brings considerable experience and is a remarkable success story. She worked on the Hill for 11 years. Before leaving, she worked closely on the agenda for the Senate Commerce Committee, which as you know has responsibility for transportation. Since 1981 Mimi has been a member of the FCC, where she's been a leading expert on common carrier issues, particularly deregulation of the telecommunications marketplace, including the economic effect of mergers and acquisitions. And Jim, I'm sure you feel fortunate, as do I, to have an individual with Mimi's wide-ranging background and solid accomplishments as second in command at DOT.

I know that Jim and Mimi will push ahead even further on such critical issues as airline safety, privatization of public transportation, space commercialization and industry, and general transportation safety. And that list represents a tall order for both of them. But with the continued help of all of you here, I have no doubt that together we will prevail.

Burnley. Mr. President, I'm deeply honored by your decision to nominate me to serve as the next Secretary of Transportation, and I am also very pleased that you will simultaneously be submitting Mimi Dawson's nomination to replace me as Deputy Secretary.

The only constant in transportation in recent years has been the rate of very rapid change. Twenty percent of our gross national product is generated by transportation, and our expanding economy depends on continuing dynamic growth in our transportation industries. Thus, even with the progress that the administration and Congress have made in the last 6 years, we still face many transportation challenges in this country. We have a very strong team at the Department and a solid foundation as a result of the farsighted leadership of your former Secretaries, Elizabeth Dole and Drew Lewis. And I'm looking forward to the opportunity to consult and work cooperatively with both the Congress and the transportation community to ensure the safest, most efficient transportation system possible.

Dawson. Thank you, Jim. Thank you, Mr. President. I would like to say how deeply honored I have been over the last 6 years to serve you as a member of the Federal Communications Commission. We have dealt with a lot of very difficult issues there, and I think they helped me to be able to offer to Jim Burnley an opportunity to bring him a great deal of help in the many serious, challenging issues which face us at the Department of Transportation. I look forward to this challenge, and I'll look forward to working with many of you and, of course, with Members of Congress and, most of all, my new boss. Thank you.

Since coming to the Commission, she has taken an active interest in the area of common carrier, an interest which was recognized with her appointment to the Federal State Joint Board convened to oversee changes in the jurisdictional separations procedures. She has served as Defense Commissioner since June 1, 1982.

Down Syndrome Month affords all Americans an opportunity to take note of the progress science has made over the past two decades in understanding developmental disabilities, especially Down Syndrome. An accumulation of new research, a body of knowledge represented by thousands of published scientific papers, has meant fresh help for mentally handicapped people and the establishment of a strong information base for future efforts. One of the most important benefits of this research is that people everywhere are becoming increasingly sensitive to the achievements, needs, and potential of the mentally handicapped.

Our society is stronger and healthier because a new situation now prevails for those in our midst who are developmentally disabled. Today, people with Down Syndrome often take part in special education classes within mainstreamed programs in schools, vocational training, and living arrangements that promote as much independence as possible. In addition, parents of babies with Down Syndrome are receiving the education and support they need to understand this condition and to plan for the future of their children with new confidence and hope.

The gift of life, God's special gift, is no less beautiful when it is accompanied by illness or weakness, hunger or poverty, mental or physical handicaps, loneliness or old age. Indeed, at these times, human life gains extra splendor as it requires our special care, concern, and reverence. It is in and through the weakest of human vessels that the Lord continues to reveal the power of His love.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1987 as National Down Syndrome Month. I invite all concerned citizens, agencies, and organizations to unite during October with appropriate observances and activities directed toward assisting affected individuals and their families to enjoy to the fullest the blessings of life.

America's remarkable ability to create new jobs attests to the ingenuity and vitality of our people and to the fundamental strength and effectiveness of the free market economy. More Americans are working now than ever, and millions of new jobs are being created each year, including many by small business. Our observance of National Job Skills Week reminds us that training for new job skills is of critical importance to our economy and to our entire society.

Department of Labor's Workforce 2000 study indicates a continuing vital need for job skills training. Trends suggest that the rate of labor force growth will diminish significantly and that the pool of workers, particularly at the entry level, will be smaller. This situation may afford unique opportunities for people from groups that historically have not entered the labor market. It challenges schools, business, community-based organizations, and government at all levels -- Federal, State, and local -- to continue to train people in the skills they will need to find and keep good jobs as the requirements of the workplace change. And it reminds us to pay careful attention to the implications of changes underway in the nature of the workplace and the composition of the work force.

National School Lunch Program was founded 41 years ago. Through it the Federal government works with State governments and local communities to provide food assistance each day for more than 20 million students in 90,000 schools. During National School Lunch Week the American people take time to salute this program and the hardworking citizens whose participation makes it so effective.

This successful program is constantly improving. For instance, food service managers have reached out to the community to involve parents and have promoted good management practices. Many school cafeterias offer new choices such as salad bars to make the lunch period more enjoyable for students. The National School Lunch Program represents the cooperative efforts of parents, teachers, community leaders, and food service specialists in behalf of the students of our Nation, and that is good reason for all of us to celebrate.

For the past 33 years during Thanksgiving week, the American people have observed National Farm-City Week to express gratitude for the bounty with which God has blessed our land and to recognize the achievements of the farmers, rural townspeople, and city residents who make our Nation's agricultural production and distribution system so successful. Truly this cooperation between rural and city dwellers for mutual benefit helps ensure our country's well-being.

America's farmers have provided food and fiber to sustain our people throughout decade after decade of progress. Farmers' productivity has increased steadily, thanks largely to their initiative in supporting and adopting the methods and materials developed by scientific research. Yield per acre has grown tremendously, with the result that American farmers are able not only to meet the Nation's basic needs for foodstuffs, but also to produce agricultural goods for export and for a wide variety of specialty markets here in the United States and around the world.

American agriculture, and the many service industries that depend upon it in cities and towns and along all the routes in between, is a story of extraordinary labor creating extraordinary abundance. At this time of year, it is only fitting that all Americans should offer some special sign of thanks to those who grow, harvest, and bring to our Nation's tables the fruits of sun, seed, and soil.

Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim the week of November 20 through November 26, 1987, as National Farm-City Week. I call upon all Americans, in rural areas and cities alike, to join in recognizing the accomplishments of our productive farmers and of our urban residents, who cooperate to create abundance, wealth, and strength for our Nation.

Today's advance notifications inform Congress that these sales are under consideration and initiate a 20-day period of additional consultations and discussions. At the conclusion of this 20-day period, the administration will formally notify Congress of the systems it plans to offer for sale to Saudi Arabia.

Having taken the situation in the region into account and after extensive consultations with Congress, the President at this time has decided to withhold notification of a proposed sale of Maverick air-to-ground missiles. The administration will keep the issue of Saudi need for Maverick missiles under very close review in the light of threats to Saudi security and will maintain close contact with Congress. The President has personally assured the Saudi Government that in the event of an emergency, the United States would provide Mavericks from American stocks with appropriate notifications to the Congress.

These sales are an essential part of the U.S. strategy of protecting U.S. interests, as well as those of our friends in the Gulf region, through security cooperation. The sales support Saudi Arabia's legitimate defense needs at a time of heightened threat to Saudi and U.S. military and economic interests in the Gulf. They follow other sales to Saudi Arabia approved earlier this year of armed helicopters, electronic countermeasures systems, and Bradley fighting vehicles. They do not upset the basic military balance in the Middle East.

The administration has made a detailed case for these sales during extensive consultations with the Congress over a period of 5 weeks prior to the advance notifications. The administration will continue to consult on the overall situation in the Gulf and on the arms sales.

Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Proclamation shall be effective with respect to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on and after the third day following the date of publication of this Proclamation in the Federal Register.

Paragraph (3) of this Proclamation shall be effective with respect to articles both (1) imported on or after January 1, 1976, and (2) entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on and after the third day following the date of publication of this Proclamation in the Federal Register.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

I am pleased by Judge Bork's decision to go forward with his nomination for the Supreme Court. Over the last few weeks, there has been considerable discussion about Judge Bork. His opponents mounted an attack based on innuendos, mistruths, and distortions to shield Bob Bork's real record of integrity, decency, fairness, and, above all, judicial restraint.

Our efforts will be focused on setting the record straight with the American people. It is time to remove the special interests from the judicial selection process. It is time to stop those who are determined to politicize the judiciary and try to accomplish through the courts what they cannot accomplish through the legislature.

The President. I just want to thank you all and tell you that Judge Bork, if you don't know already, has made a statement to the effect that he is going to remain as the appointee. So, I'm just going to say to you that we are going to fight on for an independent judiciary and we'll stay in the fight and see that we get our story told. Thank you very much.

Nancy and I were saddened to learn of the death this morning of our friend, Ambassador Clare Boothe Luce. Born into a relatively humble home and given only a limited formal education, Mrs. Luce built a life and career that made her a legend: editor of Vanity Fair; playwright of Broadway hits, including the classic ``The Women''; author of countless books and articles; war correspondent for Life magazine; Congresswoman; Ambassador; wife of Henry Luce, founder of Time magazine and one of the Nation's preeminent journalists; and, of course, a woman who was constantly expanding the boundaries of what a woman could do. As Wilfrid Sheed wrote about Mrs. Luce's career: ``It was brand-new territory, outside the tiny compound where women lived in those days. Clare was a pioneer not just during office hours but every breathing minute.

Nancy and I knew Mrs. Luce as a woman of generosity, charm, forcefulness, and -- a point not always noted -- gentleness. Her Roman Catholic faith was central to her life and thought. And always, there was her concern for the Nation. Near the end of her life, Mrs. Luce moved from her retirement home in Hawaii to Washington in order to be at the center of things, as she had been for so many decades. It is fitting that she died here in the Capital of the Republic she so loved. We will miss her, so will America.

You dropped a name here of Margaret Thatcher, so maybe I can substitute something that's even better. In our economic summits, where we all meet around a table, seven trading partner nations, and so forth -- sometime back when the summit was in England, which meant that Margaret Thatcher was presiding, one of the seven at the table got a little out of line, I thought, and attacked her that she wasn't being properly democratic in conducting the meeting and so forth.

Agency -- for initiating this international council. I want to thank each of you for coming here and giving members of our administration the opportunity to speak to you directly. And if I may, I'd like to devote my own time to a brief discussion of economics.

Well, now, in a moment I'd like to turn to the connection between this American expansion and the global economy. But first, it's important to understand the causes of America's success. Indeed, it's important to understand what have not been the causes of our success. For example, some have alleged that this expansion has been fueled exclusively by some sort of binge of consumer spending. Well, that's untrue. From the fourth quarter of 1982 through the end of 1986, total outlays on personal consumption in the United States rose only about 19 percent -- far less than the rise in investment that I just quoted.

Perhaps the most widespread misconception holds that American growth has been impelled primarily by the Federal budget deficits. Yes, the deficits are large, and our administration has been working to reduce them. And it now appears that the Federal deficits are on a downward path. The deficit for the fiscal year just ended, as of October 1st, will be 30-percent less than it was in 1986, the previous year. But throughout this expansion -- indeed, throughout much of the eighties -- government debt and deficit ratios in the United States have been lower than or equal to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development average.

No, the underlying reason for our expansion, the true reason, is simply this: The United States has become a better place to do business. Our administration cut regulations, supported a sound monetary policy, held back the growth of government spending, and, perhaps most important of all, cut tax rates. And as we did so, the return on investment went up. And overall, the American marketplace became freer, more energetic, more open to innovation and to the future itself.

Well, moving from the United States to the global economy, we understand that every aspect of the American experience cannot be directly transferred to other nations and regions. Other geographies, other cultures, other patterns of thought -- all these must be respected. Indeed, all these contribute to a diversity in the world that we Americans believe should be cherished, not undermined. Yet we believe that certain fundamental elements of our experience are valid for the rest of the world -- the elements of democracy and economic freedom. Indeed, I believe that the world of the future can be just that -- a world of liberty, a world in which human rights are respected in the political and economic spheres alike.

Economic growth along the Pacific rim has been little short of incredible. There's been a victory for democracy in the Philippines. And more recently, a second victory for democracy in South Korea, where a free-market economy is already established and flourishing. In Latin America, nation after nation has turned to democracy, nine nations in all becoming democracies since 1979.

In the words of President Sarney of Brazil: ``Latin America's extraordinary effort to create a democratic order is the most stunning and moving political fact of recent years.'' Low-tax, high-growth policies have spread throughout the Third World, with countries from Botswana to Egypt to Thailand cutting their tax rates. Even China is experimenting with the granting of wider economic freedoms.

Here in North America, recent developments hold particular hope for the future. This week the Institutional Revolutionary Party in Mexico chose Carlos Salinas, a forward-looking economist, as its next candidate for President. And the United States and Canada took the first important steps toward an historic free trade agreement, an agreement that could make our two nations the largest free trade area in the world as an example for all the globe.

I said, the global economy of increasing freedom and economic growth is already coming, it's already being built. The Communist nations know this as well as we do. They know, therefore, that they face a choice: They must either join the new world system or they will become obsolete. It's a decision they must make for themselves.

In the meantime, we can keep on building -- building, here in the United States upon our historic, 59-month expansion; building, in each of your countries, upon much that you've already accomplished. And we can remain faithful to this truth: Freedom -- freedom, both political and economic, represents the fundamental condition for genuine peace and economic growth. Where there is oppression, there is stagnation -- economic stagnation -- and the underlying stagnation of the human heart and mind. But where there's freedom, there is vitality.

I know I've come to the end of the remarks that I wanted to give to you here, but you are epitomizing something that has long been a creed of mine. And that is that we're only in trouble when we're talking about each other, instead of talking to each other. And that has come together in this room. It doesn't happen too many places in the world, or too often. But all of those of you, Charlie, and all of you who've had a part in this, I think, can be very proud of this great accomplishment.

I just want to add two more things. When I spoke about us lifting regulations and so forth to help the economy and all -- I've always believed that there's nothing government can do as well, other than a certain few things like national security, as the private sector can do if government gets out of its way and sets it free to do it.

The other one is when I was mentioning taxes. I'm getting assailed right now. I should make this speech to the Congress -- [laughter] -- about some who just seem to be dying, they think that our deficit and everything is caused by our tax cuts. Just between you and me -- and I wish they'd find it out -- ever since we started cutting the taxes in our administration, the tax revenues for the government have gone steadily up. Once you gave people an incentive to earn more money by saying that you weren't going to take half or more of it away from them, they went out and earned more money. And, so, we're going to try to make them understand that, and that would be a help in cutting our deficit, too. So, I would welcome another tax cut any time.

As you know, ending illegal drug use is one of the most important goals we must work together to achieve. For that reason, I signed an Executive Order on September 15, 1986, directing each Executive branch department and agency to develop a plan that provides for drug education, counseling and rehabilitation, as well as a testing program to identify drug use by Federal workers in sensitive positions.

I was impressed by the strong determination shown at the National Drug Policy Board meeting in July to implement the Executive Order. I know that all of the departmental plans are scheduled to be submitted to the Interagency Working Group by October 15, 1987.

Yesterday afternoon I had a meeting in the White House I won't easily forget. The man who came to see me was Robert Bork, whom I nominated for a position on the highest court in the land, the Supreme Court.

Chief Justice Warren Burger, too, called the tactics used against Judge Bork disinformation -- but the real test is to the principles that were established by the Founding Fathers when they created the Constitution. The Washington Post columnist David Broder recently wrote: ``To subject judges and judicial appointees to propaganda torture tests does terrible damage to the underlying values of this democracy and the safeguards of our freedoms.'' But despite these courageous words from a few individuals, many here in Washington closed their eyes to the wrong being done to the judicial process. And so, as the opposition grew to Judge Bork, some voices were raised to withdraw his name from nomination.

I refused to do. I knew that any decision made by Judge Bork would be made on solid grounds of principle in contrast to those who would politicize our courts; jeopardize the independence of the judiciary; and hold our courts and Constitution hostage. But while I refused to withdraw his name, I understood why Judge Bork himself might choose to do so. The judge was a distinguished scholar at the Yale University Law School, had served as the Nation's top lawyer in the post of Solicitor General, and his tenure on the Court of Appeals here in Washington has been marked by excellence.

So, too, I felt that in many ways he had already won an important victory. During his confirmation hearings, Judge Bork had given us all a national lesson in our legal tradition and the importance of judicial restraint -- the belief of our Founding Fathers that it was the role of the judge to interpret the law, not to preempt the rights of the people and their legislatures by making the law. So, I could understand then why Judge Bork might choose to withdraw and simply return to the Court of Appeals. I wish you could have been there as Judge Bork explained his decision -- as he looked me in the eye and said we must do not what was right or easy for himself, but what was right for the country.

Bork said a critical principle was at stake. He explained it this way, and again I quote: ``Federal judges are not appointed to decide cases according to the latest opinion polls. They are appointed to decide cases impartially, according to law. But when judicial nominees are assessed and treated like political candidates the effect will be to chill the climate in which judicial deliberations take place, to erode public confidence in the impartiality of our judges, and to endanger the independence of the judiciary.'' My fellow Americans, Andrew Jackson said once that ``one man with courage makes a majority.'' Obviously, Bob Bork has that courage, now let's you and I give him our support.

I agree with Judge Bork that there are no illusions. Our judges should be faithful to the written Constitution, the bedrock of our liberties. Those selected for the Supreme Court must be aware of all points of view and their decisions based on government by the people.

For nearly forty years, the United States has maintained a limited naval presence in the Persian Gulf to provide for the safety of U.S.-flag merchant vessels engaging in peaceful activities in international waters and for other reasons essential to the national security.

Our presence in the Persian Gulf has been fully within our rights under international law. Our forces have respected all relevant international rules of conduct, and provided no basis in law for hostile action against them.

Middle East Joint Task Force, while on routine nighttime patrol over international waters of the Persian Gulf, were fired upon without warning by three (possibly four) small Iranian naval vessels. This unprovoked attack posed an immediate and direct threat to the safety of the helicopters and their crewmen. Accordingly, acting in self-defense and pursuant to standing Peacetime Rules of Engagement for the region, the helicopters returned fire with rockets and machine guns. Three Iranian vessels were hit, and one of them subsequently sank. No U.S. personnel were injured in this brief exchange of fire.

RALEIGH. Two of them are seriously injured, and all are receiving complete medical evaluation and treatment. When the survivors are capable of being moved, efforts will be made to repatriate them through a third country with the assistance of an appropriate humanitarian organization.

U.S. forces, which sustained no damage or casualties, have returned to their prior state of alert readiness in carrying out the standing Peacetime Rules of Engagement for the Persian Gulf region. Although they will remain prepared to take any additional defensive action necessary to protect U.S. forces and U.S. lives, there has been no further hostile action by Iranian forces and we regard this incident as closed.

The limited defensive action described above was taken in accordance with our right of self-defense under Article 51 of the United Nations Charter, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief.

Landon exemplified the very best in public service. He deeply loved his country, and he was motivated by a genuine desire to help his fellow man. As Governor of his beloved Kansas, he brought a commonsense wisdom to the statehouse and earned the respect and affection of political friends and foes. As the Republican nominee for President, he spoke passionately and articulately on behalf of the principles on which our nation was founded.

Landon was a true elder statesman, whose expectations and views were sought and valued by many of us in public life. Until his last days he took a great interest in world affairs and was never too busy to share his thoughts. It was a special comfort to me to know he was just a phone call away.

Nancy and I have very warm memories of our friend Alf Landon and recall with special fondness our visit to his home last month. Though Alf is no longer with us, his work continues through his daughter, Senator Nancy Kassebaum.

And I have to confess that when I took that job I had a view of business that was fashionable in some circles in those days -- an unflattering view. But when I visited the plants and met the employees face-to-face, I learned something. I learned that I was seeing then, as I've seen here today, the real source of this nation's economic growth and productivity -- not government or bureaucracy. America's workers and entrepreneurs were making it happen back then, and people like you are making it happen today.

And is it happening? Well, in October the American economic expansion is in its 59th straight month. Fifty-nine months -- that will make this the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. Inflation and interest rates are down.

Productivity is up. America's manufacturing productivity is shooting ahead at the fastest rate in 20 years. Investment in capital equipment like that made by Somerset Technologies is up more than 50 percent. Net business formations have increased by about 20 percent. All around us we see a proliferation of new technology. But most heartening of all is what this means in human terms. The poverty and unemployment rates, as you've been told, are down. Coupled with our tax cuts, this solid economic growth means rising take-home pay, as has been mentioned here today, for America's families. And during these 59 months we've seen the creation of nearly 14 million new jobs. That's an average of about 240,000 jobs a month, including some 500,000 new jobs right here in New Jersey.

Indeed, the Europeans talk of what they call the American miracle. Well, if anybody wants to see miracles, they should be here today. You of Somerset Technologies have worked together as a team to increase your sales by more than $10 million since 1948 [1984], and while too many people see nothing but trade barriers when they look at Japan, you see opportunities.

Jersey as throughout the Nation, we're seeing what can truly be called an economic renaissance. Well, the reason is simple, if you ask why, really. America has become a better place to work, invest, and do business. Our administration cut regulations, supported a sound monetary policy, held back the growth of government spending, and -- perhaps most important of all, and it's been mentioned here today -- cut taxes. As we did so, the value of your paycheck went up, the return on investment went up, and the American marketplace became freer, more energetic, more open to innovation and to the future itself.

But it's my duty to tell you that this miracle -- all you've worked so hard to accomplish, all that America itself has worked so hard to accomplish -- all of this is now in danger. You see, some down in Washington seem determined to destroy our economic expansion and send us right back into the malaise and stagflation of the seventies. I'll be saying more about this later today, but for now, let me tell you about a serious threat that is facing our country.

It's the constant threat of protectionist, antitrade legislation. We're working with Congress now to fix the proposed trade bill so that it won't be antijobs, antigrowth, and anticonsumer; so that it won't be a bill that closes us off from foreign markets; and so that it won't be a bill that would hinder your affiliate in Japan.

I will not sign any bill that will hurt the American worker. With your support, I will insist that Congress go the positive route, opening markets, not shutting them down. But your support, and the support of all working Americans, will be crucial. So, to the panelists and those in the audience: I hope I can count on all of you.

We've also got to keep Federal spending down and stop those who would raise your taxes to pay for Federal extravagance. Congress has to hold to the spending limits under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill. It's important to put permanent reforms in place, reforms that will ensure economic growth even after our administration leaves office. With the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment, we can give the American people an Economic Bill of Rights so that congressional taxing and spending can never again endanger our livelihoods. So, together, let's make sure that economic miracles never cease. Let's ensure the Nation's right to a free economy, an economy of growth and opportunity for you, your children, and your children's children.

I've got a new hobby. I have been collecting stories that can be told -- or are being told by the people in that other great power that depends totally on government and has nothing to do with free enterprise: the Soviet Union. It seems there that there is a 10-year waiting period for buying an automobile. You have to go through departments and sign up papers and so forth and then you have to put up your money. And then they tell you to come back in 10 years and get your car.

But that's enough from me. And I tell you honestly, that is a story being told by the Soviets among themselves. So, it shows they've got a sense of humor, but they've also got a pretty good idea of what their system is all about.

And, Tom, no, I wasn't at the Little Big Horn -- [laughter] -- but I was in the horse cavalry. [Laughter] Well, it's good to be in New Jersey and Somerset, and this is especially an appropriate time to come here. Two hundred years ago this past summer, when the framers of our Constitution met in Philadelphia, it was William Paterson and his colleagues from New Jersey who fought for the principle of equal representation for each State in the new National Legislature. Their New Jersey Plan set the stage for the Great Compromise that is at the heart of our constitutional system. Without them, the United States Senate would be entirely different than it is today. So, you're the ones responsible.

In the months before the Constitutional Convention, James Madison described New Jersey as like a cask tapped at both ends because of tariffs in both New York and Pennsylvania. Well, things sure have changed. Today New Jersey is a powerhouse of technological innovation and entrepreneurial energy, as you've been told already here today. Yes, you are a generator of the economic dynamism that has swept America in these last 6\1/2\ years.

You've been in the forefront of the economic expansion that has led leaders of the other major industrial powers to shake their heads in wonder when they've spoken to me about what they call the American miracle. I'm going to say a few words about the national expansion, but I know everyone here would agree that New Jersey has had a special place in that expansion -- and let me say here that thanks to the leadership of people of courage, of vision, of determination, people like Speaker Chuck Hardwick and Governor Tom Kean.

This is shaping up to be a year of celebrations. The bicentennial of the Constitution -- maybe even the end of the football strike. [Laughter] And in fewer than 30 days, America will have another celebration. Our economic expansion will go on the recordbooks as America's all-time, peacetime champion -- 59 months of peace and economic growth. This land of opportunity has never recorded a run like that before. And talk about world-class performances -- to tell from the leading indicators, the champ's not even breathing hard.

I've seen firsthand what the expansion has meant here in New Jersey. This morning I was a guest at Somerset Technologies. I heard the story of businesses that were taking a beating when we entered office. Years of inflation, stagnation, rising tax and interest rates, and the drying up of investment capital, as your Governor has told you, it had all left the units that now make up this company that I visited on the ropes and out of wind. And then came the steadily dropping inflation and interest rates and the cut in tax rates.

Over these 5 years, the Somerset story has been repeated in hundreds of thousands of companies and communities all over America, and you know the results. After years of riding a plunging roller coaster, the American family has seen its income go on the rise again. Middle-income Americans, whose real income stagnated in the seventies, can once again look to the future with hope and confidence. Americans are dreaming great dreams again. And entrepreneurs -- young and old, male and female, black and white -- have been popping up like daisies all over the landscape to chase those dreams, and with them have come new companies, new technologies, and new opportunities for everyone. Yes, a new spirit of adventure, a new excitement, is in the American air. And with that in mind, I thought I'd have a little adventure of my own here and make a prediction. In December 1982, just as our tax cuts were about to take full effect, our country saw the biggest jump in new business incorporations on file. When our second round of tax cuts take full effect next year, I predict that we'll see the start of a new surge of economic growth.

Now, let me touch on that other charge: that the recovery has passed blacks and the poor by. This one kind of touches my temperature control, because it's so off the wall. In the last 5 years, black employment has shot forward twice as fast as white employment. Since 1982 the real income of black families -- the real income -- has grown almost 40 percent faster than white income. And the share of black families in the highest brackets is up by over 70 percent. This August the percentage of blacks employed was the highest on record, as was the percentage of whites. One authority on economic terms has written of this record: ``On every front -- jobs, income, even household wealth -- this 1981 through 1986 has been the best 5 years in black history.'' Granted they've had further to go, but now they're making up for it.

And blacks are by no means the only group. Hispanics, for example, have found 2 million jobs. Overall, we've reversed the rise in the poverty rate that began under my predecessor. As opportunity has risen, poverty has fallen. We still have a distance to go, but we're on the right track. Of this there can be no doubt: The way to lick poverty in America is with a hand up, not a handout. While I'm talking about poverty, let me say how pleased I am with the cooperation between our folks in Washington and yours in Trenton to implement the Governor's welfare reform initiative. On October 1st we granted the waivers, and now you are going forward. The New Jersey reforms could prove among the most far-reaching and significant ever in helping those on welfare get off and become productive citizens. And that's what your Governor has done.

I've proposed legislation to allow States even more room to experiment, and I hope Congress will pass it. In the meantime, let me say to Governor Kean: We stand behind the imaginative and innovative REACH program.

I was saying, our record expansion has been for all Americans. Since it began we've created more than 13\1/2\ million new jobs -- a half million, as he told you, right here in New Jersey. This is more jobs than Europe and Japan together have created in the last 10 years. In September unemployment fell to the lowest level in this decade, and a greater proportion of Americans have been at work this year than ever before in the history of the United States.

I think a great many people don't understand how some of these figures -- or what they're based on. The potential employment pool in America is everyone, male and female, from age 16 up. It includes all the retired people. It includes, as I say, kids in school and so forth. But that is supposed to be the potential pool against which we match our employment record. Well, more than 62 percent of that age group is presently employed. That has never before happened in our country.

But this isn't the time to sit back. I remember as a young man the good years of the twenties and then the crash of '29 and the Depression. It could happen again. If Congress passes protectionist legislation, if Congress doesn't put a brake -- a real brake -- on its runaway spending and raises taxes, this extraordinary expansion could be brought to a tragic collapse.

Since George Washington was first sworn in to the present, in periods when our international trade has grown, the number of jobs have grown; when international trade has dropped, the number of jobs has dropped. This region has seen firsthand the costs of protection. In January a certain State across the Hudson put an end to some domestic trade barriers. They let in milk from New Jersey -- [laughter] -- and the average price of a gallon of milk on the Lower East Side of New York City dropped by 40 cents. That was just one product traded not between two nations but two States. Put that on a world scale, and you see how much protectionism costs America's families. It's just this simple: America needs more trade, not less.

The framework for a free trade agreement concluded just recently with Canada points the way to the future -- and the world's future. By the year 2000, the barriers to trade between the globe's two largest trading partners will, for the most part, vanish. If past is prolog, we know what the results will be. Almost 200 years ago, trade barriers vanished in the United States part of this continent after the new Constitution took effect. Almost immediately, a stagnant national economy began to boom. The U.S.-Canada free trade agreement is a new economic constitution for North America. It will, I believe, inaugurate a similar continent-wide economic expansion. This is our policy not only to Canada but to the world. We're ready to go as far as our trading partners are on one condition: We want trade that is free and trade that is fair.

But all the trade in the world won't help us if we don't first get our own house in order. Congress is trying to force me to pick between more taxes or less defense. Well, it ain't going to work. I have a duty to the Constitution to protect our nation from foreign adversaries. I have a duty to America's families to protect this expansion.

Our opponents say they're against deficits, but they want to end the deficit by raising your taxes. I want to end it by cutting their spending. That's not going to be easy. Few Americans realize it, but a little more than a decade ago our government had a major shift in the checks and balances of budgetmaking power. The President's relative role was diminished, and the Congress' enhanced. And before that, Federal debt with inflation taken out had been steady or declining for a quarter of a century.

And this is why I've said it's time for the President to have the same tool that Tom Kean has had to help bring taxes down and growth up -- a line-item veto. And it's why I've said we need for the United States the same requirement to balance the budget that the people of New Jersey have put on their State government.

Now, an amendment enters the Constitution when three-fourths of the States approve it. But first someone has to draft common language to consider. Under the Constitution, Congress can do that, or the States themselves can convene a meeting. It takes 34 States to do that. Thirty-two have already asked for one to draw up a balanced budget amendment. Now, of course, I'd prefer Congress to do the drafting. It would be quicker; it would be easier. But one way or another we owe it to our children to see that before the decade is out the Constitution of the United States of America includes a balanced budget amendment. The first man to ask for that was Thomas Jefferson, who at the time of ratification of the Constitution said it has one glaring omission: it does not have a clause prohibiting the Federal Government from borrowing.

Well, over the last several years, we've traveled a long way together. It hasn't always been an easy journey; there have been some troublespots, but together we've moved ahead. The economic gains that have been made are a sign of our determination to stay with a consistent plan of progress. But, as I said in July, as we unveiled the Economic Bill of Rights, America is at a crossroads. The choices are between those who would return to the days of ``government knows best'' or continue on our path of sustained economic growth and opportunity.

There's another crossroads in this country, and that is the debate underway in the United States Senate on the confirmation of judges to our nation's highest courts. Washington Post columnist David Broder recently wrote of all this, and I'll quote: ``I have seen enough politics in my time to have lost my squeamishness. But watching these tactics applied to judges is scary.'' He concludes, ``It would send shivers down the spine of anyone who understands the role of the judiciary in this society.'' Well, I agree, and so does Judge Bork. When I nominated Judge Robert Bork to the United States Supreme Court last July, I thought the confirmation process would go forward in a statesmanlike manner with a calm and sensible exchange of views. That hasn't been the case. These hearings have been marred by distortions and innuendos.

Bork and I agree that there are no illusions about the outcome of the vote in the Senate, but we also agree a crucial principle is at stake. The principle is the process that is used to determine the fitness of those men and women selected to serve on our courts. And the ultimate decision will impact on each of us and each of our children if we don't undo what has already been done and see that that kind of performance is never repeated.

Tom and the rest of you who are on his team have shown the entire country that ours is the party of responsible government, economic progress, and a better life for every citizen. Our opposition has tried their best to paint another picture, but what you've proven here, under Governor Kean's dynamic leadership, is that it is the Republican Party that represents the interests of working people.

The other side still hasn't realized that what we Republicans have been accomplishing has been something marvelous. It reminds me a bit of a story of an agent that I heard about once in my old career. You know, back in the days of vaudeville, somebody aspiring to a vaudeville engagement or a career in vaudeville would find themselves on a stage in an empty theater except for one lone, cynical agent who'd be sitting down there in the front rows. And he'd usually be smoking a cigar and telling them, well, okay, what do you do?

Seriously though, inflation was public enemy number one in 1980, you'll remember, running at double digits for 2 consecutive years. But, we've put that monster in a cage and instead of seeing their income being eaten away, the American people have enjoyed stable prices and secure savings.

You'd get a raise in pay to match the inflation rate, but then the income tax, which is based on the number of dollars -- not their value -- would raise you into a higher tax bracket, and you'd wind up with less purchasing power than you had before you got the raise. Working people ended up paying at rates that at one time had been reserved for the truly affluent.

Tom, I know that under your leadership this State has cut six separate taxes, saving New Jersey taxpayers over $1 billion in just the last 3 years. We've proven by our actions -- at the Federal, State, and local levels -- that the GOP is the party of low inflation, low taxes, new jobs, high take-home pay, and robust growth. I can't think of a better platform than that. But here in New Jersey, Governor Kean has put these Republican principles to work, and that's one of the reasons the people of this State have benefited from one of the highest growth rates and lowest unemployment rates in the Nation. The other party talks about helping the less fortunate with handouts and bureaucratic programs; we offer them jobs and opportunity.

I believe one of the proudest achievements of our administration is that we've been able to turn around a dramatic rise in poverty that began in 1979. It took a few years to do it, but since the expansion the proportion of persons living below the poverty level has declined by 9 percent, real family income is up 11 percent overall, and unemployment is down 4.8 percent. Here in New Jersey, Tom Kean has been in the forefront of this crusade to turn economic growth into a vehicle for social mobility for all Americans, and that's been especially true for our minority citizens. In 1982, for example, black unemployment in New Jersey was almost 20 percent.

Today, it's just over 10. While overall employment has increased by about 12 percent, black employment has jumped by almost 40 percent. Let the other party talk about compassion, but in reality their policies cost the poor and minorities jobs. And while they're talking, we're doing something to change people's lives for the better.

I know Governor Kean would never have been able to do what he has without the support of a Republican assembly and a strong Republican minority in the State senate. So, today I want to thank all of you for being part of this effort to keep New Jersey on the right track.

I'd like to take this opportunity to thank other members of your New Jersey team who've been invaluable to our success, Congressmen -- as I've said before -- Courter and Gallo and Congresswoman Roukema. I ask this favor: Keep up your fight for a Republican State legislature so that after redistricting in 1991, New Jersey can send more prosecurity, proprosperity Congressmen to Washington, just like Jim and Dean.

One fact just about says it all: In 1984 Republicans received 51 percent of the vote in contested congressional seats, but we only won 42 percent of the seats in Congress. How can that be? It's because for 50 years now, every 10 years when the reapportionment takes place and the redistricting, they have been in charge. They have been gerrymandering, and until we can get more States with a Republican State legislature for the redistricting, we'll continue having more votes than they have for Congressmen, but electing fewer Congressmen than they do.

It was just 2 years ago that I met with you right across the road. We talked then about making Chuck Hardwick not just a member of the New Jersey Assembly but speaker of the assembly. And Chuck, the next time we meet I know you'll still be the speaker, only I think we should make certain that Jim Hurley becomes the president, instead of the minority leader of the State senate. So, please get out there and get more Republicans elected to the legislature. With just 3 weeks to go before election day, your money, your time, and your talents can make the difference. And I know I'm counting on you, and I know your Governor's counting on you also.

Well, with the enthusiasm and commitment that I found here today, I'm certain that we're going to do just that, and that the people of New Jersey and this country will be better off for it. All you have to do is just remind the people of New Jersey of the difference in this New Jersey you have here now, with your Governor and those other Republicans that we've mentioned there in the legislature, and compare it to what it was not too many years ago. So, we'll all be better off, and I'll probably be back on the mashed-potato circuit.

But it's been a wonderful thing to see you all here today. I've been speaking a couple of times here in New Jersey, and I've tried to finish each speech with a display of my latest hobby, which is collecting stories that I can guarantee are told by the people of the Soviet Union about their system. And they tell them -- the jokes -- and it shows they've got a great sense of humor, but they're also pretty cynical about the way they live. And I've told two of them already. I think I ought to be able to come up with one more here because we know that our system is absolutely the opposite to theirs.

The President. So do I. You brought this on yourself, so I'm -- [laughter] -- I'm going to tell you. Yes, Bork is staying in, and we know the odds are against getting enough people to turn around their vote. But, as he pointed out in his statement the other day, what's at issue here is not one man and what happened to him. What's at issue is that we make sure that the process of appointing and confirming judges never again is turned into such a political joke. And if I have to appoint another one, I'll try to find one that they'll object to just as much as they did for this one. [Laughter] All right.

I have been fortunate to have had someone of your abilities and dedication as Chairman of the Council for the past six years. Your accomplishments have been many and you can take great pride in them. Among your outstanding achievements are initiation of the Governor's Councils on Physical Fitness and Sports; expanding the Presidential Physical Fitness Award program to include youngsters from 6 to 9 years of age; establishing the US/USSR Youth Fitness Exchange Program; establishing National Conferences on Youth Fitness and Fitness and Aging; airing youth fitness public service television announcements that point out the benefits of exercise in easing teenage stress; designating the month of May each year as National Fitness and Sports Month; establishing 23 regional clinics on physical fitness and sports; airing a continuous radio program of 18 public service announcements distributed to 4,000 stations nationwide; inaugurating the ``Get Fit'' campaign; and planning the First World Congress on Physical Fitness for All to be held next year in our Nation's Capital.

I know your duties have been challenging and time-consuming, but throughout your unprecedented tenure as Chairman, you have consistently met those challenges with enthusiasm, energy, and dedication. You have my deepest gratitude for your service to our Nation.

It is with a heavy heart that I write to you at this time. After much deliberation with my family, business associates and valued friends, I feel that a decision must be made pertaining to my various responsibilities.

President, early in your administration you gave me the great honor of appointing me Chairman of the President's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports. I have enjoyed this tremendous challenge and have much pride over a number of accomplishments. In fact, during these Reagan years, the Council has been more productive than it has in its entire history.

I have worked to establish and to fund the National Fitness Foundation. Similar to my work with the Council, this has been and still remains to be a quite demanding assignment. However, I am elated over the substantial progress we have made.

President, I have reached a point at which I am compelled to resign from my post with the Council. I resign with great reluctance and sorrow, for there is much yet to be accomplished with the many exciting programs which are well underway.

I am grateful to you for this honor, this splendid opportunity. I have worked with all the vigor within me to serve you to the very best of my ability and I am proud to have served in this capacity under you, Mr. President.

President Duarte to Washington. He comes as the elected representative of a courageous people, people who have struggled long and risked much in order to live in a free and democratic country. El Salvador, under President Duarte's leadership, has proven wrong the cynics, pessimists, and detractors of democracy. The Salvadoran people have proven that those who love freedom can prevail over great odds -- can defeat the forces of tyranny, both left and right -- if they have the courage, commitment, and stand together.

It was not that long ago that El Salvador was all but written off by many in this city's circles of power. The Communist guerrillas, it was said, were an irresistible force, and the cruel tactics of the right could not be thwarted. The cause of democracy was doomed, so they said. Well, the United States Congress came within a few votes of making the predictions of doom a self-fulfilling prophecy. Our request for military aid to El Salvador was nearly defeated.

Those of us who have stood in support of the democratic peoples of El Salvador are especially proud of what has been achieved in recent years. Under the most trying of circumstances, with your steady hand at the helm, President Duarte, democratic convictions and ideals have been transformed into institutions, laws, and practices. In a relatively short time, you've brought the military under civilian control and helped turn it into a professional and respected part of Salvadoran society, a responsible force for both national security and democratic government. You've reformed the police and set about to improve the system of justice. You have created a climate of respect for human rights and the rule of law.

While you were putting in place these fundamental reforms, the Communist guerrillas, who would impose their form of dictatorship on El Salvador, were beaten back. Your brave military forces certainly deserve much credit, but the power of democracy itself deserves credit, as well. Democracy is a system that offers a peaceful method of settling differences. It is a system which can incorporate a wide spectrum of views while at the same time protect the rights of the individual. Our own President Lincoln once said: ``The ballot is stronger than the bullet.'' Well, that is the moral foundation on which the freedom-loving people of Central America hope to build a lasting peace.

Today the prospects for attaining this peace, although still far from certain, are better than at any time in this decade. The United States remains committed to exploring any opportunity that could end the violence that plagues the region and permit the people of Central America to live their lives in peace. Silencing the guns is no easy goal, and, President Duarte, we both know peace and democracy are inextricably linked.

If peace is to prevail, so must democracy. The people of El Salvador know this, having been victimized by an insurgency armed, trained, and headquartered in a nearby country. They have firsthand experience that a government that does not respect the rights of its own citizens cannot be expected to respect the rights of its neighbors. And that is why all of us watch so closely the reform process set in motion by the Guatemala peace plan.

This process, which ties democratization to the end of armed conflict, is consistent with a proposal made by Speaker Wright and myself. We want to see the peace process succeed. That success is dependent on genuine democratic reform, on respect for human rights, and on open and free elections. It depends on respect for the freedoms of speech, religion, and assembly. It depends on honest dialog between those who are now engaged in deadly combat.

Those who are engaged in armed struggle against your government have been invited to join in the democratic process. You have negotiated directly with the leaders of insurgent forces, sincerely trying to find the formula that will bring peace and secure freedom in your troubled land. Others in the region can do no less if they expect to end the strife that ravages their countries. The choice is theirs.

As we face the future and determine our next steps, let us recognize that the hope in Central America today has come about because those who believe in democracy have faced reality, made the tough choices, and stood together. In these last 6\1/2\ years, through the strength of purpose of brave and farsighted individuals like President Duarte, a crisis has been averted and admirable progress has been made, especially in creating and consolidating democratic institutions.

Duarte's visit permits us the opportunity to take account of the progress that has been made; to discuss our vision of a free, prosperous, and peaceful hemisphere; and to declare our solidarity with all those who share that vision.

Duarte. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished members of the Government, friends, people of America, it is indeed a very special pleasure to be received by you in this colorful ceremony. This is the first time in many years that a head of state of a Central American nation has been received by the United States President on a state visit.

I receive this honor with great modesty, knowing full well that this ceremony is an acknowledgment to the democratic commitment of the great people of El Salvador. Only last week, in your speech to the Organization of American States, you remembered the heroic behavior of Salvadorans on the voting booths. The same lines of conduct have remained steadfast through all these years and has served to build a strong democracy which, although not yet perfect, is modeled after your own.

Your constant and unswerving support for our undertaking has helped us overcome obstacles which at times seem invincible. Your Congress, too, has worked with us on the difficult roads we have had to travel. For that we thank you. And today peace is a step closer with the signing of the peace agreement in Guatemala early last month.

In your speech of the OAS, you had stated that the Central American plan ``contains many of the elements necessary to bring both lasting peace and enduring democracy for the region.'' You went on to say that there is also a reason for caution; I agree. For this reason, I have insisted that the compliance with our peace plan must be fully verified by the appointed commissions. Here we will hope that the OAS and its member nations, especially those like yours with the technical capacity, will take an active role.

I am convinced that there cannot be peace in Central America without freedom and democracy, which in turn will only be attained through comprehensive dialog and negotiated cease-fire. I also insist that each Central American President has the responsibility to comply fully within his own country with all the obligations contracted, and that no government be permitted to take only cosmetic or half-measures or to excuse his government's lack of total compliance because of difference with another government not party to the Esquipulas accord [Guatemala peace plan].

We need to continue to work to bring democracy to all Central America. I know that the United States has been engaged in this effort, but we still have a long way to go. I encourage you to do what needs to be done in order to assure that the democratic gains are enduring and that the people of Central America are free from totalitarian oppression.

And now, President Reagan, let me break the protocol. I've seen through my life many times in which people with hate in their heart have put fire to the American flag. This time, permit me to go to your flag and, in the name of my people, to give it a kiss.

This is the seventh successive year in which people everywhere, including Americans, have observed World Food Day in a spirit of rededication to the continuing fight against world hunger. We Americans are a people with strong ties to other nations and with a long record of humanitarian concern for the hungry around the world. We are blessed with the wherewithal to help: a bountiful land whose fertile soil, moderate climate, and economic and political freedom provide the keys not only to abundance here at home but to a surplus which can be shared with others in grave need around the globe.

Progress has been made in averting the threat of famine in many regions, but widespread poverty and hunger, especially in developing countries, constantly challenge us to ease the human suffering they cause and to preserve the human potential they deplete. As hunger robs people of health and strength, it also saps the economic systems to which they might otherwise contribute, upsets the social order, frustrates progress at every level, and engenders hopelessness and instability.

Nation has always been -- and continues to be -- deeply committed to helping feed the hungry wherever they may be, and to accomplish this goal an extensive network of private and public efforts has been established. But additional steps are clearly necessary. Greater success in the fight against hunger will require the implementation of worldwide agricultural and trade policies designed to promote economic growth and stability for all nations, developing and developed alike. Schemes of narrowly focused government intervention must be replaced by systems that respond to the production and trade decisions made by free individuals. Farmers must have ready access to the international marketplace and the opportunity to compete freely and to sell the goods they produce. Nations, if they are to move toward self-reliance in agriculture, must install systems that promote private ownership, reward effort and efficiency, and recognize the dignity of those who work the land.

United States has established an initiative to End Hunger in Africa by the end of the century through economic growth and private sector development. All U.S. bilateral and multilateral economic programs and policies are oriented toward this goal. But U.S. government programs cannot do it alone. The participation and commitment of Africans, other donors, and the private sector -- volunteer and business, both American and international -- are essential.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Reagan. It's been a pleasure to have you, President and Mrs. Duarte, and all of you as our guests this evening at the White House. This year is the 200th anniversary of the Constitution of the United States. It's appropriate then that we have as our guest an elected leader who has laid the foundations for freedom in his country and whose courage and strength of conviction are an inspiration to us all. President Duarte, having fought the brutality and repression of left and right, has come to symbolize the struggle for democracy in this hemisphere.

I have little doubt that our forefathers, who sacrificed so much to secure the blessings of liberty for the United States, would see President Duarte as one of their own. Thomas Jefferson, who walked these very halls, once described what it is all about: ``Freedom of religion, freedom of the press, and freedom of person under the protection of the habeas corpus and trial by juries impartially selected,'' he wrote, ``these principles form the bright constellation which has gone before us.'' Well, this is the same bright constellation whose majestic light President Duarte would shine on El Salvador. As our Founding Fathers came to know, winning liberty and establishing democratic institutions are not without great personal sacrifice.

One of the most moving moments of my Presidency was the visit to the Oval Office made by President Duarte and his daughter, Inez, shortly after her release from kidnapers 2 years ago. This terrible travail was part of the personal price President Duarte has paid to help secure the freedom of his country. Yet tonight can anyone doubt President Duarte has not only survived, he has triumphed. He's proven himself one of those rare individuals who will be remembered by his people and by people throughout the hemisphere as a hero of freedom.

This is the kind of spirit I see in President Duarte. It's been my honor over these years to have known him and worked with him, to have assisted, where possible, his efforts and those of the brave Salvadoran people to win peace, establish democratic institutions, and, before anything else, to declare all our brethren free. President Duarte, God, unity, and freedom -- the spirit of El Salvador, the spirit of all the citizens of the hemisphere. So, I ask all of you to join with me in toasting President Duarte, Mrs. Duarte, and the people of El Salvador.

Duarte. When you were telling, Mr. President, all those beautiful things of what you have valued, what we're doing in our country, and when I was enjoying this wonderful dinner tonight, I was seeing that picture there, the picture of Abraham Lincoln. And I wonder why he has his hand here and his face firm? What was happening in his own heart when he was the President of a country who was struggling? He was seeing not only slaves, he was seeing war -- hate in the heart. And this wonderful man had love in his heart. He never hated anybody. He wanted to have his country free, and he even gave his life for that. That picture to me is a symbol of this country. It's a symbol of you, Mr. Reagan, the President of the United States, the President of this country who is doing the best so that other countries can also have what you have dear in this country, which is freedom and democracy.

Let me be simple and ask you to just raise your head and give a prayer for my people of my country, for the poor people, for the suffering people of my country, and also for the soldiers who die and the guerrillas who will also die. We all are Salvadorans, and we all want peace.

Billions in new taxes -- this is how the Democrats on the Senate Finance and the House Ways and Means Committees now propose to meet the 1988 Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction targets. With Republicans on both panels not participating in the drafting sessions, the Democrats on the Senate Finance Committee proposed a tax hike of approximately $7.6 billion, with a promise of more to come.

If there were a legitimate need for these taxes, I would be less angry, but these tax hikes would only cover utterly unwarranted domestic appropriations bills totaling some $15.6 billion more than our budget request and $5.3 billion more than last year.

Simple prudence, a simple sense of responsibility, would make it possible to meet the deficit reduction targets with no new taxes. I look forward to working in this spirit with many in Congress -- I believe the majority -- who join me in rejecting new taxes. And let me repeat that if reason should fail, if Congress should actually pass a tax hike, my answer will be simply this: veto.

Democratic tax hike is an exercise in fiscal irresponsibility. It's a breach of faith with the American people. It is unwise. It is uncalled for. It will not be tolerated by me or the American people.

Studies indicate that 40 to 55 percent of all passenger car occupant fatalities and serious injuries could be eliminated if people would use the safety belts already installed in their vehicles. Each year, 10,000 people could be saved from death if everyone would use safety belts every trip. In 1986, for instance, safety belts saved the lives of 2,200 front seat passengers.

The tremendous benefits of adult safety belt and child restraint use are now widely recognized throughout the United States. Twenty-nine States and the District of Columbia have safety belt use laws. These laws, in conjunction with public education, have resulted in a safety belt usage increase among car drivers from 11 percent in 1982 to 42 percent in the first half of 1987.

Each of us can help increase this number by remembering that the use of safety belts offers protection in a crash and by increasing our willingness to communicate that fact to our loved ones who fail to wear them. We must not wait until personal tragedy strikes to become advocates of safety belt use.

Child passenger protection laws requiring the use of child safety seats and belt systems are in place in all 50 States and the District of Columbia. Correctly used, child safety seats are highly effective, reducing the risk of fatality by about 70 percent and serious injury by about 67 percent. Among children under four, these seats saved about 200 lives in 1986.

Still, the effectiveness of child safety seats can be greatly impaired when they are not installed or used properly. With 100 percent correct use, these seats could save about 500 lives a year. Parents should follow the manufacturer's instructions carefully and inspect the seat regularly to make sure it is installed correctly and used on every trip. With added concern for the proper installation and consistent use of these safety devices, we can eliminate needless and preventable tragedies and save hundreds more of our children.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15 day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The white cane is a device that helps blind citizens in their daily lives and reminds all Americans of visually handicapped people's desire and increasing ability to live independently. The cane helps its bearers negotiate physical obstacles and thus enables the sightless to travel and work more easily in the public environment. During our yearly observance of White Cane Safety Day, we pause to recall our need to eliminate barriers of misinformation and misunderstanding as well -- to remember the capabilities and accomplishments of sightless people and to respond to their particular needs with sensitivity, friendship, and respect.

It's a great honor to be with you tonight. Let me just begin by expressing special thanks to Governors Tom Kean and Mike Castle, chairman and vice chairman of the RGA [Republican Governors Association], John Rollins, the finance chairman and vice chairman of the -- or Glen Holden, I should say, who's exceptional efforts have helped to make this evening a success. Thank you all for being so generous. And of course, I must also recognize our national chairman, Frank Fahrenkopf, who is here.

You know, whenever I'm asked to speak at a dinner, I get a little self-conscious about the length of a speech. And this is really inappropriate, but I'm going to tell it anyway. I hope you haven't heard it before, because usually I'm an after-dinner speaker instead of a before-dinner speaker.

But it's wonderful to be here. As one chief executive among many, I feel right at home. I've always said one of the greatest strengths of America is the diversity of our Federal system. And you can see it represented here this evening. As we've begun to loosen the bonds of centralized control, the States have shot forward, often showing Federal Government the way.

American people now look to the Republican Party as the party of new ideas. And it's Republican Governors who are out front, taking risks, breaking new ground, putting those new ideas into practice -- everything from enterprise zones to welfare reform. Yes, we thought of the enterprise zone. We haven't been able to get it through the Congress. But I don't know how many States now around the country have enterprise zones, and they're flourishing and succeeding in their mission. There's one idea many States have implemented that I especially wish the Federal Government would cotton to: Isn't it about time that Washington followed the lead of the States and passed a constitutional amendment to balance the budget?

I remember one new idea I had when I was Governor. It taught me a lot about leadership and its limits. When I first came into the Governor's mansion, I thought it would be a great way to improve efficiency if I asked everybody to work a few extra days a month -- on Saturday. I can't claim a lot of success with that one.

But the best thing about this dinner is seeing how the ranks of Republican Governors have grown since last year. We're talking about a 50-percent increase -- from 16 to 24 Governors. Now, that's progress. And we're looking to add to that number in the elections this year, with Bob Livingston running in Louisiana, Jack Reed in Mississippi, and John Harper in Kentucky. But the critical test will come in 1988. We have 12 gubernatorial races that year. Of these, 8 are seats that we have to hold on to and 4 then that we have to win.

Few races could be more important, few campaigns more crucial, to the future of our country. What happens in those elections will have repercussions that extend far beyond the State capitals and far beyond State lines -- all the way, in fact, to Washington, DC, and the House of Representatives on Capitol Hill. That's because reapportionment comes up in 1991. That's when the congressional districts will be redrawn. And in all too many cases, having a Republican Governor is the only shot we have at getting a fair deal. And that's all we're asking for: an end to the antidemocratic and un-American practice of gerrymandering congressional districts.

A look at the district lines shows how corrupt the whole process has become. The congressional map is a horror show of grotesque, contorted shapes. Districts jump back and forth over mountain ranges, cross large bodies of water, send out little tentacles to absorb special communities and ensure safe seats. One Democratic Congressman who helped engineer the gerrymandering of California once described the district lines there as his contribution to modern art. [Laughter] But it isn't just the district lines the Democrats have bent out of shape: it's the American values of fairplay and decency. And it's time we stopped them.

We've seen a dimension of this problem this last month on the Hill during the debate over the confirmation of Judge Bork to the Supreme Court. Debate -- that's a polite word for what's been going on. During the hearings, Attorney General William French Smith spoke for many of us when he expressed his shock and dismay. He said: ``I have never seen such misrepresentation, such distortion, and such outright lying. There are people in very important positions in this government who are lying to the American public. I've never seen anything like it, and I hope I never see anything like it again.'' That's a pretty severe indictment. But former Attorney General William French Smith isn't alone in his opinion. One of the most respected, honorable men in this nation, Chief Justice Warren Burger, echoed this when he accused the opposition to Judge Bork of disinformation.

Bork's nomination will soon be before the full Senate. The purpose of Senate debate is to allow all sides to be heard. Honorable men and women should not be afraid to change their minds if they're based on that debate. There's a crucial principle at stake here. If the campaign of distortion and disinformation used by his opponents is allowed to succeed, it will represent more than a temporary setback for one candidate: It will call into question the idea of free, fair, and civil exchange. And it will mean that on critical issues, like the fight against crime and drugs and keeping those who are unelected from unconstitutionally taking power into their own hands -- each of us and each of our children will be the losers.

I do not believe that nominees to the Supreme Court should have to pass litmus tests administered by single-interest lobbies. Such tactics are better suited for campaigns and elections than for Supreme Court nominations. As I said in my TV address yesterday: Our agenda is quite simple -- to appoint judges who don't confuse the criminals with the victims and who believe the courts should interpret the law, not make it. That starts with the Supreme Court. It takes leadership from the Supreme Court to help shape the attitudes of the courts in our land and to make sure that principles of law are based on the Constitution. This is the standard to judge those who seek to serve on the courts -- qualifications, not distortions; judicial temperament, not campaign disinformation.

Justices for our nation's highest court has been transformed in a way that should not and, indeed, must not be permitted to occur again.'' Yes, it's right to differ. And, yes, people can have different opinions. But when have we ever seen an instance in which the confirmation of a Justice to the Supreme Court has resulted in private interest groups raising money and putting on television ads and campaigns as if they were running an election -- and campaigns based on distortion -- when the men and women of the Senate are supposed to sit, go over the qualifications of the individual that has been appointed, and make their decision on whether they believe those qualifications suit him for the position. Well, that's what we have to get back to.

When the message gets out, I believe the American people will reject the politicization of our judiciary. When the people begin to hear the truth, they will demand an independent judiciary, free from high pressure politics and founded on the principle of judicial restraint. And Judge Bork is a man of courage. He's decided to push forward, to take the vote on his confirmation to the full Senate. And he's going forward because he knows that the wrong done him is nothing compared to the wrong done to our nation and our system of justice. The distortions, the misrepresentations, and lies must be answered and must be rejected. Robert Bork deserves better. America deserves better.

I've heard people that have interpreted our system of checks and balances to mean that, well, that's fine: You have people on one side out there in the legislature, then people on the other side in the Executive Office. That isn't what the checks and balances were supposed to be. And certainly, when every Democratic President in those 50 years, with the exception of one 2-year period, had a Congress of their own party, and then when the Republicans had a Congress of the other party for everything but 2 years -- all Republican Presidents until my term with having at least one party for a while -- the significant thing is we can look back from the inside, where we are in our administration, and tell you that none of the things we've accomplished could have been accomplished had we not had that one Republican House, the Senate, for those 6 years.

And I know that I have to let you have your dinner and get out of here. I really was just standing here, hoping that I could think of a good get-off line. [Laughter] But it has been wonderful, and you've got some great Governors here. And this country's strength is based not on what's inside the beltway here in Washington, it is based on the fact that we are a federation of 50 sovereign States with a great independence.

And one of the things that I'll be the happiest about is that one of my goals has been, ever since I came here, to restore the Federal system and return to the States the authority and autonomy that has been unjustly seized by the Democratic Party in the years that have gone past. And let's get back to those 50 different States. Thank you all very much, and God bless you.

This year we Americans again set aside a week in October to remind ourselves that from earliest times our vast forests have provided us with food, water, fuel, and raw materials, and that forests remain a source of countless products necessary for our shelter, comfort, and utility. We can be truly grateful for the jobs and trade that forests generate, for the extensive part forest products play in our national life, and for our firmly established national policy of wise use and preservation of forest resources.

We can be grateful too for the occurrence this year of one of the most active tree-planting campaigns in our history. The new forest trees going into the ground this year will be our living legacy for the generations to come. Tomorrow's forests will be productive and continually renewing sources of wood for housing, furniture, and paper; of water for drinking and irrigation; of rich habitats for fish and wildlife; and of opportunities for outdoor recreation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

And when General Secretary Gorbachev and I met in Geneva, as you've said, we agreed that exchanges of high school students would be an excellent way to increase understanding between our two countries. Seeing the actual results of the agreement -- that gives me a great deal of personal satisfaction.

I'm sure all of you know -- being there -- the Phillips Academy signed that agreement with the Physics-Mathematics Institute for this reciprocal exchange of students, and it's enabled all of you to study here in our country. And I can say -- you probably wouldn't be hesitant to say -- Phillips Academy is a famous part of our American educational heritage. And through your experience at Phillips, you had the chance to learn about the American educational system at the secondary school level. And in addition, you undoubtedly were able to improve your language comprehension through classroom and informal social situations.

I hope that your exchange is the first of many between our two countries so that other American and Soviet students will have the opportunity to study together, to learn each other's language, and to understand better each other's aspirations and cultures. General Secretary Gorbachev and I place great importance on these exchanges, as you've been told, between our people, and particularly our young people; for you are our hope for the future. I want to express my support for you and all the other citizens of our two countries who are contributing to the effort to expand exchanges between the United States and the Soviet Union.

And this weekend while you're in the Capital, I hope you have the opportunity to go sightseeing and visit some of our museums. We're very proud of our Capital City and hope you'll have a wonderful time while you're here.

The President. Well, I think you've said it. It's very evident. But then I think I have to let you go, because I have a limited time here for visiting with these young people. But, well, of course I'm concerned, and so is she. But at the same time, I have great confidence in the medical personnel who are in charge of this case.

The President. I think maybe you're jumping to conclusions here. I cannot and will not discuss what our future action may be. But we're in discussions with the Government of Kuwait, and it would be very unwise to hint or suggest at anything we might do.

Excellence in design is integral to the Federal Government's responsible stewardship of public resources. Good design unites art with purpose. It is part of our taking pride in America. It should not be viewed as a luxury added on at extra cost but as a process for increasing the efficiency and quality of our lives. Our ability to compete effectively in international markets depends largely on an often overlooked, but integral element -- design quality.

It was for these reasons that I established in 1983 a Presidential Design Awards Program to recognize successful achievement in federal design and inspire standards of excellence throughout the government. This initiative was designed to build on the achievements of the Federal Design Improvement Project of the National Endowment for the Arts. The awards, which I conferred on Federal agencies in January 1985, generated national attention to the best of our Federal efforts.

I am pleased to announce Round Two of the Presidential Design Awards. It is my hope that the Awards competition and public recognition of our federal ``best'' will encourage greater federal leadership in, and attention to, good design.

Well, thank you all for coming by, and thank you for a warm welcome. I'm delighted to see you and I want to make a few remarks this afternoon on the matter of the law and our courts -- an area I know is of some interest to you, and as you may have noticed, has been in the news lately. Sometimes people ask me whether I ever weary of the controversy that seems to surround so much of public life and especially this job. Well, the truth is that more than anything else, the Presidency becomes a source of satisfaction if you can look back and see a far distance travelled.

In fact, I can recall very well those first few months in office when we were faced with the worst economic mess since the Great Depression. And on the international scene, in some ways, things were even worse. Anyway, what I remember most is discovering that after spending a whole campaign talking about the serious problems we faced, I got into office and found out I'd been guilty of understatement. I felt a little like the Titanic passenger, John Jacob Astor, who it is reported said when the ship hit the iceberg, ``Listen, I asked for ice but this is ridiculous.'' [Laughter] But things did turn around; we moved from a dead-in-the-water economy to a dynamic, growth-oriented, job-creating expansion that will become the longest in peacetime history.

Internationally, we moved from danger and humiliation to new status; not only as a nation of power, but a nation with a sense of right and purpose strong enough to set the tides running again in the cause of freedom and democracy.

And yet, for all the critical economic and international problems we faced, we should not forget that back in the early days, we faced another crisis that was just as grave, one that threatened the very stability and survival of our society. And that crisis was: the crisis of crime. Now, I won't list the statistics and recite the horror stories. I think we can all remember the crime rates that steadily escalated, the fear and terror in our streets and neighborhoods, and the undermining of public faith in our legal system and our democratic institution.

In my first year in office, I mentioned all of this in a speech to our nation's police chiefs, and I pledged to them and to the Nation immediate action. We organized a commission on violent crime that came up with serious reforms that were widely enacted. We added prosecutors and Federal agents and moved forward with a massive crackdown on drug trafficking. We singled out the syndicate for extinction and began a war of abolition against the mob. And though it did take 3 years and though we were forced to remove some important provisions, we did finally get the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984; which was tough, new crime legislation, passed by the Congress including new drug trafficking laws and tougher sentencing procedures. And finally, we appointed judges who understood that the first duty of any civilized society is to protect its honest citizens from those who prey on their innocent fellow citizens.

I want you to know we've had results. The number of convictions and average sentences have increased dramatically. In the organized crime area alone, convictions are more than five times what they were. I'm proud to tell you, too, that this administration's judges have been shown to be statistically far sterner with criminals than their predecessors. All of this has added up. Only last week, the Department of Justice released a study showing crime was down now for the fifth year in a row and was now at its lowest point in 14 years.

Now, some have tried to say that all this progress was the result of demographics, we simply had less people in the crime-prone categories. Well, the truth is that the drop in crime cannot be explained by demographics. Coincidence isn't necessarily cause.

The reason crime has declined is obvious to you and me. As I suggested back in 1981, the American people were fed up. They were tired of judicial systems that were tough on law enforcement officials, but let criminals off easy. They insisted that certain important truths be reasserted, certain -- well, that there's a right and wrong; that individuals are responsible for their actions; and that society has a right to protect itself and the potential victims of crime from those who prey on the innocent.

We're making America safe and secure again for our children. But much remains to be done. The task before us in the criminal justice area is the same as the task before us economically and internationally. We have dealt with the crisis, but we must now institutionalize the progress that we've made. We must make our recent gains permanent.

Let me speak then to the Criminal Justice Reform Act of 1987 and the three reforms that I am announcing today, these reforms that we were forced to remove from our earlier crime package but which we will pursue now with renewed vigor. The United States is the only nation in the world with such an expansive exclusionary rule. A rule that rests on the proposition that a law enforcement error, no matter how technical, can be used to justify throwing an entire case out of court, no matter how guilty the defendant or how heinous the crime. The plain consequence of treating the wrongs equally is a grievous miscarriage of justice. The criminal goes free, the officer is uncorrected, and the only ones who really suffer are the people in the community. Just to show how absurd this can become, let me tell you about another case, one that I have mentioned before on similar occasions. This was -- happened when I was Governor in California.

Two drug enforcement officers in California got a warrant on the basis of evidence that indicated that a married couple in a certain home were in the business of selling heroin. Well, they served their warrant, they went in, they could not find the heroin. And as they were leaving the house, one of them turned back. There was a baby in the crib, and he took the baby's diaper off. And there was the heroin. Case thrown out of court because the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched.

Now, the first reform I want to talk about today concerns that exclusionary rule. As you know, the Supreme Court recently recognized that it makes no sense to apply the exclusionary rule when a police officer believes in reasonably good faith that he is acting under a valid warrant, even if the warrant is defective for some reason. My proposal would codify the existing reasonable good faith exception and expand it to warrantless searches and seizures.

It would also limit use of statutes to exclude evidence. Those are reasonable and responsible changes, and I urge the Congress to act quickly. It'll make a difference to those of you on the front line.

Now secondly, you all know better than anyone that judicial activists have expanded the Federal habeas corpus doctrine to such an extent that it interferes with our primary defense against crime: the State criminal justice systems.

Originally meant to safeguard our liberties by preventing the government from holding a person in custody without pressing criminal charges, the habeas corpus doctrine is now misused by Federal courts to second guess valid State criminal convictions. My proposal would reform this doctrine and prevent it from being used as another tool to let guilty criminals off the hook.

And finally, I think you all know how strongly the American people feel about restoration of the death penalty. Currently, there are no adequate Federal procedures on the death penalty, and so it cannot be used in cases where Federal statutes provide for capital punishment. My proposal would establish such adequate procedures so that the death penalty provisions already on the books can be utilized in such cases as espionage, treason, and aggravated murder.

Now as I said, all of these reforms were included in our original crime bill. But, we were forced to remove them to get any action at all out of a Congress that locked our crime bill up in committee. While each of these reforms have been passed individually by the Senate in recent years, the House Judiciary Committee has refused at every turn to present them to the floor of the House for a vote. And that's why I urge a full and open debate in the Congress on these critical reforms. I urge members on both sides of these questions to come forward, as they're doing now on my nomination of Judge Bork, to identify their positions and inform the American people on the kind of representation they're receiving on the crime issue.

This issue concerns these reforms as it concerns the Bork nomination. Because what we really see here is two conflicting visions of America. Those who oppose my nomination of Judge Bork want activist judges who'll promote their policy objective, or agenda -- a policy agenda whose major objectives would not win approval in the democratic process of a majority vote, a policy agenda that includes leniency in the courtroom and the fashioning of new rules to protect criminals. On the other hand, we have the people who are fed up with crime, who support judicial restraint, who understand society's right to protect itself from the criminal element -- people especially like yourselves and the hundreds of thousands from other law enforcement groups who have supported Judge Bork for the Supreme Court.

I challenge all those who would oppose these important reforms and all those who oppose the nomination of Judge Bork to reflect carefully and well on what the American people want. I remind them again: The American people do not want judges picked for special interests. They do not want to return to leniency in the courtroom and unsafe streets. They want judges and laws that reflect common sense attitudes about crime. The simple truth is: crime is far too common.

Lenient laws and lenient judges have been greatly to blame for it. It's time to reinstate the death penalty, reform the exclusionary rule and modify habeas corpus. And it's time to put on the bench men like Judge Robert Bork.

If you think that I am a little steamed up about this, I am. I remember in my 8 years in California as Governor and the inability to get some crime reforms. And then in one of the every-two-year elections there was a certain change in the balance of the Legislature, and in a matter of months, 41 anticrime bills were passed out of committee and passed.

Legislature and were brought out when there was just a slight change in the balance of that Legislature. Well now, I think I'd better quit talking and get to writing and sign the transmittal messages.

As you know, I have always believed that government's most fundamental responsibility is the protection of the security of its people. In the area of law enforcement, this critical priority has been reflected in the unprecedented commitment of resources under my Administration to combatting the scourge of drug trafficking and drug abuse, in our recent major advances and ongoing effort against organized crime, and in important initiatives against white collar crime.

Effective enforcement, however, depends on the legislative will to provide the tools needed to do the job. If the Congress had not enacted the RICO provisions of the Organized Crime Control Act in 1970 and the court-ordered wiretap and electronic surveillance provisions of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act in 1968, we would lack essential tools in the war against organized crime. If the Congress had not enacted the bail reform, forfeiture reform, and drug enforcement provisions of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act in 1984, law enforcement would be denied basic tools in our fight against drug trafficking.

Exclusionary Rule. Under the provisions of the bill, reliable evidence of guilt would no longer be thrown out and criminals set free because of innocent errors by law enforcement officers in carrying out searches and seizures. Evidence would be admissible if an officer acted in an objectively reasonable belief that his conduct was consistent with the law.

Habeas Corpus. As a result of judicial expansions of the habeas corpus remedy, State prisoners are now free to re-litigate their convictions and sentences endlessly in the lower Federal courts. The bill would curb the abuse of habeas corpus by imposing reasonable limits on its scope and availability.

Capital Punishment. It is scandalous and intolerable that Federal law now provides no enforceable death penalty for terrorists who slaughter defenseless American hostages, for drug traffickers who engage in cold-blooded murder of our law enforcement officers, for prisoners already serving life terms who murder guards or other inmates, or for traitors who jeopardize the security of millions by betraying our most sensitive military secrets to the Nation's enemies. The bill would correct these omissions and others by establishing an enforceable capital sanction for aggravated crimes of murder, espionage, and treason.

Substantially similar titles relating to the exclusionary rule, habeas corpus, and capital punishment were included in my initial proposal of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act in 1983. At the time of the passage of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act in 1984, all these proposals were passed as separate bills by large majority votes in the Senate. Similar proposals have been passed or introduced with broad support in the House of Representatives.

There is little question in my mind that these measures would again be approved without difficulty if the membership of both houses of Congress were permitted to vote on them. Yet despite the passage of years, exhaustive hearings and study at the committee level, extensive floor consideration and debate, and vigorous efforts by numerous members of Congress in promoting these important reforms, they have not yet been enacted. This inaction is almost entirely attributable to determined delay and obstruction by those few who oppose the public's justified demand for effective action against crime and seek to deny the full membership of the Congress an opportunity to voice its will concerning these proposals.

We should not and cannot tolerate further delay on these important issues affecting the fundamental right of all Americans to justice in the courts and protection against crime. I accordingly urge prompt consideration and enactment of these legislative proposals.

I have today reluctantly signed S. 1691, a bill containing amendments to the Veterans Administration (VA) home loan guaranty law. This legislation was originally intended to extend for a limited period -- 45 days as finally passed by the Congress -- two provisions relating to the home loan program that expired on September 30, 1987. These provisions require payment of a fee by nonservice-disabled veterans who obtain VA housing loans, and contain the criteria for determining when the VA may acquire the property which secured a guaranteed loan that has gone into default.

VA home loan program has been, and continues to be, of great importance to present and former members of the Nation's Armed Forces but the costs of operating the program and paying claims on bad loans are substantial. Thus, the Congress, with the administration's support, in 1982 imposed a modest, one-time fee on veterans using this unique benefit. Certain veterans and surviving spouses, such as those receiving compensation for service-connected disabilities, are exempt from paying this fee. The 1 percent fee, which has now expired, should be extended. This fee will not ensure the solvency of the VA home loan program but will provide almost $225 million in fiscal year 1988.

A section was added to S. 1691, however, that I strongly oppose. It would have the effect of generally requiring the VA to sell its vendee loans (i.e., loans made to purchasers of VA-acquired foreclosed properties) with recourse. Under this type of sale, the Government agrees to buy back the note from the holder if the borrower defaults. This is bad credit policy.

This administration has launched a program to improve Federal credit programs by selling loan assets to the public without recourse. Loans sold with recourse run counter to both credit reform and efficient debt management. The Federal guarantee behind such loans makes them the credit risk equivalent of Treasury securities and makes it difficult to obtain an accurate measurement of the subsidy inherent in Federal credit, since adding guarantees effectively disguises the original subsidy.

Realizing the merits of the administration's objections to the provision requiring VA to sell its loans with recourse, the chairman and the ranking minority member of the Senate Committee on Veterans' Affairs have pledged to work ``to repeal or substantially modify'' this provision. They have also indicated that they intend to move VA home loan guaranty legislation forward in the near future.

The administration will work with these and other Members of Congress to repeal the unwise recourse loan amendment in S. 1691 and to extend the loan fee and streamline the home loan program. If such home loan guaranty legislation were to be enacted promptly -- for example, before the November 15, 1987, expiration date of the two expired provisions extended in S. 1691 -- the problem related to the G - R - H reduction would not occur.

Administrator of the Federal Highway Administration. Ray Barnhart has served the administration for almost 7 years, guiding the multimillion dollar Federal Highway Program. The President commends Ray Barnhart for an outstanding job and for having the courage of his convictions in providing tireless leadership to America's highway program.

Today the President sent to Congress the certification required to begin final assembly of the 155mm binary chemical artillery projectiles. This is an important element of the long-needed modernization of the United States chemical weapon deterrent.

President was pleased to make this certification on a program so vital to our national security. We seek a global, effectively verifiable ban on chemical weapons. Until we achieve that goal, however, it is essential that we maintain a safe, modern chemical weapon stockpile to deter use of chemical weapons by potential adversaries.

I speak to you, Secretary of State George Shultz is on a diplomatic mission that reflects the breadth, the intensity, and the importance of our country's foreign policy efforts. Today he's in the Middle East. He'll meet with the leaders of Israel, Jordan, Egypt, and Saudi Arabia.

In the past we've proven ourselves a nation of good will and a reliable ally to these friends and to others. Today our Navy plies the waters of the Persian Gulf helping to keep the shipping lanes open. Freedom of navigation in international waters is a cardinal principle of our policy and, especially in that region of the world, a vital interest. We've had a naval presence in the Gulf since 1949. Any risk to that naval presence or to U.S.-flagged commercial ships operating peacefully in the waters of the Gulf will be dealt with appropriately.

Our wider role in the Middle East -- perhaps more than in any other region -- is that of peacemaker. We are doing our best to help narrow the differences between Israel and her Arab neighbors so that real negotiations for peace can get started. The desire for peace and the will to make peace are growing in the region. Our job is to help. In the Persian Gulf we play a similar role.

Along with the initiative in the United Nations Security Council, we are seeking a peaceful resolution of the Iran-Iraq war -- one of the great tragedies of our time. A vigorous diplomatic effort is essential, and that is what Secretary Shultz' mission is all about.

After conferring with key leaders of the Middle East, he heads to Moscow. In his talks there, he will bring up the Arab-Israeli conflict and the Gulf war, as well as other conflicts like Afghanistan, Central America, Angola, and Cambodia. We've made it clear that if our two countries are to have better relations we must see a change in Soviet actions in these regional conflicts. We are concerned with human rights in the Soviet Union itself. This has always been at the top of my agenda. It's impossible to have a constructive relationship with a government that tramples upon the rights of its people. There are also, as one would expect, bilateral issues between our two countries concerning trade, travel, and other items that will be on the agenda in Moscow.

I've always felt that, even between systems as different as ours, if we remain true to our principles and firm in the advocacy of our own interests, some common ground can be found. This has been the basis of the arms reduction proposals we've made to the Soviet Union. As a result, we're moving toward an agreement that would eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range missiles, known as INF -- the first real reductions in nuclear arsenals in history. A number of essential details need to be worked out, however, like effective verification. And our proposals call for the most stringent verification regime in the history of arms control. We can settle for nothing less. We are hopeful, but we're in no rush. There is no politically imposed deadline. It must be done right or not at all.

Some have worried that an INF agreement would leave the NATO alliance exposed. Well, I share their concern for European security, but concern over this agreement is misplaced. The kind of INF agreement we're working toward is a tribute to the firmness and solidarity of the alliance. That firmness and solidarity must continue. A sound nuclear arms reduction agreement need not undermine our unity or weaken our nuclear and conventional deterrent which have kept the peace these last four decades. And we will indeed maintain effective deterrent forces. Secretary Shultz will also press hard for an agreement reducing strategic arms. Progress there is possible, but the Soviet Union will have to show far more flexibility than it has up to now.

Certain proposals in Congress, especially those that would tie our hands or even enact Soviet negotiating positions into American law, don't help us at the bargaining table. And they undermine chances of achieving mutual arms reduction. I can assure you, I will veto any bill with provisions that hurt our national security.

Thank you all for a wonderful concert. Nancy asked me to tell you how very sorry that she is that she can't be here tonight. I know how much she would have particularly loved this romantic evening of music. And you've proven something I've always suspected: that when you hear a great tune, and you aren't quite sure who wrote it, you could guess Jerome Kern and 9 times out of 10 you'd be right.

Kern was not content just to write songs. Like many men of genius, he wanted to take what he knew and raise it up, make it more significant, establish a higher standard for everyone who would follow. He had great faith in the intelligence of the American people and the power of the stage. He wanted to go beyond the old-fashioned musical revues and bring forth a vigorous new art form, a story told in music. The songs would come honestly from the plot. They would fit the characters' motivations. Integrity of the form is what he sought, and he pursued it throughout his life. He was dedicated to that integrity and, yes, he lived to see it realized. Jerome Kern's devotion to this new art form gave inspiration to the next generation of composers and helped bring forth the musical theater now recognized all over the world as distinctly and joyously American. As for Jerome Kern himself, he lives on in the beauty of his songs.

Acting pursuant to my authority as Commander in Chief, United States naval vessels at 7 a.m. e.d.t. today struck an Iranian military platform in international waters in the central Persian Gulf. This platform has been used to assist in a number of Iranian attacks against nonbelligerent shipping. Iran's unprovoked attacks upon U.S. and other nonbelligerent shipping, and particularly deliberate laying of mines and firing of Silkworm missiles, which have hit U.S.-flag vessels, have come in spite of numerous messages from the Government of the United States to the Government of Iran warning of the consequences.

The action against the Iranian military platform came after consultations with congressional leadership and friendly governments. It is a prudent yet restrained response to this unlawful use of force against the United States and to numerous violations of the rights of other nonbelligerents. It is a lawful exercise of the right of self-defense enshrined in article 51 of the United Nations Charter and is being so notified to the President of the United Nations Security Council.

United States has no desire for a military confrontation with Iran, but the Government of Iran should be under no illusion about our determination and ability to protect our ships and our interests against unprovoked attacks. We have informed the Government of Iran of our desire for an urgent end to tensions in the region and an end to the Iran-Iraq war through urgent implementation of Security Council Resolution 598.

President today announced his intention to nominate the following individuals to be members of the National Advisory Council on Women's Educational Programs for terms expiring May 8, 1990. These are reappointments.

The old friend, of course, was Malcolm Baldrige. No one knows and appreciates better Mac's contribution to the history of our times than you in this room. You were his colleagues for 6\1/2\ years. The partnership between you and him was, perhaps, the most fruitful in the history of this Department, going back even to Herbert Hoover's term here. Mac had a special quality. He was direct and unassuming. He didn't stand on ceremony. He kept his eye on the big picture, but not so much that he ever took for granted those working with him. We won't see Mac in the halls or in meetings anymore, but we'll remember him in our prayers.

You may remember some years ago a definition of prayer that was in a movie called ``How Green Was My Valley.'' It reminded me of Mac. It's when Walter Pidgeon tells young Roddy McDowall: ``Prayer is only another name for good, clean, direct thinking. When you pray, think. Think well what you're saying and make your thoughts into things that are solid.'' And he concluded: ``In that way, your prayer will have strength, and that strength will become a part of your body, mind, and spirit.'' I wanted to come over here today to tell you that our thoughts of Mac will also take a solid form in the years ahead. You see, the Great Hall of this -- one of Washington's great, monumental buildings, the building in which Mac did so much good work for our country -- the Great Hall is to be renamed after Mac: the Malcolm Baldrige Great Hall.

Bill will be in the driver's seat with some very important people -- and I mean all of you. I can't think of a Department with a more noble purpose, one more central to the long-term welfare of our nation, than this one. If it is true, as I believe it is, that trade and economic relations are the brick and mortar in the temple of world peace, then your Department is a department of peace.

I know how many extraordinarily different functions are in the Department. You're often compared to a business conglomerate. But each of these activities -- whether it's predicting the weather, taking a census, compiling economic data, or working on international trade -- each of these helps make America stronger in the world economic arena.

Our trade policies, of course, must always be consistent with our national security interest. Today we know that the national interest of our country is directly challenged by the flow of advanced technologies and defense-related know-how and materials to hostile nations. Your Department, under the leadership of Bill Verity, must be ever vigilant in stopping this kind of harmful technology transfer to our adversaries. That's one of the challenges of the growing world economy.

Not only challenges await us but opportunities. I believe that the birth of a truly global economy, such as we're seeing happen now, will mark the birth of a new age of peace. It's already marking a new era of opportunity. This month we'll set a record: the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. I know you know what that means, because I get many of the numbers from you. And those that come from elsewhere, you study with a microscope. In September the unemployment rate fell to the lowest level in this decade. A greater percentage of our working-age population has been employed this year than ever before in our history. Personal and family income have risen steadily since our recovery began.

The leading indicators are sending a message: Steady as she goes. As one national business magazine wrote recently: ``Business is holding to its faster growth track, buoyed by the revival in factory output.'' Yes, even as some still talk about the deindustrialization of America, manufacturing output has surged, and exports have played a major part in this. Perhaps a few of you could take the fellows around the camera platform aside later and explain to them what I've been trying to help them understand for some time now. We've been seeing substantial growth in exports in recent months, and our exports continue to stay well above their 1986 average. Exports have also been growing strongly in volume terms, while import volumes are down. Emphasizing only the dollar value of the trade deficit misses some of these fundamentals. We've also made headway with our major trading partners through our improved economic policy coordination process.

I'm delighted that [Treasury] Secretary Baker has proposed reforming this process by adding a new commodity price indicator to assist us in reaching judgments about mutually consistent policies and performance. By the way, could you also remind those fellows in the back there that not only is American industry more competitive than ever but that since our recovery began we've created more jobs in America than Europe and Japan combined and that more than 10 million American jobs depend on imports, exports, or both.

This is exactly the wrong time -- although there never is a right time -- for Congress to get on a protectionist binge. The trade bill is working its way through Capitol Hill, and I know I speak for all of you when I say that the administration will work with Congress to achieve responsible trade legislation. But we will not support, and I am prepared to veto, anything that smacks of protectionism, whether it's procedural in nature or overt.

Protectionism destroys jobs. It destroys growth. It undermines the entire global economy, and it undermines our own economy. I hope that Congress understands this and will produce a trade bill that you can be proud of and that I can sign.

And let me add one other thing: I hope that Congress will keep in mind that a strong and growing global economy is the great hope of the world of the next century. More than any other Department of the Government, you are helping our nation move into that economy of the century to come. You're helping to build the true temple of lasting world peace.

This is the start of a great adventure, and it is my hope and prayer that we in the Commerce Department can help this President achieve his goals and that we shall be a proud part of the most meaningful and successful Presidency of our time.

We have much to do, but we have the man and womanpower to do it. My predecessor, Mac Baldrige, built a superb team. He lifted the image of this Department, and he accomplished much of value. To all the people in the Commerce Department -- I need your continued support to finish what he has started.

We must work for a trade bill to promote free and fair trade. We want to increase exports, particularly by smaller businesses throughout the Nation. And we intend to take a leadership role in strengthening trade ties with our principal trading partners: Japan, Canada, Mexico, Western Europe, Latin America, and others in the developing countries and in Eastern Europe.

In trade with Eastern Europe, where export controls are required, we want to make certain that we effectively block transfer of militarily sensitive high technology and that the same safeguards are in place in COCOM [Coordinating Committee for Multilateral Export Controls]. At the same time, we must reduce the list of products of a nontechnical nature so that our manufacturers can increase exports and jobs rather than handing this business on a platter to our trading partners.

National Bureau of Standards will help American industry and government laboratories set new levels of standards and measurements to ensure that American products and services are the highest quality in the world.

I want to let you in on a secret: The Department of the Commerce is the best managed Department in this government. The goals established in 1981 are on target, so much so that we can take on three new missions: first, privatization; second, establishing an Office of Private Sector Initiatives in this Department; and Commerce must lead the charge in seeking innovative ways to reduce the trade deficit.

Mr. President, we're ready to go to work. And when you get me, you get a lot of extra help. My family, 35 of them, are right in front of me. And I want them to all stand, because I'm happy they're here, and I want you to see them all. And they're right there. Stand up, family.

The President. Maybe some people seeing a chance to grab a profit, I don't know. But I do know this: More people are working than ever before in history. Our productivity is up. So is our manufacturing product up. There is no runaway inflation, as there has been in the past. So, as I say, I don't think anyone should panic because all the economic indicators are solid.

The President. Well, since so many of you keep calling it an oil derrick of some kind or platform, no. It was a command and control tower with radar and the ability to track shipping through the Gulf. And, so, we thought that it was an appropriate and proportionate response to their missile attack on a freighter, which wounded some of our people.

Lord, we reduced the deficit over last year by $70 billion. And all the other things I've told you about the economy are as solid as I told you. So, no, I have no more knowledge of why it took place than you have.

President has watched today with concern the continued drop in the stock market. He directed members of his administration to consult with the Chairmen of the Federal Reserve, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the New York Stock Exchange, the Chicago Commodities and Futures Exchanges, and leaders of the investment community.

Those consultations confirm our view that the underlying economy remains sound. We are in the longest peacetime expansion in history. Employment is at the highest level ever. Manufacturing output is up. The trade deficit, when adjusted for changes in currencies, is steadily improving. And as the Chairman of the Federal Reserve has recently stated, there is no evidence of a resurgence of inflation in the United States. The President is keeping close watch on the markets here and in other countries. We will continue to closely monitor these developments.

Like its predecessor, the International Natural Rubber Agreement (1987) seeks to stabilize natural rubber prices without distorting long-term market trends and to foster expanded natural rubber supplies at reasonable prices. It provides for continuation of the buffer stock of not more than 550,000 metric tons established by the 1979 Agreement. The new Agreement incorporates improvements sought by the United States and other consuming countries designed to ensure that it fully reflects market trends and operates in an effective and financially sound manner. The buffer stock is to be used to defend a price range that is adjusted regularly in accordance with market conditions; its financing is to be shared equally between importing and exporting members.

To meet U.S. financial obligations arising from membership, authorization and appropriation legislation will be submitted for congressional approval. The necessary funds will be included in the budget for Fiscal Year 1989. Approval will allow the United States to deposit its instrument of ratification in the fall of 1988. The appropriation will be offset to a substantial degree by assets to be transferred to the United States from the existing Agreement.

Agreement will have a term of five years that can be extended for two additional years. It should provide substantial benefits for consumers of natural rubber. The buffer stock is of sufficiently large size to provide, over time, adequate protection for both the maximum and minimum levels of the price range, thereby providing balanced protection for all members. Moreover, exporting members undertake to pursue policies to maintain continuous availability of natural rubber supplies to consumers. Finally, by moderating price increases during periods of high demand, the buffer stock also could help avoid inflationary pressure on manufactured rubber product prices.

Agreement is consistent with our broad foreign policy objectives. It demonstrates our willingness to engage in a continuing dialogue with developing countries on issues of mutual concern and embodies our belief that long-run market forces are the appropriate determinants of prices and resource allocations.

It will also strengthen our relations with the ASEAN countries, since three of them -- Malaysia, Indonesia, and Thailand -- account collectively for approximately 80 percent of world production of natural rubber.

The following are sequestered as provided in section 252: new budget authority; unobligated balances; new loan guarantee commitments or limitations; new direct loan obligations, commitments, or limitations; spending authority as defined in section 401(c)(2) of the Congressional Budget Act of 1974, as amended; and obligation limitations.

For accounts making payments otherwise required by substantive law, the head of each Department or agency is directed to modify the calculation of each such payment to the extent necessary to reduce the estimate of total required payments for the remainder of the fiscal year to the level of resources available after sequester.

For accounts making commitments for guaranteed loans and obligations for direct loans as authorized by substantive law, the head of each Department or agency is directed to reduce the level of such commitments or obligations to the extent necessary to conform to the limitations established by the Act and specified in the Director of the Office of Management and Budget's determination of October 20, 1987.

Each Department or agency head may, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by law, use existing authority to deobligate balances of budgetary resources as necessary to apply the required reduction or sequestration in as uniform a manner as possible for any person or other recipient entitled to payments under any formula-driven calculations specified in the substantive law. Deobligations may include budgetary resources obligations for which checks have not been issued or funds not otherwise disbursed (funds obligated but unexpended).

The President. Well, we're in constant consultations. It think everyone has been caught by surprise in this. And it is true that at this point of the day the market is in a far better situation than it was yesterday at this time, with about the same number of sales of stock -- trading of stock. But I'm very pleased and gratified with the action that has been taken so far by the Federal Reserve Board and the fact that two of the major banks have lowered their interest rates.

The President. Well, as I told you, we are consulting continuously -- and have been since this started -- with others in our own administration, but also outside forces. With regard to the deficit -- then why don't they fix the blame, as I have tried to, where it belongs: on the Legislature, which has gone on now for more than 50 years defending deficit spending.

The President. I am delighted to welcome once again Prime Minister Gandhi to the White House. The Prime Minister and I have had useful discussions on the status of U.S.-Indian relations. We noted that in the years since our meeting in 1985 substantial progress has been made. Bilateral trade has expanded. Collaboration between our private sectors has intensified. We've enjoyed cooperation in defense production, notably the Indian light combat aircraft. The memorandum of understanding on technology transfer has been implemented. The United States is working with India to launch its satellites. The U.S.-India Fund for Cultural, Educational, and Scientific Cooperation has been inaugurated. And we're working together to combat terrorism.

Our shared dedication to democracy is paramount among these currents. We're also building on a strong foundation of cooperation in the fields of science, technology, and space, which permits us with confidence to set ambitious new goals.

In this connection, the Prime Minister and I have agreed to the following: to renew the Ronald Reagan-Indira Gandhi Science and Technology Initiative for an additional 3 years beyond 1988; we agreed to take steps to substantially expand two-way trade and recognized the need to reduce barriers to free trade; to consult regularly to ensure that U.S. supercomputer exports to India reflect the rapid pace of scientific advances while at the same time safeguarding U.S. technology; to work even more closely together to stem drug trafficking and abuse; to expand defense cooperation in technology and other military areas; to undertake joint research projects to explore the enhancement of arid zone agriculture, water management, and evolution of ground water resources; to increase the educational resources about our countries, as appropriate, using the U.S.-India Fund for Cultural, Educational, and Scientific Cooperation; to establish a program in research institutions in both countries for short-term exchange fellowships in development-related subjects. Expanding on our leadership exchanges, the Speaker of our House of Representatives will visit India this year, and his Indian counterpart will visit the United States next year.

Today the Prime Minister and I also discussed East-West relations and the prospects for an historic treaty eliminating an entire class of intermediate-range nuclear missiles of the United States and the Soviet Union. And the Prime Minister emphasized India's longstanding encouragement of such efforts to reduce and eliminate nuclear weapons. In this context, I urged that India and Pakistan intensify their dialog to build greater mutual confidence, to resolve outstanding issues, and to deal with the threat of nuclear proliferation in the region.

We also discussed the tragic situation in Afghanistan and strongly endorsed movement toward a political settlement -- a settlement that would remove all foreign troops from that country and permit its people to live in peace, as citizens of a neutral country and free from outside intervention. On the subject of U.S. security assistance to Pakistan, I assured Mr. Gandhi that our objective is stability and reduced tensions in South Asia and that our assistance is not directed at India. And finally, let me acknowledge the statesmanship and courage demonstrated by Prime Minister Gandhi and the President of Sri Lanka in their efforts to end the ethnic strife in that troubled island nation. I have pledged to both leaders our full support.

The Prime Minister. It's always a pleasure to be at the White House. Thank you, Mr. President, for your invitation and for your warm words. May I, at the outset, wish Mrs. Reagan the speediest recovery. We know what a source of strength she is to you, Mr. President, in your work for your country and the world.

I also take this opportunity to congratulate the people of the United States on the 200th anniversary of the Constitution. It is one of history's momentous documents that has made the United States grow to greatness. Your Constitution has been an inspiration to us in our struggle for freedom and liberty.

As the President informed you, we have had good and most useful meetings. We spoke of world peace and our concern for the well-being of humanity, and we spoke of the relations between our countries. We agreed upon further methods of strengthening our mutual friendship. The relations between our two countries have always held much promise. In recent years, we have made notable progress towards realizing that promise. Your personal attention and interest, Mr.

President, have contributed greatly to our expanding partnership. We have agreed to collaborate at the frontiers of technology. We have reaffirmed the tradition of scientific interaction, which has been the hallmark of our relationship. The growth in high technology, trade, and transfers has been a source of considerable satisfaction. I hope that the United States would recognize India not just as a market but as a partner in technological progress.

In the field of bilateral trade and investment, we have agreed that much can be done to expand the present level of activity. We will encourage increased interaction between our trading entities. Having successfully launched our cooperation for the light combat aircraft project, we have now agreed to explore other avenues in the field of defense. This is yet another step forward.

I am confident that after our talks today we will be able to place our relationship on a more enduring basis. We share not only aspirations and values, we sometimes face common threats. We have each recognized the dangers to our societies posed by terrorism and narcotics. I mentioned to you today our determination to fight these problems. I'm aware of your personal concern about narcotics, the price they extract in the form of blighted youth and wasted resources. I would like to reiterate once again our commitment to cooperate with you to this end.

Turning to international issues, I should first like to applaud the statesmanship demonstrated by you, Mr. President, and by General Secretary Gorbachev in pursuing the vexing and complex issues of nuclear disarmament. Your endeavors have given a glimmer of hope to a world threatened by imminent nuclear holocaust. An INF agreement will be an historic step. For the first time, an operational nuclear weapon system will be withdrawn and dismantled. We hope that this will be the beginning of the elimination of nuclear weapons altogether, an objective to which your are dedicated.

Secretary-General. I believe that a just solution must ensure a sovereign, independent, and nonaligned Afghanistan. Foreign intervention and interference must cease. The Afghan refugees must be allowed to return to their homes in honor, dignity, and security. We would welcome any earnest efforts in this direction.

We had a frank discussion on the dangers of nuclear proliferation, both horizontal and vertical. My country has consistently recognized that a secure world order cannot be built on nuclear weapons. Our actions have spoken louder than any words in expressing this commitment. We do not have nuclear weapons. We do not want nuclear weapons. And we certainly do not want nuclear weapons in our neighborhood. We have watched with concern developments in our immediate vicinity. Nuclear stockpiles have multiplied. Yet another country now seems on the threshold of fulfilling a long-time goal of acquiring nuclear weapons. On our part let me assure you, Mr. President and the people of your country, that we have no intention of producing nuclear weapons unless constrained to do so.

We appreciate your support to the efforts to end the ethnic conflict in Sri Lanka, Mr. President, in particular to the July 29th agreement, which I signed with President Jayewardene. We are determined to ensure the full implementation of its provisions as it represents the best hope for peace in the region.

I thank you, Mr. President, once again for your hospitality. Our discussions have been most productive, and I leave Washington, confident and optimistic about the future of our relationship. Thank you.

United States Navy ships fired upon and destroyed the platform. Additionally, U.S. forces briefly boarded another platform in the area, which had been abandoned by the Iranians when the operation began.

United States forces have returned to their prior state of alert readiness in the Persian Gulf region. They will remain prepared to take any additional action necessary to protect U.S. forces, U.S.-flag vessels, and U.S. lives.

These restrained and measured actions by U.S. forces were taken at my specific direction in accordance with our inherent right of self-defense, as recognized in Article 51 of the United Nations Charter, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander in Chief.

March 1987, I and members of my Administration have provided to the Congress letters, reports, briefings, and testimony in connection with developments in the Persian Gulf and activities of U.S. Armed Forces in that region. Additionally, congressional leaders were consulted on Sunday, October 18, 1987, concerning this operation. In accordance with my desire that the Congress continue to be fully informed in this matter, I am providing this report consistent with the War Powers Resolution. I look forward to cooperating with the Congress in pursuit of our mutual, overriding aim of peace and stability in the Persian Gulf region.

The President. I have a statement I'd like to read here. I guess you all know now that the market closed up 102.27 points and 604 million shares traded. I've just finished a meeting with my economic advisers, and we thoroughly reviewed the developments of the financial markets of the last few days and the actions we've taken thus far and our options for additional measures.

We've been in constant contact with financial leaders of both countries, with the exchanges around the world, and with market participants. While I remain concerned, I'm pleased that the steps taken by the Federal Reserve have had a salutary effect on the markets: Interest rates are down across the spectrum.

I'm also pleased with the actions by two major banks today to lower their prime interest rates. I believe that there remains room in the markets for a further decline in interest rates, and specifically I'm pleased that the bond market is strong and the foreign exchange markets are stable.

Germans to coordinate our economic policies to provide for noninflationary growth and stable exchange rates. Finance Minister Miyazawa issued a similar statement reaffirming Japan's intent to cooperate with other industrial economies and follow economic policies that will provide for a sustained growth in the Japanese economy. And in a phone conversation with Prime Minister-designate Takeshita this morning, he stated that his top priority was to maintain stable economic relations with the United States. The United States remains committed to the Louvre Agreement, and today I signed the preliminary sequester order under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law.

I think it is preferable, if possible, that the executive and legislative branches reach agreement on a budget deficit reduction package. Accordingly, I am directing that discussions be undertaken with the bipartisan leadership of the Congress for that purpose. The economic fundamentals in this country remain sound, and our citizens should not panic. And I have great confidence in the future.

Mr. President, someone described as a senior market -- or economic analyst in the administration said the market might have been so weakened by this crash that there could be a recession as early as next spring.

The President. It's pretty hard for anyone to speculate on that. I would like to point out, however, that the only way that could happen would be if the people of this country ignored the economic signs. And then if you had people begin putting off purchases of automobiles, refrigerators, things of that kind because they feared hard times, yes, that could bring on a recession. But there is nothing in what has happened here that should result in a recession. We have a higher percentage of the eligible work force at work than ever in the history of our country.

The President. I don't know whether that's necessary or whether we would do it with some of our people, but certainly I'm willing to be a participant in anything that can bring us together. Let me point out -- you mentioned the Democrats -- for virtually a half a century or more they have controlled both Houses of the Congress, and for more than a half a century there has been, with only two single-year exceptions, a budget deficit.

The President. No, because I said from the beginning that -- having predicted for 30 years that the deficit would get out of control as it did -- that there was no way you could balance the budget now in 1 year, but we could set ourselves on a course that would result in that. And the end result was that I have never gotten a budget that I asked for, even though the law says I must submit it to the Congress. And the Congress is responsible for the deficit.

House complex. For many of you the White House is an old stomping ground, so this is really welcome back. It's not often I could just about form a new Cabinet from people who are with me here in this room.

This year we mark 42 years of general peace in the world. And that doesn't mean there hasn't been conflicts in that time -- obviously there have been -- but it does mean that for 42 years mankind has not seen the likes of the world wars that in the first half of this century twice tore civilization apart. This peace has not come without sacrifice. Young Americans have fought, and some have died, to maintain it; and it has not come without resolve. It's come because America has been willing to shoulder the responsibilities of leadership.

No one understands better than you here today that, like it or not, we are the leader of the free world. And that is not a role we asked for; it's a role that was thrust upon us by history and by the hopes of those who aspire to freedom throughout the world. It is said that geography is destiny, but let me say that destiny is much more than that. We are a global power, with global interests and global responsibilities. We can ignore but we cannot escape this basic truth, and any retreat from our responsibilities endangers both our national ideals and our national interests.

Americans can agree on the fundamental objectives of our foreign policy. We want to promote democracy, because it is right, and because democratic governments are less likely to become involved in wars of aggression. We want a growing world economy where free enterprise works, because that's the kind of world in which men and women will live the best and most materially and, I would submit, spiritually decent lives. And we want to work with our friends and allies to prevent regional conflicts and enhance the security of friendly nations.

We can't afford foreign aid anymore, or we're wasting money pouring it into these poor countries, or we can't buy friends -- other countries just take the money and dislike us for giving it. Well, all these excuses are just that, excuses -- and they're dead wrong.

Give away too much money without return? The truth is that now, and historically, we've spent very little on foreign affairs in terms of the overall budget of our government. In the late forties and early fifties, during the time of the Marshall plan, we spent 11 cents of every Federal dollar on foreign affairs. That figure had dropped to 4 cents on the dollar by 20 years ago and has continued to fall until, in recent years, we've been spending less than 2 cents of each dollar to support our foreign policy. And that's money that gets a big return. Is there anyone who believes that we in America would live in as good a world and be as secure if we could turn back the clock and undo the Marshall plan?

Today our economic development aid goes to those same countries in the developing world that provide some 35 percent of the market for our merchandise exports -- more than the total volume of U.S. goods purchased by Western Europe, Eastern Europe, the Soviet Union, and China all put together. And for every billion dollars we export, we support 26,000 jobs for Americans. Just as important, Latin America, for example, will be as pivotal to our peace and prosperity in the next century as Europe is in this. If we ignore it now, we'll pay the price later.

So, what about the charge that we waste our money trying to buy friends? Well, the truth is that the money we spend on security assistance means our allies around the world can join us in defending not only their security but ours. What they can do because of our assistance, we don't have to do. And we should never forget that we aren't buying friends; we're helping friends. We're helping them open the roads of enterprise and opportunity for their own people, helping them build their own institutions of pluralism and democracy, and helping them defend themselves against externally sponsored pressures and subversion.

And anyone who doubts how the peoples of Central America, for example, feel about this should have been here at the White House last week when El Salvador's President Duarte, on behalf of his nation's people, stepped down from that reception platform over on the lawn and walked across the lawn to the Color Guard and kissed and saluted the American flag. Or maybe they should have been in Managua with our former U.N.

For the budget year beginning this October, I submitted a rockbottom request that would still allow us to undo some of the harm caused by cuts in previous years and return to a level of funding that will not put our security at risk. But now the Congress is cutting again, and the amounts approved by the committees in both the House and the Senate -- are being considered by the defense authorization conference -- are more than 15 percent below what we requested as the minimum amount necessary to do the job.

In fact, as it stands now, the foreign affairs part of the budget is one of the few that has decreased; all the others have increased. And just recently they did even more damage when the Senate attached 86 amendments to the State Department authorization bill. It's time for Congress to shove the special interests aside and return the national interest to the head of the class.

I could go on with this and some of our things, but just to give you one set of figures over the last few years that might interest you: For every dollar of defense spending that they have cut, they have added $2 in spending to the domestic programs. And it comes out to about $125 billion cut from defense; $250 billion have been added to the domestic spending.

I think we're all on the same side on this particular issue. And I want to tell you I feel much better as I now say thank you, and God bless you -- and get back over to the Oval Office -- for what you're doing.

The President. I've got two statements to make today. Yes, both happy. You know about the market. It closed at 186 and some fraction, and some 450 million shares traded. But the most important day's news is, at 9:15 a.m. tomorrow morning, I will leave here to go out and pick up Nancy and bring her home.

I want to meet with the bipartisan leaders of Congress as soon as possible to arrange the procedure for deficit reduction discussions. As I have said previously, everything is on the table with the exception of Social Security, and there are no other preconditions. I hope that Congress will also agree to put everything on the table. This matter requires that both sides make contributions and develop a package that keeps spending and taxes as low as possible.

Over the past several days, though, we Americans have watched the stock market toss and turn. It's important that we understand what is happening and that a calm, sound response be the course we follow. While there were a couple days of gains after several days of losses, we shouldn't assume that the stock market's excess volatility is over. However, it does appear the system is working. So, while there remains cause for concern, there is also cause for action. And tonight I plan to take the following steps to meet this challenge.

I will meet with the bipartisan leaders of Congress to arrange a procedure for deficit reduction discussions that will be productive and constructive. I'm appointing my Chief of Staff, Howard Baker, and my Treasury Secretary, Jim Baker, together with my OMB Director, Jim Miller, to lead the White House team.

This situation requires that all sides make a contribution to the process if it is to succeed and that a package be developed that keeps taxes and spending as low as possible. I'm able to announce tonight the final deficit figures for fiscal year 1987, which show a reduction from $221 billion in fiscal year '86, to $148 billion this year, or a deficit reduction of $73 billion. This change occurred not only because of a one-time improvement in revenues but because of reduction in spending.

I'm calling on the Members of Congress to join with me in sending a strong signal to our economic partners that trade markets should remain open, not closed, and that America will withstand any calls for protectionist legislation.

Mr. President, the stock market plunge demonstrates that there is a crisis of confidence about economic stability and the leadership of our government. Are those fears warranted, and how serious is the threat of a recession or something worse?

The President. Well, first of all, the indices, the index that is used for judging whether we're sound economically and so forth, has been up and increasing 10 of the last 11 months. And with the great employment that we have, with the fact that we have reduced that double-digit inflation, and the prosperity that is ours out there, the one thing out of such a happening as the stock market that could possibly bring about a recession would be if enough people, without understanding the situation, panicked and decided to put off buying things that normally they would be buying, postponing purchases and so forth. That could bring on something of a recession. It's happened before.

I don't think that there's any real reason for that. I think that this was a long-overdue correction, and what factors led to its kind of getting into the panic stage, I don't know. But we'll be watching it very closely. I approve very much of what the exchange is going to do with regard to the next 3 days that trading is going on, and quitting 2 hours early to give them a chance to catch up with their paperwork, which is the reason for that. But this is I think purely a stock market thing and that there are no indicators out there of recession or hard times at all.

The President. Well, I am going to meet with the leaders of the Senate, because it is high time, after about 6\1/2\ years of trying -- on my part, I know -- to bring down the deficit and get us on a path which the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill was supposed to do for us toward a balanced budget. And if that was any factor in shaping peoples' confidence, I'm going to meet with them. Now, they will have an agenda. They will have their program. But I have mine.

I've been here, they've simply put it on the shelf and have refused to even consider it. But my program had $22 billion of additional revenues in it. I've said additional revenues. There are other things you can do that are not a deterrent to the economy, such as taxes can be. But what I've said was, all right, I'll listen to them and what they have in mind as an answer to this problem, but I expect them to listen to what I have in mind. And the bulk of these $22 billion have nothing to do with taxes. As a matter of fact, I could claim that we have about $5\1/2\ billion of that $22 billion already. And the Congress has said I can't use it for lowering the deficit -- that is the sale of assets and debts that we have accomplished just in recent weeks.

Mr. President, your Persian Gulf policies have caused widespread confusion and fear that reprisals on both sides will lead to wider hostilities, more terrorism. Did you miscalculate? And is there any limit to these policies? I'd like to follow up.

United Press International], I don't think that we miscalculated anything at all. We're not there to start a war. And we're there to protect neutral nations' shipping in international waters that under international law are supposed to be open to all traffic.

They, on the other hand -- the irrationality of the Iranians -- they have taken to attacking, as they did with this most recent incident -- that was Kuwait and an oil loading platform offshore, which they fired, evidently, a Silkworm missile at and caused damage to it. We've said that if attacked why, we're going to defend ourselves. And we're certainly going to continue this task. And we've now been joined by a number of other nations in keeping the sealanes open. But I don't see it as leading to a war or anything else. And I don't think there's anything to panic about. I think we've done very well.

The President. Well, other Presidents have thought so, too. As a matter of fact, we are complying with a part of that act, although we do not call it that, but we have been consulting with the Congress, reporting to them, and telling them what we're doing -- and in advance, as we did with this latest strike. But they have other things in there that we think would interfere so much with our rights and our strategy and so forth.

Now, we have only been in 5 declared wars in our entire history. About 62 of these more than 200, there was action by the Congress, either through appropriating funds for those acts or passing resolutions or Senate ratifying a treaty or something. But the bulk of them, somewhere around 140 of them, were by American Presidents that, on their own, put American forces in action, because they believed it was necessary to our national security and our welfare.

Mr. President, despite your earlier answer, it's been made clear by you and your aides that new taxes are a possibility as you go into these negotiations on the Hill. And many of us are wondering. In 1984 you promised not to raise taxes, and you may recall that same year Walter Mondale said that it was time to level with the American people. He said Mr. Reagan and I will both raise taxes, but the difference he said was that you wouldn't tell anybody. Now, aren't you going against your own campaign pledge if you're about to negotiate some new taxes?

The President. No. And you have me in a spot in which I don't feel that I can continue discussing these things or future actions. Because for about a quarter of a century I was doing some negotiating for a union against the employers, and you don't talk in advance about strategy or about what you will or won't do, or there's no point in having negotiations.

But let me also point something out that I think all of us ought to understand: why I feel so strongly about the tax situation, and resorting to taxes to curb a deficit when they'll do nothing of the kind.

In all these years, of these 59 months of expansion, our tax revenues -- now I believe that this expansion we are having is largely due to the tax cuts that we implemented early in our administration -- but for all this period of time the percentage of revenues is about -- well, it's about 19 percent every year of the gross national product. Now, the gross national product has been increasing in size quite sizably. So that if we are getting revenues that are still 19 percent of that larger gross national product than the smaller, it would indicate that the revenues are sufficient. But the problem is that the deficit is -- or I should say, wait a minute, the spending I should say of gross national product -- forgive me -- the spending is roughly 23 percent to 24 percent, so that it is what is increasing while revenues are staying proportionately the same and what would be the proper amount that we should be taking from the private sector. And I think that this is something we have to consider if we are going to maintain prosperity.

To follow up on that, Mr. President, do you consider some taxes perhaps less harmful than others? Perhaps sin taxes -- alcohol, tobacco? Are they less harmful to the economy than perhaps an income tax increase?

The President. Well, let me just say that there are some taxes, such as the income tax, that have a more definite effect on the economy than some other taxes; but I am not going to discuss anymore of what we are going to do in this.

Mr. President, let's stay on this if we can. On Monday you said despite the plunge in the stock market that the economy was sound. On Wednesday you said it had turned around. Now, today you are ready to meet with the Congress. What has caused this transformation after months of refusing a budget summit?

The President. No, I haven't been refusing. I submitted, as I have to every year under the law, a budget. And a budget that provided for revenues, as I pointed out here. And the Congress wouldn't even look at it. And the manner in which we arrive at our budget is so much different than anything the Congress does.

We, with the men and the women who have to run the programs -- that are the heads of the Departments and the Cabinet members -- we spend weeks and hours every day, for a long period of time, with them and their expertise in running them, deciding how much money they require to perform the task that the Congress has imposed on us with that program. Then we send that up to the Hill. And those Congressmen -- who don't have any idea about running those programs, they just voted to pass a program to do a certain thing -- they turn around and say oh, no, you need millions of dollars more to achieve the objective than you've asked for.

I think it's kind of a stupid setup. And this is what we've been trying to do for a long time -- is arrive at the ways in which we can reduce spending and so forth. But now, with the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings program, with the sequestering provision that has been passed, we have to get together and make a decision.

If I could follow, sir, I'm wondering if it took a crisis to bring you to the point where you were willing to meet with Congress and whether, if you had met before, you might not have in some way averted the market crisis this week.

The President. No, I think it's been a crisis ever since I presented a budget and that they never will even look at them. If they had looked at our budgets, last year the cumulative deficit would have been $207 billion less than it turned out to be.

The President. Well, the Soviet Union joined us in 598. That was, as you know, the U.N. resolution, the Security Council. They joined us in that and supporting that. Now, Iran is the only one of the two that has refused to accept it as yet. We're still pushing on that before we move on to the followup, which was what do we do if they won't accept it. We're still holding back on that, because the Secretary-General of the United Nations is still seeing if he cannot persuade Iran to cooperate. If they don't, then we will have to face, in the Security Council, the adoption of the second proviso, which is the arms embargo on Iran.

Mr. President, earlier this week, the U.S. attacked an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf. But despite that, today Iran fired another Silkworm missile on Kuwait. Do you really think you can stop the Ayatollah?

The President. Well, the Ayatollah is in a war, and if he's going to go on with provocative acts against us or anyone else, then he's running a great risk, because we're going to respond. We're not going to sit there. And we have to feel that, on the basis of everything he said and everything he's done, that if we did not retaliate as we did recently he still would have done again what he did the first time. We're going to try to point out to him that it's a little too expensive if he's to keep that up.

The President. No, I can't tell you how long that will, but I can tell you that I believe we're just the same as -- we have a fleet in the Mediterranean, and we have one in the Caribbean, other places of that kind. We've had naval forces there since 1949. And we have to have them as long as it is necessary to take action to keep international waters open to commerce and trade. And no nation has a right to close those, particularly when it's not involved with their enemy that they're at war with, but when it's neutral nations.

The President. I'm not going to make suggestions like that to them. I think that's up to them. And as I say, there are no signs of deteriorating economy out there in the economy. We have the highest percentage of the potential work force at work -- employed today -- than we've had in the entire history of the United States.

I can't discuss in advance what I will or won't do, but I'm going to tell you I have not changed my opinion about ever accepting a tax that will have a deleterious effect on the economy. And most tax increases do.

Taxing is not the policy with -- or the problem with the deficit. The deficit is due to too much spending. Every dollar of increased revenue since 1980 -- and that means including our tax cuts -- every dollar of increased revenue has been matched by $1.25 of increased spending.

The President. Because for more than half a century that was dominated entirely by the Congress of -- both Houses of the Congress by one party. They have followed, beginning with what they call the Keynesian Theory, deficit spending -- openly deficit spending on the basis that they claimed that it was necessary to maintain prosperity, that you had to do it, and it wasn't hurtful, because we owed it to ourselves.

And some of us said year after year that this would keep on to the point that it would get out of control. And it has, just as we said it would. And they've got to give up that belief in that. I think I'd like to point out to them that Maynard Keynes didn't even have a degree in economics.

Mr. President, you've taken great delight, in your appearances over the last 6 months or year, in saying that there will absolutely be a veto of any tax increase that reaches my desk. You've said that in a number of different ways.

The President. You're all trying to get me into saying what am I going to do when I sit down at the table with the other fellows. And I'm going to tell you that I'm going to do what I think is absolutely necessary for the economy of the United States. And I still happen to believe that taxing is something -- well, I think it's what brought on the troubles that we had when I came here.

The President. No, there are many sources that we've pointed out. I'm in favor of a number of pay for services -- that there are some things that government does for, say, a particular group of people, a service that's performed. I don't think that the taxpayer should pay for that service when it is limited to one particular group. They should pay a fee for that service.

Mr. President, while your budget talk has been conciliatory over the past few days and a bit this evening, earlier this week you flatly blamed Congress again, out on the South Lawn, for the deficit. Doesn't the White House equally share in this mess?

The President of the United States cannot spend a nickel; only Congress can authorize the spending of money. And for 6 years now, I have repeatedly asked the Congress for less money, and they have turned around and given more to spend, and done it in such a way that I can't veto it when they put it all together -- instead of appropriations -- in a continuing resolution.

No, the Congress is the one that's in command, and we have to persuade them that what we've asked for is enough to support the programs as determined by the people who work those programs and who run them. And every budget that I've sent up there has been put on a shelf, and I've been told that it's dead on arrival. And then we are faced, someplace after the first of the fiscal year, with a continuing resolution containing 13 or so appropriation bills. And I think that I was perfectly justified in saying that a President is not responsible for this. You can go back all the way to 1931; we've been running deficits.

The President. Well, a couple who've quit -- we're going to replace them. We've appointed a new Chairman of the Commission. We think that it has to have a variety of skills, because it's a very complex problem. So, we have as much representation as we can get from the business community, from medicine, from education, and so forth. And we have two vacancies to fill. And I'm still hopeful that we'll learn something and find out if there are more things and better things that we can do with regard to this terrible plague.

Many economists think that one quick, sure-fire way to give the economy a big boost would be to create, in effect, a Common Market for North America. Now, you initiated these talks with [Canadian] Prime Minister Mulroney, and [Treasury] Secretary Baker recently completed the negotiations. But the Canada-U.S. trade pact is being vigorously opposed, especially in Canada and in some parts of the U.S. Is there any way that your office can be put behind this to give it the needed push?

The President. Oh, you bet that I'm behind it. The problem is right now there's a Parliament in Canada, also, that has to pass on it. And I understand they're somewhat reluctant about a few points. I think the trade agreement that we reached with them is one of the foremost things that has happened in this area in history. Here we are these two great partners -- and we're the greatest trading partners in volume in the world, between us.

Q. Mr. President, now that an INF deal is all but wrapped up, the next step would be strategic weapons. The Soviets have said that they are willing to give you the big cuts in those missiles that you've always wanted if you would agree to some limits on strategic defense testing.

Now, a lot of experts have said that that would not require slowing down the program for the foreseeable future. Why have you told your negotiators that they cannot even discuss this issue with the Soviets?

The President. Because if you put it on the table as a bargaining chip, then it becomes a bargaining chip. And we have said that this, a real defense against nuclear weapons, can be the biggest factor in hopefully one day making those weapons obsolete, because I heard my own words come back to me the other day from Mr.

The President. Andrea, we don't have a word yet or a date yet as to whether he's coming. We have a belief that this is going to take place, and I want it to take place very much. But also I hope that when it does that -- he's never been to this country before -- that he would have time to see a great deal of America. And I think it would be good for him to see this and to see things that he couldn't accuse us of staging them for him. Let him see it.

Now, yes, I've thought about -- knowing something about the quarters that they have for beach homes in the summer and so forth -- I've thought it would be kind of nice to invite him up to our 1,500-foot adobe shack that was built in 1872 and let him see how a capitalist spends his holidays.

Well, comment on the Bork confirmation. You said, ``If they reject him, I'll give them someone they will dislike just as much.'' That seems a defiant statement. Both you and the Senate have fulfilled your constitutional duty. The people exercise their democratic privileges by expressing their opinion. The majority of the Senators rejected Judge Bork, and according to the polls, the majority of the American people. So, while it appears your defiance was aimed at the Senate, weren't you, in reality, defying the working of democracy in America, while advocating democracy around the world?

The President. I think that this selection of a judge -- and what you were referring to as democracy -- I think was totally out of line with what the procedure should be. We were not electing a political figure that could then be turned out of office by someone's votes -- and for the first time in history, to go out and have private interest groups of various kinds pressuring individuals to vote a certain way on this.

I think that this thing was politicized, and I think that Judge Bork was one of the first ones that said, regardless of what happens to him now, we must all make sure that never again does this process that has been so dignified as a confirmation by the Senate of an appointee of the President turned into a political contest, as if people were voting on it. And I think if you would compare the qualities of the people who testified for him -- and their qualifications, I should say, not quality -- I think they were far superior than most of the people who were against him.

You said it was politicized. It wasn't politicized from the beginning because of the fact that I remember about 2 years ago when Senator Paul Trible asked the Black Bar Association of Virginia to recommend a black person for a Federal judge. And I quote from Senator Paul Trible's letter; he said: ``Recommend someone who shares the conservative philosophy of President Reagan.'' And it's pretty hard to find a black -- you know -- [laughter] -- who shares it. [Laughter] And so, and then you said again that you had pressure interest groups. Isn't that what happens in America? Special interest groups -- I don't know whether you're talking about the civil rights people and women and all. They're American citizens, and don't they have that right to do so?

But on the racial question, I realize that there are some who believe that somehow I have a prejudice in that way and am a racist. And that is one of the most frustrating things to me, because I was on the other side in that fight long before it became a fight. And I would like to point out that the head of CORE, the Committee on [Congress of] Racial Equality, was one of the witnesses testifying on behalf of Judge Bork.

The President. Good morning. I'm looking forward to hearing from each of you on what you think -- both what the private sector and what government can do to make sure that our 59 months of growth and job creation continue. You should all be proud of the nearly 14 million jobs that we've created since the expansion began.

The trend toward higher education requirements is striking. Since I know that many of the new jobs created between now and the year 2000 will require educational backgrounds beyond the high school level, I'm interested in hearing you and your thoughts on this. And another challenge facing us in the year 2000 will be the demographic changes in the work force and additional numbers -- women, minorities, immigrants. And we need to make sure that our markets remain the -- or keep the dynamic flexibility that has served us so well in creating new job opportunities.

I've always been a firm believer in the power of the people -- that when we get the government out of their way, problems can be solved more quickly and more efficiently. I'm interested in hearing your thoughts -- all of you -- on how the private sector can rise to meet the challenges that are facing the work force now and in the future. And that's enough from me because it's time for me to listen and learn from each of you.

The President. Well, Bill, thank you, and thank all of you very much. It's been a great pleasure and certainly a learning experience to be here at the Labor Department. Let me just begin though, if I can, with a special thanks to Secretary Brock, who's leaving all of us. Bill, you've been a dedicated public servant and a trusted adviser, and we'll miss you in the Cabinet. If I was really smart, I'd stop right there.

I had a lesson some years ago -- I've related it many times, but not for some years -- about the importance of brevity in a speech or remarks. It was taught to me by the Reverend Bill Alexander of Oklahoma. Now, he was present when I made a speech, and he later told me his first experience as a clergyman, and I've always figured there was a connection between his story and my speech.

Megan, a high school junior, tells of how she was sitting on the front steps of the library when a man from the local shoe store came by and said he needed someone to work for him. Megan declined the offer, because she already had another job.

Since it began, our gross national product has risen some 20 percent, well above that of comparable expansions. We've been creating jobs at an average rate of almost a quarter of a million a month, as Bill told us, for a total of nearly the 14 million new jobs, as you've seen. And we're not just creating more jobs, we're creating better jobs. According to Labor Department data, nearly two-thirds of the new jobs have been in the higher paying occupations, and we've seen that here now in the charts, with only 12 percent in lower paying, low-skill occupations. Over 90 percent of the jobs are full-time. In short, we're talking about continuing job creation with jobs that are better paying, more challenging, safer, and more rewarding. So much for the so-called McJobs thesis.

One of the groups that has benefited most from this job surge is, as we've been told, the black community. Employment of blacks has increased twice as fast as employment of whites. Since 1982, the real income of black families, as we've been told, has increased almost 40 percent faster than white family income. And the share of black families in the highest income bracket is up by over 70 percent. This August, the percentage of blacks employed was the highest on record, as was the percentage of all Americans employed.

Well, so far I've concentrated on employment. But that's only one indication of the strong and vital economy that we have today. I could talk about how inflation is holding low and steady; how real household income is way up; how manufacturing productivity has surged ahead, well above the postwar average; and industrial production has outpaced Europe and Japan. All of this is concrete evidence of an economy that is strong and fundamentally sound. It is an economy, judged in pure economic terms, that has a very bright future before it, a future of growth, low inflation, and high employment.

We've seen in the last week, however, that there is real concern on Wall Street. The recent turbulence in the stock market suggests that those who are investing in the future of our economy are worried that some roadblock may be put in the way of that future. The market is constantly reacting to an almost infinite flow of information. There may have been hundreds of factors affecting the uneasiness on Wall Street, but I think it's appropriate to single out some of the more likely ones: The first are domestic, and I think it's fair to say, primarily political in origin. I say political, because they have more to do with the actions -- and lack of action -- of the government than with American business people, entrepreneurs, and workers. As I said, the business of America is sound, the economy is strong.

Those who have to make the decision on whether or not to invest in the future of our economy see some very disturbing signs on Capitol Hill. For one, a dangerously protectionist trade bill working its way through conference.

If passed, that bill would threaten a spiraling trade war and could very well bring our economic expansion to an end. And if it comes to that, I will have no choice but to veto it. The devastating effect on employment -- on all those jobs I mentioned -- would only be a part of the effect of protectionist trade legislation. Of the roadblocks that could be thrown in the way of our economic expansion, Wall Street knows protectionism is one of the worst. At the same time, we see a Congress that is unable to get control of deficit spending. It backed away from its Gramm-Rudman promises. And there are many who, while refusing to cut spending, insist on increasing taxes.

The disruption in our markets is sending a signal loud and clear to get our economic house in order. And that is why, last night, I called for the bipartisan leadership in Congress to meet with me on Tuesday to arrange the process for reducing the Federal deficit. And as I said, I will listen to them but they must listen to me on the need to send a clear signal that spending will be restrained. And I'm asking every Member of Congress who agrees that we should reject protectionist legislation, every Member who agrees that tax increases are not the solution, to join with me in showing our support for America and her economic future.

I've said, I think the markets are reacting more to the actions -- and inactions -- of government than to the deficit itself, which has been shrinking -- down nearly 30 percent since the last fiscal year. But while that deficit exists, the uneasiness will remain. And that's why we're going to go back to Congress and, in light of what's happened, redouble our efforts to cut the deficit by cutting away overspending. Congress has made no effort to seriously restrain domestic spending. Just freezing spending at last year's levels would yield substantial deficit reduction. Overspending endangers our economy. And each one of those cherished special interest programs is going to have to justify itself against the good of the whole Nation.

But let me just close with a message to all those in government. The story of this historic 59-month expansion is first and foremost, as you heard up here today: a study of individual achievement, of the historic struggle -- or the heroic struggle of entrepreneurs; the hard work and dedication of laborers; the ingenuity and creativity of our business community; and just the plain, raw power of American industry. All that's asked of us is not to get in their way, to keep the business environment as free and as stable as possible. Freedom and stability, that's all our economy needs. That's all Americans need to keep this economy growing well into the next decade.

But now, before I go, there are a few special American workers that I want to mention. Recently, the country was riveted, as you know -- all of us -- to the story of tiny Jessica McClure. And I think that we all said prayers of thanks when that story had a happy ending. And I think we're also very thankful in our hearts for the generous people who worked around the clock, through fatigue, past exhaustion, to save little Jessica. And, of course that's why I'm happy and I think we all are that three employees of the Department of Labor who work for the Mine Safety and Health Administration are here with us today, having done their job so well.

Working closely together, they directed the rescue operation, drilling a hole parallel to the well and then digging a shaft across to reach Jessica. In fact, Dave Lilly chipped away by hand the last few inches of rock to make the first physical contact with little Jessica. Now, I know another Midlander, Vice President Bush, has awarded you a certificate of recognition. Wayne and Dave and Sid -- I think you've understood here already this morning that we're all very proud of you.

And now, I'll just close with one more little episode. I received a letter the other day from a gentleman that pointed something out I hadn't thought of, and a subject that I think all of us are aware of, however. This man, in his letter, said that you can go to live in France, but you can't become a Frenchman; you can go to live in Japan, but you cannot become Japanese; or Turkey and not become a Turk; or Greece and become a Greek. But he said anybody in the entire world can come to this country and become an American.

Mr. President, I am privileged to start off, and of course, we all have heard word from Moscow. So, I simply would ask you for your reaction. Are you disappointed that there was no date for a summit set, or are you still hopeful that you can have one sometime later this year?

The President. Well, I'm hopeful, of course. They have said they want such a thing and agreed to it -- and to be held here in this country -- but so far have not set a date. So, I'll remain hopeful that we can have it, yes. I understand there was some progress made, however, in the talks on the intermediate-range weapon agreement.

The President. I have to believe that there is an effort being made on their part as well as ours to make the cold war a little warmer in the right way. Let's say a little less cold, but also a little less war.

Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, here in this room, repeated those words to me as being his own belief: that it can't be won and shouldn't be fought. So, I cannot make that a bargaining chip. We have the prospect of a defensive system that could practically make nuclear missiles obsolete. And I have said over and over again that if and when we have such a system we wouldn't use that for our advantage offensively against any other nation.

I am saddened and disappointed that the Senate has bowed today to a campaign of political pressure and has turned down the nomination of Judge Robert Bork to the Supreme Court. Chief Justice Warren Burger said that he could not recall a more qualified nominee in the past 50 years. The highest Court in our land will not enjoy the services of one of the finest men ever put forward for a place on its bench. Judge Bork will be vindicated in history.

My next nominee for the Court will share Judge Bork's belief in judicial restraint: that a judge is bound by the Constitution to interpret laws, not make them. In our democracy, it is the elected representatives of the people, not unelected judges, who make laws. He or she will share my belief in judicial restraint. He or she will share my belief that the courts of law must administer fair and firm justice to criminals and must show compassion to the victims of crime. I will seek a nominee who understands the dangers of judicial license and leniency in the courtroom. This is the kind of jurist the American people want on the Supreme Court. This is the kind of jurist the framers of our Constitution envisioned sitting on the Supreme Court. This is the kind of jurist I am determined to appoint to the Supreme Court.

The bears and the bulls were out on Wall Street this week with some of the sharpest drops and gains in stock market history. So, what did it all mean? Now, there's a question that the experts and analysts will be pondering for a time. But on one point I've been certain all week, and it's a point that's been buttressed by some good economic news released on Friday.

This news shows that the growth of our gross national product during this last quarter was a remarkable 3.8 percent. So, too, the inflation index showed only a two-tenths of 1-percent rise, which if worked out to an annual rate would be only a 2.4-percent inflation rate. What this shows is that our predictions about the direction of the economy this year have been right on: strong growth with a slight rise followed by an encouraging drop in inflation.

Now, coupled with the declining interest rates we saw earlier this week, all this speaks to the point I made after Monday's drop in stock prices: that the American economy is sound and strong. Our historic, even astonishing, growth is continuing -- the creation of nearly 14 million jobs, hundreds of thousands of new businesses, rapid rises in family income -- all adding up to 59 months of economic expansion, the longest peacetime expansion in our history. Though the market has been volatile, let's remember, if corrections or fluctuations do occur, that as long as consumers do not overreact by losing confidence our expansion will continue.

Let's also remember a critical reason for this expansion was our decision to reduce taxes in 1981. I'm sure many of you know it was very difficult getting this through the Congress, although with your help we achieved it. And despite all the predictions of high inflation from our opponents, our tax cuts not only fueled our expansion, they had a benefit that surprised some people: Far from reducing the amount of money the Federal Government collected in tax revenues, over the long run, those collections actually increased due to the economic activity sparked by the tax cuts. In fact, tax revenues from 1981 to 1987 actually went up $255 billion. Of course, this meant we had enough to pay for our defense buildup and some left over to help get our deficit spending problems under control. But instead of using new revenues to cut the deficit, the Congress decided to spend even more.

I'm proud that since 1913 my party has reduced taxes 10 times and increased them only once. And that's why I hope members of the Democratic Party will follow President Kennedy's lead of some years ago and remember that lower taxes mean higher growth.

But the simple fact is that all sides must contribute to this process if it is to succeed and if a package is to be developed that keeps taxes and spending as low as possible. This effort must also address the flipside of our twin deficit problem. I mean, here, our trade deficit, a problem that would only be worsened by protectionist legislation. So, let's keep the stock market healthy and sound, and let's do it by avoiding protectionist legislation and by keeping taxes and spending down so we can keep interest rates and inflation rates low.

As prominent as the news on Wall Street was this week, I'm sure you are also aware that Secretary Shultz and my national security adviser, Frank Carlucci, were in Moscow this week to talk to the Soviet leaders on the full range of our relations. We're closer now to completing a treaty on eliminating an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles, and progress was made in other areas as well. No date was set for a summit meeting, but we're in no hurry. And we certainly will not be pushed into sacrificing essential interests just to have a meeting. I'll keep you informed as events move forward.

I have directed the Secretaries of Treasury and State to take action to place an embargo on all U.S. imports from Iran. At the same time, we are instituting a ban on the export to Iran of 14 broad categories of U.S. products with potential military application. As required by law, we have consulted with Congress on these actions and are presently engaged in formally notifying Congress with regard to them. The ban on imports of Iranian goods will take effect as soon as possible. The additional controls on exports to Iran will go into effect in a week to 10 days.

Congress itself has moved quickly and decisively in this important area, and the administration looks forward to cooperating closely with the Congress to ensure that any future legislation serves our broader goals of implementing United Nations Security Council Resolution 598 and restoring peace and stability to the Persian Gulf region.

The measures I am initiating are a direct result of the Iranian Government's own actions, including its unprovoked attacks on U.S. forces and U.S. merchant vessels, its refusal to implement U.N. Security Council Resolution 598, its continued aggression against nonbelligerent nations of the Persian Gulf, and its sponsorship of terrorism there and elsewhere in the world. These measures will remain in place so long as Iran persists in its aggressive disregard for the most fundamental norms of international conduct.

Let me emphasize that we are taking these economic measures only after repeated but unsuccessful attempts to reduce tensions with Iran and in response to the continued and increasingly bellicose behavior of the Iranian Government. They do not reflect any quarrel with the Iranian people. Indeed, as I have said a number of times, the United States accepts the Iranian revolution as a fact and respects the right of the Iranian people to choose any government that they wish.

United States hopes that more normal relations with Iran will evolve as Iranian belligerence and tensions in the area diminish. We have made these points known repeatedly to Iran, through diplomatic channels as well as public statements. Unfortunately, the Iranian Government's response to date, in deeds as well as in words, has been entirely unconstructive.

The people of the States created the national government when they delegated to it those enumerated governmental powers relating to matters beyond the competence of the individual States. All other sovereign powers, save those expressly prohibited the States by the Constitution, are reserved to the States or to the people.

The nature of our constitutional system encourages a healthy diversity in the public policies adopted by the people of the several States according to their own conditions, needs, and desires. In the search for enlightened public policy, individual States and communities are free to experiment with a variety of approaches to public issues.

Acts of the national government -- whether legislative, executive, or judicial in nature -- that exceed the enumerated powers of that government under the Constitution violate the principle of federalism established by the Framers.

Policies of the national government should recognize the responsibility of -- and should encourage opportunities for -- individuals, families, neighborhoods, local governments, and private associations to achieve their personal, social, and economic objectives through cooperative effort.

Constitutional authority for Federal action is clear and certain only when authority for the action may be found in a specific provision of the Constitution, there is no provision in the Constitution prohibiting Federal action, and the action does not encroach upon authority reserved to the States.

With respect to national policies administered by the States, the national government should grant the States the maximum administrative discretion possible. Intrusive, Federal oversight of State administration is neither necessary nor desirable.

Sec. 4. Special Requirements for Preemption. (a) To the extent permitted by law, Executive departments and agencies shall construe, in regulations and otherwise, a Federal statute to preempt State law only when the statute contains an express preemption provision or there is some other firm and palpable evidence compelling the conclusion that the Congress intended preemption of State law, or when the exercise of State authority directly conflicts with the exercise of Federal authority under the Federal statute.

As soon as an Executive department or agency foresees the possibility of a conflict between State law and Federally protected interests within its area of regulatory responsibility, the department or agency shall consult, to the extent practicable, with appropriate officials and organizations representing the States in an effort to avoid such a conflict.

When an Executive department or agency proposes to act through adjudication or rule-making to preempt State law, the department or agency shall provide all affected States notice and an opportunity for appropriate participation in the proceedings.

Preempt State law, unless preemption is consistent with the fundamental federalism principles set forth in section 2, and unless a clearly legitimate national purpose, consistent with the federalism policymaking criteria set forth in section 3, cannot otherwise be met.

In addition to whatever other actions the designated official may take to ensure implementation of this Order, the designated official shall determine which proposed policies have sufficient federalism implications to warrant the preparation of a Federalism Assessment. With respect to each such policy for which an affirmative determination is made, a Federalism Assessment, as described in subsection (c) of this section, shall be prepared. The department or agency head shall consider any such Assessment in all decisions involved in promulgating and implementing the policy.

Budget, to the extent permitted by law and consistent with the provisions of those authorities, shall take action to ensure that the policies of the Executive departments and agencies are consistent with the principles, criteria, and requirements stated in sections 2 through 5 of this Order.

Order No. 12291 and OMB Circular No. A - 19, Executive departments and agencies shall identify proposed regulatory and statutory provisions that have significant federalism implications and shall address any substantial federalism concerns. Where the departments or agencies deem it appropriate, substantial federalism concerns should also be addressed in notices of proposed rule-making and messages transmitting legislative proposals to the Congress.

Presidential Personnel for National Security. Before joining the White House staff, Mrs. Foreman practiced law with the Washington office of the Houston-based law firm of Bracewell and Patterson, where she specialized in international law and litigation. A former career member of the Foreign Service, Mrs. Foreman was posted as a political officer to Beirut, Lebanon, and to Tunis, Tunisia, and as an economic officer to the United States Mission to the United Nations. She was a member of the United States delegation to the 31st Session of the United Nations General Assembly and to the 60th Session of the United Nations Economic and Social Council.

In the last 59 months America has enjoyed an economic expansion that will soon enter the history books -- the longest peacetime expansion on record. During this period, we have created an average of almost a quarter of a million jobs a month. GNP has risen 20 percent. Yet recently the stock market has alerted us of potential dangers on the economic horizon. Anyone who doubted that these threats to our future growth were serious should have been set straight in the last couple of weeks.

It is time to put aside partisan rivalries and work together for our nation's future. I pledge that in these meetings on the budget deficit the administration will do just that. I know that all Americans hope that the leaders of Congress will do the same. I urge Congress to work quickly with us to set year-by-year deficit reduction targets, moving from this day forward, and then to join us in putting together realistic plans for meeting those targets. We owe it to the Nation to get this job done.

Weinberger and Congressman Gilman and General Palmer, General Gorden, and members of the staff and faculty, and ladies and gentlemen of the United States Military Academy, I want to thank you for all your hospitality, especially since I'm an old Army man myself.

British attack. And now, for more than 180 years, the United States Military Academy, here at West Point, has in effect extended and carried on that first mission. For here we train the men and women whose duty it is to defend the Republic, the men and women whose profession is watchfulness, whose skill is vigilance, whose calling is to guard the peace, but if need be, to fight and win.

More than 180 years, West Point in this time has established and added luster to a proud story, a story of courage and wisdom, a story of heroism, of sacrifice, and yes, very often the ultimate sacrifice. It is the story of men like Ulysses Grant, the son of a humble tanner in Ohio who went on from West Point to save the American Union. It's the story of Dwight David Eisenhower, a Kansas farm boy who learned the skills at West Point that enabled him to command the mightiest invasion force in history, and of Douglas MacArthur, an acknowledged genius in war who showed himself during the occupation of Japan to be a genius in peace, as well. And if I may, it's the story of men like General Fred Gorden. The only black cadet in his class, today General Gorden has come back to West Point as Commandant, setting an example for you, and indeed for all young Americans, of what hard work and devotion to duty can achieve.

Palmer, ladies and gentlemen of West Point, it is because you, above all other people, pray for peace, but must bear the burden should that peace fail, that I've come here today. For I want to speak about relations between the American Republic and democracy's main competitor, the Soviet Union -- relations that are likely to shape the whole course of your careers as professional soldiers.

But first, some essential background -- from the beginning, our administration has insisted that this country base its relations with the Soviet Union upon realism, not illusion. Now, this may sound obvious, but when we took office, the historical record needed restatement. So, restate it we did. We told the truth about the massive Soviet buildup. We told the truth about Afghanistan and Poland. We told the truth about economic growth and standards of living -- that it is not the democracies that have backward economies, that it is not the Western World in which life expectancy is actually on the decline. We told the truth about the moral distinction between their system and ours.

When our administration took office, we found America's military forces in a state of disrepair. Today the situation is very different. Pay and training for our Armed Forces are up. The Navy has been expanded. Weapons systems of all kinds have been modernized, making full use of the technological revolution. As a result of our efforts, you in the Army will see the fielding of more than 400 new systems. And we've begun work upon a dramatic, new departure, both in military strategy and technology; our Strategic Defense Initiative, which offers the hope of rendering ballistic missiles obsolete and of ensuring deterrence by protecting lives, not threatening them. In brief: We have replaced weakness with strength.

To turn now from background to specific substance, the agenda of our relations with the Soviet Union has focused upon four critical areas: first, human rights, because freedom is what we stand for as Americans; second, negotiated settlements to regional conflicts; third, expanded exchanges between our peoples; and fourth, arms reduction.

In some areas of this four-part agenda, we have seen progress. Cultural, scientific, and other bilateral exchanges have shown a dramatic increase since my 1985 meeting with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva. In human rights, too, we've seen some positive developments. Some political prisoners have been released. Emigration figures are up somewhat. And of course, there's talk of reform in the Soviet Union, of some liberalizing changes in Soviet laws, and of economic reforms that could give greater scope to individual initiative.

We harbor no illusions: While changes have taken place in the Soviet system, the one-party system unchecked by democratic institutions remains unchanged. And yet we welcome such changes as have taken place, and we call upon them to make still more. It is in regional conflicts where Soviet performance has been most disturbing. Anyone searching for evidence that the Soviets remain expansionist, indeed imperialist, need look no farther than Nicaragua or Afghanistan.

Our policy in these regional conflicts is straightforward. We will continue to engage the Soviets, seeking to find political solutions to regional conflicts, solutions that eliminate foreign troops and return the fate of nations to their own people. In Nicaragua, we support the peace plan agreed upon by the Central American Presidents last August, insisting upon the establishment of full and genuine democracy in Nicaragua. Moreover, Soviet-bloc and Cuban forces must leave that nation; this is essential to protect our own security.

As for the democratic resistance in Nicaragua, year upon year, for 7 years now, they have fought and sacrificed and endured. It is the resistance -- the brave members of the resistance, many of them no more than teenagers -- who have kept the Communist Sandinistas from consolidating their power and forced them into the current peace plan. It is the resistance, in short, that has given Nicaragua at least a chance for true freedom. And my friends, I know you agree: We must not abandon these courageous men and women, these soldiers. So, let me promise: Nicaragua will have its freedom.

Well, no doubt the Soviets wanted to test NATO resolve. And indeed, the deployment of our INF missiles had to be carried out in the face of sharp political protests and even mass demonstrations. I remember speaking in Bonn in 1982. Thousands of demonstrators chanted and marched. And I couldn't help thinking what irony, for it was to secure the peace they sought and the freedom they were exercising that we were deploying the missiles that they protested.

NATO held firm. And, yes, it was when we showed strength that, if need be, we would ensure the credibility of our deterrent posture by meeting force with force that the Soviets, after first walking out of the negotiations, eventually returned and began to talk seriously about the possibility of withdrawing their own INF missiles.

I'm pleased to say that the agreement we're nearing is based upon the proposal that the United States, in consultation with our allies, first put forward in 1981: the zero-option. The zero-option calls very simply for the elimination of this entire class of U.S. and Soviet INF missiles.

How will we know that the Soviets have actually destroyed their missiles? As you know, the Soviets have an extensive record of violating past arms control agreements. So, frankly, we're not going to take their word for it. Any treaty that I agree to must provide for effective verification, including onsite inspection of facilities before and during reductions and short-notice inspections afterwards. All in all, the verification regime we have put forward is the most stringent in the history of arms control negotiations, and I will not settle for anything less.

At the same time that we've been moving forward on INF missiles, we've attached the highest priority to achieving deep reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic arms. Even Mr. Gorbachev has described strategic weapons as the ``root problem'' in arms control, and we agree. To that end we've expedited the strategic arms negotiations in Geneva. Much progress has been made in reaching accord on our proposal of cutting strategic arsenals in half.

The Soviets must, however, stop holding strategic offensive reductions hostage to measures that would cripple our SDI, particularly since the Soviets are already spending billions of dollars on a strategic defense program of their own.

And this brings me to what happened last week in Moscow. As Secretary Shultz has reported, he had lively, sometimes heated discussions with Foreign Minister Shevardnadze and General Secretary Gorbachev. Well, that was no surprise. The whole range of issues on our agenda was covered. There was important positive movement toward an INF agreement, and there was progress in other areas, as well, not only in arms reductions. As I announced earlier today, Foreign Minister Shevardnadze will come to Washington Friday to meet with me and Secretary Shultz to continue these discussions.

And let me repeat what I've said before. Summits can be useful for leaders and for nations, occasions for frank talk and a bridge to better relations. It would be good for Mr. Gorbachev to see this country for himself. I'm ready to continue and intensify our negotiations, but a summit is not a precondition for progress on the agenda at hand. When the General Secretary is ready to visit the United States, I and the American people will welcome him. Let us remember that we've reached this point only as a solid alliance, an alliance made up of NATO, Congress, and the American people. If we're to continue to see real results and to convince the Soviets to bargain seriously, this cohesion must continue.

Now, some have argued that when the INF missiles have been removed, our commitment to Europe will have been weakened. Yet this is simply untrue. We maintain our firm commitment to the NATO strategy of flexible response, ensuring that the alliance is capable of blocking aggression at any level. In Europe itself, we will retain a large force of many types, including ground-based systems and aircraft and submarines capable of delivering nuclear weapons. And in consultation with our NATO allies, we've agreed that further nuclear reductions can take place only in the context of a substantial improvement in the balance of chemical and conventional forces.

This, then, is the accounting that I've come here to give you. For, ladies and gentlemen of West Point, I believe that from time to time we who are your civilian leaders owe that -- an accounting -- to you who bear the burden of our decisions. But I've come not only to inform you, I've come to enlist your help.

If we do reach an INF agreement with the Soviets, when its provisions have been fulfilled and the INF missiles destroyed, you will be assuming your posts as platoon leaders and troop commanders. And even then, when I and the members of my administration will already have been some years out of office, your careers will only be beginning. So, I ask you to guard the future of the Republic. Use the courage and steadiness that this Academy is teaching you in dealing with our adversaries. Employ all your skill as soldiers and good will as Americans in preserving and strengthening the emerging relationship with our friends and allies. And always, always remain true to the values for which this Academy and our country stand: Duty, honor, country.

Commander in Chief these 7 years, I have been struck again and again by the professionalism of our military officers and by the dedication of the soldiers that I have met in the field. But one who impressed me most deeply is a member of the United States Army I never met. His name was Sean Luketina.

Republic has always served, from the hunger and bloody snow of Valley Forge to the heavy demands of vigilance upon the borders of Germany and Korea. It is the cause of life as God meant life to be lived. It's the cause of human freedom. And so, the proud words sound again today as they did 25 years ago and as they will at this Academy 25 years hence: Duty, honor, and country.

Permit me to say, as well, that I feel something today of what General MacArthur must have felt. Your youth, your optimism -- they give me strength. And as I look out upon your young faces, I feel as one who will depart the stage almost before you've made your first entrance. I feel in my heart a great confidence in the future of our country, for I know that you will defend that future. And it's true: The long gray line has never failed us.

I have signed S.1666, an act that extends and improves the Government's pay comparability allowance program for Federal civilian physicians. This important program has helped Federal agencies recruit and retain badly needed physicians by bringing their salaries closer to those available in the private sector.

U.S.C. section 5948 to count that previous service with the VA and the PHS in computing the total length of their service as a ``Government physician'' to determine the amount due them under the physician pay comparability allowance program. Nothing in this provision is intended to bring physicians currently employed in the VA or the PHS within the coverage of the pay comparability allowance program or to change in any way the definition of the term ``Government physician'' for purposes of that program. Further, this provision does not have the effect of amending any statute relating to the pay or allowances of a physician employed by the VA or the PHS. Its sole purpose is computation of the length of service as a ``Government physician'' for purposes of determining the amount of physicians' pay comparability allowance.

I also wish to point out that section 2 of the act, which requires payment of special allowances to certain nonphysician psychologists in the Public Health Service, is unnecessary since the agency is not experiencing any recruitment or retention problems regarding such professionals. This provision could also lead to pressure to provide similar allowances to psychologists in other agencies, which would be an equally unwarranted use of the taxpayers' money. Accordingly, the administration plans to seek its early repeal.

We have good reason to set aside a week to remind ourselves of the benefits of adult immunization: The lives of many adults could be saved each year by inoculation with vaccines readily available and approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. Vaccination against infectious diseases saves lives and lowers health care costs as well, as the Surgeon General has repeatedly reminded our Nation.

Influenza and pneumonia kill more than 70,000 adult Americans each year, in part because approximately 80 percent of people at high risk for influenza-related complications have not been vaccinated. Estimates are that more than 200,000 cases of hepatitis B occur in the United States every year, yet 70 percent of those who should be protected remain unimmunized.

Between 10 and 15 percent of women of childbearing age -- more than 11 million women -- are unprotected against rubella. As many as seven million adults born after 1956 remain susceptible to measles, and the majority of Americans over 60 are not protected from tetanus and diphtheria.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

President commends the Senate for passage of a catastrophic health insurance bill with bipartisan support. This action brings to fruition an effort the President has promoted for many years. He is pleased that the plan that has passed is modeled after the proposal he sent to Congress earlier this year.

President wishes to recognize the dedication and hard work of several members of the Senate Finance Committee in helping shape the bipartisan plan, which answers his call for catastrophic insurance in his 1987 State of the Union Address.

Section 1. Except as otherwise provided in regulations issued pursuant to this Order, no goods or services of Iranian origin may be imported into the United States, including its territories and possessions, after the effective date of this Order.

I am enclosing a copy of the Executive Order that I have issued exercising this authority. I have delegated to the Secretary of the Treasury the power, in consultation with the Secretary of State, to carry out the provisions of the Order.

I have authorized these steps in response to the actions and policies of the Government of Iran in support of terrorism and in the conduct of aggressive and unlawful military action against U.S.-flag vessels and merchant vessels of other non-belligerent nations engaged in lawful and peaceful commerce in international waters of the Persian Gulf and territorial waters of non-belligerent nations of that region. These Iranian actions and policies have been supported in part by revenue earned from the sale of products imported into the United States. The measures taken pursuant to this Order are in response to such hostile Iranian actions occurring after the conclusion of the 1981 Algiers Accords, and are intended solely as a response to such action.

Iran was officially designated under U.S. law in 1984 as a country that has repeatedly supported acts of international terrorism, the United States has taken a number of limited economic measures in response to hostile Iranian actions. These measures have included export controls on items that would contribute to Iran's military potential and its ability to support international terrorism.

Iran, however, not only has continued but has escalated its aggressive acts against the United States. Iranian actions in the Persian Gulf have not only directly threatened U.S.-flag merchant vessels and U.S. forces but those of our allies and other friendly states as well. These policies of the Government of Iran have necessitated the further economic measures I have announced today.

Government of Iran to cease its support of terrorism and acts of aggression directed at the United States and other nations both in the Persian Gulf and elsewhere. The United States calls upon other nations to join us by taking similar measures. We must demonstrate by firm political, economic, and other steps that the international community considers the actions and policies of the Government of Iran unlawful and intolerable.

So, if you guys ever get tired of playing in front of all those screaming, adoring fans, you're welcome back. [Laughter] Well, actually, I could use a couple of you guys in the Congress hitting some grand slams for me up there, and maybe some of you umpires calling the shots.

But seriously, I'd like to congratulate your manager, Tom Kelly, the youngest nonplaying manager to take his team to a World Series since 1905, and Frank Viola, the series most valuable player, and Garry Gaetti, the league championship series most valuable player. And, Frank and Garry, you two really did an outstanding job, as did all the Twins.

Well, the Cards just might do that, considering they're the only team to play in the World Series three times in this decade. And to reach this playoff, the Cardinals had to overcome the immense talent of three great teams: the Mets, the Expos, and the Giants. I'd like to think the Cardinals were winners in their own way. They made no excuses, and they accepted their defeat with class.

So, to all you champions here and those homer hanky-waving Minnesotans back home as well as here, again congratulations. And Steve Lombardozzi no longer needs to worry about hearing the term ``Twinkie'' anymore. [Laughter] The Minnesota Twins are the world champs. So, good luck, champs, and God bless you all.

Kelly. On behalf of the ball club, I get to do the honors. But one thing I want to bring up here: After looking at these umpires for 7 days, it's nice to see their wives with them here today. [Laughter] What an awful sight for 7 days.

But in a sense, that's what the last 7 years have been all about: getting the Government out of the way. When we first came to town, there was a lot of getting out of the way that needed to be done. If you were a small businessman or entrepreneur in those days, the outlook was not bright. Nearly everywhere you turned the Government had set up a roadblock in your path.

Double-digit inflation was eroding your savings and the savings of everyone who might be a potential investor in your business. That same inflation was driving interest rates sky high. It got to the point that to borrow money you had to be so rich you didn't need it. And then there were the taxes: 70 percent top rate on individuals and 46 percent on corporations. And bracket creep meant that you got a tax hike every year, even if you were just holding even.

Well, we turned that around with tax cuts, deregulation, and declining inflation. And the result is an economic expansion 59 months long -- the longest peacetime expansion on record. And since it began, our gross national product has risen more than 20 percent. The story of these 59 months is one of consistent growth with low inflation; of dramatic rises in real household income; of surging productivity in manufacturing, well above the postwar average. But perhaps the single most impressive gain has been the employment.

We've been creating jobs at an average rate of almost a quarter of a million a month, for a total of nearly 14 million new jobs. This summer the employment-population ratio -- that's the measure of the percentage of all Americans 16 years and older who are working -- was at the highest level in U.S. history. And we're not just creating more jobs: We're creating better jobs. According to Labor Department data, nearly two-thirds of the new jobs have been in the higher paying occupations, with only 12 percent in lower paying, low-skill occupations; and over 90 percent of these new jobs are full-time. In short, we're talking about creating -- or continuing job creation with jobs that are better paying, more challenging, safer, and more rewarding.

Well, we know where most of the new jobs came from, too -- not the big corporations, not the Fortune 500. It is small businesses that have accounted for about 70 percent of all the new jobs -- that's right, 70 percent. Small businessmen and entrepreneurs don't just create jobs: They're helping shape America's future. On a per-employee basis, small firms contributed over twice as many first-of-type innovations.

That's why one of the best economic indicators we have is the rapid growth of small business incorporations, which have been increasing at a rate of about 5 percent a year for 4 straight years now. That's not simply a measure of economic health -- it's a measure of how much opportunity there is in the American economy. It's not just a measure of business activity: It's a measure of the American spirit of enterprise -- restless, large, and growing. It won't be satisfied till it captures the future.

Recently, there have been some signs of economic concern. The fact is the stock market, even after these last weeks of adjustment, is still much more than double what it was in August of 1982. We're concerned, of course, and are now in the process of negotiating with Congress to do something about that persistent black cloud on the economic horizon: the Federal budget deficit.

Now, before I took this job, I was a labor negotiator for many years, negotiating on the side of labor. And if there's one thing about negotiating, it's that you don't tip your hand. I will promise you this much, however: There will not be an agreement that could threaten our economic recovery. Our goal is to work together on a course that will signal growth and opportunity for the future.

Well, thank you very much. We've got some tough fights ahead of us on these issues and others, such as the threat of government-mandated costs on business and opposition to fundamental tort and product liability reform. But with your help and support, we'll keep America's economy on the high road of growth and opportunity. And working together, I know we will succeed. I thank you all very much, and God bless all of you.

I am pleased to submit to the Congress my sixth annual report on the state of small business. This report confirms that the small business economy was healthier at the end of 1986 than at the start of the year, reflecting growth in both new firms and new employment. Our Nation's small businesses fare best with stable prices, low interest rates, and steady growth, all of which were present in 1986.

A healthy small business sector is more than a reflection of the national well-being; it is an active force for change. America's entrepreneurs are continually experimenting with new products, new technologies, and new channels of distribution. Half of all major innovations in the past 30 years were generated in small companies.

The result of all this innovative activity is new companies and more employment for our workers. The great industrial and commercial concerns of our Nation were built by innovators like Henry Ford and Alexander Graham Bell, whose small businesses grew to help shape a new economy. Today, many of America's great corporations rely on small firms as suppliers, manufacturers, distributors, and customers.

A broader spectrum of Americans than ever before is starting businesses. In the past 10 years, the number of businesses owned by women has increased three times as fast as businesses owned by men. Minority-owned businesses have also increased; American minorities are more likely than ever before to be business owners in 1987.

In the end, they made 60 recommendations to the Federal government, ranging from reducing the deficit, to easing the terribly expensive burden of liability insurance, to continuing our efforts to enlist small firms in important national research efforts. This last recommendation -- to reauthorize the Small Business Innovation Research Act -- has been signed into law, as have several other bills addressing the delegates' concerns. I can assure the small business delegates that their message will continue to be heard during the 100th Congress.

What benefits the economy also benefits small business. On October 22, 1986, I signed into law the most comprehensive tax reform legislation since the enactment of the Internal Revenue Code in 1954. Culminating 2 years of bipartisan effort, this law cuts tax rates significantly for corporations and individuals alike, and limits or eliminates many special tax advantages. The law is designed to help remove tax considerations from business decisions, which are best made in a free, competitive marketplace.

Call it competitiveness or a quest for excellence. The quest for excellence that I envision is not just a legislative package, although legislation will play a part. It is not just another government program, although government will have a role. Rather, it is a great national undertaking that challenges all Americans.

To help achieve this goal, I have submitted to the Congress a major competitiveness proposal to assure that the Federal government does everything possible to make our businesses and workers preeminent in the 21st century.

Enactment of my proposal will allow American workers and businesses to meet world competition head-on. This six-part program is aimed at increasing investment in human and intellectual capital, promoting the development of science and technology, protecting intellectual property, enacting essential legal and regulatory reforms, meeting the challenges of international markets, and reducing the Federal deficit.

Promoting flexible job skills and more challenging work for a better work force are important to the competitiveness of American industry. This new program will help workers displaced by adverse economic conditions, technological changes, or increased imports. Small firms -- major employers of first-time job holders, recently unemployed workers, and workers in need of training -- will play a very important part in this program.

Administration is interested in exploring with the Congress and industry representatives measures that will provide more incentives for American business to advance in research and technological development. To help transfer technology from Federal laboratories to the marketplace, I have signed Executive Order No. 12591 creating incentives for the development and transfer of federally supported innovation. To protect business confidentiality, I am also proposing to broaden legislatively the Freedom of Information Act definitions of trade secrets and confidential commercial information. In addition, I have signed an Executive Order giving businesses an opportunity to object to the government's release of commercial information if disclosure would harm commercial competitive interests.

To maintain the incentives for continued innovation and the protection of intellectual property envisioned by the signers of our Constitution, I have proposed legislation to the Congress that would: protect processes for manufacturing products, restore the time lost by inventors due to government-mandated testing of products, and reduce the incentives for unnecessary litigation.

Regulations and excessive paperwork place small businesses at a disadvantage in an increasingly competitive world marketplace. Over the past decade, small firms have benefited from the more competitive milieu in the deregulated financial and transportation industries. The Administration supports continued deregulation and other reforms to eliminate regulatory obstacles to open competition. I have also proposed statutory reforms to curtail the costly product liability spiral and to amend our antitrust laws to reflect the dynamics of world trade.

U.S. trade laws have been effective instruments for opening foreign markets and defending American industries against unfair practices by our competitors. I have proposed improving those laws that enhance our ability to meet the challenges from abroad without enacting protectionist barriers at home. Our proposals will emphasize opening markets through multilateral negotiations, encouraging adjustment while providing relief to industries injured by import competition, and tightening our laws to deal more effectively with unfair competition.

Finally, improving our national competitiveness means eliminating the Federal budget deficit. Controlling Federal spending remains an essential goal. I have proposed a budget that achieves the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings target by reducing spending, not by raising taxes.

The quest for America's business is to make products more efficiently, to embrace new ideas, and to develop better methods of management and new technologies. In that quest, this Administration will continue to listen to the concerns of small business owners and to press for legislation that will enhance small business' ability to compete. In the final analysis, though, it is the individual decisions and innovative efforts of our Nation's business owners and workers that will forge a new American competitiveness.

The President. I am announcing today that, in accordance with my duty under the Constitution, I intend to nominate and ask the Senate to confirm Judge Douglas Ginsburg of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit for the position of Associate Justice of the Supreme Court.

Federal judge, as Assistant Attorney General of the United States, as a senior official at the Office of Management and Budget, as a distinguished professor at Harvard Law School, and as a former law clerk to Supreme Court Justice Thurgood Marshall makes him eminently qualified to sit on our highest court. Just as importantly, Judge Ginsburg is highly respected by his peers across the political spectrum. When I nominated him to the U.S. Court of Appeals last year, he was unanimously confirmed by the Senate and won lavish praise not just from conservatives but from liberals, as well.

Ginsburg is, as I am, as every justice I've nominated has been, a believer in judicial restraint; that is, that the proper role of the courts is to interpret the law, not make it. In our democracy, our elected representatives make laws, and unelected judges interpret the laws. And that's the foundation of our system of government. Above all, judges must be guided by our most fundamental law: the Constitution. Every judge that I appoint must understand that he or she serves under the Constitution, not above it, and Judge Ginsburg is such a judge.

Throughout his professional career, Judge Ginsburg has shown that he also believes, as I do, that the courts must administer fair and firm justice, while remembering not just the rights of criminals but, equally important, the rights of the victims of crime and the rights of society. Too often, judges have reinterpreted the Constitution and have made law enforcement a game in which clever lawyers can try to find ways to trip up the police on the rules. This is not what our Founding Fathers intended when they framed our Constitution 200 years ago. They knew that among the most vital duties of government was to ``ensure domestic tranquility.'' They drafted a Constitution and gave us a system that was true to that duty, while protecting the rights of all Americans. I believe that Judge Ginsburg will take a tough, clear-eyed view of this essential purpose of the Constitution, while remaining sensitive to the safety of our citizens and to the problems facing law enforcement professionals.

Much has been said about my agenda for the courts. I want courts that protect the rights of all citizens. No one has rights when criminals are allowed to prey on society. Judge Ginsburg understands that, and that's why I am nominating him.

Supreme Court. In taking up this nomination, I hope we can all resolve not to permit a repetition of the campaign of pressure politics that has so recently chilled the judicial selection process. It is time for the Senate to show that it will join with me in defending the integrity and independence of the American system of justice.

And a good way to begin would be by holding hearings promptly. When Justice Powell announced his retirement 4 months ago, he made it plain that he believed it would be unfair to the parties with cases before the Supreme Court, and unfair to the remaining members of the Court, to be left without nine full-time Justices. He graciously stepped down from the Court to enable the President and the Congress to select his replacement before this October term began. But as a result of the longest delay in starting hearings to fill a vacant seat on the Court since the custom of taking testimony from Supreme Court nominees first began in 1939, the Nation's highest court is still operating at less than full strength over 4 months later.

Since June 1987, when Justice Powell resigned, the work of the Supreme Court has grown even more burdensome. All during the months of July, August, and September, nearly one-third of the literally hundreds of cases that the remaining eight Justices reviewed for hearing were criminal cases. Throughout this time, the empty seat on the Supreme Court has been a casualty in the fight for victims' rights and the war against crime.

During the last 25 years, the average time between nomination and the start of hearings has been less than 18 days. In fact, in the entire 200-year history of our country, since the nomination of John Jay, the average start-to-finish time from a President's appointment to confirmation or other action by the Senate has been only 24 days. One Senator has boasted that the reason for the 70-day delay in beginning Judge Robert Bork's hearings was to allow time to gear up the political campaign against him. And that was, very simply, a disservice to the Court and to the Nation. If these hearings take longer than 3 weeks to get going, the American people will know what's up.

It's time to put the national interest ahead of partisan political interests. No excuses about the press of other business before the Senate Judiciary Committee. There's no more important business before that committee than to bring the Supreme Court up to full strength. The Senate has a duty in this regard, just as I do. So, this is my call to the Senate today: Let us all resolve that the process of confirming a Supreme Court nominee will never again be distorted. Alexander Hamilton wrote that ``the complete independence of the courts of justice is essential in the Constitution.'' Let us resolve this time that guarding that independence will be the Senate's highest priority. The American people want this. They have a right to expect it.

By selecting Judge Ginsburg, I've gone the extra mile to ensure a speedy confirmation. I've been impressed by the fact that in academia, in government, and on the bench Judge Ginsburg has been enormously popular with colleagues of all political persuasions. A word that many have used to describe Douglas Ginsburg is ``unpretentious.'' Now, that's quite a compliment for a judge.

Let me say in closing, it is up to all of us to see to it that Senate consideration of Judge Ginsburg's nomination is fair and dispassionate and, above all, prompt. I believe America is looking for a sign that this time the process will protect the independence of our judiciary as the framers of the Constitution intended. I urge Senator Biden and Senator Thurmond and the other members of the Senate Judiciary Committee to join me in the spirit of bipartisan cooperation and to demonstrate this spirit by meeting during this coming week to schedule hearings on this nomination.

Ginsburg. Thank you, Mr. President. I want to express my deep appreciation for the confidence you've placed in me and nominating me to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. I just want to say that I'm looking forward to the confirmation process and, upon confirmation, to taking a place in the Court and playing a part in the work that it does that's so important in our system of government. Thank you again.

Hospices, expanding rapidly as a vital component of health care, provide a compassionate way for terminally ill patients to approach death naturally in a supportive environment and surrounded by family members. Hospices foster personal care, comfort, and full living, with attention to physical, emotional, and spiritual needs, especially those relating to pain and grief. The enactment in recent years of a permanent Medicare hospice benefit and an optional Medicaid benefit makes this care a possibility for more Americans.

The most important focus of hospice care is concern for patients and their families. This emphasis on the sanctity of human life and the dignity and worth of every individual is exactly why we set aside a time to salute the professional staffs of our Nation's approximately 1,700 hospices and the thousands of volunteers who give freely of themselves in this endeavor.

Hospice Month. I urge all government agencies, the health care community, appropriate private organizations, and the people of the United States to observe the month of November with appropriate programs and activities to recognize and support hospice care.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Since my report of May 1, 1987, fewer than 30 applications for licenses have been received with respect to Nicaragua, and the majority of these applications have been granted. Of the licenses issued in this period, most either authorized exports for humanitarian purposes, covering medical supplies, food, and animal vaccines, or extended authorizations previously given to acquire intellectual property protection under Nicaraguan law.

The expenses incurred by the Federal Government in the period from May 1, 1987, through October 31, 1987, that are directly attributable to the exercise of powers and authorities conferred by the declaration of the Nicaraguan national emergency are estimated at approximately $167,800, all of which represents wage and salary costs for Federal personnel. Personnel costs were largely centered in the Department of the Treasury (particularly in the Customs Service, as well as in the Office of Foreign Assets Control, the Office of the Assistant Secretary for Enforcement, and the Office of the General Counsel), with expenses also incurred by the Department of State and the National Security Council.

The President. I have just finished meeting with Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, and Mr. Shevardnadze presented a letter to me from General Secretary Gorbachev, who has accepted my invitation to come to Washington for a summit beginning on December 7th. At that time, we expect to sign an agreement eliminating the entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear forces, or INF. In his letter, General Secretary Gorbachev set forth his views of other arms reductions topics that should be discussed during that meeting and indicated the Foreign Minister had authority to agree on the agenda and duration of the meeting. I am studying that letter carefully, and it appears forthcoming and statesmanlike, and I welcome it.

In our discussions, Foreign Minister Shevardnadze and I reviewed the status of outstanding issues incident to completing an INF agreement and discussed progress in Geneva. The remaining details, while technical, are important in ensuring effective verification of any agreement. Verification remains a major concern of the United States. Our proposals will result in the most comprehensive verification regime in history. We also reviewed recent developments in other negotiations, as well, and I stressed the importance I place on reaching an agreement on reducing strategic offensive arms by 50 percent. In particular, I emphasized that we seek a formal, verifiable treaty and do not believe either nation should settle for anything less. We agreed to work toward such an agreement, which I hope to sign during a visit to Moscow next year.

Minister Shevardnadze and I also discussed the general state of relations between our two countries. We agreed that in addition to arms reductions, a meeting between myself and the General Secretary should deal with the whole range of issues that concern us, including bilateral, regional, and human rights issues.

I am very pleased with the results of my discussion today. A formal announcement on behalf of the two Governments will be forthcoming shortly. I'm looking forward to welcoming Mr. Gorbachev to Washington and to productive discussions with him that will advance the U.S. agenda of peace and freedom.

The President. Well, I don't know about the term of the visit. I think it will be simply for that conference, because he has some scheduling problems, too, just as we do here. But as to the other things there, I can't say. I don't know.

The President. Well, there has never been, to my knowledge, any negative from him. Back in Geneva, in our first meeting, we agreed to two more summits. And the first one to be here, and the second one to be there.

Mr. President, you talked about 50-percent reductions on strategic weapons. Do you think, as a result of the letter from General Secretary Gorbachev that there is some movement possible on strategic defense that would make the other kinds of reductions possible? Are they still linked?

The President. Not in the sense of making one a condition for the other. All of these things are going to be discussed between our people. But I've made it clear, and -- they've not rejected this -- that there's no way that we can give up SDI, which we believe is offering an opportunity for peace for the world.

Mr. President, there have been some indications from the administration in recent days that there is some flexibility on the deployment schedule for your Strategic Defense Initiative. Could this come in to play in your discussions with Mr. Gorbachev?

Mr. President, if I heard you correctly, you seem to be talking about the fact that there are still some remaining details, including some on verification, to be completed. Am I correct? Have you announced a summit and the fact that you will sign an INF agreement, when in fact it isn't done yet?

The President. I think that will be taken care of in a statement that will be given to you shortly after I take one more question, and then I have to go. These gentlemen have to go, but there is being released a joint communique that will answer a number of these questions.

The President. I think there's a great deal of misunderstanding having to do with our relationship with our European allies and all of that. I can only assure you that none of us feel that way. We believe that we're leading a situation that is equal between our two countries with the things yet to be tied down in verification and so forth. And as I say, I have great confidence in it.

United Press International], it must be ESP. Do you know that I hadn't even thought about that until we were sitting in the Cabinet Room in this recent meeting, and I thought to myself, wouldn't it be wonderful if Pearl Harbor Day would become superseded by the day that we began the path to peace and safety in the world through disarmament?

The President. Well, maybe that could be another meeting. He would come purely for that purpose, and I would still like to do that, just as I know when we discussed these two meetings in Geneva he suggested that there might be things in the Soviet Union that he would like to show me.

President and the General Secretary attach the highest importance to holding a substantive meeting which covers the full range of issues between the two countries -- arms reductions, human rights and humanitarian issues, settlement of regional conflicts, and bilateral relations -- and which makes significant headway over the full range of these issues.

At their meeting in the United States, the President and the General Secretary will, in addition to reviewing the full range of U.S.-Soviet relations, sign the treaty on the total elimination of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range and shorter-range missiles; set the agenda for future contacts between the leaders of the two countries; and consider thoroughly the development of instructions to delegations on a future treaty on 50 percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms and on the observance of and non-withdrawal from the ABM Treaty for an agreed period.

President and the General Secretary envision a further meeting between them in the Soviet Union in the first half of 1988, where they would also seek progress across the entire range of U.S.-Soviet relations. Toward this end, both sides will work towards early achievement of a treaty implementing the agreement to reduce strategic offensive arms by 50 percent, which could be signed during the President's visit to Moscow.

I'm speaking to you today by a taped message, because I am away from Washington and my usual microphone. But I'd like to take a few minutes to talk to you about two issues that have occupied our Nation's Capital this past week, issues that will affect the lives of all Americans for years to come.

My concern is that in recent years too many judges have forgotten that one of the goals of our Founding Fathers was to ensure domestic tranquility. Too many judges have reinterpreted the Constitution, got away from the original intent of the Founders and, in the process, made law enforcement a game in which clever lawyers try to find ways to trip up the police.

Our courts must protect the rights of all Americans, and that includes the rights of the victims of crime and of society, not just of criminals. I believe that Judge Ginsburg will do just that. He has had a distinguished legal career that has included teaching at the Harvard Law School and serving as a law clerk to Supreme Court Justice Thurgood Marshall and as an Assistant U.S. Attorney General.

As the Senate takes up Judge Ginsburg's nomination, I hope that it will join with me in defending the integrity and independence of the American system of justice against the kind of campaign of pressure politics we saw during the consideration of Judge Robert Bork's nomination. The way to show its determination to prevent such a campaign from happening again is for the Senate to insist that the Judiciary Committee hold hearings promptly, no delays to gear up opposition or support for this nomination -- prompt hearings. You have a right to expect nothing less.

The other issue I wanted to talk about is the economy. Our economic expansion continues strong. In November it will enter the history books as the longest peacetime expansion on record. During the expansion we've created nearly 14 million new jobs. Employment levels this year have been the highest ever recorded. Industrial production is rising strongly, much of it because our manufacturers are exporting more. Despite the trade deficit, since the day I was sworn in for my second term, America's total real exports have risen at a powerful annual rate of over 8 percent. And the budget deficit is on the way down. This week it became official: The budget deficit was $73 billion smaller in the fiscal year that just ended than it was the year before. And what's more, it was technically within the range of what was called for in the original Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill. Now, that's good news, but in the last few months, I've warned that we could end the expansion and send the economy into a tailspin. Well, now the stock market is giving its own warning. And there are some steps we can take in Washington to deal with the Federal deficit, to reject moves toward trade protectionism, and to examine the stock market mechanism and procedures.

This week leaders of Congress sat down with me and members of my administration to talk about the budget deficit. These were bipartisan meetings to make sure the budget deficit comes down again this year by at least $23 billion. If we can do that, it'll be the first time deficits have dropped 2 years in a row since 1974. But cutting deficit spending can no longer be a sometime thing. Let's resolve that from now on we will join together each year to bring it down again until the budget is balanced. When we cut spending, it must stay cut, no coming back to next year with new programs or replacing old reductions with new increases. From now on, deficit cuts, like diamonds, must be forever.

The world is looking to Washington for leadership. So, I say to the leaders in Congress: Let's roll up our sleeves, pull together. The things we want aren't all that different -- a better life for all Americans.

Doran. We want to welcome all of you to St. Thomas the Apostle Parish. In a sense, it's a home parish for Edie, for though she was not a Catholic, she began coming to this parish in 1951, when we were a little barracks built on the back of the property. And she, as a matter of fact, became one of the first benefactors of this parish, where she came one Sunday in the old, cold barracks -- and we were sitting on folding chairs -- and she said, ``We've got to do something about this parish.'' So, she went back up to the Biltmore, and she said, ``There's a bunch of you rich Catholics around here, and you've got to do something for that young, little'' -- years ago -- ``young, little priest that is trying to build a parish. Now, I'm going to give a bingo game Sunday night, and you're going to come, and you're going to dish out.'' And thus it happened.

Lord is my shepherd, I shall not want. He maketh me to lie down in green pastures. He leadeth me beside the still waters. He restoreth my soul. He leadeth me in the paths of righteousness for his namesake.

Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil. For thou art with me. Thy rod and thy staff, they comfort me. Thou preparest a table before me in the presence of mine enemies. Thou anointest my head with oil. My cup runneth over. Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life, and I will dwell in the house of the Lord forever.'' These are the words of Holy Scripture.

Doran. Over many years of priesthood, 22 of which were spent in this parish, I came to know a great number of people, naturally. And I came to build a habit of -- when I was saying a few words at their funeral service -- of trying to pick out some particular aspect of that person, something that perhaps gave the key to that person's personality. And what I always wanted to do was to choose something that her friends and her family and all who knew her would sit back and say, ``Yes, that's right. That's true of him. That's true of her.'' It was a way of seeking a truth of a person and have it verified by the family and the friends.

So, we looked to the center aspect of Edie Davis, something that would be singular about her. And I think her family and you, her friends, will agree that if you wanted one word to describe Edie Davis it would be ``delightful.'' She was a delightful person. One felt delight in her presence. One felt delight in the anticipation of her presence. One found delight in the memory of her presence. For that is the way of Edie Davis in her life and to all those around her. She reminded me of what a poetess had said: ``She walks, the lady of my delight.'' And that is what I saw, and I have a feeling what you saw, in this lovely woman.

Now, it might be interesting to consider for a moment just what is delight. If you were asked to describe the word ``delight,'' how would you put it? What would you say of it? It's a strange thing that delight is curiously human and intensely intellectual. We experience delight first with our minds. We feel it is not so much a pleasure of the senses as it is a delight of the mind at something that another has said or something that another has done that gives pleasure, delight to those around, to those who hear, to those who experience. So true is this that sometimes, though we're reluctant to admit it, we can be delighted in ourselves at something we have said or something that we feel was particularly good that we might have done. Delight -- delight is a reaction. It's a vibration responding to the wisdom or the wit or the outright humor of another person, of the vibrations of that reaching our mind like a spark coming out and igniting a fire of warmth within us.

One couldn't be with Edie Davis for a few minutes, or one couldn't be with Edie Davis for a long time, without experiencing the effulgence of delight which came from her presence or which came from hearing her witty, fun-filled reactions to the vagaries and the varieties of human life. She could turn a formal occasion into a fun-filled occasion with one simple phrase. I remember one time I introduced her to our first Bishop of Phoenix, and she met him very formally, almost curtsied to him. And then she turned to me, and she said, ``Well, aren't you and I going to kiss? We always do when the Bishop isn't here'' -- [laughter] -- a typical Edie remark.

And so, may I say to the family and to you friends the assurance that something special is in delight in the very eyes of God. You know, God made us humans the only creatures who can laugh. The animals don't laugh, even the angels don't laugh -- only humans. It's our human characteristic. And so, we have this power of laughter and of joy and of delight in the grandeur or the lovability or the wit or the wisdom of another. And this gift of God was intended to lighten our days, to make them lighter and brighter by the delight that we see in others.

And that same God -- I think I can assure you, Nancy -- that same God who gave us this power rejoices in our use of that power and certainly will smile benignly at one who used that power with such graciousness and such generosity, who gave delight to others through these many, many years of her life; because there's an old saying -- I think it's an Indian saying, but I'm not sure -- and it says this: ``Laughter is music to the ears of God.'' And she played a song of music in her life and will have it now. God bless you.

Donohoe. In this day of thanksgiving for heritage -- heritage for her family and, through the providence of God, heritage for our nation -- we go back to the Book of Ecclesiastes and read this passage for ourselves as we go on our pilgrimage to join Edie in heaven.

Indeed, she loved all humankind. We all have our memories, precious memories. I became acquainted with Deedie by telephone. When Nancy and I were courting, if she were calling her mother or her mother calling her and I was there, she -- well, she introduced me to Deedie on the phone. And then she would put me on the phone to visit for a while. And it was quite a time before we met face-to-face, but when we did we were already close friends.

Many people who only knew about Deedie will remember her as the lady who headed up the great fundraising charity in Chicago for 25 years. Many more will remember her for all that she did here in Phoenix, raising millions of dollars, particularly for children who were disabled or handicapped. But there are countless more individuals who will remember her for what she did for them, personally, when they had a problem or a trouble or something that made them need help. She didn't just recognize the cop on the corner; they were personal friends. She knew countless other people who just crossed her path -- delivery boys, the cleaning woman, Dr. Loyal's patients, and, yes, his students in the medical school at Northwestern University.

My first inkling of how well she was known and loved came some years ago when, at that time, my television sponsor had brought me to Chicago to appear at a kind of forum. It ran late, and I came out; it was dark. And I was supposed to meet Deedie and Loyal. They had told me the name of the cafe, and I was to meet them for dinner. And I told the doorman about this and that I needed some instructions as to where was that cafe.

And was it far enough away that I needed transportation? And in doing so, I, without realizing it, I told him who I was meeting. And he just raised his hand when I said that name. And he left me and went out to the curb, and he started looking, I suppose, for a cab. But the traffic was stopped for the stoplight on the corner, and there was a police car. And he waved the police car over to the curb, and he told them about me and who I was meeting and that I needed to get there. And the next thing I knew, I was a passenger in a police car with two officers who knew Deedie Davis and who drove me right to the door as quickly as they could.

In the midst of our grief, Dick and Nancy, I hope you'll take comfort from this: that you were loving children, and you made Deedie happy and very proud. Yes, all of us who are gathered here feel great sorrow.

But let's be sure we know the sorrow is for ourselves, for the loss that we now feel. But let us realize that Deedie has just gone through a door from this life to that other life that God promised us, that life that is eternal, where no one is old, where there's no pain or sorrow, and where she is a smiling and loving Deedie we all remember, now once again hand in hand with Loyal, surrounded by others of her loved ones who have preceded her there.

And she's looking back on us with that loving kindness. Yes, she's here. She's seeing us and hearing us now. She's wanting us to be happy in knowing that one day, we will all be together again. And if I know Deedie, that other life that we've been promised will even be better, because she's been there for a while before we arrived.

One of the most important has to do with the Federal budget. Only once since 1948 has all of the budgeting of the United States Government been approved by Congress and signed by the President on or before the beginning of the fiscal year. And too often, when the budget process has reached an impasse, appropriations have been dumped into massive continuing resolutions. The worst of these came along last year. Congress poured all of the Government's appropriations into a single bill. The bill was 1,057 pages long, weighed 14 pounds, and arrived over 2 months after the fiscal year began. Not even Congress knew what was in it. I said in January that the next time Congress pulled such a stunt -- well, never again.

I'm happy to report that today, October 1st, marks the beginning of the fiscal year. And at this hour, for the first time in years, all the Government's budgetary work is done. The last of the Government's 13 appropriations bills have been delivered to me, and I have signed them. It was touch and go for a while whether we would actually meet the deadline. The appropriations bill for the District of Columbia provided financing of abortions, long after most other Federal abortion financing has stopped. We said public money should not be used for abortions; many liberals said it should be. We won.

Defense appropriations bill was also a close call. As you know, many liberals are opposed to our Strategic Defense Initiative. Why they would want to deny America a defense against nuclear missiles, a defense that the Soviets have been candid enough to say they're building for themselves -- why the liberals would want to do that, I don't know. They had, through various devices, restricted how we spent money on SDI research and development. These restrictions could have crippled critical parts of the program. But early this week, we got the restrictions removed from all bills, and research will go forward to find a way to end the nightmare of nuclear terror.

I hope the last 24 hours prove historic and mark the end of the ``Perils of Pauline'' budget games Congress played for so long. Another recent historic accomplishment is passage of a bill implementing the U.S.-Canada Free Trade Agreement. When similar legislation is enacted in Canada, North America will be on its way to becoming the world's largest open market. Thanks in part to our successful policy, begun the day George Bush and I took office, of opening markets around the world to American goods, America is today in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. Canada is also growing strongly. Opening our mutual border to uninhibited commerce will help that unprecedented expansion continue into the next decade and the next century.

I've often said that genuine welfare reform must be geared to making people independent of welfare; and that means, among other things, that those who receive welfare must be required to work. Too many liberals have fought this idea every step of the way. But yesterday we prevailed, and the welfare reform legislation that will arrive on my desk shortly includes a work requirement.

Even as we can take pride in these great victories, a couple of other legislative battles continue to rage over the textile bill -- which I vetoed this week -- and the drug bill. On the textile bill, the problem is that the bill is protectionist and would draw foreign retaliation against American products.

Liberals in Congress oppose the death penalty and other necessary improvements in the law and plan to kill the bill in the Senate. They've also recently cut funding for the Federal agencies that enforce our drug laws.

And our law enforcement officers should have all the tools they need to do their job. I urge the Senate to follow the House's lead and give America a strong drug bill. I urge Congress to act swiftly this week to restore full funding to drug law enforcement. With your help, in the end, what is best for the Nation will win out. It has in many ways in the past few days. Let's hope Congress will do what's right on the textile and the drug bills.

The message of Mohandas Gandhi, Indian disciple of nonviolent resistance, was that no society based on the denial of basic liberties can endure. He died 4 decades ago -- but before his death and after, and across the oceans and continents, he gave enduring witness to all who seek, often in desperate and unequal contests, to secure the inherent rights that belong to every human being without exception. Today freedom and the desire for human rights and democracy are on the march everywhere, and Gandhi's example and inspiration offer us reason to observe a day of recognition for him.

The force at Gandhi's disposal was that of nonviolent persuasion. He understood the ideas of many of America's thinkers, such as Emerson and Thoreau. He demonstrated the power of those ideas and created a legacy that was to offer courage and hope to America's civil rights movement and many other Americans from that day to this.

Though today's United States differs in countless respects from the India of the 1930's and 1940's, nevertheless we continue to feel a kinship for many of the ideas Mohandas Gandhi represented, such as the reconciliation he championed in the search for freedom and justice. May our observance of this day in his honor be suffused with a like and lasting spirit.

I feel compelled to add that these bills are by no means perfect. Congress did not fully fund my budget request for drug enforcement activities. I urge the Senate to return to this issue and to give our law enforcement agencies the support they need. Our campaign for a drug-free America is simply too important for Congress not to act before adjournment. Similarly, the reforms enacted for the Legal Services Corporation are inadequate, and questions exist about whether they are structured so that they can be achieved. I am sorry to say that other provisions are inconsistent with the Constitution, including provisions purporting to allow a single House of Congress or a congressional committee to change the law, provisions that would undermine the separation of powers, and provisions that would compromise my authority in the conduct of foreign affairs and the defense of the Nation. Finally, the nonlethal funding of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance is minimal and does not respond adequately to the need to protect and sustain the resistance.

Nevertheless, simply getting timely congressional action is a great achievement. So, in conclusion, let me express again my thanks and that of the Nation to the Members of both Houses for their conscientiousness in making this historic break with the recent past.

Thank you, Father Healy, Father Freeze, and Jeane Kirkpatrick, and thank you all very much. It is indeed a great privilege in these, the closing days of my service in Washington, to receive an honor such as this and a welcome such as the one that you've just given me.

It puts me in mind of a story about a remarkable man -- a classic scholar, a scientist, a humanitarian -- who once received an honorary degree from a great institution of higher learning. And the fellow introducing him said, ``We are about to hear from a great man, a noble man, a man of courage, a man of honor, yes, a man to whom the entire world owes a debt of gratitude.'' And the man rose from his chair and took the podium, as I just did, and the crowd cheered.

Well, unlike him -- [laughter] -- the greeting you've just given me really does make me feel modest and humble, and so does the degree you've bestowed upon me today. It certainly would have pleased my blessed mother. She always wanted me to be a doctor. [Laughter] But it also means a great deal to me.

We're celebrating the bicentennial of Georgetown University. I have a great affection for Georgetown. After all, it's one of the few things in this country that are older than I am. [Laughter] In the year that Georgetown first came to be, the political system designed by our Constitution was inaugurated as well, and our first President was chosen. Georgetown is the oldest Catholic university in this country. And the political system of the United States has been the world's most stable over the course of the past two centuries. But only in the eyes of men are they old. In the eyes of God, these past two centuries have been but the briefest moment in the onrush of time whose meaning is truly known to Him alone. I would hope that He would be pleased with America and Georgetown, and would view both with the special fondness and, perhaps, the occasional exasperation that any precocious child invokes in his father.

Well, yesterday we commemorated a dark day in the course of our century: the 50th anniversary of the signing of the Munich pact. On this day 50 years ago, Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain returned to Britain and proclaimed that he had brought ``peace in our time.'' And 11 months later, Nazi Germany invaded Poland, hurling that nation into a nightmare from which it has yet to awake and throwing the world into war. And yet, just at the very moments that the worst seemed destined to defeat the best, the best pulled something out of themselves and were not consumed. Three barbaric governments were eliminated, and Germany, Italy, and Japan became inseparable allies to those whom they had fought only a few years before.

And though millions and millions still live under the yoke of communism, they have proved that the human spirit cannot be consumed either. There have been men and women who make us gasp with wonder at the greatness thrust upon them when oppression proved too much to tolerate. I think of the sight of Natan Shcharanskiy still in the dominion of his KGB captors, zigzagging his way across the tarmac after they ordered him to walk a straight line from the plane that had carried him to freedom. It was one of those moments when laughter and tears commingle, and one does not know when the first leaves off and the second begins. It was a vision of the purest freedom known to man, the freedom of a man whose cause is just and whose faith is his guiding light.

At its full flowering, freedom is the first principle of society; this society, Western society. Indeed, from Abraham to Plato, Aristotle to Aquinas, freedom is the animating principle of Western civilization. Freedom comes in many guises: in the noble words of the Declaration of Independence and in the noble souls of people like Shcharanskiy. And yet freedom cannot exist alone. And that's why the theme for your bicentennial is so very apt: learning, faith, and freedom. Each reinforces the others, each makes the others possible. For what are they without each other?

Learning is a good thing, but unless it's tempered by faith and a love of freedom, it can be very dangerous indeed. The names of many intellectuals are recorded on the rolls of infamy, from Robespierre to Lenin to Ho Chi Minh to Pol Pot. We must never forget that wisdom is impossible without learning, but learning does not -- not by the longest measure -- bring wisdom. It can also bring evil. What will faith without a respect for learning and an understanding of freedom bring? We've seen the tragedy of untempered faith in the hellish deaths of 14-year-old boys -- small hands still wrapped around machineguns, on the front lines in Iran.

And what will be wrought by freedom unaccompanied by learning and faith? -- the license of Weimar Germany and the decadence of imperial Rome; human behavior untempered by a sense of moral, spiritual, or intellectual limits -- the behavior G.K. Chesterton described as the ``morbid weakness of always sacrificing the normal to the abnormal.'' And when freedom is mangled in this way, what George Orwell would have called unfreedom soon follows.

So, we like to believe, and we pray it will always be so, that America is different, that America is what she is because she is guided by all three: learning, faith, and freedom. Our love of knowledge has made this nation the intellectual and technological center of the world.

Americans know the truth of those words. We still believe in our Creator. We still believe in knowledge. We still believe in freedom. We're committed to providing the world with the bounties we enjoy, and we're sickened by those societies that do dishonor to humankind by denying human beings their birthright. We grieve for the millions who have perished even in this decade because their freedoms were denied, and we must not dishonor them by allowing those who follow us on this Earth to say those millions died for nothing, that we lived in an age of barbarism.

No, ladies and gentlemen, I believe that if we hold fast and true to our principles our time will come to be known as the age of freedom. There are signs -- and they're only signs -- that suggest the rulers who enslave and victimize the people of the Earth are on the ideological defensive. Their claims for the superiority of failed and terrible philosophies are sounding ever more hollow. The societies they designed to be utopias have not, to put it mildly, turned out as planned. To save themselves, those rulers are beginning to cast their eyes toward the democratic societies they used to revile. There are signs, only signs, that these rulers are beginning to understand the secret to our prosperity: We prosper economically only because people are free, free not only to speak and read and think but also to create and build and barter and sell.

Now, we're fast approaching a turning point in the history of this age. It'll determine whether history will deem our time the age of freedom or the age of barbarism. We have been steadfast and unapologetic about our defense of our beliefs and our defense of our societies. We learned the lesson of Munich. When we were told that the time had come to accept Soviet nuclear superiority in Europe, we said we would never accept it; when we were told that the time had come to accept the Soviet dominion over Afghanistan, we said we would never accept it; and when we were told that we had no chance to dislodge Soviet proxies in Angola and Nicaragua, we said we would never accept it.

And you all know what has happened. In the last 8 years, not an inch of ground has fallen to communism. Indeed, we liberated the island of Grenada from the ``mere anarchy'' it had fallen into under Communist rule, and set it on the road to democracy. And we helped save a country from communism and watched it flower into a democracy in the midst of a civil war: the Nation of El Salvador. Yes, at every point on the map that the Soviets have applied pressure, we've done all we can to apply pressure against them. And now we're seeing a sight many believed they would never see in our lifetime: the receding of the tide of totalitarianism.

I'm the same man I was when I came to Washington. I believe the same things I believed when I came to Washington. And I think those beliefs have been vindicated by the success of the policies to which we held fast. But now -- just at the moment when we're required by history to hold the line, to hold true to our principles, and to apply the lessons of our learning, our faith, and our freedom -- some of our most distinguished and thoughtful people have taken a look at the world today and determined that America is in decline.

Orwell once said that some ideas were so foolish only intellectuals could believe them. [Laughter] Well, this is perhaps the most foolish idea of the present day. We live in the most prosperous, the freest society the world has ever known; and yet they say we're in decline. We've had almost 6 years of uninterrupted economic recovery, and yet they say we're in decline.

I was given the honor of manning the Nation's helm these past 8 years, so I think I speak with some authority when I tell you, ladies and gentlemen, that the United States of America is not in decline. No, America is still young, still full of promise, and ready to fulfill that promise. She has not reached her apex. It's sad to say, but the false prophets of decline have needlessly lost faith at a moment when they should be talking faith. They should be taking faith in the ideas that have led us here: faith in the determination of men to be free and faith in the destiny our Maker has written for us. And, yes, ladies and gentlemen, with all my heart I believe that this is the age of freedom.

I want to thank you all for what you've given me. I want to thank Georgetown University for what she's given all of you. And all I want to say to close is, God bless you all, and may God bless America.

The President. Well, it's a pleasure to greet such an impressive group of U.S. and Soviet young people. I hope those of you from Moscow are enjoying your visit to the United States and that you are finding it an exciting as well as an educational experience. I had only 5 days in Moscow this summer, but my visit to your university was a highlight I'll always remember.

And it's great to see those of you here from Yale. I also had an opportunity a few years back, to visit your campus as a Chubb fellow. It's a warm memory, particularly when contrasted with some of my visits to other campuses back in the 1960's, which were, shall we say, even warmer. [Laughter] But that's all history, and we don't want to give our Soviet friends the wrong impression.

And so, I'm delighted this exchange could be taking place between two such important centers of learning in the world. Believe me, having Yale and Moscow State University students here today fulfills a longstanding goal of this administration and a personal wish of mine. Some of you may remember what I said to the Nation before I left for that first summit with General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva: that if Soviet youth could attend American schools and universities they could learn firsthand the spirit of freedom that rules our land and understand fully that we do not wish the people of the Soviet Union any harm.

And if American youth could make similar visits, they would gain firsthand knowledge of life in the U.S.S.R. and, most important, a better realization that we're all God's children and, all of us, brothers and sisters in peace.

Everything that's happened since then convinces me we were right about this. In the 3 years since Geneva, where we concluded a new exchange agreement, we've had an explosion of people-to-people contacts.

Less than 2 weeks ago, more than 200 Americans from all walks of life spent 5 days mingling and interacting with Soviet citizens in Tbilisi. Youth exchanges have blossomed more than any others. The university pairing program, from which your project was the model, now includes some 20 pairs of universities. And last week in Moscow, we reached an agreement to begin a high school pairing project that will enable even younger Soviets and Americans to visit and experience each others' countries.

Perhaps some of you who heard me speak at Moscow State University on May 31st may recall what I said then: that as important as these people-to-people exchanges are, they still require official interference or coordination. Nothing would please me more than to see official sanctions become unnecessary, to see travel between East and West become so routine that Soviet university students could take a month off in the summer, put packs on their backs, and like so many American students do, travel from country to country in Europe or North America with only a passport check in between. Today this is a dream, but it's not an impossible dream. It's a dream for your generation to seize upon and transform into reality.

Well, in any case, it's wonderful to see all of you here today. And I can look at you, and I can't tell which are which. Last week at the United Nations I noted the strides that have been made by that organization in addressing such concerns as human rights and regional conflicts. And I think exchanges such as this can assist dramatically in that same process, and I want all of you to know how much we're pulling for the success of this program.

And by the way, I've heard that Mark Twain is a very popular writer in the Soviet Union. And I am reminded he once said, ``It is better to be a young June bug than an old bird of paradise.'' Well, you young June bugs are getting together, and frankly, some of us older birds think that's just fine. So, welcome to the White House, God bless all of you. And now I understand that you have chosen two, Dimitri and Alex, to say a few words.

Ptchelintsev. Mr. President, we have brought with us our best recollections about your recent visit to Moscow and about our experience of listening to you personally when you spoke before our students in the university. And we are very glad to observe the improvement in relations between our countries, and on our part, we pledge to do our best to maintain this positive process in our relations. Thank you, Mr. President.

The President. All right. Well, thank you. And again, I must leave and go back to work. But I just want to tell all of you here -- I've said repeatedly, and you can all be missionaries with regard to the experience that you've all had among your colleagues and the other young people in each of our countries -- and that is, I've said if all the young people of the world could get to know each other, there'd never be another war. So, carry on, and God bless all of you. Thank you.

Disabled people with jobs contribute to prosperity, take a more active part in their communities, and lead more satisfying lives; and their employers gain productive employees. Since the end of World War II, America has celebrated National Employ the Handicapped Week in recognition of the many achievements of workers with disabilities and of those who employ them. During this week we also reaffirm our desire and determination to continue fostering employment opportunities for Americans who have disabilities.

Each year we remove more barriers that have prevented people with disabilities from taking jobs. New technology, job training and placement programs, an increasingly accessible working environment, and greater public understanding all contribute to disabled people's competitiveness in the job market.

More remains to be done, though, as we seek to ensure enhanced employment opportunities for the disabled. Only one-third of working-age Americans with disabilities are employed, so we must keep on opening up more ways for them to gain job skills and overcome job discrimination and transportation, communication, and physical barriers to employment. We are all enriched immeasurably when everyone who wants to work can and does find employment and every citizen is free to follow the path to full and equal participation in the life of our communities and country.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

National Job Skills Week, 1988, every American can reflect on the good news that our economy is far along in its sixth year of uninterrupted growth, employment is at an all-time high, and the average unemployment rate this year is the lowest in 14 years. Our economy, unlike that of many of our international competitors, is creating several million new jobs each year and helping meet the challenges of greater economic competition and rapid technological change.

Our celebration of a week in recognition of all who foster, teach, and learn job skills should include awareness that jobs now being created demand capabilities and higher levels of literacy. A recent report by the Secretaries of Commerce, Education, and Labor, ``Building a Quality Workforce,'' reminds us of these demands and the concomitant need for improved skills among entry-level workers.

These programs include adult basic education, vocational education, and dropout prevention efforts; the summer youth employment program; an expanded adjustment program for dislocated workers; and training assistance through a $1.8 billion Job Training Partnership Act block grant. The JTPA has been particularly effective in reintegrating citizens into the work force, by stressing private sector involvement and concentrating on skills actually needed in localities across our land. The new Economic Dislocation and Worker Adjustment Assistance Program will build upon JTPA to provide Federal grants to States, offering rapid response to dislocation and a comprehensive approach to education and employment assistance for workers affected by plant closings or large layoffs.

Let us observe National Job Skills Week, 1988, with greater understanding of the skills, needs, and devotion of America's workers and with continued appreciation and support for private and public job training efforts in their behalf.

I hope that welcome was for Christopher Columbus. [Laughter] Well, Secretary Carlucci, Secretary Verity, and distinguished international guests: We are here today for the signing of the Columbus Day proclamation. It's on this day we revisit the enduring lessons of his courage and leadership. Columbus, of course, has always held a proud place in our history not only for his voyage of exploration but for the spirit that he exemplified. He was a dreamer, a man of vision and courage, a man filled with hope for the future and with the determination to cast off for the unknown and sail into uncharted seas for the joy of finding whatever was there. Put it all together and you might say that Columbus was the inventor of the American dream.

Of course, we recognize others besides Columbus today. For just as Columbus, a son of Italy, inaugurated the age of European exploration in this hemisphere, so too, have millions of Americans of Italian descent contributed to the building of this nation of aspirations on this continent of hope. Over the years, millions have left that country for these shores, often carrying scarcely more than the prayers in their hearts and the determination in their souls. And as they've come, they have brought with them the richness of the heritage of their homeland, and given its richness and strength to our land.

Columbus Day is an American holiday, a day to celebrate not only an intrepid searcher but the dreams and opportunities that brought so many here after him and all that they and all immigrants have given to this land.

In the next few years Columbus' voyage will take on a heightened significance. The year 1992 will mark the 500th anniversary of his sailing. It is called the quincentenary, and it may take another 500 years before I can say that easily. [Laughter] But it will be a time when Americans from all backgrounds look back on all that that voyage has meant to mankind over the past half millennium. We're already getting ready for the big celebration. Three years ago, I appointed a commission, the Christopher Columbus Quincen -- [laughter] -- Quincentenary Jubilee Commission, to recommend ways for the Nation to mark this milestone. The Commission has submitted its report, which I have sent to Congress. Recommendations include educational programs to enhance the knowledge of history, geography, foreign languages, and international affairs among our young people. The Commission will be raising money from the private sector in order to plan and coordinate projects for the anniversary.

Now, before I sign the proclamation, with all the celebrations we've seen having over the -- or been having over the last decade or so -- the Revolution, the Constitution, now Columbus' voyage, I can't help being reminded of an old story. That's what happens when you reach my age.

Christopher Columbus, whose voyage to the Americas in 1492 inaugurated communication between worlds old and new. Today, nearly 500 years after his epochal discoveries, Columbus remains for us a giant of exploration and of the human spirit -- a man whose faith, vision, courage, and perseverance have won him an imperishable place in the history of America and the world.

Today, our homage to Christopher Columbus includes recognition of the accomplishments of the many Italians who have followed him to America and of the achievements of their descendants. Columbus remains an inspiration for them and for all Americans, and a source of comity between the peoples of Italy and the United States.

The same is true for Americans of Spanish descent. Support by the Spanish monarchs Ferdinand and Isabella made the discoveries of Columbus possible and led to Spain's later cultural and economic contributions to the New World and the development of the heritage we share with our Spanish-speaking neighbors throughout the Western Hemisphere.

As we approach the 500th anniversary of the first voyage of Columbus to the New World in 1492, observances in his honor are growing in number and significance. The Christopher Columbus Quincentenary Jubilee Commission, a group of Americans assisted by representatives from Spain, Italy, and the Bahamas, has made recommendations for our Nation's celebration of the Quincentenary.

October 10, 1988, as Columbus Day. I invite the people of this Nation to observe that day with appropriate ceremonies in honor of this great explorer. I also direct that the flag of the United States be displayed on all public buildings on the appointed day in honor of Christopher Columbus.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

All over the world, America is known as a ``land of liberty.'' For the settlers who first came to America by ship in the 17th century, this new land promised a New World, and a new chance to make possible the oldest of dreams -- the dream of personal liberty. The early settlers and explorers found an abundance of land -- virgin forests, untouched meadows, bountiful streams, and sweet-smelling air -- that vastly exceeded anything the kings of the old world could have ever imagined. In his first inaugural address, Thomas Jefferson spoke of a country with land sufficient to ``the thousand thousandth generation.'' There was so much land in America that there was no way to restrict it to a privileged few. Instead of locking it up for the exclusive use of royalty, the Founding Fathers made possible the widespread ownership of the lands west of the original colonies by anyone brave enough to take the risk, to grasp the main chance, and to hope for a better tomorrow.

The settlement of this great and generous land and the development of its resources created a diverse and expansive American republic of hope, opportunity, experimentation, mobility, and personal freedom. Americans created so much wealth, and shared it so widely, that eventually ordinary men and women could afford to travel West just for pleasure. Americans' fascination with the West, and advances in transportation, education, and science, contributed to a successful popular movement to restore and beautify cities with public parks, arboreta and gardens, and to preserve other places of natural beauty or curiosity. The Federal government began to set aside wondrous places ``for the benefit and enjoyment of the people,'' such as Yellowstone in 1872, when the Congress established it as the first national park. Today the National Park Service manages 341 units on 76 million acres preserved as parks, monuments, historic, cultural, and recreation sites. A philosophy of conservation and wise use was championed by Theodore Roosevelt, who signed legislation in 1905 that created the Forest Service and brought about the national forest system that today includes 191 million acres of national forests and grasslands, managed under multiple-use principles.

The first unit of the modern National Wildlife Refuge System dates back to President Roosevelt's designation in 1903 of Florida's three-acre Pelican Island as a refuge for colonial nesting birds. Popular interest in the conservation of native birds at that time led to the establishment of independent Audubon societies in many States, and a national association was formed in 1905. By 1910, most States had an agency protecting wildlife and fisheries. The Migratory Bird Act of 1918 authorized international agreements and Federal management for migrating waterfowl and other birds. Today the Fish and Wildlife Service manages 443 refuges on nearly 90 million acres, and administers the Endangered Species Act of 1973, that further protects native animal and plant species whose survival is threatened or endangered. Private organizations dedicated to the restoration of viable populations of such species, to the conservancy of rare habitats, or to the protection of wetlands that are critical to waterfowl have continued to enlarge their contribution to the preservation of natural systems. In recent years, the idea of protection of natural habitat has also been extended to marine environments through the establishment of marine sanctuaries.

Earlier in our Nation's history, the cause of liberty was well served by the government making a rapid and flexible divestiture of its land, out of which our people created a prosperous and generous nation of communities. The preservation of parks, wilderness, and wildlife has also aided liberty by keeping alive the 19th century sense of adventure and awe with which our forefathers greeted the American West. Many laws protecting environmental quality have promoted liberty by securing property against the destructive trespass of pollution. In our own time, the nearly universal appreciation of these preserved landscapes, restored waters, and cleaner air through outdoor recreation is a modern expression of our freedom and leisure to enjoy the wonderful life that generations past have built for us.

Administration has understood the necessary relationship between freedom and opportunity, between opportunity and growth, between growth and progress, including progress in restoring and maintaining the quality of the human environment. The same spirit of creativity and innovation that has created 17 million jobs has also benefited the land itself, making America the beautiful more beautiful still.

The accompanying report of the Council on Environmental Quality, which I am pleased to transmit today, provides an accounting of the natural systems and resources that Americans have accorded special protection by government agencies and by private voluntary associations active in States and communities all over this country. No other nation in the world has done more to preserve and improve its natural environment. We are a people who take pride in America, and in the environmental quality of the communities we helped to build, and who will continue to build our future as we did our past, in freedom.

Shortly before the August 24th talks, I sent a message to the Secretary General commending his persistent and patient engagement over many years in the effort to assist the parties to achieve peace. I also transmitted oral messages to both leaders with my best wishes for their attempt to reach a lasting, mutually acceptable solution of the Cyprus problem. As I noted in the letter to the Secretary General, the United States will continue to support strongly the effort to achieve a settlement of this tragic conflict.

August 1, I met with President Vassiliou in Washington and discussed our mutual hopes for resolution of the Cyprus problem as well as the excellent state of our bilateral relations. I reiterated my strong confidence in the U.N. Secretary General and was pleased to hear him echo that thought and to express his sensitivity to the needs and concerns of the Turkish Cypriot community. In the course of his visit, he also met with the Vice President, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of Commerce, the U.S. Trade Representative, and other high-ranking officials, private individuals, and groups.

We have continued frequent consultations with the two parties, the U.N., and other interested countries and individuals during the past 2 months. In August, the U.N. Secretary General's Special Representative for Cyprus, Oscar Camilion, visited Washington and met with Assistant Secretary of State Ridgway, Assistant Secretary of State Williamson, and the Special Cyprus Coordinator. Special Cyprus Coordinator Wilkinson also visited Cyprus in mid-July and met with the leaders of both sides and numerous other interlocutors. In all of these meetings, we reiterated our strong commitment to assisting in the search for a peaceful settlement to the Cyprus problem.

The President. But now, I don't have to tell anyone here that every family in America has a stake in what all of you on this board -- what you do. You're the command team for our fight against drugs. And this is Dick Thornburgh's first meeting, so, Dick, welcome aboard. You have my full confidence. And with Doc Bowen at your side and the other members of this board, the fight against drugs couldn't be in better hands.

I expect this board to redouble its commitment to the vital work of achieving a drug free America. And this is another in which I want a sprint to the finish line. No letting up; drive as hard as you can. This administration has no more solemn commitment than the one it has made to families across our land to fight drugs.

I wish I could say the same for Congress. But when it comes to fighting drugs, Congress looks more and more like all talk and no action. They've cut funding for the major agencies that enforce our drug laws, and liberals in the Senate are trying to kill the House-passed drug bill. And that bill provides a Federal death penalty for drug-related killings, a modification of the exclusionary rule so that relevant evidence obtained in good faith can be used in court, and other needed changes in the law. It's time for Congress to end its dependency on the liberal agenda and to give our law enforcement officers the tools they need. And it's time for the Senate to pass a strong drug bill.

Reagan today informed Jamaican Prime Minister Edward Seaga that the United States would provide a long-term package of disaster assistance relief totaling $125 million to help with the aftermath of Hurricane Gilbert. The U.S. Government immediately provided emergency equipment and supplies to Jamaica after the hurricane hit on September 12 - 14, causing more than 25 deaths and millions of dollars in property damage.

Minister Seaga thanked the United States for its assistance. He said the hurricane was the greatest natural disaster to ever hit Jamaica. Prime Minister Seaga summarized the reconstruction program and showed the President pictures of destruction on the island. One picture showed an entire housing complex with no roofs. Another showed a banana and poultry farm completely wiped out.

Michel. Mr. President, forgive me for my brashness, but this would appear to be maybe the last leadership meeting that we're going to have during your Presidency here, at least to discuss legislative agenda. And as one of those who have been here now for 8 years, for the entire period of time, around this table, I just have to tell you what a rewarding experience it's been for those of us who have been privileged to sit around this table, have you give us our charge each week or every other week or so, and then go out there and do the best we can.

Bob [Dole] can speak from a little bit different perspective when they were the majority, but we in the House have always been in the minority. Let me tell you, Mr. President, the only leverage we have had in the House of Representatives in the last 8 years has been your leadership and what you've been able to do by supporting that valiant minority that we have in the House of Representatives.

I just want to express my personal appreciation and thanks to you for what you've done by way of giving us the inspiration and esprit de corps to do the best we could, even in the minority role. And of course, Bob can speak for himself from the Senate vantage point. But that's our view from the House. We thank you, Mr.

Dole. And I just say, Mr. President, America's a better place because you've been here. And we're all proud to have been part of it, and we'd go the extra mile for you anytime, just as you've done for our country.

But before you do, I want to urge the Senate to pass a responsible drug bill. The House passed a good bill 12 days ago to strengthen our fight against drugs, but it's been sitting on the Senate calendar for days. And I urge the Senate to pass the drug bill so that it can be quickly conferenced and enacted, and then I'll wish the 100th Congress a very hardy adieu.

It's an honor to be a part of the Minority Enterprise Development Week and to recognize your contributions to this nation. This year's theme, ``Business to Business: Strategies for the Future,'' reminds us that the national as well as the global marketplace offer great growth potential to all businesses, but especially to minority enterprises.

You all know that I used to work in Hollywood. That's some place some people call the Dream Factory. Well, the days of the Hollywood dream factory are long over, but this nation is full of dream factories; they're your businesses. For you take your dreams and make something tangible out of them. You employ people to make the things you sell, and that fulfills their dreams; and you sell the things they make to others and fulfill their dreams.

Now, we know that there are Americans, unfortunate Americans, who've lost the capacity to dream. These souls may live in neighborhoods where they must fear to walk. Their children go to schools where the teachers fear the students, and when they walk down the hallways of their apartment buildings, they hear the crunching of crack vials beneath their feet. Well, like all Americans, they hope for a better life. They hope for a better life for their children, but somehow it seems that better life never comes. And then the hopes fade and the dreams die. And when that happens, disappointment turns into despair, and despair becomes a self-fulfilling prophecy.

And that's where you minority business leaders come in. For you prove to those who are less fortunate, who need examples of success if they're to hope for better, that, yes, there is hope and; yes, there's a chance; and, yes, this is a nation of bounties. You prove that hard work and determination overcome all obstacles and that despair is unnecessary. What is necessary is self-esteem and self-confidence. You can teach them the ability to see that the future is contained within the present, that work itself is its own reward, and that with work comes dignity and, eventually, the fulfillment of your dreams.

President today announced his intention to appoint Edward E. Allison to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Pennsylvania Avenue Development Corporation for the remainder of the term expiring October 26, 1990.

I am pleased that the House of Representatives sustained my veto of the protectionist textiles bill. With the defeat of this protectionist legislation, we remain committed to expanding the business, investment, and consumer opportunities for Americans. The decision of the House today continues the protrade progress we have made in this Congress with the Omnibus Trade and Competitiveness Act and the U.S.-Canada Free-Trade Agreement Implementation Act. By sustaining the veto, the House has once again reaffirmed America's commitment to the free market and free international trade.

I have a news flash for you. That got you, didn't it? Well, at some time, not more than an hour ago, the Congress started voting on a measure that was of great interest to me. As you know, I vetoed what I thought was a terribly protectionist measure, the textile bill. The vote in the attempt to override was 272 to 152, which means my veto was sustained.

And from what I've been told by Mike Castle and Terry Branstad, many of you in this room have been instrumental in making it possible to get the good word out to the people of all our 50 States. Believe me, everything you've done through the Republican Governors Association has been much appreciated -- in the past, yes, but especially this year. Your generosity has made possible so much good work for the party and our all-important statewide races.

And you know, whenever I come to one of these fundraisers, I think of the couple that never once during the long years of childrearing took a vacation. But then in retirement, they wanted to take a trip to Florida, and they asked their sons for some money. And the first son was a lawyer, and he said, ``No, I can't do it. I'm just fitting out a new law office and sending my son to an expensive camp.'' So, they asked their second son, a doctor.

Well, the fact you're here tonight means some of you have anything in common -- none of you I should say -- [laughter] -- have anything in common with those ungrateful sons. But, ladies and gentlemen, I've been thinking your continued generosity is going to make a difference. And I'm starting to think perhaps a bigger difference than any of us could have realized. As I said, I've been out on the campaign trail lately, and I'm just starting to wonder if this year there isn't something in the air.

Something has been happening. You know, when this race began, we knew that our record gave us a big advantage on the key issues of peace and prosperity that are normally decisive in a national campaign. We've also seen the emergence of a whole range of social issues from the Pledge of Allegiance to school prayer, to the radical agenda of some far-left legal groups. And when you compare our positions with those of the other fellas, you begin to see a dramatic difference not just on these individual issues but on basic values and fundamental perspectives.

Well, you and I are aware of these very clear distinctions. The fact of the matter is that while someone decided to put the wishes of the Massachusetts Legislature out on furlough and refused to sign a certain bill, Governor Jim Thompson -- who has plenty of legal experience, by the way -- decided he could sign the Pledge of Allegiance bill sent to him by the Illinois Legislature. And it's incidents like that that are making it easier for the American people to perceive the fundamental difference between the two sides.

At first, of course, there was the difference on taxes and spending; a difference that we drove home in the 1984 campaign. We were against big government and more regulation and higher taxes, and the liberals in the other party couldn't stop talking about how good a tax increase and more government would be for us.

I think the American people are beginning to see that this consistent difference in how the two sides approach government springs from deeper convictions about the nature of society and the rights of the individual. So, too, on the social issues, we believe in certain basic values that give a sense of order to our free society. And it's these values the average American also readily identifies with. The public agrees with us when we say we are for the death penalty, school prayer, tough law enforcement, and against liberal organizations like the ACLU that always seem to be searching for technicalities to exonerate criminals.

Now, remember we did see signs of this happening back in 1984, when Republicans made unexpected gains in States like Texas and North Carolina. And I'm just thinking that some of this is going on out there in the heartland and that this campaign may be starting to break out as a referendum on liberalism itself, a referendum on the direction in which the liberals have taken the once-proud Democratic Party.

Now, of course, some of you know how tough it is to get people to give up old loyalties. There's plenty of disenchantment out there with that other party, but we have to realize that people are still a little cautious about our party.

In fact, when I was out in Missouri just a few weeks back, I told some students down in Cape Girardeau -- and they seemed to enjoy the story -- about the fellow who was running for office as a Republican in a heavily Democratic State. He stopped by a farm to do some campaigning. And when the farmer heard he was a Republican, his jaw dropped, and he said, ``You wait right here while I get Ma. She's never seen a Republican.'' [Laughter] So, he got Ma. And while they were gone, the candidate looked around for a podium from which to give his speech.

They're beginning to realize that under the leadership of the liberals the once-proud Democratic Party, a party of hope and affirmation, has become a party of negativism, a party whose leadership has changed it from the party of ``yes'' to the party of ``no'' -- ``no'' to the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto, ``no'' to holding down taxes and spending, ``no'' to the death penalty and the school prayer amendment, ``no'' to adequate defense spending and a Strategic Defense Initiative.

American people are beginning to understand that in all these ways the liberal leadership has been saying ``no'' to rank-and-file Democrats. Now, rank-and-file Democrats are going to say ``no'' to the liberal leadership by saying ``yes'' to George Bush and the Republican Party. Now, let's move in on that. Let's point out that the other party has had enough control of Congress to say ``no'' to the American people on all these issues because of gerrymandering.

But in addition to drawing attention to the liberal bender the opposition party has been on, let's also talk about our own record of success in the States. And here again, we see fundamental differences. Our policy of taking power away from the Federal Government and returning it to State and local authorities has been a smashing success. The recently passed welfare reform bill that drastically overhauls the existing Federal welfare system is true to this principle by relying heavily on State participation and involvement. But federalism is more than just a policy; it's a philosophy of government. People in Washington have a tendency to look out at America and see a sea of distant faces, all of which are a little fuzzy. But when a Governor looks at the people of his or her State, he or she sees them in all their variety, and he or she hears their voices.

State has different characteristics, each has different greatnesses, and each has different problems. And you, the Republican Governors, can see all these things and act to help where help is needed. And when you're successful, you show us all how we can do better to help. I think of Governor Tom Kean's innovative ideas for helping the disadvantaged in his State, which have been models for some of the things we've been trying nationwide. I think of Governor Ed DiPrete's investment in job-training programs to build a more positive work force. I think of Governor John Ashcroft's efforts to improve the education in his State and compel those who provide education to be accountable to parents and school boards. And there are more, many more, but time prevents my listing them all here.

Federal Government is so large and its mandate so very broad that when programs are instituted, flexibility and ability to adapt to local circumstances are very limited. And that's another way the States have it all over the Federal Government. You're low to the ground, you're flexible, you can change speeds and directions as nimbly as a high-performance sports car when you find out what works. The virtue of innovative programs at the State level is when they work you know it quickly and you can expand them, and when they don't you can rechannel the energies that went into them and look for new solutions.

And there's something we ought to promise them: After the 1990 census, it will be time for the reapportionment of all your States and all the States in the Union. We must go to the voters now. We must tell them that never again must they permit the kind of obscene redistricting plans that we saw in 1981 in places like California, where the map was shattered like a pane of glass and each district was a different shape. We've got to let them know how it was done, why it was done, and why it must never be done again.

I want to thank all of you for what you've done these past 8 years. You've made my job easier. And after November 8th, I know you'll be there to make George's job easier, too. Some of these things that I've talked about here, perhaps you're not aware of just the extent of some of them. This redistricting, this gerrymandering; it's been a case of cramming as many Republicans as they could into as few districts as possible. And the result was that in California we saw where more people in California voted for Republican Congressmen in the last election, but the Democrats elected 60 percent of the candidates because of the way they had compressed us into the fewest possible districts.

Well, that isn't the way reapportionment was supposed to be. So, we've got to get back to where we're in charge. And you know something, I'd be awful proud if when we got back to where we were in charge instead of doing it, now that it was our turn -- the way they've been doing it -- if we would change the system and maybe have a bipartisan citizen's committee -- blue ribbon citizen's committee -- that did the reapportioning instead of the way it's done now, where there's such a conflict of interest on those that are doing it.

Well, that's one thing. This thing -- what the gerrymandering has meant to us -- are you aware that in the 58 years from 1931 through 1988 the Democrats have held the House of Representatives in Washington for 54 of those 58 years? And they've held both Houses of the Congress for 48 of those 58 years. The others being the 6 years that we had a majority in the Senate in this administration. Now, we're back the other way. We couldn't have done the things that we've done or accomplished them if we hadn't had that one House, the Senate. And so, this is just part of what's at stake in this coming election.

I know that I'm keeping you from your dinner, but you've just got to humor me on one more thing. I have a new hobby, and I impose it on people like you. I'm collecting jokes that I find are invented by the people of the Soviet Union. They make them up and tell them between themselves. I only collect the ones I can prove are their stories that they tell. And I brought one home on the last summit there -- from Moscow.

Administration efforts to transfer the development and operation of programs from the Federal Government to Indian tribes. Tribal self-governance allows tribes more freedom to design programs to serve the specific needs of their members.

A provision in section 205 of the Act states that the Secretaries of the Interior and Health and Human Services shall reduce funding to Indian tribes if so directed by a statement from a Member of Congress that accompanies a conference report. Because this provision purports to authorize a process altering the legal duties of Executive branch officials, without participation by both Houses of Congress and the President, it does not conform to the requirements for presentment and bicameralism articulated in the Constitution and enunciated by the Supreme Court in INS v. Chadha, 462 U.S. 919.

Ladies and gentlemen, good morning. We gather here today, as we have been so eloquently told here, for a solemn, profound, saddening, and yet triumphant occasion. It's an occasion that commemorates all we've lost -- the irreplaceable humanity whose monstrous end will ever testify to the hellish depths of human evil. But it's an occasion that commemorates something else as well, it commemorates the seriousness of our intention -- as human beings, as Americans, and, in the case of many here today, as Jews -- to keep the memory of the 6 million, fresh and enduring.

We who did not go their way owe them this. We must make sure their deaths have posthumous meaning. We must make sure that from now until the end of days all humankind stares this evil in the face, that all humankind knows what this evil looks like and how it came to be. And when we truly know it for what it was, then and only then can we be sure that it will never come again.

Some people say evil of this degree is incomprehensible. They say we will never understand it. Some people even say that the word ``evil'' is insufficient to describe the Holocaust, and instead they use terms like mad, crazy, insane. I think they're wrong. What we saw there, at Treblinka and Belsen and Auschwitz and Dachau, was the image of the inferno. That may have been the ultimate purpose of those who made the Holocaust: a grotesque effort to hurl the Earth into the very pit of the serpent. I believe the Holocaust is comprehensible. Indeed, we must comprehend it. We have no choice; the future of mankind depends upon it. And that's what we're here for: to lay the cornerstone for the United States Holocaust Memorial Museum, which will help us understand and make it impossible for us to forget.

Republicans and Democrats and independents who understand that partisanship has no place here. There are Jews who serve on it and Catholics and Protestants, who understand that religious divisions have no place here. It is composed of those who came through the flames of the Holocaust and those who did not, for we've required no rules for membership except an unyielding commitment to our mission -- to keep the memory alive.

To fulfill that mission, the museum will study the history of the Holocaust, provide an invaluable resource for researchers, and bring together in one place the greatest array of information and knowledge on this necessary subject. It will examine the nature and meaning of the continuing curse that is anti-Semitism. I think all of us here are aware of those, even among our own countrymen, who have dedicated themselves to the disgusting task of minimizing or even denying the truth of the Holocaust. This act of intellectual genocide must not go unchallenged, and those who advance these views must be held up to the scorn and wrath of all good and thinking people in this nation and across the world.

And yet just as we must challenge it here at home, so, too, we must challenge anti-Semitism abroad. We know that in certain nations an infamous and fraudulent document called the Protocols of the Elders of Zion is still being distributed and, in some cases, taught in school. This, the most profoundly cynical piece of anti-Semitic filth ever produced, is full of libels toward the Jewish people, particularly the horrifying ``blood libel.'' We must send the message out to all the world: A blood libel against the Jewish people is a blood libel against all humankind, and no decent person will stand for it.

We know that the United Nations, whose peacekeepers were honored only last week for their service to the world, has yet to repeal its infamous resolution equating Zionism and racism. We know where such intellectual infamy can lead. The world has learned that when the truth is turned on its head, holocausts become possible.

And there are the subtler forms of anti-Semitism. There is the anti-Semitism that seeks to deny Jews their independent identity. In these days of glasnost, we hear talk about liberalizing attitudes toward Judaism in the Soviet Union. But it is still true that a Jew must have courage to rise and say with pride: ``Yes, I am a Jew. I wish to study Hebrew, and I wish to emigrate to the homeland of my people.'' Those who speak those words know what follows them: the despair of waiting for permission to do that which is a basic human right -- to go where they will when they choose. There are still tens of thousands -- maybe even hundreds of thousands -- of Soviet Jews who wait to leave the Soviet Union so that they may live free as Jews.

Jewish people were on this Earth at the time of the pyramids. Those structures are still standing, and the Jews are still here. We must make sure that when the tall towers of our greatest cities have crumbled to dust in the turnings of time, the Jewish people will still be on this Earth to cast their blessings and remind all of us that this world and the people who live upon it have a history and, yes, even a destiny.

This week we celebrate one of the worst anniversaries of this century. Last Friday, 50 years ago, the European nations met in Munich and accommodated the expansionist designs of Adolf Hitler. Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain returned to Britain and proclaimed that he had brought ``peace for our time.'' And 11 months later the Nazi tanks rolled into Poland, and the war began.

Even to think about the cost makes sleep impossible. Had the West awakened to the meaning of Hitler, would those dead be with us today? Would there even be a need for this museum? It's a question without an answer. But we must never allow ourselves to have to ask that question again. American troops who liberated the concentration camps saw things no human eyes should ever see. But if we in America remain strong -- if we hold fast and true to the conviction that, yes, there are things worth fighting for, there are things worth dying for, and we will heed the call if we must -- humans will never suffer so nor will others be called upon to save them from such suffering.

I hope you'll forgive me if I say that I believe those who perished in the Holocaust have, after long suffering, attended that banquet. I cannot imagine our Lord would deny their request. We here will inscribe their names in human memory, and pray that God may bless us all.

Highway Safety Act and the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act, both enacted in 1966, initiated a national effort to reduce traffic deaths and injuries and require annual reports on the administration of the Acts. This is the 20th year that these reports have been prepared for your review.

The national outrage against drunk drivers, combined with growing safety belt use and the voluntary cooperation we have received from all sectors of American life, has brought about even more improvements in traffic safety.

The progress we have made is, of course, no consolation to the relatives and friends of those 46,056 people who, despite the safety advances and greater public awareness, lost their lives in 1986. But it is indicative of the positive trend this Administration has established to make our roads safer.

During a time of economic prosperity and lower gas prices, the loss of approximately 126 lives per day on our Nation's highways is still too high. Also, with the increasing motor vehicle travel, we are faced with the threat of an even higher number of traffic fatalities. Therefore, there is a continuing need for effective motor vehicle and highway safety programs.

President today announced his intention to nominate Lance Banning to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the James Madison Memorial Fellowship Foundation for a term of 6 years. This is a new position.

President today announced his intention to designate Franz Martin Oppenheimer to be a member of the Panel of Arbitrators of the International Centre for Settlement of Investment Disputes for a term of 6 years. He would succeed Oscar Schachter.

Heuristics in Los Angeles, CA. He has been president of the European American Institute for Security Research, vice president of the Security Conference on Asia and the Pacific, and a senior fellow at the Hoover Institution at Stanford University. He is also an author of numerous articles and several books.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen of the press, we just wanted to come out here for a few seconds and introduce our friends to you -- newcomers to our country -- the Zieman family and their daughter and son-in-law, who have been living in America. And now the family is reunited. They came out of the Soviet Union and are reunited here in the United States, and we're very happy to have them with us.

The President. I've never been able to explain, Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News], the Iranians and what their strategies are and what they do. But obviously we could not do any negotiating with them unless and until the hostages are released.

United Press International], I saw that, and I was quite upset by it because -- no, back in 1981, I issued a directive that the United States would not permit assassinating anyone in any of the things that we were doing. And that continues to this day.

So, what was the meaning then of that language which says that good faith would not -- that nothing would be done to someone who ended up killing someone in good faith? What was the meaning of that language?

President and Mrs. Reagan watched the debate on television in their living quarters. The President felt Senator Quayle was effective and did an outstanding job. The President discussed the debate last Saturday with Senator Quayle. He was gratified by tonight's outcome. President Reagan called Senator Quayle immediately after the debate to congratulate him on a job well done.

Reagan. Mr. President, it's an honor and a pleasure to welcome you on your first official visit to the United States. You and all the people of Mali are good friends of the United States. In addition to deeply appreciating your support on international issues, we admire Mali as a country where people of different ethnic and religious backgrounds respect each other and live together in peace.

Organization of African Unity, of which you were recently elected chairman. And we ask you to accept our congratulations on your election to this important post. Earlier this year, the OAU celebrated its 25th anniversary. During its history, the OAU has played a vital role in resolving regional conflicts in Africa and has helped African countries to work together to solve problems and promote economic development.

Under your leadership, Mr. President, I'm confident the OAU will continue with these crucial activities. You have already demonstrated your interest in helping to promote regional settlements in southern Africa and the western Sahara. We hope the OAU can play an even more active role in solving those regional problems and play a key role in promoting development in Africa by encouraging economic reform and cooperation.

President, I understand there is a Malian proverb that goes: Bolokoni kelen te bele ta -- One finger cannot lift a rock. I think this proverb expresses perfectly the goal and the strength of the Organization of African Unity. Africans must pull together and work together. And we wish you and the OAU great success in working together to achieve common goals during your time as chairman and throughout the OAU's next 25 years.

President, we look forward to talking with you over the next few days, not only about bilateral concerns and African regional issues but about concerns we share in other parts of the world. For Africa, I believe -- which represents nearly one-third of the member nations of the United Nations -- truly has come of age as a participant in the international arena. Let me say again how pleased we are to welcome you to the United States. We wish you an enjoyable and profitable visit. Thank you, and God bless you.

Traore. Mr. President, I should like on behalf of my delegation and my own name to express my very sincere thanks to you for the kind invitation extended to us to visit this great nation, the United States of America.

Our visit meets two concerns; first of all, the concern of making even stronger the friendship and solidarity which have been a trademark of relations between our two nations. May I cite in this connection Vice President Bush's memorable visit in Mali on March 8th and 9th, 1985. It was for our people tangible evidence of the unwavering commitment of the United States to the Republic of Mali.

I now express my honest wish to bring to the American people in my capacity as president of the OAU a message of friendship from the peoples of Africa. Indeed, over and above the worldwide role played by the United States, there are between your nation and the African continent human, cultural, and spiritual relations becoming stronger every day, to the greatest benefit of the American and African peoples.

I know for a fact, Mr. President, that my visit will give us a chance to discuss together the major issues of common interest. And I am convinced, Mr. President, that our discussions will enable us to make progress in the search for a solution to the problems which are of concern to both our sides. Mr. President, I thank you.

One magnificent symbol of the bonds that tie our two great peoples together is the German-American Friendship Garden. This symbol of eternally renewing growth and strength will be dedicated this autumn here in the Capital. In its growth, our own commitments to the well-being of America and Germany shall be cultivated and nurtured.

Unfortunately, for Germans, as well as Americans, a horrendous scar continues to mar the hopes and prospects of a united Germany, free of totalitarian shackles. I'm speaking of course about the cruel and unnatural division of Europe and Germany, which is symbolized by the Berlin Wall -- the wall that stands as a gash dividing those who hope and those who despair, and those who are free to do as they may and those who do only what the state will allow.

About a year and a half ago, I stood at the Brandenburg Gate and called for the removal of this evil wall. And now, once again, I implore those in the East to remove this stain on human decency. The greatest flowering of moral, spiritual, and economic growth ever witnessed by this universe is being experienced by those who are truly liberated and who are truly free. Release those bonds and some day there will be one united and free Germany. And the United States will be even further enriched by the great German people.

Reagan. Mr. President, it's a pleasure to welcome you here this evening. We're honored by your visit to the United States, both as the President of Mali and as the Chairman of the Organization of African Unity. During your visit, we've been discussing issues of concern to Mali, the Organization of African Unity, and the United States. And I'm gratified that you share our concerns about regional stability and economic development in Africa. And we've appreciated your efforts to promote peace and development.

I want you to know that we'll continue to work with you and be as supportive as possible in addressing these areas. But Africans and Americans do not just share a concern for various international problems. We share a rich cultural heritage as well. One out of six Americans, Mr. President, trace their ancestry to Africa. And indeed all of us are very proud of that African heritage and are eager to learn more about the African cultures from which they came.

President, I look forward to continuing to share ideas with you. By exchanging ideas and working together with the leaders of a great and ancient continent, I believe we can find solutions with a human face to the problems confronting the world. I salute you as a good friend, a great leader of your people, and as the Chairman of the Organization of African Unity. And so, can we raise our glasses, to President Traore and Madame Traore.

Ambassadors, ladies and gentlemen: May I on this occasion renew my very sincere thanks to you, as well as the thanks of my delegation for the warm welcome and very cordial hospitality that we have been enjoying ever since we arrived in the United States, this great and beautiful land of freedom.

The many agreements for cooperation between our two countries cover all fields of activity, and they fall very clearly within our strategy for development. We seek, first of all, self-sufficiency in food production, control of our water resources, breaking away from the landlocked situation of our country -- both domestic and foreign -- and training our human resources.

I'm happy to salute here the very valuable assistance that your government has been extending to us in securing these objectives. In order to have a better performance for our economy, we have undertaken, together with international financial institutions and friendly nations, a very profound and exhaustive reform which touches upon all sectors of development -- public finances, state-owned enterprises, developments of the rural area, and private sector. Basically, we are seeking to mobilize all energies and all the creative potential of the people -- Mali. The people of Mali, just like the people of the United States, has a very highly developed sense of enterprise.

President, ladies and gentlemen, concerning Africa, our principal concerns remain the total liberation of the continent and the social and economic development. Recent trends in southern Africa allow us to think that it may soon become a reality that Resolution 435 may soon become implemented helping Namibia accede to independence.

The international community must spare no effort and gather all its strength in order to force the governments of South Africa to comply with the requirements of the implementation of this pertinent resolution. Side by side with the fighters of South Africa, the Organization of African Unity will continue to struggle for the taking down of the intolerable system of apartheid. We seek to establish in South Africa a more humane, more just society which has been rid of all forms of segregation.

In the economic area, Mr. President, it is urgent to find a just and lasting solution to the problem of the African debt. Thus, the Organization of African Unity has been calling for the convening of an international conference on that issue. In solving the problem of the African debt, we will have to factor in the issue of raw materials and commodity prices as Africa is a producer because it is only through a just remuneration of their production that the African nations will secure the steady resources necessary to their development and to payment of the debts.

I, in closing, ladies and gentlemen, ask you to raise your glass with me to the health of President Ronald Reagan, to the health of Mrs. Reagan, the strengthening of the friendship between our two nations, and closer bonds of cooperation and solidarity among all people of the world.

But these numbers are just shorthand for the more important fact that 255,000 persons got new jobs in September and 18 million new jobs have been created since the recovery began in 1982. We've talked about the record 70 months of economic expansion, but these figures tell the real story that people can understand. They mean paychecks and school clothes and families that can plan a brighter future. And that's what George Bush and Dan Quayle stand for, and it's what the administration has worked for the last 8 years.

Our economy is on a very sound basis. Inflation remains low and under control. We are growing in a sound and sensible fashion and more of our citizens are going to work every day. You all know the litany of high interest rates, high inflation, and high unemployment when our administration took over. And you know the changes that have been made since then. And there's no truer marker of the total impact of these changes than new jobs and the feeling of confidence that Americans have in our economy, our policies, and our future. End of statement.

We should all be aware that spinal cord injuries paralyze some 12,000 Americans each year, adding to the total of nearly half a million citizens whose lives have undergone this sudden and tragic change. Motor vehicle accidents are the chief cause of these injuries, and young men are the most at risk; but spinal cord injuries happen in many ways, and to anyone at any age. War wounds have taken a large toll. Recreational and sports accidents injure many, and so do mishaps in the home. Paralyzed people meet challenges such as physical limitations, rehabilitation, and drains on financial resources with determination, ingenuity, and a positive outlook. We do well to hold a week in recognition of the needs, capabilities, accomplishments, and courage of paralyzed Americans and of efforts in their behalf.

Understanding of paralysis continues to grow, thanks to biomedical research led by scientists supported by the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke. One major advance, with promising applicability to humans, is the realization that injured nerve cells in animals' spinal cords can regrow and may reassume function. Other developments are continuing.

Investigators are seeking ways to limit post-injury tissue destruction by controlling substances within the body that ironically damage spinal cord tissue as they relieve trauma-induced pain and swelling. Such work has provided new research leads that may one day enable people with injured spinal cords to walk again.

Veterans' Administration has also long been a leader in spinal cord injury clinical and research efforts. The VA operates the largest system of spinal cord injury facilities in the world, serving approximately 20,000 patients each year in 20 centers around our country. The VA also supports some 175 such research projects.

As we continue our national program of basic and clinical research on nervous system trauma, let us take the occasion of National Paralysis Awareness Week, 1988, to resolve to do our share, personally and as communities, to assist, befriend, and learn from paralyzed Americans.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

The President. Before I begin my remarks today, I have a very pleasant announcement to make. This morning the unemployment figures for September came out. And once again, unemployment is down to 5.3 percent. That is close to the lowest that it has been in nearly a decade and a half. And last month, America created 255,000 new jobs. America's economy is a Grand Prix racer, and the way to keep it on track is to give George Bush and Dan Quayle a checkered flag in their race in November.

And now, before I go any further, I have a request I brought with me from my roommate. She wants me to remind you that, please, for your family, for your friends, for your country, but most of all, for yourselves, just say no to drugs and alcohol.

And you know, I can't help wondering: Are any parents here? Raise your hands. Well, I'm sure I speak for your sons and daughters and for the Nation, too, in saying that for all you're doing to make sure that America's next generation is ready to make the most of the magnificent opportunities America's future has to offer -- we all say thank you.

I've also heard that you who are students here care about your community, and that in one of your most popular clubs you visit hospitals and help the sick and those with handicaps, as well as giving of yourselves in many other services to your community. Yes, I've heard that when we talk about that old tradition -- old as our country -- of Americans volunteering to help neighbors, when we talk about -- certain good friend of mine has called a Thousand Points of Light that shine in America's sky, one of the brightest of those lights is the S.O.S. Club of Stevenson High School.

I've heard something else -- about the future -- about your future, about America's future -- and that you're preparing for it. I've heard, for example, that all four high schools have sent student ambassadors to the Soviet Union, that your schools on all levels have outstanding records for academic achievement, and that in the trade programs you were world class champions in the 1988 Skills Olympics.

I'm here today because I believe you're right to care about the future. I believe America's future and your future hold promises bigger than the sky and more vast than the galaxies -- if we have faith and if we're true to the values of family, work, and community that have always been America's guiding stars on the path of history. In the last 8 years we've set our sights once again on these enduring values, and you know the results: more than 18 million new jobs since our expansion began, more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined; an unemployment rate the lowest it's been in 14 years; the greatest flowering of new businesses and new technologies in the history of the world; the longest peacetime economic expansion ever recorded; and more people are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States.

And there's something else, something you don't often read in the papers. Today the highest proportion of our labor force is employed than ever before in the history of our nation. And job for job, the jobs we've created in our expansion pay better than the jobs that existed before our expansion began. How did we do it? By getting government out of the way and letting the American people do their thing.

You know, in my job I visit many schools and factories, farms and communities around our country, and I get to see why our nation is so strong. Again and again I find myself remembering what General George C. Marshall said when he was asked why he was so confident that we would win the Second World War. General Marshall said, ``We have a secret weapon: the best blankety-blank kids in the whole world.'' Well, in our economy, we too have a secret weapon: the best blankety-blank men and women in the whole world.

The growth that our expansion has brought America can be just the beginning. America is entering a new age that will open opportunities for you, opportunities that we in the older generation could not even have dreamed of when we were your age. Here in Michigan, you can see that future in new industries, like the robotics industry, that are springing up; and in old industries, like automobiles, that are coming back strong and getting stronger. That's the future. And you know something -- you, with the education in both academics and the trades that you're getting here, will lead America and the world into this future. The only limits will be your imagination and your courage. And are there any limits to those?

The President. Well, yes, the last 8 years have been great, but I've got a hunch that when you get in the saddle, as someone said in an old movie: Well, we ain't seen nothing yet! But I hope, as you study and work to build America's future and your own, you never forget that prosperity has a purpose. It gives you the opportunity to raise a healthy family in the right way, to reach out to those who need help in your community, to dream, and to make your dreams come true.

Now, those of you who can vote, and your parents and friends, will decide that question. And think of what that means. You hold history in your hands if, as I say, you vote. Earlier this year I had the privilege of doing something I had never thought an American President would be able to do.

I spoke to students in Moscow about the glories of freedom. Think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them ever have the influence on the course of their country's history and world history that each of you can have just by going into the voting booth. It's very disturbing to me that America's young people, who with so many years ahead of them have a bigger stake in the future than anyone else -- our young people, I have to tell you, vote in lower numbers than everyone else. The comedian Will Rogers once said that the people who are elected are no better and no worse than the people who elected them. But they're all better than people who don't vote at all. Well, I know that you're better than that. And so, I want to continue talking about that particular trouble, if I can find my note here and get it uncovered.

Let me, before I go, ask you something. Those of you who are eligible to vote this year -- I'm asking for a commitment now, and if you say yes, I'll take it as a promise: This November, will you show up at the polls and vote?

The President. All right. Now, those of you who aren't old enough to vote -- you can talk to family and friends you know and make sure they cast their ballots. That can be your way of voting -- by getting someone to vote who wasn't so sure that he or she would. So, let me ask you something. And again, I'm asking for a promise, so if you say yes, mean it. Will you make sure that your parents and your friends who can vote will vote? [Applause] All right.

One last thing -- next Tuesday, this coming Tuesday, is the deadline for registering to vote. And I'll bet there are some here who are eligible to vote that haven't yet registered. And you know that if you aren't registered on election day, you can't vote. It's like making the team and then not showing up for the big game. So, let me ask one last thing. Will all of you make sure that any friends who aren't registered get registered by Tuesday? [Applause] Well, that's what I was hoping you'd say. Now, I'm supposed to join some folks in town for lunch. And I bet you're getting hungry, too. So, I'll have to just stop right here. But I just want to tell you, you have inspired me, and this is so wonderful to see all of you out here. From the bottom of my heart, I thank you, and God bless you all. Thank you.

Well, here with us today are five of the people who make Washington tolerable and who keep it from inflicting too much harm on Michigan and the rest of the country: Congressmen Guy Vander Jagt, Bill Broomfield, Carl Pursell, Bill Schuette, and Fred Upton. And let me also mention a few outstanding candidates here with us today: Cal Allgaier and Doug Carl for Congress and Jim Dunn for Senate. They deserve your support.

Well, all that, as they say, is history -- or should I say ancient history, which at my age is a subject that I'm regarded as an expert in. [Laughter] You know, very briefly, I was regarded as an economics expert. Of course, that was my college major. But very briefly, they labeled our program Reaganomics. And then it became clear that the program was working. The funny thing is, they don't call it that anymore. [Laughter] But, in fact, experts agree the United States economy has made history.

One year ago, our economic recovery became the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded -- and it hasn't stopped. This month the expansion enters its unprecedented 71st month. We've created over 18 million jobs, as you were told, and bringing employment to an all-time high. And these are good jobs. More than 90 percent are full-time, and of these, over 85 percent of them pay better than $20,000 a year. So much for that campaign rhetoric on the other side that these are just menial jobs -- flipping hamburgers or something.

Let's remember how in the 1970's inflation and taxes were suffocating families and working people and small businesses, as they tried to make ends meet. I think it's important to note that today -- when hard-working people like you put in long days to provide for your family, to give them a better future -- the Government lets you keep more of what you've earned instead of confiscating it through higher taxes and runaway inflation.

I would add that over the last 2 years, without much help from Washington's big spending liberals, we have also cut the Federal budget deficit by more than a third -- continued to reduce the trade deficit. And we've still kept the economic expansion going, and we've done it without raising taxes.

Well, our program so far has helped middle-income families make their paychecks go further. And the drop in interest rates has made home ownership more affordable. The drop in inflation has protected the savings of citizens and helped those who lived on fixed incomes. And our tax reductions have guaranteed that a family's purchasing power will not be eroded by bracket-creep. Imagine where the American family would be today if the liberals had succeeded in their attempts to block our economic reforms.

While we have cut taxes, reduced regulation, and limited the growth in Federal spending, this particular State government has, since 1983, increased spending at double the rate of the Federal Government's increase and nearly doubled the State debt. They've added on almost $200 million in additional State taxes and fees this year, but their budget deficit, much too large this year, is projected to be even larger next year.

You see, what we've done with the economy is important, and we must make sure that it continues. But our special strength as a nation, as you all know so well, is that we can march into the future, leading the world into a new age of growth, technology, and innovation; but we can do so without leaving behind the vital moral foundation, the basic values of faith and family that makes ours a great nation and on which all that we've accomplished has been built.

Yes, the family is the bedrock of our nation, but it's also the engine that gives our country life. It is the reason that we produce. It's for our families that we work and labor so that we can join together around the dinner table, bring our children up the right way, care for our parents, and reach out to those less fortunate. It's the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, and that serves as the cradle of our country's soul.

Well, as I've said before, there really are only two things the liberals don't understand: the things that change and the things that don't. [Laughter] The economy, technology -- these things change, and under us for the better. But America's basic moral and spiritual values -- they don't change.

Chesterton, submitted to ``the modern and morbid weakness of always sacrificing the normal to abnormal.'' They've turned principles at the core of our common culture and common history into partisan issues that hang in the balance as we prepare to elect a new President and Congress. For example, some liberal organizations believe that separation of church and state requires ending the Catholic Church's tax exemption or removing the words ``under God'' from the Pledge of Allegiance. Is that what you believe?

The President. They think tuition tax credits for children in parochial schools are unconstitutional, that prostitution should be legalized, but that children should be denied the right to begin their school day by joining with their classmates in a voluntary prayer. And I know what you're going to say. Is that what you believe?

The President. No, that's not what we, or most Americans, believe. And I think it's time for us to say that America's most basic, fundamental values are not unconstitutional. Now, I'm not saying that all or even most liberals agree with all of these far-out views. But these issues, and there are other examples, raise an important question. You recall a few years back, political figures had to disassociate themselves from groups on the right with crackpot, far-out views. Well, isn't it now time for responsible people to do the same thing with far-out groups on the left?

And now, I'm a former Democrat. But I think you know what I mean when I raise questions about the distinction between rank-and-file Democrats and the liberal leadership of that party in Washington. The liberals may try to mouth some of our words, but when they talk about ``values'' and ``family,'' they mean something very different.

Now, there are other values that we should think about this year -- to change the subject here. You know, last Friday was the 50th anniversary of the Munich pact, the naive act of appeasement that brought us the great nightmare of this century, the Second World War. The vain boast that we'd achieved ``peace in our time'' was followed 11 months later by Hitler's invasion of Poland. The lesson from Munich is too clear and too important to be forgotten.

That sad lesson is that to be weak is to invite war. And that's why I say to you: America must never be weak. We must always be strong. But even today there are those who have forgotten the ancient principle of peace through strength. And their innocence and naivete would put in question all that we've achieved since Vice President Bush and I took office, all the progress toward ending the twin evils of totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

I know that down the road here is an important defense plant that helps to keep America strong. When I see our tanks, I think of the defense of the free world. Of course, other people now look at our tanks and think of what a Boston newspaper columnist -- him, not me -- called Pee-Wee's Armored Adventure.

And even when they say they now favor weapons like the new Trident missile and Stealth bomber, listen closely and you hear them whisper it's just in theory that they favor these systems; they're not prepared to deploy them. But in a dangerous world, weapons that don't exist don't count. Let's remember, the Soviets did business because they saw that we meant business.

And there's one last issue, yes, more important even than all the other crucial matters we've already discussed. Ladies and gentlemen, just a few years ago, I wonder how many of us could really have believed then that so many of our fondest dreams for America could come true. And of those things that have happened, how many of us could have imagined 8 or even 4 years ago that one day a President of the United States would have an opportunity to stand, as I did a few months ago, there in the Lenin Hills at a podium at Moscow State University and tell the young people of the Soviet Union about the wonder and glory of human freedom?

And what a great moment we have before us, and, oh, how future generations will dishonor us if now, in a moment of sudden folly, we throw it all away. So, let's go forth then, you and I, to tell the American people what is really at stake: the fate of generations to come, a hopeful vision of a world of freedom, and a bountiful future of reverence and peace for our children and all the children of the world.

So, yes, some say that it's time for a change. But, ladies and gentlemen, let us just remember: We are the change. We started it 8 years ago, and we're going to continue it and extend it to Congress if you do the right thing at the polls on November 8th. Now is a time for action, not complacency. It's time to keep the progress moving, not to sit tight or slip backwards. I think George Bush had it right at the convention: If you have to change horses in midstream, doesn't it make sense to get on one that's going the same direction you are?

Well, it's a real pleasure to be here for a tribute to a great Detroiter, a great Republican, a great American, Max Fisher. To put it simply, the man is a legend. He's been an adviser, a supporter, and a friend not only to me but to dozens and dozens of others who would not have made it very far without Max's guidance.

You all know that Max Fisher is an important man, but I'm not sure you know just how important. I remember when I was here at the Joe Louis Arena 8 years ago for a little party you all probably remember called the Republican National Convention. At that convention, I was honored to receive the Republican nomination for President, and after I finished delivering my acceptance speech, many of you crowded onto the podium along with my family, my friends, and Republicans who shared in that magical moment. I have to say it was one of the proudest moments of my life.

Max has always seen Detroit through its ups and downs, and he's lived to see his city fight back and move forward, in no small measure due to his efforts. And today he has every reason to be proud, because if you ask me, Detroit is America's renaissance city.

Max has seen them come and seen them go, like I have, and I'd wager that he was as impressed as I was by a certain speech given a couple of months ago in New Orleans. It was one of the finest pieces of oratory I've ever heard, given by one of the finest men I've ever known, a fellow by the name of George Bush.

Now, some people want to talk this year, I understand, about competence. Well, I say: Fine, let's talk about competence. I just happen to think that the youngest flier in the Navy with 58 combat missions, the Texas wildcatter who made his own way in the world, the Republican Congressman from Houston, the chairman of the Republican Party, the de facto Ambassador to China, the Ambassador to the U.N., the Director of the Central Intelligence Agency, and the Vice President of the United States has it just about wrapped up in the competence department.

And that's the kind of competence we need as we move onward. Our party looks to the future -- a future of continued growth, a future of expanded opportunity, a future of peace. And after watching the debate the other night, I know the Bush-Quayle ticket will continue the policies of peace and prosperity that have, as Dan said, made this great nation ``the envy of the world.'' I hear some people say we've grown complacent, that it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. We began it 8 years ago.

Let me talk a little about that change. We're in the 71st straight month of economic recovery. We've been dedicated to slashing taxes and liberating the American economy from the regulations and confiscations of the ``malaise'' years. Let me speak a second about those regulations. When I came in and sat in that Oval Office, one of my first chores was to name George Bush as the chairman of a committee to get into how we could reduce and eliminate many of the Federal regulations. Where was George? He was in charge of that commission that today -- we estimate that today the regulations that had been reduced have resulted in a savings of 600 million man-hours a year that no longer have to be applied to government-required paperwork.

NATO allies stood firm when government intermediate-range nuclear missiles were pointed at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

Now, if only we could get Congress to follow Walter's example and cut the fat out of their diet. [Laughter] And I want you to know when I'm talking here about this there are four of your Congressmen I know here in the audience -- and we want them back in Washington -- and present company is excepted from the things that I'm saying right here. I think we ought to put Congress on a diet: a diet called the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment.

Yes, today we have peace and prosperity, and the liberals are trying to pretend those economic and foreign policy nightmares they gave us never happened. Well, they may think they've thrown the past down the memory hole, but there's a reason why the Republican symbol is an elephant. An elephant never forgets. And when you're talking about the ``malaise'' years, let me assure you the liberals -- or let me assure the liberals, I should say, that I haven't forgotten and you haven't forgotten, and they can be sure the American people haven't forgotten either.

Still, you can hardly blame the liberals for trying to tell the country about how terrible everything is. After all, what issues do they have to run on? Take defense -- they opposed the buildup of the military. They opposed the deployment of the missiles in Europe. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

Take crime -- the liberals oppose the death penalty. They oppose it absolutely and in every case. We have fought to protect the noble men who protect us, and that means the death penalty for these vicious killers. If you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police. And we say that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should give up his life as his punishment.

Now take the economy -- the liberals opposed our tax cuts, our tax reform efforts, our economic program that slashed interest rates in half and put America back to work. That's the trend I'm most proud of, and that's what I see in this great State where the unemployment rate has fallen by a staggering 30 percent in just 9 months.

Today more Americans are at work. And the highest proportion of our labor force is employed than ever before in the history of this country. And job for job, the jobs we've created in our expansion pay better than the jobs that existed before our expansion began. How did we do it? By getting government out of the way and letting the American people do their thing, their stuff.

The liberals are saying that they want to help the American middle class. And what they're planning to do for the American middle class is to tax them and tax them and then tax them some more. Well, if you ask me, the liberals are selling the middle class short. Every time the liberals see a problem, they think a big government program run by bureaucrats in Washington is the solution -- the same bureaucrats who do so much to stifle individual initiative and economic growth.

I say if you're not part of the solution, you're part of the problem. And the problem is big spending. The solution is so simple only a liberal could miss it. [Laughter] We just have to spend less. What we've learned from hard experience -- that big spending is as seductive as anabolic steroids. And I think it's time the big spenders were disqualified. We can accomplish that by giving George Bush what he needs to do the job: a new Congress, a better Congress, a Republican Congress.

Let me just say something about that. In this campaign, coming from one side, I'm getting sick and tired of hearing about my 7 years of deficit spending. The President of the United States can't spend a dime -- only the Congress can spend money. And if we want to talk about the deficit and the Congress and all, in the last 58 years, the House of Representatives has been run by the other party 54 of those 58 years. And 48 of those 58 years, they've had both Houses of the Congress. And in the 50 years that ended in 1980, there had only been 8 years in which the budget had been balanced. And when some of us went public and complained about that and the deficit spending, we were told it was part of the Keynesian theory and it was necessary to maintain our prosperity.

Well, you know, they left out one part of the Keynesian theory. It's true he did say deficit spending by government, if need be, in times of recession to bring back the economy -- stimulate the economy. But then he said, as soon as you've done that, you pay off the deficit and get back to balanced budgets. That's the part they neglected.

So, you've all got to do everything you can here in Michigan, and that means getting our message out for a tough-as-nails guy who's running a tough-as-nails race and will make a great Senator -- Jim Dunn.

What it all comes down to is a clash of principles, of values, and of visions. The liberals look at this country and see problems, woes, gloom and doom. And you know, that's the kind of thinking that can turn into a self-fulfilling prophecy.

We look at this country, and we see expanded opportunities, a glorious future, a future in which this nation is strong, protected by land and sea and air and, yes, space -- courtesy of the Strategic Defense Initiative. We're confident that we're right. We're confident that our cause is just. So, let us go then, Let's take our message of optimism to every man, woman, and child across this great State and across this great nation. Let them know that a vote for us is a vote for peace, a vote for prosperity, and, yes, a vote for the future. And let them know that we are the change. And that change will continue if the people go to the polls and do what they should and vote for that ticket of ours and for our House of Representatives, the Congressmen who are here, for our Senatorial candidates, and continue us in charge of this recovery that has been going on. And it is the longest sustained recovery in the history of the United States.

I'd like to turn to another subject: the war on drugs. I want all Americans to take heart. This war is not yet won, not by a long shot. But we're doing better, and our nation is united against this scourge as never before.

When we say zero tolerance, we mean, simply, that we've had it. We will no longer tolerate those who sell drugs and those who buy drugs. All Americans of good will are determined to stamp out those parasites who survive and even prosper by feeding off the energy and vitality and humanity of others. They must pay. We believe that when those who sell drugs are caught they must make redress for the damage they cause.

That's why the administration, personified by the leadership and passion of this administration's point man on drugs, Vice President George Bush, and the national voice of conscience, my wife, Nancy, has advocated tougher measures than ever before to combat the drug runners and the drug dealers. We're doing this by seizing the ill-gotten possessions of drug dealers and their accomplices.

Those fancy cars and fancy houses and bank accounts full of dirty money aren't really theirs. They were bought from the sale of illegal blood pollutants. We do not tolerate companies that poison our harbors and rivers, and we won't let people who are poisoning the blood of our children get away with it either.

Those who have the gall to use federally subsidized housing to peddle their toxins must get the message as well. We will not tolerate those who think they can do their dirty work in the same quarters where disadvantaged Americans struggle to build a better life. We want to kick the vermin out and keep them out.

Nor can we allow these people to hide behind bizarre legal challenges when we do arrest them and work to see them jailed. And that's why we are advocating a change in the law that will allow exceptions in the so-called exclusionary rule to permit the use in court of evidence gathered in good faith by the police.

Nor can our vigilance cease once they're behind bars. George Bush has proposed, and I support, drug testing for all who seek early release from jail, to send them this message: You don't go free until you're drug free.

We won't have a drug-free society until we manage to stop the drugs before they get to our shores. We must protect our coasts, and that means using the resources and calling on the noble men and women of the Coast Guard to protect us. We've sought increases in the drug enforcement budget, but in the past we've encountered consistent resistance from Congress. I requested $538 million for the Drug Enforcement Administration in fiscal '89, but Congress hacked $33 million away. I think drug enforcement is too important a matter for this kind of political behavior, and I imagine you agree with me.

But there is a way, more vital than all of these, that we can express our revulsion at the violence and degradation of the life of the drug peddler. These people seem to feel nothing -- no fear, no remorse, nothing -- when they pull out a machinegun and murder a police officer in the line of duty. The bill that has passed the House provides for the death penalty for these vicious killers. We must, we need, and we will, have this law.

Now, there are those who have opposed the House bill because it includes the death penalty. Others oppose it because of the ``good-faith'' exception to the exclusionary rule. I believe these people are more concerned with the abstract rights of criminals than the right of our society to save itself from those in this country and outside who seek their fortune in our national misfortune. I challenge the U.S. Senate to get that bill passed. The Nation demands it, and there's no time to waste. Compromises on the key provisions are unacceptable.

From her earliest days as a child, Bonita Granville Wrather was a figure of beauty and grace in the motion picture business. Many people will remember her for the films she made that endeared her to her audiences and earned her a very special place in our hearts. But more than that, she was a warm and caring friend. For so many years, she enriched our lives with her sparkling personality, her wonderful sense of humor, her loyalty, and her love.

Bunny had a smile that lit up a room and love of life that made everyone who knew her feel special. We have so many warm and special memories of Bunny and Jack, and they live on in our hearts forever. Though we are deeply saddened by her death, we are comforted by the joy that can come only from having known and loved a true, dear friend. Truly, Bunny was more than a friend; she was family. We loved Bunny and will miss her deeply.

Bob, thank you for inviting me here tonight. I'm delighted to be with all of you. This is a great time of year because it gives me an opportunity to get out and around and spread some gospel. And from what I've been told, many of you in this room have been instrumental in making it possible to get the good word out to the people of North Dakota and Montana. Believe me, everything that you've done to help us with the crucial battle for the Senate has been much appreciated. Your generosity has made possible so much good work for the party and our chance to once again gain control of the United States Senate.

He's a nice boy. [Laughter] Conrad is a Yellowstone County commissioner who helped balance the budget of the State's largest county when it faced tough economic times. And he did it without raising taxes. Now, that's being true to our Republican philosophy, I'm proud to say. And another thing that Conrad has proven is that he understands agriculture. Conrad is well known by Montanans for delivering farm and ranch news on the Northern AG Network. His entire career has dealt with farming and ranching. And that's the kind of down-to-earth experience that we need in Washington.

I want to say a word about Earl as well. Earl has the kind of legislative experience that would allow him to hit the ground running. Earl's been in the North Dakota house for 22 years, 13 of those as minority leader. He's recognized as one of the strongest and most successful legislative leaders in the State's history. In that position, he's had to make tough and sometimes unpopular decisions. I can tell you from personal experience that that's not always pleasant, but it makes me admire Earl all the more.

I see that Jan Strinden is also here tonight and has been introduced to all of us, and I know what a great source of strength and inspiration she is to Earl. Believe me, I don't know what I'd do without my better half.

Well, the fact that you're here tonight means none of you have anything in common with those ungrateful sons. [Laughter] But, ladies and gentlemen, I've been thinking your continued generosity is going to make a difference; and I'm starting to think perhaps a bigger difference than any one of us could have realized. I've been out on the campaign trail lately, and I'm just starting to wonder if this year there isn't something in the air.

They're beginning to realize that under the leadership of the liberals, that once-proud Democratic Party, a party of hope and affirmation, has become a party of negativism, a party whose leadership has changed it from the party of ``yes'' to the party of ``no'' -- ``no'' to the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto, ``no'' to holding down taxes and spending, ``no'' to the death penalty and the school prayer amendment, ``no'' to adequate defense spending and a Strategic Defense Initiative. The American people are beginning to understand that in all these ways the liberal leadership has been saying no to them. Now they're going to say no to the liberal leadership by saying yes to George Bush and Dan Quayle and Conrad Burns and Earl Strinden and the Republican Party.

Let's move in on that. All of you know how vital control of the Senate is going to be for the Republican agenda for the future. We couldn't have done any of the things that we've accomplished in these 8 years had we not had a Republican majority for 6 years. Holding down taxes, stopping the special interest spending, the balanced budget amendment, the line-item veto, getting tough anticrime legislation adopted, getting the right judges confirmed, the prayer amendment, keeping our defenses strong and our foreign policy firm -- you know how tough it's going to be to accomplish any of these things if that other party remains in control of the Senate, if Ted Kennedy continues to control the Labor Committee, if Joe Biden keeps his grip on the Judiciary Committee, and if Howard Metzenbaum keeps talking to death our conservative legislation?

Now in 1986, a mere shift of some 29,000 votes would have meant that we retained control of the Senate. But voter interest was low that year, and we lost some races that were so close they were heartbreakers. But I give Rudy Boschwitz and Bob Dole enormous credit, because far from being discouraged, they've realized that with voter interest much higher in this Presidential year there's a real shot at getting back control of the Senate. You see, all the issues that we had so much trouble getting out there in 1986 are automatically there in 1988. The public is beginning to realize that this election is a referendum on liberalism.

I don't think I have to tell you that as this administration worked to get our economy back on track and our international stature restored, we couldn't count on the help of these two Members of the Senate. One voted with us only one-third of the time; the other only 40 percent of the time. They voted against us on vital issues like our drug bill, the balanced budget amendment, the line-item veto, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings Deficit Reduction Act, increased funding for SDI, aid to the contras, the MX mobile missile -- well, and the list goes on.

And when the good conservative voters of Montana and North Dakota begin to realize that the opponents of Conrad Burns and Earl Strinden are nothing less than hard-core liberals, Senators who talk conservative back home but who vote liberal in Washington, they're not going to be happy. So, believe me, it isn't going to take smoke and mirrors and magic tricks. It's just a matter of going to the people of Montana and North Dakota and explaining to them how liberal their current representation is in the Senate. And that's what makes what all of you are doing to help two great candidates like Conrad and Earl so important.

Burns will fight for those great Western values we both hold dear. If you ask me who the people of Montana should vote for, my answer is Conrad Burns. You bet. And Earl Strinden is a fighter with a vision. Earl is North Dakota's best hope for the future. I think you're going to see the people of Montana saying they want a conservative like Conrad Burns in the Senate, not the current fella who votes liberal. And I think you're going to see the people of North Dakota saying they want a conservative like Earl Strinden, not the current fella who votes liberal.

I want to thank each of you for helping them. I think we're heading for victory in November. And I know George Bush is looking forward to the support of two great Republicans like Conrad Burns and Earl Strinden in the United States Senate.

And in all those 58 years, when you hear them in this campaign talking about the Federal deficit as if it just started with our administration and as if we're responsible, I think you should know that there were only eight balanced budgets in all those 58 years when they were in charge -- just one, and the last -- or eight. And the last one was in 1969. So, whose deficit is it?

I remember making speeches all over the country back then, talking about the every-year Federal deficit and pointing out that one day it would get loose and start going wild. Well, along came the War on Poverty back in the middle sixties. Poverty won because they got it passed. From 1965 to 1980, in those 15 years the budget increased to five times what it had been in '65, and the deficit increased to 58 times what it had been in 1965.

I am returning herewith without my approval S. 1259, a bill to grant a right of access across a portion of Buffalo National River Park to a landowner whose property is adjacent to the Park. Located in northwest Arkansas, the Buffalo National River was established in 1972. Buffalo National River, with both swift-running and placid stretches, is one of the few remaining unpolluted free-flowing rivers in the lower 48 States.

The Federal Government has a duty to preserve and protect our National Parks for the benefit and enjoyment of all Americans -- both those now living and future generations. This bill permits the special roadway access for the private landowner to diminish the scenic, historic, and other values for which the Park was established, as long as it does not do so ``unreasonably.'' The Park lands across which the landowner seeks access are partly wooded and partly old pastureland that is now returning to its natural condition as a forest.

If we begin with S. 1259 to establish by private bills special roadway privileges in our National Parks for the convenience of private landowners fortunate enough to have sufficient influence to secure passage of such bills, we will have begun to squander our national treasure.

President today announced his intention to appoint Richard W. Snyder to be a member of the Advisory Committee for Trade Policy and Negotiations for a term of 2 years. He would succeed Eleanor Lyons Williams III.

Seventy years ago, on November 11, 1918, World War I ended by armistice. On that date each year, America calls to mind the ideals and achievements of U.S. forces in that conflict and throughout our history; and we salute and thank all the veterans of our military for their service, sacrifices, and love of country.

Experience has taught us that preparedness deters aggression and that weakness invites it. Innumerable Americans have preserved the peace by manning our defenses through the years; and, when we have been called upon as a people to resist the forces of aggression and tyranny, countless brave men and women have donned military uniform to do so. They have known that the defense of our heritage may demand even the supreme sacrifice; and many of them have made that sacrifice for our Nation. We and the generations to come can never forget them.

We can all testify proudly that the same love of country that inspires America's veterans during their military service remains with them in later years. Across our land, veterans continue to contribute to our Nation -- in the private sector; in public office; in volunteer service; in efforts for their fellow veterans, hospitalized or with other needs; in activities for young people; in the patriotic, civic, religious, fraternal, and service groups that cement our communities and country together; and in support of the strong defenses America needs to maintain peace and freedom.

November 11, 1988, as Veterans Day. I urge all Americans to recognize the valor and sacrifice of our veterans through appropriate public ceremonies and private prayers. I also call upon Federal, State, and local government officials to display the flag of the United States and to encourage and take part in patriotic activities throughout our country. I invite the business community, churches, schools, unions, civic and fraternal organizations, and the media to support this national observance with suitable commemorative expressions and programs.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Now, you may not know it, but I've heard a lot about your schools, and I like what I've heard. I've heard, for example, about your code of values, as well as that you care about the community. I've heard many of you volunteer in the Delaware County Hospital next door and do other community work. I can't help thinking that when a certain friend of mine talks about ``a Thousand Points of Light'' in America's sky, when he speaks of the thousands of American communities where neighbors reach out to help neighbors in need, well, one of the brightest of these points of light is a place called Upper Darby, Pennsylvania.

I've also heard that you young people here in Upper Darby care about the fu- ture -- about your future, about America's future -- and that you're preparing for it. I've heard that you've set high standards for yourselves in both your college preparatory and vocational programs and that when it comes to looking to the future you can't beat the students at Upper Darby High, or Monsignor Bonner High, or Archbishop Prendergast High.

I know that many of you are not yet old enough to vote. And yet you have a stake in this year's election, and you can have a role in it, too. As you know, 8 years ago I visited this school and stood in this place as a candidate for the high office that I now hold. The students in this school then now have jobs. They're starting families, and they're establishing themselves in community and career. All we've accomplished in the last 8 years is making their lives easier, better, and more hopeful.

The results have been 18 million new jobs since our expansion began, more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined have created in this same period; an unemployment rate the lowest it's been in 14 years; the greatest flowering of new businesses and new technologies in the history of the world; the longest peacetime economic expansion ever recorded; and more people at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

Think of what 255,000 new jobs in America last month alone means to you. When you leave school there will be work, paychecks, and a chance to make your hopes come true. Last month was no fluke. America has created, on average, a quarter of a million jobs a month in the 71 months since our expansion began. And today not only are more Americans at work but a higher proportion of our labor force is employed than ever before in the history of the country. And job for job, the jobs we've created in our expansion pay better than the jobs that existed before our expansion began. What Senator Quayle said the other night I've heard echoed in my talks with leaders of many other nations: Today the United States of America is the envy of the world.

I believe prosperity and economic growth are the products of strong values. In the last 8 years, we've worked to return America's values to all areas of American Government. We've said it's time to return to basics in education, and one of those basics is that you should be permitted to open your schoolday with a simple, silent, voluntary prayer. If Congress can open each day with a prayer, why can't you? And you know, Congress probably needs it more than you do. We've said it's time to return to basics in reading the Constitution and to acknowledge that the Constitution does not prevent parents from receiving a tuition tax credit when they send their children to parochial schools. And in no way is it meant to deny the right to life. We've said it's time to return to basics in protecting America's neighborhoods. And that means among other things appointing judges who don't only respect the rights of criminals but also those of the victims of crime. And we've said it's time to return to the basics in protecting America itself. We've returned to the fundamental wisdom that the way to peace is not through American weakness but through American strength.

Yes, we've had 8 great years. But some ask: Have we done as much as we can do? Have we gone as far as we can go? You might as well ask Eagles quarterback Randall Cunningham if after his spectacular game Monday night -- [applause] -- ask him if he's gone as far as he can go. My answer is the same as I know Randall Cunning-ham's would be: We've only just begun! From here on in, it's touchdown city. Yes, I believe that the growth that our expansion has brought America can be just the beginning. America is entering a new age that will open opportunities for you and all young Americans, opportunities that we in the older generation could not even have dreamed of when we were your age.

Let me tell you about something I heard the other day. It has to do with the technological revolution that is going on all around us and that many say has already surpassed the Industrial Revolution in changing the way humanity lives in the years ahead. The heart of this revolution is a tiny silicon chip that you can hold on the tip of your finger and still see most of the finger. Today that silicon chip has the incredible computing power of a million transistors; that is, of the biggest computers of the 1960's. Yet according to one of our nation's most prominent research directors, in less than 15 years, he says the power of a billion transistors will be packed on a chip. That's the power of 20 of today's most advanced computers all in a laptop computer.

Think of what that can mean in the ability of your generation to cure disease, to make the world more productive and opportunity for all peoples more plentiful, to build a strategic defense against ballistic missiles to end forever mankind's nightmare of nuclear terror, and to pursue your dreams wherever they'll take you. That's the future that awaits you. The only limits will be those of your imagination and your courage. And are there any limits to them?

America's prosperity is both an opportunity and a challenge, and I know that you're up to it. As part of my job, I've visited schools all over the country, and wherever I go, I find myself remembering the words of General George C. Marshall when asked why he was so confident that we would win the Second World War. ``We have a secret weapon,'' he said. And when asked about that, he said, ``It's just the best blankety-blank kids in the whole world.'' Well, as I look at you and meet young people like you all over the country, I know we still have a secret weapon, and it's the best blankety-blank kids in the world.

Now, if you're talking to friends about getting out and voting and they aren't sure they want to go to the trouble, would you ask them for me to think of what it means to be able to vote? You hold history in your hands. Earlier this year, I had the privilege of doing something I never thought an American President would be able to do. I spoke to students in Moscow, at the state university of Moscow, about the glories of freedom. Think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them ever have the influence on the course of this country's history and world history that each American has just by walking into the voting booth. And not just by casting a vote for President.

Ours is a system of three equal branches of government. Two branches, Congress and the President, are chosen by election, and the third branch, the courts, is chosen by the other two branches. When you vote for a candidate for the Senate or the House, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you vote for President.

President can't spend a thing. Congress makes the budget. And if you want to see the Federal deficit fall, remember, a vote cast for a Senator or Representative is at least as important as a vote for President.

It's very disturbing to me that America's young people, who with so many years ahead of them have a bigger stake in the future than anyone else -- and yet our young people of voting age so far vote in lower numbers than all the other age groups. Perhaps you've heard of Will Rogers, the great American humorist of the 1920's and '30's. Will Rogers once said that the people who are elected are no better and no worse than the people who elected them. But they're all better than people who don't vote at all.

In the years ahead, whenever election day rolls around, I hope you won't forget the privilege and honor of being an American and the privilege you have of helping to govern this great nation, under God, with liberty and justice for all. Yes, America is truly the last, best hope of humanity, a city on a hill, a light unto the nations. I know that you know this. I know that some of you or your friends know firsthand what life without our liberties and our democracy is like and what it means to sacrifice everything to journey against all odds halfway around the world to come to America.

Well, now, let me explain that a little bit. [Laughter] I have a new hobby, and that hobby is collecting jokes that I can absolutely prove are created by the people in the Soviet Union and told among themselves. And I've collected quite a number of them. I told a couple of them to General Secretary Gorbachev, and he laughed.

There is just one other thing I'd like to say. I mentioned earlier in my remarks the Constitution. Every country, I think, has a constitution -- oh, about most of them that I know of do, including the Soviet Union. Then what is the great difference between theirs and ours? Many of them have some of the same lines in them. The difference is so simple and yet so great it tells the whole story -- three words: ``We, the people.'' Those other constitutions are documents in which the Government tells the people what their privileges are and what they can do. Our Constitution is a document in which we, the people, tell the Government what it can do. And it can't do anything other than what is prescribed for it in that Constitution.

And so, today I would just remind you, in closing, you not only have the power to speak to the President but to pick the President and the Congress and the State legislature -- to determine the course of our history and to protect those liberties that have made this good and gentle land, yes, the envy of the world.

The President. Thank you, Governor Kean, and thank you all very much. And let me offer my special thanks to John Renna, the Italian-Americans of Essex County, and the Italian Tribune for your hospitality here tonight. My friends, grazia [thank you]. And thanks also to Bob Franks, Bo Sullivan, and Victory '88 for helping make this dinner possible. It really is great to be here, and you sure know how to make a fellow from out of town feel welcome. When Columbus discovered America, I can't believe that he got as warm a reception as you've given me. And I doubt there was a delicious plate of baked ziti waiting for him, either. Now, contrary to what you may have heard, however, I was not with Columbus on that trip.

Well, that was almost 500 years ago, and few people could imagine where we would be today. Tonight, for example, we're eating a delicious hot meal, sitting on top of an ice-skating rink, listening to a speech by the President -- this could only happen in America.

But, you know, we are now in the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded. We are now in the 71st month of growth. And since the recovery began, the unemployment rate in the Essex County area has fallen by well over half, down to just 3.6 percent. And statewide, real personal income is up by some 28 percent. We've shown that record economic growth, more jobs than ever before, and a greater decline in the unemployment rate than any other major economy not only can be achieved, but that we could do it while also reducing tax rates, slashing inflation by two-thirds, and cutting interest rates in half. And I would add that over the last 2 years, without much help from Washington's big-spending liberals, we have also cut the Federal budget deficit by a third, continued to reduce the trade deficit, and we've still kept the economic expansion going -- and we've done it without raising taxes.

Now, with regard to the Federal budget deficit and all the campaign rhetoric, I think our critics ought to read article I, sections 8 and 9 of the Constitution. Congress passes the budget each year; I don't. The President of the United States can't spend or borrow a dime; only Congress can do that. And every dime of deficit spending over the last 8 years has been mandated by Congress, line by line. And that's why I want for the President to have what 43 Governors already have: the line-item veto.

Let me interject something here. When I said that every dime of deficit spending for the last 8 years -- how many of us have stopped to think that in 58 years, including this as the 58th year, the Democratic Party has had the majority in the House of Representatives for 54 of those 58 years and has had both Houses of the Congress for 48 of the 58 years. And in all of that time, there were only 8 scattered years in which the budget was balanced. The last time was 1969. And yet they keep on pretending that somebody else, somebody at this podium, is responsible for the deficit.

Well, you see, our program has helped middle-income families make their paychecks go further. The drop in interest rates has made homeownership more affordable. The drop in inflation has protected the savings of the citizens and has helped those who live on fixed incomes. And our tax reductions and indexing have guaranteed that a family's purchasing power will not be eroded by tax-bracket creep.

Of course, the liberals still don't understand how we were able to get rid of their economic crisis, their ``malaise'' -- remember that word from back 8 years ago -- their inflation, their gas lines, and turn this economy around.

So, in this campaign they're treating the good times as if they're a given, as if they just automatically happen. Their message is: You can take prosperity for granted. It's time for a change, so take a chance on us. Well, you know, that's sort of like someone telling you that if you've stored up all the cold beer you could want, now it's time to unplug the refrigerator. [Laughter] But whether it's a well-stocked refrigerator or our progrowth economic policies, you can't unplug what's working and expect things to stay the same.

And there's another point I want to make here. What we've done with the economy is very important, and we must make sure that it continues. But our special strength as a nation, as you all know so well, is that, yes, we can march into the future, leading the world into a new age of growth, technology, and innovation; but we can do so without leaving behind the vital moral foundation, the basic values of faith and family that make ours a great nation and on which all that we've accomplished has been built. Yes, the family is the bedrock of this nation. But it's also the engine that gives our country life; it is the reason that we produce. It's for our families that we work and labor so that we can join together around the dinner table, bring our children up the right way, care for our parents, and reach out to those less fortunate. It's the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, that serves as the cradle of our country's soul.

For example, some liberal organizations believe that separation of church and state requires ending the Catholic Church's tax exemption, or removing the words ``under God'' from the Pledge of Allegiance. Is that what you believe?

Let me take a moment to tell you something I've never said before. You know I'm a former Democrat. And it's often said that the once-proud Democratic Party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman is dead and gone; that the Democratic Party has been taken over by the left; that the departure from the mainstream that we began to see at their 1968 convention now defines the party at the national level, especially the liberal leadership in Congress. But there's something you should know.

You know, I cast my first vote for Franklin Delano Roosevelt in 1932. And his platform then was to cut Federal spending by 25 percent, to restore authority and autonomy to the local communities and States from which it had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government, to eliminate useless boards and commissions. Well, now, which party does that represent today? That has to be our party. Those are the things we've been doing and trying to do.

You know, I'm reminded of a story. Yes, it's one of my stories. It's about a man who aspired to an opera career, and he got a job in pictures, acting in motion pictures in Hollywood. But he was there just long enough to put money together that he could go and realize his real ambition. And so, he left Hollywood; then he went to Milan to study opera. And he was studying there in Italy for 2 years and then received a very great honor.

Well, today, as we think about America, as we think about Columbus' discovery of the New World and all that it's meant for mankind, we should realize how our one nation with its special destiny has brightened the hopes and possibilities of every country and people on Earth.

I think many of you know that we recently marked the 50th anniversary of the Munich pact, the naive act of appeasement that brought us the great nightmare of this century -- the Second World War. The vain boast that we had achieved ``peace in our time'' was followed 11 months later by Hitler's invasion of Poland. The lesson from Munich is too clear and too important to be forgotten. The sad lesson is that to be weak is to invite war.

Well, but in a dangerous world, weapons that don't exist don't count. Let's remember, the Soviets did business because they saw that we meant business. But today there are those who have forgotten the ancient principle of peace through strength. And their innocence and naivete would put in question all that we've achieved since Vice President Bush and I took office, all the progress toward ending the twin evils of totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

You know, when I see our tanks I think of the defense of the free world. Of course, other people now look at our tanks and think of what a Boston newspaper columnist -- him, not me -- called Pee-Wee's Armored Adventure.

Now, before I quit, I'm going to do something. It's become a hobby of mine. I've been collecting stories, jokes, that I can absolutely prove are created by the people of the Soviet Union among themselves and that they tell to each other, and they reveal a great sense of humor and also a little cynicism about how things are there. I've got quite a collection now, and I even told two of them to Gorbachev and got a laugh. There are several others I wouldn't tell him. But I'd just like to close by telling you one that I did tell him, and he laughed at.

Most of the automobiles are driven by the bureaucrats -- the Government furnishes them, and drivers and so forth. So, an order went out one day to the police that anyone caught speeding -- anyone, no matter who -- gets a ticket.

More and more visually impaired Americans are attaining independence in their daily lives, and we can all reflect gratefully on the role of the white cane in making this so. Thanks to the white cane and public awareness of it, blind people can travel and conduct daily activities successfully.

The white cane has affected the lives of its users so profoundly that it has come to symbolize freedom and self-reliance for blind citizens everywhere. This simple but effective tool helps many people with visual impairments build fuller lives. Each October, White Cane Safety Day offers all Americans the opportunity to congratulate their friends, neighbors, and fellow citizens who use the white cane to such good advantage for themselves and for our communities and country.

Well, the Family Support Act focuses on the two primary areas in which individuals must assume this responsibility. First, the legislation improves our system for securing support from absent parents. Second, it creates a new emphasis on the importance of work for individuals in the welfare system.

Under this bill, one parent in a two-parent welfare family will be required to work in the public or private sector for at least 16 hours a week as a condition of receiving benefits. This important work requirement applies to families that come onto the welfare rolls as a result of the unemployment of the principal wage earner. It recognizes the need for a family's breadwinner to maintain the habits, skills, and pride achieved through work. This work requirement also allows us to expand coverage for two-parent families to all States without dangerously increasing welfare dependency. A key part of this bill is to make at least one of the parents in a welfare family participate in meaningful work while still getting a needed cash support.

Single-parent families also share in the message of hope underlying this bill. They, too, will know that there is an alternative to a life on welfare. To ensure that they get a better start in life, young parents who have not completed high school will be required to stay in or return to school to complete the basic education so necessary to a productive life. Other parents will be offered a broad range of education, employment, and training activities designed to lead to work.

To provide new employment opportunities to welfare recipients, States will be entitled to receive $6.8 billion over the next 7 years. They also will receive the funding necessary to provide child care and Medicaid benefits. This financial assistance represents a significant and generous national commitment to enhancing the self-sufficiency of welfare recipients. To ensure that meaningful numbers of recipients actually do benefit from welfare reform, each State must be required to involve increasing percentages of welfare families to participate in employment and training activities over time.

Family Support Act also contains significant reforms in our nation's child-support enforcement system. These reforms are designed to ensure that parents who do not live with their children nevertheless meet their responsibilities to them. To improve the adequacy of child-support awards, judges and other officials will be required to apply support guidelines developed by their States for setting award amounts. And to help ensure that the child-support awarded actually is paid, child-support payments will be automatically withheld from the responsible parent's paycheck.

Reflecting the concern we all share over the Federal budget deficit, the Family Support Act contains funding provisions to offset the increased new spending in the bill. The single largest source of the funding comes from a temporary extension of current authority for the Treasury to collect overdue debts owed the Federal Government by reducing Federal tax refunds of individuals not paying those debts on time.

As lead Governors on welfare reform for the National Governors' Association, Governors Castle and Clinton consistently presented the interests of the States in getting welfare reform enacted. And that interest has been manifested by many States carrying out their own welfare reform programs. Leaders in this effort are Governors Kean, Tommy Thompson, Moore, and Hunt, who have paved the way for this legislation through unique welfare-reform initiatives in their States. Legislators like Wisconsin's Susan Engeleiter were instrumental in achieving welfare reform and showing Congress how well it works.

Members of Congress share the credit for the responsible welfare-to-work and child-support enforcement reforms in the Family Support Act. In particular, Senators Moynihan, Armstrong, Dole, and Packwood, and Bentsen, and Representatives Rostenkowski, Hank Brown, Michel, Frenzel, and Downey played key roles in forging the consensus for this landmark legislation. They and the members of the administration who worked so diligently on this bill will be remembered for accomplishing what many have attempted, but no one has achieved in several decades: a meaningful redirection of our welfare system.

Dick Covey, Pinky Nelson, Mike Lounge, and Dave Hilmers to wish them Godspeed as they prepared for their important journey. Today let us just say to our five brave countrymen: Thank you for taking us with you into space, and bless you for your courage. And on behalf of every American, welcome home.

Vice President was right last night: You are America's heroes. You are his heroes and mine. You're each veterans of the space program, and what you have done for the program and for your country will be long remembered. At a time when it counted, you stepped forward to help return America to space, to once again live the dream -- and for all of us, to help keep that dream alive. You, the astronauts, and the entire team that made the mission of the Discovery a success deserve the praise of a grateful nation.

I also want to salute the engineering and technical crew responsible for the redesign of the space shuttle. It was a job well-done. More than 400 design changes were made involving the orbiter, booster rockets, external tank, and engines. With the success of the new shuttle, America is on track for our next major objective: having the space station Freedom orbiting the Earth in the next decade.

In the meantime, we're looking forward to deploying the planetary probes Magellan, Galileo, and Ulysses, that will visit Venus, Jupiter, and the Sun. The launch of the Humble space telescope -- the Hubble, I should say; I put an ``m'' in there -- the launch of the Hubble space telescope will extend our gaze to the far reaches of space. Important national security projects will also be launched, improving our ability to monitor arms control agreements. Our progress on developing the Mach 25 national aerospace plane continues.

For our young people, in particular, I think Mike Lounge said it best: ``Space is a fun place.'' That's a message that deserves to be posted in every science classroom in America. We can tell each child in every school: There's an exciting future ahead, and it belongs to you.

Education will be your passport. Knowledge will be your boarding pass. So, set your sights on the stars. I want to say to our young people that our space program needs you. So you should study and work hard, because when you're old enough to go to space, America will be prepared to take you there.

I'll predict that the crew of the Discovery has launched a whole new generation of young space pioneers. Mission Commander Rick Hauck has said that this will be his last space flight. Well, we'll miss his leadership, but he says ``there are a lot of people waiting in the wings.'' In fact, four of them are right here.

Along with the Discovery's dramatic liftoff, there have been few sights more inspiring than watching the graceful shuttle gliding down to Earth. Because in that moment, as five Americans returned from the heavens to the Earth, we could see our own future -- or at least glimpse the shape of its opening moments -- because there's so much more to come. What history is recording today is simply the greatest of beginnings, the opening overture of a symphony in space.

Yes, there have been setbacks and tragedy and heroism along the way. And the journey ahead is not for the faint-hearted; it's for the brave. But there are wonders that lie before us, wonders that the human heart has yearned to know since the dawn of time. Ours is the first generation in human history that has had the tools to bring mankind into the heavens, into space; and America intends to stay there as long as the human soul can dream and wonder, as long as our ancient destiny draws us toward the stars.

The poet William Butler Yeats described an Irish airman in World War I, who became a pilot not because of the call of ``public men nor cheering crowds'' but ``a lonely impulse of delight drove him to this tumult in the clouds.'' I think that's the way it'll always be. The men and women who blaze the trail lead us forward through sense of joy, through ``a lonely impulse of delight.'' They are the pioneers who seek knowledge and adventure, who lead us beyond the frontier, across great oceans, and who lift us to the clouds, to the heavens, and, someday, out beyond the stars.

Follow us. We'll lead you there. This is the mission for which our nation itself was created, and we ask for God's guidance. America's as large as the universe, as infinite as space, as limitless as the vision and courage of her people.

This is a great team that we work with, and many of those people are represented in the audience today. And we appreciate that opportunity to thank them again. But a team is only as good as its leader, and as far as we're concerned, you're the captain of the team. And we have a team jacket that we presented to you in Houston. We took the patches off of them so we could fly them into space, and we brought them back to you and would like to present them to you.

Congress will adjourn for the year, and its Members will return to their States and districts. If, during adjournment, the Sandinista regime attacks the resistance, available resources may not be enough to protect and sustain the freedom fighters until the new Congress convenes. In the event the Sandinistas attempt to capitalize on this situation, they should know I would not hesitate to call the 100th Congress back into session to consider emergency assistance to the freedom fighters.

Our policy in Nicaragua remains the same: freedom for the people of Nicaragua, restoration of democratic institutions, and peace and stability for all of Central America. America must stand with those who fight for freedom in Nicaragua, as it has stood with the valiant freedom fighters in Afghanistan and Angola. We have an obligation to share the blessings of our liberty with those who yearn for freedom in Nicaragua. Their struggle is our struggle, and together we can achieve democracy in Nicaragua.

I'm particularly proud this afternoon because I remember more than 4 years ago, at a Cabinet meeting in January 1984, and I asked Vice President George Bush to launch a thorough investigation of alternative energy and see what he could find -- not pie-in-the-sky demonstration projects but real-world possibilities and realistic options that would help keep our air clean and our nation less dependent on foreign oil.

That's what's so exciting about the bill before us today: The forms of energy encouraged by this bill are already in use. Methanol, for example, is used in the Indianapolis 500 and in other race cars because it simultaneously enhances performance and safety. And cars that run on methanol have the potential to reduce emissions by an amazing 50 percent and improve efficiency. For areas like southern California, that could be a Godsend. A few months ago, Vice President Bush dedicated the first methanol pump on Wilshire Boulevard in Los Angeles. And this bill gives American automobile companies a real incentive to start building cars powered by alternative fuels by adjusting the federally mandated average fuel economy ratings to reflect the gasoline saved by these vehicles.

This legislation also opens up new markets for natural gas and coal, our two most plentiful energy resources in this country. The success of these projects could improve employment and the economies in the hard-pressed oil- and gas-producing areas of the country. This bill takes advantage of existing government programs and mechanisms to assist alternative fuels. Most important, it's not intended to create massive new bureaucracies or new taxpayer subsidies.

On April 8, 1988, in Executive Order No. 12635, I declared a national emergency to deal with the threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States posed by the policies and actions of the Noriega/Solis regime of Panama (53 Fed. Reg. 12134, April 12, 1988). In that Order, I ordered the immediate blocking of all property and interests in property of the Government of Panama (including the Banco Nacional de Panama and the Caja de Ahorros) then or thereafter located in the United States or coming within the possession or control of persons located within the United States. I also prohibited the payment or transfer of any funds or other financial or investment assets or credits to the Noriega/Solis regime from the United States and by U.S. persons and U.S.-controlled Panamanian entities located in the territory of Panama. All transfers, or payments owed, that are not authorized by rules, regulations, or licenses, to the Government of Panama are required to be made into a blocked account of the Government of Panama at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, to be held for the benefit of the Panamanian people.

The Panamanian Transactions Regulations contain a number of general licenses, authorizing payment to the Noriega/Solis regime of utilities; indirect taxes; fees and taxes paid in connection with basic business activity; fees (other than income taxes) directly owed by individuals; payments for travel-related, telecommunications, and mail transactions; fees related to the purchase and sale of publications; and payments of obligations of the Noriega/Solis regime to persons within the United States.

The objective of Administration policy remains support for a return to civilian constitutional rule and the development of an apolitical military establishment in Panama. In furtherance of our policy, the Administration has imposed economic sanctions against the Noriega/Solis regime. In our judgment, the root cause of the current crisis is the fact that the Panamanian people have lost confidence in a political system widely perceived as corrupt, repressive, and inept. A genuine Panamanian resolution of the political crisis is necessary to restore confidence in the Panamanian economy, a precondition to the return of economic stability and growth in Panama. Accordingly, our efforts have been directed at supporting Panamanian efforts to resolve the underlying political crisis as rapidly as possible.

The policies and actions of the Noriega/Solis regime in Panama continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply economic sanctions against Panama as long as these measures are appropriate and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on significant developments, pursuant to 50 U.S.C.

Forests supply many material needs, from lumber for homes to paper products to the baseball bats of our national pastime. And, whether in national and city parks or in local woods, forests enhance our physical and spiritual well-being with their scenic vistas and recreational opportunities.

Forestry and agriculture have been vital to our economic life from the start. Today, we are seeking to expand our market for forest products. We have the technological and resource capabilities to boost our competitiveness in exporting forest products. Our active competition in the international marketplace will foster a more robust economy and healthier and more productive forests. We continue to develop new resource management practices and to foster innovations in forest products. We can provide these and other products for ourselves and the people of the world; we will succeed as long as we continue to understand the great importance of our forests and the need to nurture them.

Congress prepares to leave town, many of its liberal leaders are congratulating themselves about their handling of the budget. And, yes, at least Congress didn't repeat its budget performance of last year: one desperation bill called a continuing resolution passed over 2 months late rather than the 13 regular appropriations bills required by law. Congress heard my warning that if that happened again I'd use my veto pen, even if it meant shutting down the entire Government.

So, we stopped Congress from once more saying, ``The dog ate my homework,'' when its budget assignment was due; and we got them to cut spending enough so that we'll meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets this year.

You may have heard a lot of campaign talk from our liberal friends recently about the Federal deficit and Federal debt. What you don't hear them say is that the President can't spend one dime of the Government's money without congressional appropriations. Only Congress can decide how much the Government spends. Only Congress can pass spending bills. Only Congress can determine how big the deficit will be, or if we're to have a deficit at all. In fact, it is against the law for the President to spend a penny more or a penny less than Congress directs him to spend. The President can't add to the deficit. He can't subtract from it either. That's Congress' job.

And how many of us have stopped to think that our liberal friends have had a majority in the House of Representatives for 52 of the last 56 years and in both Houses of Congress for 46 of those 56 years? And in all that time, there were only 8 scattered years in which the budget was balanced; the last time was 1969.

Over the years, I've asked Congress for many spending cuts that Congress with its liberal leadership has rejected. Add them all up, and they come to more than this year's entire budget deficit. Think of it: We could have wiped out a year of deficits if our liberal friends in Congress were as dedicated to reducing government spending as we are.

Of course, the liberal big spenders in Congress will tell you that they're for reducing the deficit and even for reducing spending. But somehow for them reduced spending always comes down to reduced defense spending. And time and again, when they've cut defense spending, it's just been a cover for spending more on their special interest programs. In 6 years, the liberal leadership in Congress cut defense spending authority by over $125 billion. And for every dollar they cut from defense outlays, they added $2 to domestic spending.

I've called on our liberal friends in Congress to admit their addiction to big spending and to give the President more tools to help him help them kick the habit. And that's why I've wanted a balanced budget amendment: to require them to live within their means. And it's why I've wanted a line-item veto for the President: so the President can go through the budget, lift out bad spending, item by item, and make Congress vote on it out in the open, not hidden with thousands of other items. That way, if the spending really is bad, you'll know about it, and your representatives will have to answer to you when they go home and ask for your vote.

You can see why the liberal congressional leadership is dead-set against the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto. They like things just as they are, although they act as if the first chance they get they'll find a way out of the discipline of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. I'm sorry to say that the Congress' liberal leadership still has one answer to everything: raise your taxes. And if they stay in control of the Congress, they just might find a way to raise them.

In the next 4 weeks, as you're thinking over how you'll vote this year, I wish you'd consider something else as well: Since we must ride two horses, Congress and the President, across every stream, shouldn't they both be going the same way? Why should we have a President who says no more taxes, and Congress have a liberal leadership that wants to tax and spend? Why should we have a President who's for a line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment, and Congress have a liberal leadership that's against both? If we don't want a tax-and-spend liberal in the White House, shouldn't we give the President we do want a Congress that will work with him? And when it comes to giving the next President a more receptive Congress, I hope you'll remember: If your Representative and Senator aren't part of the answer, you can be sure they're part of the problem.

Marcella Scully, Secretary Cavazos, and Dan Curtain -- just before I came out here, my good friend Cardinal Hickey took me to view the altar before which Archbishop Carroll celebrated Mass. I was deeply honored that Cardinal Hickey gave me the opportunity to see where that great American man of God worshiped.

America's first bishop was a scholar, a patriot, a good shepherd in our nation's founding years. Saint Thomas Aquinas once wrote about qualities that marked the character of Archbishop Carroll. ``Three things,'' he said, ``are necessary for the salvation of man: to know what he ought to believe, to know what he ought to desire, and to know what he ought to do.'' I have come here today as a temporal leader, a man concerned with the affairs of state and the course of the country. And yet I have come to tell you, my young friends, that in all my years of public life, I have found that what Aquinas tells us is necessary for the salvation of man is also necessary for the strength and happiness of nations.

I've found there are two kinds of people in this world: those absorbed in themselves and those who give love -- love to their families, to their friends, to their communities, to their country, and to God. Yes, we show love in many ways: by saying we love, of course, and by putting our arms around someone, but even more, by how we live, by our courtesy, by our integrity, by studying and preparing for the future, and by service to humanity. Add it all up, and you'd say: by our values.

And to take just one area -- education -- Catholic schools across America are showing that private virtue and public interest do indeed live together. Yes, you have two of the best schools in this city, and you're some of the best students in this city. And what's true of you -- how you stand out -- is also true of the students of Catholic schools in most cities. Isn't that because you're not only learning the ABC's but also about right and wrong, good and evil, and the nature of God's love?

Your prayers, your dress code, your religious studies, your service to your community -- all go hand in hand with your academic achievement. The public interest in your education depends on the private virtues you're learning, or as Aquinas might have said, it depends on you acquiring the elements of personal salvation.

It amazes me that while you're exploring the mysteries of God's love and all that goes with it and showing how this exploration goes hand in hand with getting a good education, others around our nation deny the public importance of the private virtues that you are mastering. If you can believe it, not long ago one State chapter of a national activist organization said that for public schools to teach the idea that fidelity in marriage is a traditional American value would be unconstitutional since, as they said, these values are rooted in religion.

Well, imagine what so many, denied the right to life, have missed. Imagine what we've all missed for their absence. Think of the cost to all of us because of the denial in public life of this most basic of values.

In no area is the importance of private virtue to the public interest clearer than in another area: the area of drug abuse. When we came into office 8 years ago, we found a drug epidemic that few in the Government seemed to care much about.

We started arresting and sending to jail drug dealers and drug kingpins in larger and larger numbers. In the last 8 years, Federal narcotics convictions have more than doubled, and we have seized tons of cocaine and tens of thousands of tons of marijuana. And there's other good news, too. After much prodding, pushing, and bludgeoning from us, a reluctant Congress is expected to pass a tough, new drug bill in the next few days. It would give our law enforcement officers new and better tools for helping them protect us all. And, to help protect the lives of the innocent, it would provide for the death penalty for those who commit murder in the course of a drug-related crime. I hope this means our liberal congressional friends are dropping their nostalgia for the do-your-own-thing-in-your-own-time-baby sixties and are joining us whole-heartedly in this fight against drugs.

You know something? While the number of drug users soared during the 4 years before we took office, it's dropping now. And earlier this year we got the best news of all: High school students are saying no to drugs, including cocaine, as never before.

But what Nancy has been saying to so many young people is what the priests, the nuns, and the teachers say to you each day: that you must have values to guide your lives. Too often values aren't taught, or can't be taught, in our public schools. But they are taught here. And may I say, because you're here, each of you is greatly privileged. But with each gift goes an obligation, and yours is to act as examples to your friends who aren't as fortunate to go to these schools and who may be tempted by those who would lead them astray.

So, this is my message to you, as a secular leader, but also as a man standing in humility before God: to seek what the Cardinal calls true freedom, to reach for what Aquinas called the necessities of salvation. For if you do, if these lessons become part of the instruction you carry with you when you end your studies here, America will be stronger; the world will be better; and there will be no limits to what, in this sweet land of liberty, you can do with your lives.

Let me just, if I can, say a few words on my own about this nation of ours. You know, I received a letter. We're quite unique. I received a letter from a man one day. He pointed out something I had never thought of. He said, ``You can go to live in France; you cannot become a Frenchman. You can go to live in Germany or Spain, and you cannot become a German or a Spaniard.'' And he went on, naming Japan, China, and other countries.

But he said, ``Anyone from any corner of the world can come to America and become an American.'' And this country is the only one you can say has that peculiar melding of people together, revealing as no other area ever has, that we are all the sons and daughters of God.

But I have always believed that there was some divine power and plan that placed this great continent between the two great oceans to be found only by people who had that extra love of freedom and that courage within their hearts to uproot themselves from their native land; leave, many times, family and friends; but to come here and to create this nation that we have created for ourselves here. I have to believe that that is true, just as I believe that Lincoln spoke the truth I've learned in these 8 years as never before when he said, ``I could not perform the functions of this office for 15 minutes if I did not know that I could call upon one who is stronger and wiser than all others.'' Thank you all. God bless you all.

Good afternoon, and thank you all for coming here. You know, maybe it'll sound a little like bragging, but I have to tell you, I really have a great job. [Laughter] And one of the reasons this is such a great job is that I get to preside at wonderful occasions like this one. We're all here today to present the Medal of Freedom to eight remarkable Americans. It's the highest civilian honor this nation can bestow, and those who are so honored have spent much of their lives advancing the cause of freedom around the world.

Like those who have come before, today's recipients are artists and statesmen, philosophers and academics, and people of action and profound introspection. Your lives and careers testify to a central truth of humanity: It is better to give than to receive. You've all given -- given of your talent and your energy and your resources -- because you know that the only way to fight injustice and promote freedom is to speak a resounding ``no'' to the forces of international complacency and a resounding ``yes'' to those whose souls thirst after the cool waters of liberty.

What your example -- and the examples of Mac Baldrige and J. Willard Marriott, who are watching us from a better place -- teach all of us is that fighting for what you believe in is not only good; it's fun. It's a pleasant experience to know you've done some good, maybe the most enjoyable experience we all have. You are all possessed of the good cheer and clear consciences of those who know they've done all they can for a cause they believe in.

The reward for good deeds does not only come in the hereafter, it comes every day in the knowledge that the world is maybe a little better because of the things you've done in your life. Well, we can't hope to top a feeling like that, but we do aim to add a little pleasure with the awards we give out today. And so, without further ado, I will now read the citations for the eight Medal of Freedom recipients of 1988. And as I start to read, you'll please come to the platform.

Cowboy, business executive, political activist, Cabinet Secretary -- Mac Baldrige was all of these and more. To every task and role, he brought the strength of his integrity and the power of his vision. In serving his country, he became an architect of our international economic policy. And yet, though he moved with Presidents, Prime Ministers, and Kings, he was always happiest with the kind of straight-talking cowboys who elected him to the Cowboy Hall of Fame. Malcolm Baldrige had uncommon accomplishments and character. He was a true embodiment of the American spirit.

As teacher, lawyer, Assistant Attorney General of the United States, and judge, Warren Burger proved his abiding love of the law. For 17 years, he served in the highest post on the highest court in the land as the 15th Chief Justice of the United States. Chief Justice Burger stepped down from the Supreme Court to lead our country in a bicentennial celebration of the Constitution -- one more act of devotion and distinction by Warren Earl Burger to the Republic he loves and serves so well.

The son of a humble Utah sheep rancher, J. Willard Marriott turned a small root beer stand in the Nation's Capital into one of America's largest and most successful businesses. Known for his vision, ingenuity, and hard work, J.

Dedicated to furthering the pursuit of scientific, technological, and human progress, devoted to his country and the cause of keeping her strong in a dangerous world, David Packard has served the American people effectively, generously, and proudly.

I have today signed H.J. Res. 602, which expresses congressional support for the restoration of a free and independent Cambodia, the withdrawal of Vietnamese troops from that country, and the protection of the Cambodian people from a return to power by the Khmer Rouge. I welcome this clear statement of principles on a subject on which we are all in agreement.

I note that the Resolution is properly cast in admonitory terms and accordingly must be interpreted as a nonbinding expression of the sense of the Congress. I disagree with the wording of certain clauses, which, as written, could complicate our efforts to work with other governments to achieve the objective we all seek: to prevent the Khmer Rouge from ever again being in a position of absolute authority from which to wage its rule of terror over the Cambodian people. I have, however, signed this legislation because it makes clear that the United States will continue to do everything possible to assure that the Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia is brought to an end and that effective guarantees are put into place to prevent the Khmer Rouge from ever again taking control of Cambodia.

I must, however, note that S. 908, like the Inspector General Act of 1978, raises certain constitutional concerns. Unless properly construed, the Act's reporting requirements could impermissibly interfere with the President's control over the deliberative processes of the Executive branch. For example, the disclosure of opposing views with respect to decisions at issue unnecessarily creates divisions within the Executive branch that could chill the frank exchange of views necessary to effective decision-making. Such requirements would conflict with the constitutional protection afforded the integrity and confidentiality of the internal deliberations of the Executive branch and the President's authority as head of the Executive branch to ``take care that the laws be faithfully executed,'' U.S. Const., art. II, sec. 3, and to coordinate and supervise his subordinates. I have signed S. 908 with the understanding that it will be implemented consistent with these constitutional principles.

The President. Well, I'm calling first of all -- I just have to tell you how much I'm impressed by all that you are doing up there in this effort on the whales and tell you that down here a great many of us are very concerned about that rescue operation and freeing those three mammals. And I've called, well, for one thing, to see if I could get an onsite report from you on the rescue effort and how it looks.

Carroll. Very good, sir. I'd just like to lead off by saying that there's a tremendous amount of people who put a lot of effort who appreciate the fact that you've taken the time from your schedule to call. And we'll make sure that everybody knows that that did happen. I know they'll be extremely pleased.

Carroll. I can give you a little bit of an update. Right now, of course, the environment is extremely harsh, and the hover barge that we are going to take over there to actually break the path through the ice has been sitting for quite some time -- over 2 years. And so, the major effort here by VECO, the company that actually owns the barge, has been to ensure that it's totally safe and free of any maintenance problems that might occur. And that's been somewhat of the holdup, because that kind of relates to the safety of the air crew that will actually be towing the barge over to the community of Barrow.

Carroll. That's correct. The helicopter is a CH - 54 skycrane, of course, one of a dying breed. And without the helicopter, this particular operation would be impossible. But really the operation is a conglomeration of private sector industry, ARCO, Standard Oil, VECO, and of course then the National Guard is in here. And we're pulling it together. And then additionally, there's a tremendous number of people in the communities of Barrow that -- from a Greenpeace organization to National Marine Fisheries -- that are really giving a hand. It's extremely moving when you see the interest that's been generated not only here but across the Nation.

The President. Well, I was going to say, yes, that it is. Television keeps us apprised, virtually on a daily basis, of the plight of the whales, and photographing them and all. But through this, we've become aware of how much all of you are doing up there, and I just want to tell you that everybody down here -- their hearts are with you and we just -- our prayers are also with you. And anything that we can say or do to help you along with the success of the operation, we'd be pleased to do it.

Carroll. Sir, I think that this phone call, believe it or not, related to the crews that are out there right now in the below-freezing weather, will make a substantial difference in their morale. This is the kind of thing that kind of makes it all worthwhile. And of course, the end product of hopefully saving those whales is going to really be the peak.

The President. Well, you can tell them all that we're very proud of all of you and what you're doing up there. And I'll let you get on with your rescue mission now. But just know that a great many people are praying for all of you.

Carroll. We appreciate it, sir. I'd like to just close the conversation with one thing: There's a couple of people that were really instrumental in the early stages of helping us out. And one is Senator Stevens, and the other was Governor Steve Cowper. And I'm not just saying that for any reason other than to just -- without them in the beginning helping all of the organizations -- the Greenpeace, the National Guard, and everybody else -- I don't think we'd be here today. And of course, your interest is extremely helpful.

The President. Thank you all very much. All right. And I thank you, George. Thank you for that very wonderful introduction. And a thank you to that great music of the Ohio State University Marching Band and the Pikerington High School Band.

The President. And you know, when I was a pledge, I was told that Tau Kappa Epsilon was a fraternity for life. And let me also say hello to another group I take a kind of a personal interest in. And you know, I've heard all the way to Washington that here at Ohio State the College Republicans give -- [applause] -- well, I didn't get to finish the sentence. I hear the College Republicans here give the best party on campus.

Well, it's great to be back in Ohio and here at the home of what, over the years, has always been a football team with the heart to keep fighting -- the way a certain friend of mine has done since August when he, too, was a few games down and came up with a winning season -- one of the great football teams in America, the Buckeyes. And speaking of great athletes, there's someone here who brought home both the silver and the gold, Ohio's Olympic champion, Butch Reynolds.

You know, I watched a certain debate the other night. I don't often feel sorry for liberals, but I came close. I couldn't help thinking the problem with those fellows on the other side is not camera angles or lighting. It's not whether their candidate is likable or not.

Well, you know the facts and so do the American people. Our liberal friends have spent the last 3 months trying to dress up their agenda in our clothes, but somehow nothing fits. When they say ``opportunity,'' they mean subsidies. When they say ``reducing the deficit,'' they mean raising taxes. And when they say ``strong defense,'' they mean cut defense spending. No wonder their favorite machine is the snowblower. [Laughter] They talk about it being time for a change. Where have they been the last 8 years? We are the change. We began the change 8 years ago. And the choice this year is to go forward with the change or to go back to the stagnant status quo of the past.

George Bush and I took office, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. High taxes and runaway regulations had driven our economy to its knees with a 1 - 2 - 3 combination of inflation, economic stagnation, and unemployment. We turned that around.

Today we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion ever recorded. We're exporting more than ever before in our history. And a greater proportion of Americans and a greater number of Americans are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

Would you let me just qualify that statement here and tell you what that means and what I mean? It seems that the statisticians have determined that everyone, male and female, from the age 16 and up, are considered the potential employment pool. That means that all of you, in spite of the fact that you're going to be here getting an education and perhaps going on to a post-education -- this doesn't discount or leave out the people that have retired and are out there on the golf course or someplace else -- but everybody in the United States 16 of age and up, is considered the employment pool. Well, now, listen to this: 62.7 percent of that population I've just described is employed in this country today.

Now, you may have heard the liberals talk about a smaller middle class, and it's true: The middle class is getting proportionately smaller, but not because a greater proportion of our people are poor. That just isn't so. No, it's because more people in the middle class group are moving up and becoming so well off.

Now, think of what reducing the prime interest rate by over half means to young families seeking to purchase a new home. Think of what reducing inflation to a third of what it was means to families seeking to protect their life savings.

It's a good time to begin a career and maybe get married to that special someone and start a family. And perhaps now, or in a few years, you'll want to start your own business. It's a great time for that, too. Think of how lucky you are not to have graduated in the classes of '79 or '80 when things were different. But also think of how lucky you are to be graduating in our country and not some other one.

The President. Yes, what you heard in a recent debate I've heard echoed in my talks with the leaders of many other nations: Today the United States of America is the envy of the world. Yes, we've come a long way in the last 8 years, but, my friends, everything that you and I and George Bush have worked for these last 8 years, everything, could be lost faster than you can say the Pledge of Allegiance. The liberals talk about reaching for the center, but from the economy to national defense, they've taken positions that only a McGovern could love.

Yes, it's the same old liberal agenda they're pushing: less defense and more big government. For example, as part of their so-called profamily agenda, they propose Federal child-care assistance. A little while ago, I told an audience that under this proposal, if parents want assistance and they also want to leave their child with his or her grandmother the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

The President. And they say their era will be just beginning. Let me ask you something, and could you give me an answer loud enough so they can hear it all the way to Boston: Come January, do you want Washington run by those whose only pledge of allegiance is to more government and more spending and who have never let the taxpayers' dollars out on furlough?

The President. Do you want our foreign policy in the hands of those who criticized our rescue mission in Grenada and our strike on Libya and who always, always, blame America first? I guess what I'm asking is: Do you want the liberals in control in Washington?

Hear me out. I just want to tell you that once I am a civilian again I intend to get out on the mashed-potato circuit, talking about some of the things we've been trying to do. And one of the things that I'm going to suggest to the American people is that they demand the erasing of that amendment because it is an infringement on the peoples' rights to vote for who they want to vote, for as long as they want to vote.

President -- ours is a system of three equal branches of government. Two branches, Congress and the President, are chosen by election, and the third branch, the courts, is chosen by the other two. When you vote for a candidate for the Senate or the House, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you vote for President.

Think about the deficit -- something our liberal friends like to talk about. What they aren't as eager to tell you is that the President can't spend one dime of the Government's money. Only Congress can decide how much the Government spends, and only Congress can pass spending bills. In fact, it's against the law for the President to spend a penny more or a penny less than Congress directs him to spend. The President can't add to the deficit, nor can he subtract from it. Do you realize that they're so tight on that, that even if one of our bureaus and agencies which we've been reducing in size and cost, increasing in efficiency -- if they come in at the end of the year with less money spent than the original appropriation, they can't use that to pay on the deficit. The Congress says they have to go out and spend that money on something.

You may have guessed, I feel strongly about giving George Bush a Congress in which he has more friends than he had on that Pacific Island where he was shot down during World War II. Yes, we've accomplished much these last 8 years, but we could have accomplished even more -- including, I believe, balancing the budget -- if both Houses of Congress had been friendly. So, with the liberal Presidential campaign starting to fall apart, shouldn't we ask: If we must ride two horses, Congress and the President, across every stream, shouldn't they both be going the same way?

The President. You just made my day again. I mentioned voting a few moments ago. And earlier this year I had the privilege of doing something I never thought an American President would be able to do. I stood in the Lenin Hills and spoke to the students in Moscow State University about the glories of individual freedom. Now, think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them have influence on the course of history that each American has by just walking into the voting booth.

I'm just going to tell you a little story. I've gotten in the habit lately -- some of the fellows with the cameras back there know this -- I have started collecting jokes which I can absolutely prove are jokes made up in Russia and are told among the Russian people, usually about their system. And one of them -- I'll just tell you one little one here because you've all been so kind about me.

Well, it's great to be back in Bowling Green. Today I'm here for a very special reason: Because I want to talk to you about a friend of mine, the next President of the United States, George Bush. For 8 years, together we've worked to get America growing and on the move again, to make the United States once again what it should always be: the great moral and material arsenal of democracy, a light unto the nations and champion of freedom around the world. For 8 years, George Bush and I have worked side by side in the White House, during times of crisis and times of historic triumph and achievements. I've come to know George very well. And I also know what is required to be President of the United States, what is required of the man at the desk; and, ladies and gentlemen, George Bush is that man.

When we took office 8 years ago, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. We turned that around, and since our expansion began, we've created over 18 million new jobs, reduced the unemployment rate to a 14-year low, and presided over the greatest flowering of new businesses and new technology in the history of the world. As a matter of fact, for every business that closes in America, six new ones open. And today a greater proportion of our potential work force is employed than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

Let me explain that term ``potential employment pool.'' It comes from the statisticians, and I had to learn what it is. Everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up, all the way, is considered that potential pool. Well, today, thinking of all the millions who are in school getting an education, who are 16, 17, 18 years old, all of those who've retired and all -- 62.7 percent of that group have jobs today; and that's the first time we've reached that in the history of this century.

The President. Well, thank you. Of course, you know, the liberals still don't understand how we were able to get rid of their economic crisis, their ``malaise'' -- remember that term -- their inflation, their gas lines. So, in this campaign they're treating the good times as if they're a given. Their message is: You can take prosperity for granted. It's time for a change, so take a chance on us. Well, that's sort of like someone telling you that you stored up all the cold beer you could want, so now it's time to unplug the refrigerator. But whether it's a well-stocked refrigerator or our economic policies, you can't unplug what's working and expect things to stay the same.

Now, what we've done with the economy is very important, and it must continue. But what we believe in is much more than that. Our greatest treasure as a nation is our precious moral heritage, the basic values of faith and family that makes ours a great nation. It's the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, that serves as the cradle of our country's soul. Yes, ladies and gentlemen, the family is the bedrock of our nation.

There really are only two things the liberals don't understand: the things that change and the things that don't. The economy, technology -- these things change. But America's basic moral and spiritual values -- they don't change.

And we've appointed serious-minded judges who respect the Constitution and know the meaning of the word punishment. Violent crime has fallen significantly since 1981 because we put criminals on notice: Make a false move, and the next sound you hear is the clang of a jail cell door slamming shut. George and I also believe that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should receive the death penalty.

Besides fighting crime and restoring our economy, we also went to work on our nation's defenses. We're once again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

But none of this, my friends, none of this could have happened if the liberals had their way. There would have been no INF treaty or rollback in Afghanistan or democratic revolutions around the globe. They opposed rebuilding our military defenses.

They opposed the deployment of the missiles in Europe to counter the Soviet threat. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

And I think you already know his record of achievement as Vice President -- how he led the task force to cut away excess regulation. Do you know that that task force eliminated so many Federal regulations that you, the people of America, in the communities and the State governments, have now seen a reduction of 600 million man-hours a year in paperwork that you once had to fill out -- and it made for prosperity and millions of new jobs -- or how he worked with our allies to strengthen NATO, to make the INF treaty possible, and to make this a safer world; or how, well before the liberals suddenly discovered the drug problem, he launched a major and successful offensive against drug smuggling that last year alone succeeded in blocking a record 70 tons of cocaine from reaching our communities?

I can tell you about is the man that I know personally; a man who is strong, decent, loyal, wise, capable, and compassionate; a man who has the qualities necessary to fill the office of President: that man is George Bush. And on November 8th, I hope Ohio helps make him the next President of the United States.

The President. All right. But there's even more that we must do. You know, I'm a former Democrat. And it's often said that the once-proud Democratic Party of Franklin Delano Roosevelt and Harry Truman is dead and gone; that the Democratic Party has been taken over by the left; that the departure from the mainstream, which we began to see at the 1968 convention, now defines the party at the national level, especially the liberal leadership in Congress. But there's something you should know: the party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman couldn't be killed.

The party that represents people like you and me, that represents the majority of Americans, that party hasn't disappeared. The fact is, we are stronger than ever. You see, the secret is that when the left took over the leadership of the Democratic Party, we took over the Republican Party. We made the Republican Party into the party of working people; the family; the neighborhood; the defense of freedom; and, yes, ``one nation under God.'' So, you see, the party that so many of us grew up with still exists, except today it's called the Republican Party. And I'm asking all of the traditional mainstream Democrats to come home and join me. And that's why George's opponent appeared stagestruck last week, because -- it's true -- he's on the liberal political fringe.

You know, I cast my first vote in 1932 for Franklin Delano Roosevelt. And let me tell you that apropos of what I have said, there was a difference. It was the Republican Party then that believed in protectionism and foisted off the Smoot-Hawley tariff that made the Depression so great. But Roosevelt's platform that he ran on in '32 was to cut the cost of the Federal Government by 25 percent, to restore autonomy and authority to the local communities and States from which it had been unjustly seized, as he said, by the Federal Government. Well, now which party does that represent? That has to be our party, the Republican Party, that is saying that. And the Republican Party is now the party of free trade and low tariffs -- free and fair trade. Those are the things we've been doing and are trying to do.

The President. But that's what he's been doing in Congress for the last 8 years. Keeping the liberal Democrats in control of Congress is a certain formula for governmental gridlock and political paralysis. So, when you vote for George Bush and Dan Quayle at the top of the ticket, will you also vote for George Voinovich for the Senate and for Paul Gillmor for Congress? It takes the President and Congress working together to move America forward. So, if we have to ride two horses at once, shouldn't they both be headed in the same direction?

You see, the opposition has gotten so far away from the mainstream, it's tilting so far to the left, that they're about to take the biggest tumble since Humpty-Dumpty fell off the wall -- [laughter] -- and I don't think they'll put the pieces back together again. So, that's what's on the line this year and why the thousands of you here today -- every one of you -- has a responsibility to get the truth out all across the Buckeye State.

I thought I'd like to take a public opinion poll, so, let me ask you: When you've got a Senator from Ohio who has opposed the balanced budget amendment, the line-item veto, the MX missile, and the Strategic Defense Initiative; but favors higher taxes and special-interest spending, and who gets perfect liberal ratings from liberal Washington lobbyists, tell me: Is this the man the good people of the Buckeye State want to represent their views and values in Washington?

The President. And you know, when I hear them in this campaign blaming me for the deficit -- and I have to remember the President of the United States can't spend a dime; only Congress can spend money. And you remember those figures -- 54 out of 56, 46 out of 48, or 56 -- let me also remind you that in all that more than half a century there have only been 8 scattered years when the budget was balanced.

Now, before I go, there are a couple of things I want to say. One, first of all, I didn't at the beginning mention, but I know there are six bands here. And having been the drum major of a boys band in Dixon, Illinois, I know what it means to come out and to contribute as you have, and I think we're all grateful to you for that. And then the second thing I just wanted to say is that I've been hearing some voices from the flanks out there. Am I right that they were kind of disagreeing with what I was saying? They were? Well, you know, I hope one day that they will be reminded that if maybe they had the kind of government they want they wouldn't be able to come and heckle the way they're doing now.

Well, all right. This has been wonderful. And I know I've got to move on because I'm going to do some more of this before the day is over, in other places, but all of them in Ohio. Thank you all, and God bless you all.

You know, the Government's got quite an employee there -- the First Lady -- for no salary. But I thought it might -- I can tell you, I'm very proud of her and the cause that she is speaking -- or addressing herself to throughout the country.

George and Janet may be a little lonely, but they know and you know and I know that if they're seeing a little less of each other these days, it's for a very good cause. And I'm here because I want to help.

But as you all know, there are two Georges running this year in Ohio, and they share much more than just a name. The two Georges have the same values: the bedrock principles of family and home and community and country. The two Georges have the same goals: keeping government off the backs of the American people, keeping taxes down, and keeping this nation strong and at peace. They stand opposed to the forces of weakness, accommodation, gloom and doom. The two Georges stand as proud defenders and promoters of a vibrant economy, limited central government, strong national defense, and the American system and the American people.

Yes, ladies and gentlemen, I say it again: There are two Georges this year. And I don't know of a better, more able, and more principled public servant than the man who's going to be the next Senator from the State of Ohio: George Voinovich. When he became mayor of Cleveland in 1979, George found the city treasury mired in debt to the tune of $111 million. On June 25, 1987, he paid off the last of that debt. A lot of people said it couldn't be done, but they didn't understand that George Voinovich is the ``Charlie Hustle'' of Ohio politics. That kind of accomplishment is what we need from our politicians in Washington, the guys who spend and spend and spend the taxpayers' hard-earned money and then have the nerve to go on television on those Sunday morning shows and complain that there's a budget deficit.

The only way the President can get Congress to spend less money is to veto those pork-barrel bills that have so much packed into them they end up thicker than the New York City phone book. Ladies and gentlemen, that ain't legislation: It's extortion of the taxpayers' money.

But the clash between liberals like George's opponent and mainstream America -- it's about much more than spending. It's a clash of vision, of philosophies. George Voinovich's opponent has a great deal in common with George Bush's opponent. That's why a liberal lobby that counts these things gave him a perfect 100-percent liberal rating. Well, when the liberals give a politician that kind of unqualified thumbs up and the voters of Ohio find out about it, I think they're going to give him a thumbs down.

On issue after issue, liberals like Ohio's premier liberal have made it clear that their values are not the values of the American people and the great Buckeye State. George and George believe we must protect the lives of those who protect us: the noble men and women who serve in State and local police. And what do the liberals -- the Massachusetts liberal and the Ohio liberal -- believe?

They oppose the death penalty, or at least the Ohio liberal did until this election. He had a sudden change of heart and decided to support it for drug kingpins. How's that for political opportunism? Who knows what he would support next year? With George Voinovich and George Bush, there is no question. They believed before, they believe now, and they will continue to believe a crack dealer who murders a police officer in the line of duty should receive death as his punishment. And I agree.

A difference in values -- that explains why the liberals sometimes seem to care more about the rights of criminals than the rights of honest and law-abiding Americans. You see, they oppose legislation that would allow reliable evidence obtained reasonably and in good faith by our police to be used in criminal prosecutions. That's the kind of position they take on crime, and they're just plain wrong to invoke the Constitution when they take it. I don't see a word in the Constitution that says crooks should go free because of a technical error; but that's what George Voinovich's opponent was saying when, until this election year, he repeatedly argued against giving police the benefit of a reasonable good-faith exception.

Now, let me give an example, if I could, of what I'm talking about here and what maybe too many people don't understand: This thing of ``in good faith'' -- a policeman, a law officer, does something and then finds that some technicality was not observed, and so the evidence that he has found cannot be used. The example I'll give you happened in my State, California -- San Bernardino.

There was a policeman who had enough evidence on a couple living in a home there to get a warrant to search that home for drugs, that these were drug peddlers. He had the warrant. He came in; said, ``drug enforcement officer''; and went through the home, as best he could, searching everywhere, and found nothing.

And on his way out the door, suddenly, he realized there was their baby in the crib, and he stopped. And he took off the baby's diaper, and there was the heroin, stashed away. In court, they threw it out as evidence and freed the two people because the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched. It's now known in California, and throughout much of the country, as the diaper case.

He changed jobs. I ran into him very closely when I first came into this job. He switched to the Secret Service, and I'm glad to have him. But I thought that you might like to know this is the type of thing -- you know, it's almost like -- I've explained it sometimes as an automobile going through a red light, and the policeman stops it for going through the red light and sees a murdered body in the back seat. He can't claim that as evidence because he only stopped him for going through a red light.

Well, when you examine their views on foreign policy and defense, the differences between them -- between the Georges and the American people -- I mean -- no, the other two, the Georges' opponents and the American people, become even more clear. They've opposed our efforts to modernize and enhance our national security. How about the deployment of American intermediate-range missiles in Europe, the very missiles that made our INF treaty a reality? Ohio's liberal supported the nuclear freeze that would have locked in Soviet nuclear superiority. How about the MX missile? Nine times his vote was no. How about this administration's efforts to protect America from nuclear attack?

Earlier today, I said we're going to do all we can to make sure that people don't cancel their vote for George Bush by reelecting diehard liberals to Congress and sending them to Washington to make more trouble and spend more money and try to raise taxes. One example of a qualified conservative who should replace one of those liberals is, as you well know, right here in this room: the Republican congressional candidate from the First District, a great guy who'd make a great representative, Steve Chabot.

We've got to get this message out. The party leaders up here with me have raised a lot of money and worked hard for our ticket this year. And they need your help in these remaining 3 weeks. I can't think of a better or more able crew to spread the message and fill the polling places on November 8th than the Hamilton County Republican Party.

I know that I'm keeping you from your dinner, and so that's what I get for being a before-dinner speaker. [Laughter] And I just want to recognize all that you two are doing by being here. And I have every confidence that you're going to go all the way. And on November 8th, we're all going to be aglow with victory. I thank you all, and God bless you all.

The very concept of Drug-Free America Week, 1988, reminds us of how far we have advanced in our thinking and actions in the fight to stop illegal drugs. Most people now understand that illegal drug use brings illness, disability, and death. The illegal drug user costs our Nation billions of dollars in lost productivity each year, while undermining our economy and threatening our national security. Drugs ruin lives and destroy families and prey on our young people. Americans everywhere recognize the real and present danger of illegal drug use.

Drug-Free America Week, we will continue to spread the messages that there is no safe use of illegal drugs; that illegal drug use is simply unacceptable anywhere in America; and that we will pursue the fight against illegal drugs, in our homes and schools and in our communities and factories. We will seek and take every opportunity to oppose the presence and use of illegal drugs. We will hold drug dealers and users responsible and accountable for the plague of illegal drugs.

American has a right to live in a drug-free family, to dwell in a drug-free community, to learn in a drug-free school, to earn a living in a drug-free workplace, and to travel on drug-free roads, waterways, railways, and airways.

We should be pleased with the progress we have made together as Americans -- in strong law enforcement against drug criminals, in international cooperation to reduce drug production and smuggling, in research to learn more about drugs and what works in treatment, and in education and prevention. Each of these important gains is a battle won in the war against drugs. We have started a crusade for a Drug-Free America. We must maintain awareness of the drug threat and continue the fight until illegal drugs are only a bad memory.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

As we examine the international situation today, we find a world with greater prospects for freedom, justice, and peace than even a year ago. Share in the credit surely goes to the United Nations for its work as a facilitator in resolving regional conflicts.

We can all be grateful for the progress being made on U.N. reform. A more efficient and streamlined organization can better focus on the real problems that shatter the peace and cause human suffering in too many regions. We can be grateful as well for the service and sacrifices of the members of the U.N.

Tribute is also in order to the life-saving mission of the World Health Organization (WHO), which celebrates its 40th anniversary this year. In the past 4 decades, the WHO has led the fight to eradicate smallpox, fostered vital work toward a vaccine against malaria, and worked to reduce the tragedy of preventable childhood deaths through universal immunization, oral rehydration therapy, and other activities. The WHO is now battling the Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) around the globe. In these ways, the WHO exemplifies the finest traditions of United Nations specialized agencies.

Despite differences in language, training, cultural background, and politics, people from many nations are cooperating to bring the blessings of health and safety to everyone -- proof of the difference the U.N. can make for all.

The many other technical and specialized agencies of the United Nations achieve much as well. The International Labor Organization, the U.N. Industrial Development Organization, the International Civil Aviation Organization, the International Atomic Energy Agency, and the Food and Agriculture Organization are some of the agencies that seek to serve humanity's needs.

This failure permits the unauthorized copying of pharmaceutical products and processes that were invented by U.S. firms. I directed the United States Trade Representative to hold public hearings on products of Brazil that were appropriate candidates for increased duties or other import restrictions, and those hearings were held September 8 and 9, 1988. I have further determined, pursuant to section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended by the Omnibus Trade and Competitiveness Act of 1988, that appropriate and feasible action in response to Brazil's unreasonable policies and practices is to impose increased duties of 100 percent ad valorem on certain imported articles that are the products of Brazil.

Section 301 of the Act as amended authorizes appropriate and feasible action within the power of the President to obtain the elimination of an act, policy, or practice of a foreign government that is inconsistent with the provisions of, or otherwise denies benefits to the United States under, a trade agreement; or is unjustifiable, unreasonable, or discriminatory and burdens or restricts U.S. commerce. Section 301 authorizes the suspension, withdrawal, or prevention of the application of benefits of trade agreement concessions with respect to, and the imposition of duties or other import restrictions on the products of, such foreign country for such time as is appropriate. Pursuant to section 301, such actions may be taken on a nondiscriminatory basis or solely against the products of the foreign country involved.

The United States Trade Representative is authorized to suspend, modify, or terminate the increased duties imposed by this Proclamation upon publication in the Federal Register of his determination that such action is in the interest of the United States.

The modifications to the TSUS made by Annex I to this Proclamation are effective with respect to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after the 10th day after the date of signature of this Proclamation.

The President. Thank you very much, and, Governor Jim, thank you very much. And a very good morning to all of you. And having had a few minutes here to look at some of the signs, there's a lot of talent here that could be used on political commercials. And a special hello to Jim Broyhill and Jim Holshouser, Jesse Helms, Jack Hawke, and Jim Gardner.

Well, that's in the past now. North Carolina is a leader, a pathfinder, as this country travels down the road toward the future. And I'm here to help that future along, from the statehouse to the courthouse. Because what North Carolina has been teaching this nation is that the future has an honest face, a good face, a conservative face.

Congress that seeks to enhance our strength at home and abroad. And that, my friends, means a more conservative Congress. And on November 8th, that goal will be met when the great people of North Carolina go to the polls and send great congressional candidates like Tom Fetzer and Lyons Gray, Ted Blanton and Charles Taylor to Washington.

Let me explain something that perhaps many of you might not be aware of. You know, the figure for the rate of unemployment -- well, of course, there are always people between jobs or looking for a new one, or new entrants into the job force -- but that isn't the figure that counts. The so-called potential employment pool in the United States is considered to be everyone, male and female, from age 16 on up, all the way. That is what they consider the potential pool. Well, for the first time in our history, 62.7 percent of that body of citizenry are employed in jobs in the United States today.

Of course, you know that the Research Triangle Park is also home to one of our most distinguished Americans. And just this week -- I know he is here in the place today -- he was awarded the Nobel Prize for Medicine. And he's with us here: Dr. George Hitchings.

And now, what we've done with the economy is very important, and it must continue, but what we believe in is much more than that. Our greatest treasure as a nation is our precious moral heritage, the basic values of faith and family that make ours a great nation. It's the power of the family that holds the nation together and that gives America her conscience and that serves as the cradle of our country's soul.

I've often said there really are only two things the liberals don't understand: the things that change and the things that don't change. [Laughter] The economy, technology -- these things change. But America's basic moral and spiritual values -- they don't change.

Make a false move and the next sound you hear is the clang of a jail cell door closing. George Bush and I also believe that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should receive the death penalty. If you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us -- our State and local police. And George Bush and I stand behind them.

They opposed the deployment of the missiles in Europe to counter that Soviet threat. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

Truman is dead and gone; that the Democratic Party has been taken over by the left; that the departure from the mainstream, which we began to see at their 1968 convention, now defines the party at the national level, especially the liberal leadership in Congress. But there's something you should know. The party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman couldn't be killed. The party that represents people like you and me, that represents the majority of Americans -- this party hasn't disappeared. The fact is, we're stronger than ever.

You see, the secret is that when the left took over the Democratic Party leadership, we took over the Republican Party. We made the Republican Party into the party of working people; the family; the neighborhood; the defense of freedom; and, yes, ``one nation under God.'' So, you see, the party that so many of us grew up with still exists, except today it's called the Republican Party. And I'm asking all of you to come home and join me.

I say come home because the liberal leadership in Washington has replaced the idea of checks and balances with a philosophy of adversarial government. Now, when they lose in the national election, they fight a political guerrilla war for the next 4 years to block the policies that the American people have chosen at the ballot box. That's what the liberal Democrats have been doing in Congress for the last 8 years. Keeping the liberal Democrats in control of Congress is a certain formula for governmental gridlock and political paralysis.

So, that's what's on the line this year and why the thousands of you here today -- each and every one of you -- have a responsibility to get the truth out all across the Tarheel State. Ladies and gentlemen, America needs the strength, the vision, and the true grit of George Bush, Jim Martin, and the ``Tiptop Tarheel Seven.'' Express '88 is ready to leave the station, and it's time to tell all of America to come aboard.

I'm going to stick my neck out here and say something that maybe would have you think I'm sticking my nose in your business. But having been a Governor for 8 years, and having had the advantage of the line-item veto -- which I used 932 times and was never overridden once -- I have a suggestion for all of you: Get these people I've mentioned here by name in office and get to the point where you can add a little something to your Governor's power and give him, first of all, the right of veto itself, which he presently does not have. And then you can stick that other line in front of it about ``line-item'' also. So far we haven't been able to get it.

The President. All right. I once said that he's a great Vice President, but I know and I've seen that didn't come easily. George Bush is a man of action; he's a man accustomed to command. And the Vice Presidency doesn't fit easily on such a man. But George Bush is also a patriot. And so, he made it fit, and he served with a distinction that no one has ever matched.

He cares that the courts won't allow children in public schools to open their day with a simple, silent, voluntary prayer. He believes that we must have judges on our courts who interpret the law and don't try to legislate, and who care not just about the rights of criminals but about those of the victims of crime. And that's why the man I want to be the next President of the United States is George Bush.

The President. Bush, '88. All right. But as I listened to George Bush and his opponent debate, I couldn't help thinking: The problem with those fellows on the other side is not camera angles or lighting. It's not whether this campaign is trying desperately to hide -- or I mean, is likable or not. No, it is the very thing that I just said, that they've spent this campaign trying desperately to hide.

But you know, the American people always have a way of figuring out the facts. It kind of reminds me of a story. At my age, everything reminds you of a story. [Laughter] It was about one of our intelligence agents.

When they say ``reducing the deficit,'' they mean ``raising taxes.'' When they say ``strong defense,'' they mean ``cut defense spending.'' No wonder their favorite machine is the snowblower. They talk about it being time for a change. Well, where have they been the last 8 years? We are the change. We began it 8 years ago, and the choice this year is to go forward with that change or to go back to the stagnant status quo of the past.

The President. When George Bush and I took office, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. High taxes and runaway regulations were driving America's families to their knees, pounding them with a 1 - 2 - 3 combination of inflation, economic stagnation, and unemployment. We turned that around. Since our expansion began, we've created over 18 million new jobs. That's more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined. Today we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion ever recorded. We're exporting more than ever before in our history. And a greater proportion of our potential work force and a greater number of Americans are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

You know, we hear so much about the unemployment rate. Well, of course, there are always going to be people between jobs or people that are just coming into the job market and so forth. That isn't the important figure. When I use that term ``potential work force,'' that's what the statisticians use. Their definition is that everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up, all the way to the top, including the retired people and all -- that is their term, what they mean by their term, the ``potential work force.'' And today, thinking of all of you who are still in school and all, but who are in that age group -- the millions throughout the country -- 62.7 percent of that group have jobs today in the United States.

Yes, think of what reducing the prime interest rate, as we have, by over half means to young families seeking to purchase a new home. Think of what reducing inflation to a third of what it was means to families seeking to protect their life savings. And think of what our tax reduction program has meant to families, most of whom now pay a top rate of 15 percent. And think of what all this means to you. When you leave school, there'll be jobs and opportunities waiting for you. It's a good time to begin a career and maybe get married to that special someone and start a family. Perhaps now or in a few years, you'll want to start your own business. Well, it's a great time for that, too.

The President. Well, thank you. You know that for every business that has to close up shop and quit today, six new ones go into business and start. Think of how lucky you are not to have graduated in the class of '79, when things looked so different. Think of how lucky you are to be graduating in our country and not some other one. Yes, what you heard in a recent debate I've often echoed in my talks with the leaders of many other nations -- I've heard that, I should say, in those talks. Today the United States of America is the envy of the world.

Not long ago, former Defense and Energy Secretary James Schlesinger, who has served both in Democratic and Republican administrations, wrote that their ticket this year seems to be, in his words, ``viscerally antimilitary.'' They'd cut out the B - 1 bomber, the mobile MX, the Midgetman missile, our strategic defense against ballistic missiles, and eliminate two carrier battle groups from the Navy. In fact, what they plan for the Navy is so bad that by the time they get through, Michael may have to row the boat ashore.

Our opponents talk about wanting a conventional defense initiative to improve our conventional armaments -- as if it were something new, and supporting it shows that they support a strong defense. What they never say is that we started the conventional defense initiative more than 4 years ago.

The only difference between what they would do and what we're doing is that they want to cut the budget for the conventional defense initiative. You know, sometimes I wish that someone would tell our opponents that the men and women who fly the planes, stand guard at the outposts, and drive the tanks of the Nation are engaged in the deadly serious business of defending freedom. They're not in a game for leftwing politicians to play slight of hand with. We're too proud of the men and women who wear the uniform of the United States of America to let that happen.

For example, as part of their so-called profamily agenda, they propose Federal child-care assistance. A little while ago, I told another audience that under this proposal, if parents want assistance and they also want to leave their child with his or her grandmother, the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

The President. They have opposed the death penalty and opposed mandatory sentences for drug dealers. They believe that directing teachers to lead classes in the Pledge of Allegiance is unconstitutional. And they have already voted to strike down a ban on child pornography.

Now, our friends on the other side have promised that come January ``the Reagan era is over,'' and they say their era will be just beginning. Well, let me ask you something. And could you give me an answer loud enough so they can hear it all the way to Boston? Come January, do you want Washington run by those whose only pledge of allegiance is to more government, more spending, and who have never let the taxpayers' dollars out on furlough?

The President. You know, despite what the press is saying, this election campaign is not over. The only poll that means a thing is the one on election day. And that's why it's so important for you to vote. It's disturbing to me that so many of America's young people now old enough to vote don't show up at the polls and vote. With so many years ahead, you have a big stake in the election. Earlier this year, I had the privilege of doing something I never thought an American President would be able to do. I spoke to students in Moscow about the glories of freedom. Think of it: Those students at the University of Moscow -- only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any one of them have influence on the course of history that each American has by just walking into the voting booth.

And you know, you've let me know how you feel about Bush, but let me just say something else. All those other offices, for State offices, local, and those for the Congress, the House of Representatives and the Senate, and what must be done for them -- just think of this: Most people just haven't caught on and aren't aware that in the last 56 years, the other party has had control of the House of Representatives for 54 -- or 52, I should say, of those 56 years. And they've had control of both Houses of the Congress for 46 of those 56 years. I was fortunate enough to have 6 years of the Senate on our side, or we couldn't have done the things that we've done. So, everything is important. It doesn't make any sense to send a President up there because you agree in what he has proposed doing and then continue to send people up in the Congress who are dedicated to opposing everything that he said he'd do.

Reagan proposed such a conference in his speech at the U.N. on September 26, calling on all concerned nations to consider actions we might take together to reverse the erosion of respect for the existing norms against the illegal use of chemical weapons. Recent expressions of support for the idea of holding this Conference by nations from various regions indicate that many others share our concern. We hope that nations attending the Conference will reaffirm their political commitment to comply with existing prohibitions on chemical weapons use. We also invite those nations which have not done so to adhere to the 1925 Geneva protocol. The purpose of the Conference is neither to change the Geneva protocol in any way nor to single out any country for its previous actions.

United States remains committed to the negotiation of a comprehensive, effectively verifiable, and truly global ban on chemical weapons. Such a ban would be the best solution to the threat posed by illegal chemical weapons use and proliferation. We hope the participants in the Conference will express their support for the continuing negotiations for a ban at the 40-nation Geneva Conference on Disarmament.

United States welcomes the action by the Government of France to host the Conference and will make every effort to ensure that it succeeds. Secretary of State Shultz will lead the U.S. delegation to the Conference.

Annual Report, which includes a recent actuarial valuation, indicates an improved financial outlook for the rail pension fund, due in part to a 2 percentage point increase in the rail sector contribution rate. The Congress enacted this increase based on an Administration proposal and a recommendation by the Railroad Retirement Board's Chief Actuary. I hope we can continue to work together in the future to protect rail pensioners' benefits.

Congress also enacted a $370 million taxpayer subsidy for the rail pension fund at the urging of rail sector representatives. Since 1983, over $3.5 billion of Federal funds have been given to the rail pension fund. It is time to put an end to this tap on the taxpayer. Under current law, the subsidy will expire in 1989. I urge the Congress to hold the rail industry to its pledge to fund rail pensions fully without Federal taxpayer support by allowing this subsidy to expire at that time.

Congress has also asked for a study by a panel of rail sector representatives and independent experts regarding rail pension reform proposals. I urge the panelists, including the rail sector representatives, to adhere to the Congress's wish, as expressed in the charter and in the report language, that the Commission focus on putting rail pensions on a sound long-term track financed solely from rail sector resources and not on palliatives involving new taxpayer subsidies.

The best approach to rail pension reform is to restore the rail pension system to the private sector, where all other private pension plans reside. The Administration recently transmitted to the Congress the Rail Industry Pension Restoration Act of 1988, which would restore control over rail pensions to rail labor and management. The bill would allow labor and management to collectively bargain their pension plan free from inappropriate Federal intrusion. Current retirees' pensions and the earned benefits of current workers would be protected. Over time, rail pensions would be fully funded in advance of retirement like other industry pension plans.

October 22, is the 50th anniversary of Chester F. Carlson's invention of xerographic printing, which has transformed our ability to copy documents quickly. By inventing and developing this process, Carlson did much to increase productivity and efficiency throughout society and to make information more readily available. The profound and enduring achievements of this second-generation American exemplify our national spirit of ingenuity and opportunity, and we can all gladly celebrate them.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Lincoln once said, ``you can't fool all of the people all of the time.'' Well, this week our liberal friends have been trying to prove him wrong. They've charged that our record of lowering your taxes, ending runaway inflation, and igniting the longest peacetime economic expansion ever has been bad for middle class, working Americans. Well, it's time to remind them of a few facts.

Our liberal friends have been hopping around the country charging that real family income is no higher today than it was 20 years ago. Now, in fact, it's 14 percent higher. But why would they bring family income up at all? After all, between 1977 and 1981 -- maybe you can guess why I pick those years -- the typical American family's income after taking out inflation fell 7 percent.

Think of what it would mean to you and your family if somebody were to cut your family's paychecks by that much today. Think of how much less you could buy at the grocery store, the clothes you couldn't get for your children, how much less you could put in the plate at your church or synagogue each week. And then think of this: Since 1981, when we came to office, the typical family's income after taking out inflation has soared more than 10 percent.

One place you can see what this change means to you is in housing. Our liberal friends have been talking a great deal about affordable housing recently. Don't they remember that in 1980, as housing prices and interest rates skyrocketed together -- one of the few times in history that's happened -- and real family incomes plummeted, the American dream of owning a home almost went down for the count; and the top housing official of the previous administration finally threw up his hands in despair and said, ``For many hard-working families, housing is growing beyond their reach.'' Yes, according to real estate industry economists, in 1980 the average American family made just over three-fourths of what it needed to buy a home. Today, with interest rates half of what they were and inflation under control, the typical American family makes over 110 percent of what it takes to buy a home.

Renters are also doing better. When the liberals left office, the national vacancy rates for apartments in the price range of low- and medium-income families were around 5 percent, which means it had become hard for low- and medium-income Americans to find an apartment. Today these national vacancy rates are around 8 percent, and it's the landlords who are having to wait longer to find tenants. Add this all up, and you see that we have more, much more, affordable housing today than we had 8 years ago.

You'd think all these facts would give our liberal opponents pause, but apparently not. When we note that since our expansion began, America has created more than 18 million new jobs, that unemployment is nearly the lowest it's been in 14 years, and that a greater proportion of Americans are at work today than ever before in our history, the liberals blandly respond that what we need are ``good jobs at good wages.'' Perhaps they believe that most Americans have bad jobs. I don't believe that. And to tell the truth, I find remarks that put down honest occupations -- yes, including short-order chefs -- offensive, and I expect you do, too. In any event, overall, job for job, the jobs created since our expansion began pay more than the jobs that existed before.

The charges go on and on, but the truth remains the same. No matter how you look at it, the last time they were in office, the liberals clobbered the American middle class -- and we stopped them. Some are calling this last-ditch opposition campaign an attempt at ``class warfare.'' So, what's new? Our liberal friends have been at war with America's middle class for years. Now they want you to turn the other cheek -- but will they just take that as an opportunity to really let you have it? Main Street America is in better shape today than it's ever been. Why would we ever want to put it back in the hands of those who almost turned out its lights?

In light of the current state of relations between the United States and Nicaragua, including the July 11, 1988, unjustified expulsion from Nicaragua of the United States Ambassador and seven other United States diplomats for pursuing legitimate diplomatic activities, the Nicaraguan government's refusal to allow the entry of United States diplomats to ensure the continued functioning of the U.S. embassy, and long-standing Nicaraguan government suppression of free expression and press and support of subversive activities throughout Central America, I have determined that it is in the interests of the United States to impose certain restrictions on entry into the United States of officers and employees of the Government of Nicaragua and the Sandinista National Liberation Front (hereinafter, the ``FSLN'').

Nicaraguan nationals as nonimmigrants is hereby suspended: (a) officers and employees of the Government of Nicaragua or FSLN holding diplomatic or official passports; and (b) individuals who, notwithstanding the type of passport that they hold, are considered by the Secretary of State or his designee to be officers or employees of the Government of Nicaragua or the FSLN.

The President. Members of the Cabinet and distinguished guests, and athletes and coaches, and ladies and gentlemen. I want to welcome all of you to the White House today as we honor and welcome home our victorious summer Olympic team. You know, with so many successful athletes here, I kind of expect a camera crew from Walt Disney to run up and ask me what I plan to do next. [Laughter] But seriously, this team showed the world that America stands for fairplay and sportsmanlike conduct. While here, I want to say that Nancy and I are so proud of you we'd give the whole team a gold medal.

As you athletes know, some of the credit goes to your parents and families, the people who've stood by you through all those long hours of training. Maybe it was a father who rose before sunrise to drive you to practice or a mother who skimped and saved so a young athlete could train. Or it may simply have been a sister or brother providing a strong word of encouragement in a moment of self-doubt. Whichever the case may be, they also deserve our heartfelt thanks.

When all is said and done, the most important accomplishment of all was the many hours of training that each of you endured. Your personal dedication to being the very best that you can be, achieving the highest level of physical and mental perfection, guided you through those many hours, days, and years of practice. And when your time came, and with the world watching, you crystallized those many hours and sacrifices into glorious moments. And if everything came together, you stood on the medal platform holding your head high as the ``Star Spangled Banner'' rang out in triumph. And if you didn't come home wearing a medal you still were every bit a hero. Just to make it to the level of Olympic competition is one of the greatest achievements a human being can attain in a lifetime. And I mean performing with grit and determination, as all of you here have done.

Not relying on drugs or banned substances, you set a fine example for the youth of America, and my roommate and I both commend you. You may notice that I'm wearing a ``Drug-Free America'' ribbon today. Well, this is Drug-Free America Week. And it's a time to renew America's determination to see the day when everyone in our country will just say no to illegal drugs, and for every American to just say yes, as you have, to doing the most with his or her God-given talents. America promises to all its children, of whatever background, the opportunity to dream great dreams and to make those dreams come true. Drugs kill that promise, and that's why we all want a drug-free America. And that's why we honor you, because you've worked to become the very best that you can be.

I don't measure the success of our Olympic teams only by the tally of medals they bring home. I believe people who go out and give their all in fair and competitive sport are winners. In Seoul we claimed 94 medals and 611 winners -- all of you. You are 611 reasons for America to be proud.

And these Olympics were a triumph for our hosts in the Republic of Korea and for our long friendship with them. One journalist described it like this: ``I have been unfailingly treated with politeness and friendliness and genuine warmth by police, security guards, and Korean Olympic personnel. They gave me small gifts to take home so I'll remember Korea.'' Well, today we do remember the Korean people and are proud to have them as friends -- and proud of the indelibly successful Olympic games they hosted.

I hope these games will be remembered for the poignancy of the closing ceremony, that heartfelt scene of camaraderie as thousands of athletes from around the world exchanged gifts, danced together, and bid farewell to one another. One observer described this mass of friendship as ``swirling together in a sea of international revelry.'' And right there in the middle of this sea marched you, the United States athletes, carrying tiny Korean flags in a true gesture of respect and brotherhood. And back home, in every corner of our country, our hearts swelled with the pride we had for you and for America.

States Olympic Committee, it's my pleasure to thank you very much for welcoming this team. And as you said, we have 611 heroes here. There are 611 stories of sacrifice -- sacrifice of time; sacrifice of the relationship with their families as they're practicing and training; and, yes, even economic sacrifice, because these athletes and their families have to dig down into their own resources to help train. And that's why I want to give a special thanks to the President and the Congress for the Olympic Coin Act. The money from that is a donation to the United States Olympic Committee as the American people buy these coins.

Olympic team: swimming champion, Janet Evans; boxing champion, Andrew Maynard; kayak champion, Greg Barton; and the track and field queen of the sprints, Florence Griffith Joyner. On behalf of the athletes attending the White House reception, I would like to say how great it is to be here in this city to receive the warm welcome and to enjoy each other's company on a less competitive circumstance.

I look at what we've done as athletes in Korea as a gift -- the days, the hours, the time that we spent dedicated to our sport training -- a gift that we tried to open in Korea for ourselves, for our sports, and most importantly, for our country. And to come back to the States and to see that the gift was so well-received, with smiles, handshakes, and warm gestures, makes us feel really warm inside. And as athletes, the performance is what we try to give, and to have it so well-received makes us feel really nice. And we want to thank you for that warm reception.

One way to show our appreciation for the support of our country is to offer a gift from our team to the President. Mr. President, we know you are familiar with this style of hat from your western films you've made, but this is a special one. The pins on the brim make it a lasting and unique memory of all the struggles and triumph that each athlete faced while participating for the United States in the Olympic games.

National Down Syndrome Month, 1988, we can all grow in awareness of the nature of Down Syndrome; of the needs, rights, and abilities of persons affected by it; and of continuing progress in our understanding of this developmental disability and our responsibilities, as individuals and communities, toward those involved and their families.

Today, fortunately, we are making many options available for people with Down Syndrome, such as early intervention, mainstreaming, recreation, socialization, respite services, employment, and independent living programs. These welcome developments are in the finest traditions of American life and of our long-standing willingness to offer acceptance, help, and hope to our neighbors in time of need.

Private and public research continues in areas such as finding the cause of the extra chromosome 21 in people with Down Syndrome; mapping this chromosome's genes; understanding the relationship between Down Syndrome and Alzheimer's disease; and using computers to facilitate language and speech.

As we salute past and present accomplishments, we realize that many important needs still remain -- and that we can solve them better the more we keep in mind the innate rights and human dignity Down Syndrome individuals share with their fellow Americans.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1988 as National Down Syndrome Month. I invite all concerned citizens, agencies, and organizations to unite during October with appropriate observances and activities directed toward helping affected individuals and their families enjoy to the fullest the blessings of life.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

This year, we again set aside the month of October to mark our great concern for the thousands of Americans who suffer from lupus. An immune system disorder of unknown cause, lupus in its systemic form may affect the joints, skin, and one or more internal organs, such as the kidney, heart, and brain.

Lupus is a chronic disease in which there is always the potential threat of serious illness and disability. The disease can occur in men, but women in their childbearing years are the majority of its victims. Minorities, especially blacks, are particularly vulnerable; lupus is three times more prevalent in black women than in white women.

Ordinarily, the immune system protects against infection by producing antibodies that successfully combat foreign substances. In people with lupus, the immune system produces abnormal antibodies that react harmfully against the individual's own tissues.

To combat lupus, we need new research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and treatment. Scientists in biology, biochemistry, immunology, genetics, and other fields are seeking to understand its causes and disease processes to develop better means of detection, treatment, and prevention. If this work is to continue, and if we are to take advantage of the knowledge we have already gained, public awareness of lupus and of the importance of continuing scientific research on this disease is critical. The Federal Government and private health organizations are working together to promote awareness of lupus and research on it. This collaboration ultimately will conquer this significant public health problem.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1988 as National Lupus Awareness Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical, and health care organizations and professionals to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Five years ago, in the silence that awaits the Caribbean dawn, a unit of American naval forces slipped ashore and began the rescue of the tiny island nation of Grenada. Today we commemorate that mission and the heroism of the thousands of soldiers, sailors, marines, and airmen who took part. The men of that force and later contingents came from the United States, yes, but also from Jamaica, Barbados, as well as Antigua, Dominica, St. Lucia, St. Kitts-Nevis, and St. Vincent -- the island democracies of the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States that had sent an urgent SOS message to America just days before the mission began.

Yes, a Marxist regime had been established in a corner of the world that had, over the centuries, known little other than peace. Many in our country doubted the significance of this, but not those who lived closest to it. They watched with growing alarm as the Grenadian regime strengthened its ties with Cuba and the Soviet Union and as building began on an airfield that appeared destined to become a major military base. And then the regime itself began to disintegrate and an anarchy began to spread in which only the most violent and ruthless could triumph. Our Caribbean friends believed they could no longer stand by quietly and that we should not, either. It was as if, in those days, the entire eastern Caribbean was crying out for help -- and we heard the cry.

Americans soon came to know the resolute Prime Minister of Dominica and the leader of the OECS, Eugenia Charles, and heard from her about the need those small free nations had for the help of the United States. Here in Washington, in the administration, we heard her plea before the rest of the Nation did -- as the crisis was breaking. We had long shared her concern about what was happening in Grenada and to the people of Grenada. We were concerned, as well, about the lives and safety of a thousand Americans there, most of them medical students. And so, with the initial planning conducted under the supervision of Vice President Bush, we responded quickly to the developing crisis. Within hours, our forces were moving toward the island.

Throughout our history, America's men in uniform have always been ready when the cause of freedom called, and they've never let us down. I've often told that when General George Marshall was asked why he was so confident that we would win the Second World War -- ``We have a secret weapon,'' he said, ``the best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' Well, it's still true today. We still have a secret weapon, and it's still the best blankety-blank kids in the world.

When it came time for the last American force to leave Grenada, the Grenadian people didn't want our men in uniform to go. Yes, the people of Grenada treated our forces the way the people of France treated American liberators of another generation, and we're proud of that.

We're proud of something else, too. From the Argonne Forest to Normandy, from Chosin Reservoir to Danang, America has always stood with those who stand for freedom. This is not to say that we eagerly jump into every fight. We don't. But we've always been ready to give a hand to those struggling for freedom when they needed it.

Yet in the years after we withdrew from Vietnam, our leaders seemed to shy away from freedom's battles. In Asia and Africa and even in Central America, they seemed to forget a truth that has guided our nation from its founding: that the cause of free peoples is indivisible. When freedom is diminished anywhere in the world, freedom everywhere is endangered. When the boundaries of freedom expand in one country, freedom for all people expands.

Grenada, after more than a decade on the sidelines, America at last stepped back into freedom's battles. And in the years since, we've stayed there. Around the world, in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, and yes, Central America, the United States stands today with those who would fight for freedom. We stand with ordinary people who have had the courage to take up arms against Communist tyranny. This stand is at the core of what some have called the Reagan doctrine.

Well, imagine what it means to become a Mujahidin, to fight for UNITA [National Union for the Total Independence of Angola], to join the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. Some have called our support for at least one of these movements bizarre, but I say it's as natural as what makes us Americans -- that there is something in our spirit and our history that calls on us to say these battles are our battles and these freedom fighters are our brothers and sisters.

Most, at one time, worked the land. They are simple and peaceful people who have stood face to face with Communist oppression. No, oppression is not an abstraction to them. It is a farm seized, a village destroyed, a father or mother murdered. It's an arbitrary ruling elite telling them how much they can charge for their crops. It's a knock on the door at midnight because someone in the family casually criticized the regime. It's the defacement or destruction of the local church or mosque or synagogue. It's the intrusion of an armed and ruthless party into the realms of life that every human being knows in his or her soul should be inviolable.

And so, these simple farmers have taken up arms, an act of almost inconceivable courage. For to be a freedom fighter -- whether in Afghanistan, Angola, Nicaragua, Cambodia, or elsewhere -- is to face large forces equipped with some of the most terrifying weapons any army has ever faced and to fight against all odds.

Americans came out from ``every Middlesex village and farm,'' and from villages and farms all over the 13 Colonies, to face the greatest imperial army in the world -- and to defeat it. We learned then that the God-given love of freedom that fills every human heart with strength is the greatest force the world has ever known. No empire, no tyrant, no ruling party can resist it forever. To stand on the side of human freedom is truly to stand on the side of history.

And yet we also found during our own Revolution that when a free people are young and struggling, they need friends. We could not have won our independence without help. Today others cannot win their freedom without help from us. And thanks in part to our help, they are winning. Today in Afghanistan, Angola, and Cambodia, we're seeing moves toward peace and freedom that would have been unthinkable even a few short months ago. In each country, the Soviets and their allies have said they will withdraw, and the reason is clear. In each country, we helped freedom fighters obtain the supplies that, together with their own courage, evened the odds. We were strong and steady friends, and we see once again in the news from those countries that American strength is indeed the greatest force for peace on the face of this Earth.

We could be seeing the same seeds of genuine peace and freedom sprouting in Nicaragua today if we had shown the same steadfast support for the freedom fighters' cause. But doesn't the failure of peace plans and democratic overtures in Nicaragua give anyone willing to look and listen an example of the exception that proves the broader rule? Where we have stood unflinchingly with freedom fighters, peace and freedom have begun to take root and grow. Where we haven't, they haven't.

And yet if the book is far from fully written on the struggle for freedom in Nicaragua, it is much farther along and much more hopeful in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia and, of course, Grenada. And so, I say to you that on this day we celebrate something far greater than a military action. It's the irrepressible spirit of freedom that is at home in every human heart. It's a great and generous spirit. And around the world today, as we were in Grenada, America is once again on its side.

While many were still wondering if we'd done the right thing in Grenada and if the danger there had been all we said it was, a plane carried the students we'd rescued back home. And then we saw these students walk down the steps from the plane, fall to their knees, and kiss their country's earth. Many also questioned whether we were right about the strategic threat Grenada was beginning to pose in the eastern Caribbean. And then we found a wealth of documents on the island that showed that the threat had been at least as serious as we had believed.

I thank you, and God bless you. But I have a few words I have to say -- something else near and dear to my heart. All those who have served in America's uniform deserve the Nation's thanks. To show our gratitude, I am about to do something I've been looking forward to for a long time: sign the bill that creates a Cabinet-level Department of Veterans Affairs.

It's been 13 years since Army veteran Senator Strom Thurmond introduced the bill. We have it this year because Marine veteran Congressman Gerry Solomon worked to make sure the job would be completed before Congress adjourned. And of course, Army veteran Congressman Sonny Montgomery was one of the leaders in the fight for the legislation. Others in Congress, especially on the Veterans and Government Operations Committees, helped lead the way. This bill gives those who have borne America's battles, who have defended the borders of freedom, who have protected our nation's security in war and in peace -- it gives them what they have deserved for so long: a seat at the table in our national affairs.

I've said before that America's debt to those who would fight for her defense doesn't end the day the uniform comes off. For the security of our nation, it must not end. Every time a man or woman enlists in the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, or Coast Guard, he or she is ready to lay down his or her life for our nation. We must be ready to show that America appreciates what that means. I like to think that this bill gives Cabinet rank not just to an agency within the Government but to every single veteran. And so, in signing this bill, I'm saying to all our veterans what I say to new Cabinet members: Welcome aboard.

Each year, approximately a million pregnancies in the United States end in miscarriage, stillbirth, or the death of the newborn child. National observance of Pregnancy and Infant Loss Awareness Month, 1988, offers us the opportunity to increase our understanding of the great tragedy involved in the deaths of unborn and newborn babies. It also enables us to consider how, as individuals and communities, we can meet the needs of bereaved parents and family members and work to prevent causes of these problems.

Health care professionals recognize that trends of recent years, such as smaller family size and the postponement of childbearing, adds another dimension of poignance to the grief of parents who have lost infants.

More than 700 local, national, and international support groups are supplying programs and strategies designed to help parents cope with their loss. Parents who have suffered their own losses, health care professionals, and specially trained hospital staff members are helping newly bereaved parents deal constructively with loss.

Americans are also assisting women who suffer bereavement, guilt, and emotional and physical trauma that accompany post-abortion syndrome. We can and must do a much better job of encouraging adoption as an alternative to abortion; of helping the single parents who wish to raise their babies; and of offering friendship and temporal support to the courageous women and girls who give their children the gifts of life and loving adoptive parents. We can be truly grateful for the devotion and concern provided by all of these citizens, and we should offer them our cooperation and support as well.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1988 as Pregnancy and Infant Loss Awareness Month. I call upon the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate programs, ceremonies, and activities.

I'd like to thank Jack Moseley for the outstanding job he's done in putting this event together, and a tip of the hat to party chairman Dan Fleming and Glenn Beall and, of course, old number 19 himself, Johnny Unitas. And a special hello to Helen Bentley. She's the kind of person who makes Washington a tolerable place and keeps the folks down at the other end of the BW Parkway from inflicting too much harm on the rest of the country. [Laughter] I'm also happy to see a great and proud American, a true American hero, Judge Robert Bork. And I'd like to add a special thank you to Alan for that marvelous introduction. Thank you.

Well, unlike him, the greeting and the introduction you've given me really does make me feel modest and humble. And it even seems a little strange. After all, Alan, I should be the one thanking you, because you did such an extraordinary job in the first 7 years of our administration: working with Jeane Kirkpatrick at the United Nations, serving as the U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Economic and Social Council, defending our country against the forces of anti-Americanism.

I think particularly of your work at a conference in Nairobi where you and my daughter Maureen worked to eliminate the disgusting ``Zionism is racism'' resolution from that conference's final report and earned the gratitude of all Americans. And there was your performance as my Assistant Secretary of State for International Organization Affairs, where you pursued successful reforms of the United Nations and opposed with every ounce of strength in your body all those who have served to foster and legitimize state-sponsored terrorism.

I should be thanking you -- and I am -- because every time I asked you to do your best, you did that and better. Every time I asked you to stand for America, you stood tall, and you deserve not only my thanks but the thanks of every citizen of this great country.

But that's not surprising. After all, the incumbent and the Stealth candidate at the top of the liberal ticket are so alike they could be twins. [Laughter] The two Stealth candidates went to law school together. They're still very good friends. And what they have most in common these days is a healthy fear and understandable terror of America's least favorite word.

Now, some people think I shouldn't be using the ``L'' word. They say I'm labeling them. Well, I gave the matter some thought. What should we call those people who oppose the death penalty, who support policies that hand out weekend furloughs to convicted murderers, who support laws that make it easier for a criminal to own a gun than law-abiding citizens who want to protect their homes and children? As I say, I thought about it. And then I decided that if the label fits they ought to wear it, because we all know that what these men believe is not what you believe, not what I believe, not what the people of Maryland believe, and not what the American people believe.

Maryland deserves a Senator who reflects the values and bedrock principles of this great State and this great nation: the principles of family and home and community and church. Our gravest treasure as a nation -- our greatest treasure, I should say -- maybe the other word fits, too -- is our precious moral heritage, the basic values of faith and family that make ours, as Alan said, a great nation. It's the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, that serves as the cradle of our country's soul.

Maryland deserves a Senator who understands what America stands for and what America has to offer because he's a living, breathing example of how this nation can change, adapt, and grow -- how in one short generation it can make itself a better and freer land. And, ladies and gentlemen, that man is Alan Keyes.

Maryland deserves a Senator who understands the concerns we all have about protecting ourselves from the scourge of drugs and the menace of drug-related crime. You know, until this election year, the incumbent opposed the death penalty. Is that what the good people of Maryland believe? I don't think so. Alan Keyes and I believed yesterday, believe today, and will continue to believe that a crack dealer who murders a police officer in the line of duty should receive the death penalty. We must protect those who protect us. And we believe that there are no citizens more precious than those noble men and women who are laying their lives on the line so that we can be safe -- our State and local police.

Yes, my friends, Maryland deserves a Senator who will stand up for his State, defend the values we hold dear, and defend the interests of his constituents and the Nation. Maryland's been a leader in this country since colonial times, and it needs leaders in Washington.

Maryland deserves a Senator who wants to keep America strong and at peace. Maryland deserves a Senator who believes in a strong America and believes in expanding the free world. And I've never known a more stout-hearted defender of a strong America than Alan Keyes. He truly knows that freedom works.

I'm sure that everyone in this room is going to do all they can to get out the vote on November 8th for my very good friend and valued colleague, that silver-tongued devil, George Bush. [Laughter] You know George. George took quite a shellacking when the liberals had their party in Atlanta this summer. But he stood the fire, and then all he did was cite the record -- his and theirs. And now they're squealing he's running a negative campaign. Well, I think they're squirming because George has shown America how far outside the mainstream they really are. They may not like it, but George has thrown a clear light on their views. And, yes, their ideas on the Pledge of Allegiance do matter. Their ideas about our national defense do matter. Their ideas about taxes and spending do matter. Republicans are talking about the issues, and the American people are listening.

I believe, as do we all here, that America needs the wisdom and courage and strength of George Bush. But, my friends, that's not enough. The liberals will still be in Washington come November. And we've seen how in recent years when they lose a national election they fight a political guerrilla war for the next 4 years in Congress to block the policies the American people have chosen at the ballot box. To keep Congress in check, the President needs the same power 43 Governors have, the power of the line-item veto. And I'll keep saying it until I'm too hoarse to speak: We need to pass the balanced budget amendment. Well, there's only one guy in this race who supports these things -- in this race here that we're talking about.

I know everyone in this room is going to do everything possible to see to it that Maryland comes through for George Bush and Alan Keyes in 1988. These last 2 weeks are critical. If we can get the message out, the people of Maryland will get the message as well. And that's what I leave up to all of you. Your financial support is important, but it's your blood and sweat and tears that will make the difference come November 8th. There are few tasks more important than ensuring our future.

Make no mistake: Here in Maryland every single vote will count. You know I vote in California, but let me say on this occasion that today I wish I lived in Maryland so that on November 8th I could go into that voting booth and pull the lever for Alan Keyes and the Republican future. It makes no sense for people to believe in the things the President has claimed, and elect him to office, and then return to office a Congress pledged to not let him do the things the people voted for him to do. So, Godspeed to Alan, Jocelyn, his wife.

Pending the issuance of an Executive order to implement the Act, the Secretary of the Treasury is hereby designated and empowered to perform the following-described functions of the President: The authority vested in the President by Section 721 of the Defense Production Act of 1950, as amended, relative to mergers, acquisitions, and takeovers proposed or pending on or after the date of enactment of the Act by or with foreign persons which could result in foreign control of persons engaged in interstate commerce in the United States.

Investment in the United States, established pursuant to Executive Order No. 11858 and chaired by the representative of the Secretary of the Treasury, to take such actions or make such recommendations as requested by the Secretary of the Treasury.

The delegation provided herein shall terminate, and this interim directive shall be without any further effect, except as may be provided in the Executive order implementing the Act, upon the effective date of such order.

After a formal hearing and review of the written submissions and data, the Emergency Board made the following recommendations for settlement of the dispute between the parties. The Board suggested that the parties follow the wage pattern of 5 percent each year for 3 years accepted by six other unions on PATH (the United Transportation Union, the Transport Workers Union, the International Brotherhood of Teamsters, the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, the American Railway Supervisors Association-Division of the Transportation Communications Union, and the American Train Dispatchers Association). The wage increases would be effective in each of the 3 years September 1985 to September 1987. The Board, after considering the other issues in dispute, recommended the granting of the Martin Luther King holiday, an improvement in meal allowances, and an improvement in major medical and group life insurance.

I couldn't help but recognize the lady who threw out the first pitch; that was some fastball, Nancy. [Laughter] But seriously, your Just Say No campaign has awakened a nation to the dangers of illicit drug use, and I'm glad to have you on my team.

Let's remember that before this season started, few baseball writers expected the Dodgers even to win their division. Yet you fellows took the National League West, tripped up the powerhouse New York Mets in the league championship series, and then wrapped up the title by beating the Oakland Athletics in five games. I guess it just never occurred to this bunch that someone else was supposed to win. But you did it, and you did it with guts and determination.

Orel Hershiser, you capped a sensational year by winning three postseason games, including two in the Series. And you're the first pitcher ever to win the Most Valuable Player Award for both the league championship and World Series in the same year.

Then there were guys like Mickey Hatcher, who hit one homer all year, but two during the World Series. And there were plenty of others who contributed, too. Rookie pitcher Tim Belcher and reliever Alejandro Pena led a fine supporting cast of pitchers. And let's not forget guys like Mike Marshall, Steve Sax, John Shelby, and Franklin Stubbs; veteran catchers like Mike Scioscia and Rick Dempsey. Everybody played a part. Somebody even remarked that your physician, Dr. Frank Jobe, ought to get a raise for all the work he did in nursing injured players.

Lasorda. Thank you, Mr. President, the First Lady. We are honored on behalf of Peter O'Malley and his sister Terry, and the entire Dodger organization. We're very, very honored that you wanted us here to visit with you. And all I can say is that the First Lady threw out the first ball to the World Series, and we won that game in the most dramatic way I've ever seen a ballgame in a World Series won. So, when you are finished with your job here, we would like for her to come out and throw the first ball out at Dodger Stadium and, of course, bring you along with her. [Laughter] I'd like to present you this, sir.

Hershiser. Mr. President and the First Lady, I was chosen by the team members to present you with a bat here today. And the bat is inscribed with Mr. President's name. And I will be so great to say Ron Reagan on the bat. And there's one thing -- I had a lot of success in the World Series and the playoffs, and you've had a lot of success as a President. And I think the main reason is, is that we look to a higher power: We both believe in God.

Los Angeles Dodgers had a group picture taken with the President and First Lady in the Oval Office prior to their appearance in the Rose Garden. There was considerable banter back and forth with the players.

Sax was prodded by his teammates to perform what must be a well-practiced imitation of the President. After initially declining, Steve drew himself up in his best Ronald Reagan imitation with the words, ``Well, it's a pleasure . .

Director for Space Programs on the National Security Council, where his duties included the coordination of national space policy and related matters. Prior to this he served on the staff of the Air Force Space Command in Colorado Springs, CO.

I am withholding my approval of S. 508, the ``Whistleblower Protection Act of 1988.'' I regret that the Congress did not present me with constitutional and effective legislation to expand the protections and procedural rights afforded to Federal employees who report fraud, waste, and abuse they discover in Federal programs.

Such reporting is to be encouraged, and those who make the reports must be protected. At the same time, we must ensure that heads of departments and agencies can manage their personnel effectively. Enactment of S. 508 would have redesigned the whistleblower protection process so that employees who are not genuine whistleblowers could manipulate the process to their advantage simply to delay or avoid appropriate adverse personnel actions.

To ensure that Federal employees who report mismanagement are protected from reprisal, while ensuring that Federal personnel managers are not saddled with routinely defending appropriate decisions they make, I have directed the Attorney General, working with the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Director of the Office of Personnel Management, to prepare constitutional and effective whistleblower protection legislation for me to submit at the beginning of the next session of the Congress.

A major objection to S. 508 is its change of the factual showings required of employees in making their cases in whistleblower proceedings. Section 1221(e) of Title 5 of the United States Code, as contained in S. 508, would have interfered substantially with personnel management in Federal departments and agencies. Current law strikes a proper balance between the showings required of employees and agencies in making their cases before the Merit Systems Protection Board. Section 1221(e) would have removed the requirement that employees demonstrate in Merit Systems Protection Board proceedings that whistleblowing by the employee was a substantial factor in the agency's personnel action decision about which the employee complains.

Moreover, that Section would have imposed the heavier burden upon the department or agency of proving by clear and convincing evidence -- which is a much higher legal standard than proof by a preponderance of the evidence that applies in most civil matters in American courts -- that the same decision would have occurred in the absence of any whistleblowing.

The substantially reduced factual showing required of the employee and the substantially increased burden on agencies essentially rigs the Board's process against agency personnel managers in favor of employees. The interests of both employees and managers should be fully protected.

Systems Protection Board in proceedings to which the Special Counsel is a party. Implementation of this provision would place two Executive branch agencies before a Federal court to resolve a dispute between them. The litigation of intra-Executive branch disputes conflicts with the constitutional grant of the Executive power to the President, which includes the authority to supervise and resolve disputes between his subordinates. In addition, permitting the Executive branch to litigate against itself conflicts with constitutional limitations on the exercise of the judicial power of the United States to actual cases or controversies between parties with concretely adverse interests.

These provisions could not have been implemented to the extent that they are inconsistent with the President's constitutional authority and duty to faithfully execute the laws, supervise his subordinates in the Executive branch, and recommend such measures to the Congress as he judges necessary and expedient, and Article III requirements for the exercise of the judicial power.

I am gratified that the California gray whales have been released to the open sea. The human persistence and determination by so many individuals on behalf of these whales shows mankind's concern for the environment. It has been an inspiring endeavor. We thank and congratulate the crews of the two Soviet icebreakers who finally broke through to the whales.

Now, you know, as President, a lot of important papers cross my desk. And one of them told me about some teams that are undefeated after seven games, nationally ranked, moving up, and that has some of the greatest football fans in the United States. I have to say the Arkansas Razorbacks and the UCA [University of Central Arkansas] Bears are my kind of teams.

Well, today I've come to Little Rock for a very special reason: because I want to talk to you about a friend of mine, the next President of the United States, George Bush. For 8 years, we've worked together to rebuild our economy, to get America on the move again, to make the United States once again the great arsenal of democracy, a light unto the nations, the champion of freedom around the world. For 8 years, George Bush and I have worked side by side in the White House, during times of crisis and times of historic triumph and achievements. I've come to know George Bush very well. I also know what is required to be President of the United States. I know who should be the man at the desk. And ladies and gentlemen, George Bush is that man.

Vice President Bush and I took office 8 years ago, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. But today America is in the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded in our history -- 71 months. Now, of course, the liberals still don't understand how we were able to get rid of their economic crisis, their ``malaise'' -- that was their word, remember -- their inflation, their gas lines. So, they're promising to reverse everything we've done.

Well, here's what we've done. We've cut taxes, slashed inflation by two-thirds, sliced interest rates in half. And since the economic recovery began, we've created over 18 million jobs. And in spite of what you might have heard from some people who are talking today, they were good jobs.

More than three-quarters of them are the kind that pay better than $20,000 a year. And the unemployment rate in Little Rock has fallen by more than 20 percent, and statewide, real personal income is up by 16\1/2\ percent. And today in America a greater proportion of our potential work force is employed than ever before in the history of the United States.

Did you know that that potential employment pool, according to them, is everyone in the United States 16 years of age, male and female, all the way up. And 62.7 percent of that population have jobs today.

You and I and George Bush worked much too hard to cut your taxes to let our opponents come into office and raise them all over again. So, on November 8th go into the polling booth and do some negative campaigning of your own -- the right kind of negative campaigning. Say no to new taxes, and say yes to the Republican ticket.

Our greatest treasure as a nation is our precious moral heritage, the basic values of faith and family that make ours a great nation. It's the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, that serves as the cradle of our country's soul. Yes, ladies and gentlemen, the family is the bedrock of our nation.

Now there's a new election before us, and I have little doubt that the people of the United States are going to do exactly what I did 8 years ago -- they're going to choose George Bush. Do you know who led the task force that cut away excess Federal regulation, which saves American people and communities and States from 600 million man-hours of paperwork a year, making our prosperity and millions of new jobs possible?

George Bush led that task force. Do you know who led the offensive against drug smuggling at our borders that just in the past year alone seized a record 70 tons of cocaine before it could reach our communities? George Bush. And when we needed to work with our allies to strengthen NATO, to counter Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles, who did I turn to to do the job? George Bush.

Now, today I don't think I need to review George Bush's resume or his heroism in war or his service to America in the Congress or the United Nations or China as Ambassador or as Director of the CIA. What I can tell you about is the man that I know personally -- a man who's strong, decent, loyal, wise, capable, and compassionate and a man who has the qualities necessary to fill the office of the Presidency.

But we have to give equal time, so here's the response: that it's wrong to use labels because ideology doesn't matter. [Laughter] Well, but I have to say, how can a man running for President of the United States look the American people in the eye and tell you that his ideology doesn't matter? Ladies and gentlemen, if he's saying to you that what he believes doesn't matter, isn't he really saying that what each one of us believes doesn't matter either?

For example, the liberals recently proposed Federal child care assistance. But under their program, if you want assistance and wish to leave your child with his or her grandmother, the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

The President. One of the congressional staff members behind that bill was asked by a reporter if this was true -- that grandmothers would have to get a Federal license to take care of their own grandchildren. And the reply came, yes, of course, it's true.

The President. Well, George Bush believes that for the most horrible crimes, like when a drug dealer murders a policeman in cold blood, that kind of dealer -- or killer deserves and should receive the death sentence. And if you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us -- our State and local police. And George Bush and I stand behind them all the way.

You know, violent crime has fallen significantly since 1981 because George and I put criminals on notice. We said make a false move, and the next sound you hear is the clang of a jail cell door slamming shut. Of course, what happens in Massachusetts is a little bit different. In that State, and only in that State, first-degree murderers not even eligible for parole were let free on weekend passes, and some of them never bothered to return. Do you call that justice?

Besides fighting crime and restoring our economy, we've made sure that once again America is respected in the world, our Armed Forces are strong, and our nation is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

And one other thing: As our administration set America on the path of what is now the longest peacetime expansion on record and as we negotiated the first real reduction in U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles in world history, no one has been a better ally in the Senate than Kit Bond or Jack Danforth.

I can't go any farther without a hello to some fellows that I have a personal link to at Southwest Missouri State -- my brother TEEK's. When I first joined, they told me it was a fraternity for life, and I can see they're right. And let me also say hello to another group I take a kind of personal interest in, the College Republicans.

You know, I watched a certain debate a couple of weeks ago. I don't often feel sorry for liberals, but I came close. [Laughter] I couldn't help thinking the problem with those fellows on the other side is not camera angles or lighting.

It's not whether their candidate is likable or not. No, it's the very thing that they've spent this campaign trying desperately to hide. When our liberal friends refuse even to whisper the ``L'' word and insist that this election is not about ideology, it's about competence, they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

But you know, the American people always have a way of figuring out the facts. Our liberal friends have spent the last 3 months trying to dress up their agenda in our clothes, but somehow nothing fits. When they say ``opportunity,'' they mean ``subsidies.'' When they say ``reducing the deficit,'' they mean ``raising taxes.'' And when they say ``strong defense,'' they mean ``cut defense spending.'' No wonder their favorite machine is the snowblower. They talk about it being time for a change.

Well, where have they been these last 8 years? We are the change. We began it 8 years ago. And the choice this year is to go back to the stagnant status quo of the past or to go forward with the change.

When I said that about this proportion of Americans, do you know that what the statisticians called the potential employment pool is everyone, male and female, from 16 years of age on up, all the way. In other words, the total population of the United States except those below age 16. Well, today 62.7 percent of that total population have jobs.

Think of what reducing inflation to a third of what it was means to families seeking to protect their life savings. And think of what our tax reduction program has meant to families, most of whom now pay a top rate of only 15 percent. Yes, what you heard in a recent debate, I've heard echoed in my talks with the leaders of many other nations. Today they tell me the United States of America is the envy of the world.

The President. You're right. Yes, we've come a long way in the last 8 years, but, my friends, everything that you and I and George Bush have worked for these last 8 years, everything, could be lost faster than you can say gun control. [Laughter] The liberals talk about reaching for the center, but from the economy to national defense they've taken positions only a McGovern could love.

We've achieved arms reduction agreements with the Soviets and a new warmth in relations not through weakness but through our policy of peace through strength. You know, you'd think our liberal friends would have learned from that. But not long ago former Defense Secretary James Schlesinger wrote that their ticket this year seems to be, in his words, ``viscerally antimilitary.'' They'd cut the B - 1 bomber. They'd cut the MX missiles, our strategic defense against ballistic missiles. And if they had their way, and what they proposed already, we would have to get rid of two carrier battle groups in the Navy.

Yes, we've accomplished much these last 8 years, but we could have accomplished even more -- including, I believe, balancing the budget -- if both Houses of Congress had been friendly. Ours is a system of three equal branches of government. Two branches, the President and Congress, are chosen by election.

The third, the courts, is chosen by the other two. When you vote for a candidate for the House or Senate, you're voting for the direction of the country and the world as much as when you're voting for President.

Since we must ride two horses, Congress and the President, across every stream, shouldn't they both be going in the same direction? We don't want a President who would raise taxes. Why elect a Congress that would? We don't want a big-spending President. Why should we want a big-spending Congress? We don't want a President who would cut our defenses. Why vote for a Congress that wants to do that?

There, at the Moscow summit, I stood at the podium at the Moscow State University and spoke to those students there about the glories of personal and individual freedom. Think of those students. Only if they're very lucky and rise high in the Communist Party will any of them have influence on the course of history that each American has by just walking into the voting booth.

America does well to hold a national week of observance to remind citizens that the need for immunization does not stop with childhood. Vaccine-preventable diseases continue to kill grown-ups in our Nation; as many as 70,000 adults die each year because they do not take advantage of vaccines for influenza, pneumococcal pneumonia, hepatitis B, tetanus, and other preventable infectious diseases.

Even among people at greatest risk for complications -- the elderly and the chronically ill -- fewer than one in five routinely receive annual influenza vaccination and fewer than one in 10 have been vaccinated against pneumococcal pneumonia.

Immunization with safe and effective vaccines can greatly reduce the tragic loss of life and reduce the massive costs associated with health care. The Surgeon General of the United States has repeatedly urged adults to use appropriate preventive health-care practices, including vaccination for diseases preventable through immunization. We can all do our share in making sure we ourselves and members of our families know about and receive immunization, and that our neighbors and communities have the same opportunity.

It's great to be back in my home State and see so many good friends. And thank you, Pete, for that wonderful and kind introduction. Of course, I don't need to tell the people of San Diego about you, Pete. They know you. You were the best mayor they ever had. But I will, anyway: You're a great guy, a great public servant, and come November 9th, you'll still be the great Senator from the great State of California.

I'll feel just fine because nobody knows better than I just how capable and valuable are those two hands I'll be passing the torch to come the 20th of January. And you know, George took quite a shellacking from the liberals when they had their little party in Atlanta a few months ago, and even now they use all sorts of insulting words to describe him. He stood the fire and just cited the record -- his and theirs. Now that the game seems to have turned against them, the liberals have started squealing that he's running a negative campaign. Well, I hope the people of Oakland will forgive me, but that would be a little like the A's complaining that the Dodgers ran a negative World Series. They didn't. The Dodgers won fair and square. And come November 8th, the Republicans are going to win fair and square, too, because they know we stand for the future and they know the opposition is liberal, liberal, liberal.

That's why I'm here: to talk to you about the great Republican ticket, from the White House to the statehouse, and make sure everybody who shares our hopes for the future turns out to vote on November 8th. We need Pete Wilson, Duncan Hunter, Bill Lowery, and Ron Packard in Washington. And we need great congressional candidates like Rob Butterfield in Washington. They all know that a thriving economy, a strong national defense, and the preservation of the family are the keys to our revolution. And that revolution's going to continue come November 9th.

Let's talk a little bit about that change. We've been slashing tax rates and liberating the American economy from the regulations and confiscations of the ``malaise'' years. When we came into office, families everywhere were reeling from regulations and taxes that were sapping this nation's initiative. We took that money out of the grasping hands of the Washington bureaucrats and put it back in the wallets of the people from whom they'd confiscated it in the first place -- the working men and women of America.

Yes, since our expansion began, we have created more than 18 million new jobs. We reduced the unemployment rate to nearly the lowest it's been in 14 years. And today a greater proportion of our potential work force -- that means everybody, male and female, from the age of 16 on up, all the way; they are considered that potential work force -- and a greater percentage of that potential work force -- 62.7 percent of everyone in America above the age 16 -- is employed than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

You know, we'd be able to solve the budget deficit, too, if we could get the liberals in Congress to follow Walter's example and cut the fat out of their diet. Pete Wilson and I think we ought to put them on a diet -- a diet called the line-item veto and the balanced-budget amendment. You know, I had the line-item veto. Forty-three Governors have it. I had it when I was Governor of California. I used it 932 times. It was never overridden once.

But you know, the way I see it, really what we did in these 8 years in Washington was just get out of your way. You and I and George Bush worked much too hard to cut your taxes to let our opponents come into office and raise them all over again. So, on November 8th, go into that polling booth and do some negative campaigning of your own -- the right kind of negative campaigning. Say no to new taxes, and yes to the Republican ticket.

We also went to work on our nation's defenses. We're once again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace. We and our NATO allies stood firm, as Pete told you, in the face of Soviet missiles pointing at the heart of Europe and Asia. And Mr. Gorbachev got the message. He did business because he knew we meant business. And we still mean business.

None of our triumphs -- no, not one -- would have happened if the liberals had had their way. There would have been no INF treaty or rollback in Afghanistan or democratic revolutions around the globe. They opposed rebuilding our military defenses, and even today they want to cancel out of our Navy two carrier task forces.

Now, you know, with the Moscow summit and all these meetings with General Secretary Gorbachev, some people think that maybe I've changed, that I don't believe the same things that I believed when I came into office. Well, I'm here to tell you that's not true.

Yes, ladies and gentlemen, when our friends refuse to whisper the ``L'' word and insist that this election isn't about ideology but about competence, they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

Another area where we differ is our understanding of the Constitution. We've appointed serious-minded judges who respect the Constitution and know the meaning of the word ``punishment.'' This is very important because, unlike the State of California, the Constitution does not give citizens an opportunity to vote Supreme Court Justices out of power.

And I don't think America wants the highest court to look the way the California court did before the people of California raised up and said, ``Enough.'' If judges don't do their job right, criminals feel like they can run rampant.

We also believe that a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should receive the death penalty. We owe this protection of the law to the men and women who protect us -- our State and local police. And we stand united behind them. And we don't need to see the job of the police made any tougher by the kind of furloughing of first-degree murderers -- even those ineligible for parole -- that we've seen in the State of Massachusetts. That State has the most liberal prison program since Billy the Kid sprung the Lincoln County Jail.

My friends, all that we have achieved can be undone quicker than you can say ``furlough'' if our liberal friends are successful. Remember how my successor here in California undid many of our accomplishments until George Deukmejian rode into town? We don't want that to happen again this year. I want to ask you: Are we going to let that happen again?

So, that's what's on the line this year. Ladies and gentlemen, America needs the strength, the vision, the true grit of George Bush and Pete Wilson. And with your help and God's grace we'll all have cause to cheer just 12 days from now.

You know, I have a special place in my heart for the people of California. It was my great privilege to have served two terms as your Governor. And during our national campaigns, it was a source of comfort to know that we could count on the support of the people of California. You've already given me so much; I hesitate to ask you anything else. But will you do just one more favor for me? Will you go out and win one for the Gipper?

And the importance of your work comes home particularly now in the final days of a political campaign, a campaign in which the American people will speak out on the issues of war and peace, democracy and totalitarianism, and make decisions that will affect the world and our foreign policy consensus for a great, long time to come. And this election comes, too, after one of the most crucial and significant years in the history of that foreign policy. Right now, we have hopes -- and for the moment we must remember that they're only hopes -- that our children might see 1988 as the turning point in the great twilight struggle known as the cold war.

General Assembly, we've seen this progress continue in settling regional conflicts in places like Angola, Cambodia, Afghanistan, the Persian Gulf, and elsewhere; regional conflicts once thought impossible to resolve. And so, too, the INF treaty has taken force. We've seen Russian and American missiles -- once growing in number and ready to wreak destruction on a massive scale -- themselves destroyed in the Russian and American heartland.

Arms negotiations continue, too, or are in prospect, in a series of other areas: chemical weapons, conventional weapons, nuclear testing, and of course, the START talks on strategic offensive weapons.

And yet -- as we've also frequently pointed out -- what prevented progress in the past in these areas, indeed, what was at the heart of the cold war, was not some failure of communications or giant misunderstanding between East and West.

Far to the contrary, it was understanding -- not misunderstanding -- that was the root cause. And I speak here of the clear consensus that developed in the West shortly after World War II on several vital points: the true nature of the Soviet regime, the fundamental distinction between totalitarianism and democracy, and the moral duty to resist the international threat to human rights posed by Soviet expansionism. It was these realities, not some unfortunate or avoidable misunderstanding, that caused East-West tension. And we can forget this lesson only at the greatest peril.

But fortunately, it's also here we see the most encouraging change of all. Every issue of the morning paper seems to bring with it news of questioning in the Soviet Union: questioning of state control of industry, of restrictions on human rights, and even of the ideology of world domination, of class warfare in international politics, all of which formed the greatest barriers between our two nations. This talk of democratic reform in the Soviet Union remains tentative -- hardly the stuff of sure-fire prophecy.

Still, to those of us used to the monolithic nature of Soviet society in the postwar era, these changes seem remarkable -- no, not conclusive, but certainly remarkable. Like myself, I'm sure most of you would have had trouble a few years ago, given the state of our relations, imagining the sight of an American President strolling through Red Square with his Soviet counterpart, or that same President there in the Lenin Hills addressing the students of Moscow State University on the wonder and splendor of human individual freedom. We see a restiveness also in Eastern Europe, where peoples who've been denied their right of self-determination for four decades are exploring the limits of a new, seemingly more tolerant environment.

Poland, we see the resurgence of the free labor movement, Solidarity, with which the Government is now forced to negotiate after years of trying to suppress it. In Hungary, bold steps are being taken toward economic reform. Throughout the region, the pressures of change -- and, yes, for freedom -- are accelerating. And if there are any who doubt the immensity of the change that has come upon us in 8 years, perhaps they should seek out ethnic Americans and ask their opinion. Ask Polish- or Hungarian-Americans -- ask Estonian-, Latvian-, or Lithuanian-Americans if it doesn't mean something when relatives in the old country can at last worship in a long-shutdown cathedral or negotiate working conditions in a shipyard. Yes, ethnic Americans will confirm such changes, however long overdue. They'll hold great promise, and we pray today: May that promise be fulfilled.

Change, indeed, is inevitable. No one should doubt the instability of the present situation in Eastern Europe, in which an artificial economic and political system, long imposed on these peoples against their will, is more and more exposed as bankrupt and discredited. The new degree of tolerance of experimentation is welcome. But no one should doubt, either, that Moscow's handling of the growing drive for self-determination within its European empire will be a vital test for us of how deep is the transformation of Soviet foreign policy in a new era.

So, whatever the future may hold, it's safe to say: We've come a long way, and this is a portentous time. Indeed, when I hear some of the critics of our foreign policy, the most apt comparison that comes to mind has nothing to do at all with the serious matters of foreign policy of war and peace. I'm instead brought back to a story of my Hollywood days by scriptwriter Tom Mankiewicz, who described the time his producer walked through the door of his office and asked him what he had planned for the film's archvillain, Blofield.

Well, let us remember that great steps have been taken in the last few years, steps to safeguard against archvillains -- not to mention the blowing up of the world, of course. Let us not be satisfied, and certainly not smug, but let us be appreciative of what has happened and determined to build on that progress.

Now, in other addresses here, I've noted that maintaining that progress means realizing that our foreign policy during these past 8 years has made a significant departure: We now hold that containment is no longer enough; that ours is a forward strategy for freedom; and that this strategy means not only maintaining our defenses and vigorous diplomatic engagement but also candor about and to our adversaries, support for freedom fighters all around the globe, and encouragement of human rights and democratic reforms within the Eastern bloc. And yet while these elements do signify a departure, we must also remember that all of them are based on the bipartisan consensus developed shortly after World War II, that consensus that was the basis of American foreign policy leadership for the first decades of the postwar period.

As perhaps many of you know, at the close of World War II, Winston Churchill's government was defeated for reelection, a defeat that occurred in the midst of the Potsdam Conference. As Churchill left the conference, he grew depressed at the increasingly aggressive tendencies of the Soviet Government and viewed with great alarm the inability of his own government, under its new leadership, to mount a vigorous challenge to the Soviet refusal to keep its agreements on Germany, Poland, and the other nations of central Europe.

Yet it was the man many disparaged as a former haberdasher and F.D.R.'s ill-prepared understudy, the new American President, Harry Truman, who became an enormous source of comfort and solace to Churchill. Because it was Harry Truman who moved with vigor to meet the Soviet threat to world freedom. Indeed, at the very moment when Europe seemed most vulnerable, the Truman administration, working with a Republican Congress, produced the framework of strategic survival: the Truman doctrine, the Marshall plan, and NATO.

Now, as I say, I believe these premises have held fast, and they're premises not so much changed by this administration as extended. And again, I refer here not only to the concept of military help for freedom fighters but also the concept of pressing, through private but especially public diplomacy, the cause of democratic reform and human rights within the Eastern bloc and even the Soviet Union itself. And yet for all of that, this progression from containment to a forward strategy can be misunderstood if it's thought of strictly in Soviet-American terms.

In point of fact, this new zealousness for freedom has permeated our foreign policy and is seen in all multilateral relations. The call for a worldwide crusade for freedom and democracy, which I first made at Westminster in 1982, was one meant for all nations and all peoples. And in this context, we've stressed, particularly, the importance of freedom in the economic sphere: freedom as the font of human creativity and prosperity.

Today we see its fruits in our daily headlines: people's yearning for democracy in the Philippines and South Korea, or in Chile, Burma, Haiti. Or when this decade began, for example, only a third of the peoples of Latin America lived under democratic regimes; today the figure is close to 90 percent. There are the economic miracles taking place in Southeast Asia, Taiwan, Hong Kong, Sri Lanka, Korea, and even the People's Republic of China itself. In Africa, we've seen a special U.N. General Assembly Session develop a consensus for less state control and more free-market incentives.

I think if we look closely enough here, we'll see at work not just a foreign policy successful at expounding the cause of freedom but a foreign policy successful precisely because its very purpose and meaning was defined by that cause and sprang from the greatest of all ideas of Western thought and civilization: freedom, human dignity under God.

And if I might, I'd like to pause here and note: It's truly ironic that even as those Western insights and traditions -- the tinder and fuel of human liberty -- start fires all across the world, here at home they are called into question. Their legitimacy as areas of required study on some of our campuses is even questioned. I recently came across an interview in Time magazine with Allan Bloom, the author of ``The Closing of the American Mind,'' in which he expresses his own deep concern that too much of the academic community has lost sight of the uniqueness and the moral superiority of Western values such as freedom, democracy, and the rule of law. ``Hey, hey, ho, ho!'' -- the chant went on one campus -- ``Western culture's got to go!'' All across the United States we've heard other expressions of concern from those like former Secretary of Education William Bennett, who criticize groups with special interests or political agendas that seek to diminish and restrict the teaching of the insights contained in the great books and learning of Western civilization.

Our chief arms negotiator, Max Kampelman, has a favorite quotation about all this. He likes to note that no one has spoken more eloquently of the preciousness of this heritage or its pertinence to foreign policy concerns than former President of the U.N. General Assembly, the late Charles Malik -- a friend of the United States, a champion of freedom.

Yes, thanks to the perseverance of the American people and her allies, the twilight struggle did not fade into the dark night of totalitarian rule. Instead, in 1988 the lights are going on all over the world: the lights of freedom. So, at this critical moment, let us be certain that this continues, that the source of that illumination, the great works of Western thought and culture, is protected and revered and, yes, studied -- above all, here in America.

America's first line of defense is found as much in our universities and the great works of humane learning as it is in all the NATO tank divisions on the German border. And the direction of our foreign policy is based as much on the great ideas that bind together the free nations of the world, as it is on the pace of all the peace conferences in Geneva.

I call today on America's college faculties and administrators to consider this proposition: that returning to sound education, that getting back to basics, involves not just closer attention to good grammar or better mathematics but devotion to the very wellsprings of human freedom -- to the nurturing of the precious intellectual heritage of Western culture, to the preciousness of the idea of human freedom. And it is in this spirit that we can approach the great problems that remain -- the unfinished agenda of our postwar foreign policy.

First, we must maintain progress in settling regional conflicts, conflicts that could so easily escalate into a larger war. Here especially, it is essential to stick to the policy in Central America that is bringing progress in Angola, Afghanistan, and Cambodia. Congress must give up the double standard: one for freedom fighters in far corners of the globe, but a different standard for freedom fighters only a few days' drive from our borders. Until the Sandinistas make good on their promises of democracy, until Daniel Ortega stops restricting civil liberties, we must support the contras.

And second, we must aggressively pursue the research, development, and testing of our Strategic Defense Initiative. In recent months, we've seen significant research breakthroughs, breakthroughs that lead us to believe deployment could be less costly than originally thought. We've been so successful in our research efforts that we've been able to reduce the projected cost of our most promising program by tens of billions of dollars. Now is the time to redouble our efforts, not cut them back. A nation protected against nuclear missile attack, particularly an accidental or limited launch -- this is not just a policy option, it's a moral imperative.

That sacrifice is now paying handsome dividends in peace initiatives across the globe; a safer, more secure free world; and an Eastern bloc forced to confront its own problems. Now, of all times, at this moment of opportunity, we must keep the military strength that has made all this possible.

Fourth, our public candor about human rights abuses and the fundamental moral differences between totalitarianism and democracy must continue. We must continue to speak aggressively for the cause of human freedom. We must be unafraid to point out the moral wrong of those who would repress liberty. We must be unashamed to say that economic growth and material prosperity are the result of economic freedom, not state planning.

Fifth, we must continue our policy of diplomatic engagement in arms reduction negotiations. A START treaty is attainable in the next few years. In a few months new negotiations will open on conventional arms.

And there are other areas of concern. It's ironic that just when we're beginning to see reductions in nuclear arsenals and new negotiations on conventional arms, the scourge of an older and equally deadly menace appears to be on the increase. I'm talking about chemical weapons -- poison gas, whose use in the Gulf war has horrified the civilized world. And we face the prospect of more and more countries capable of producing or acquiring such weapons. We must establish respect for the international norms against illegal use of chemical weapons and see to it that this does not become a part of the history of the 21st century. I've called for an international conference against the use of chemical weapons, which will meet in Paris in January. This conference, along with the current negotiations for a comprehensive, effectively verifiable, and global ban, are our best hope for putting an end to this horror.

One other problem that darkens the otherwise hopeful horizon is the continuing failure of the Soviet Union to live up to important obligations in the arms control area. Chief among these is their large radar facility near Krasnoyarsk, which is a significant violation of a central element of the antiballistic missile agreement. We have told the Soviet Union that unless that violation is corrected in a verifiable manner we will not be able to conclude any new strategic arms control agreements. Nothing is more damaging to the integrity of the arms control process than for one side to be able to choose which parts of a solid agreement it will fulfill. The Soviets had more to say on this issue yesterday. We're certainly listening to what they have to say, but our legitimate concerns must be met.

And as Churchill also said to his own people at the end of the last war: ``Forward, unflinching, unswerving, indomitable, till the whole task is done and the whole world is safe and clean.'' Thank you, and God bless you.

The President. I don't know whether conflicts between them, but we have noticed, very definitely, that they are aware of the meaning of glasnost and perestroika, and they're moving, as Gorbachev has been moving in Russia, to make changes. I have met with the headman of Hungary just recently. He is a close friend and associate of Gorbachev's, and he is even moving faster than they are in the Soviet Union with actual economic changes and so forth. So that, I think, and I think in Russia, that his opposition is not from the people. We saw that in the summit meeting there. But the opposition is coming from his own bureaucracy that see some of their perquisites disappearing if he continues with his plan. And I've longed to tell him about some of the things that can be done and what he can go with the people. One of the things I've wanted to tell him -- haven't -- is that if they'd look back honestly at their revolution that brought communism to the Soviet Union they would find that really all they did was wipe out an inherited aristocracy and replace it with another inherited aristocracy: the Politburo.

Yes, Mr. President, a few weeks ago, the young Shah of Iran spoke to us here at the World Affairs Council about his hopes of returning to Iran as the monarch here. Do you, or would you in the future, support the new monarch's efforts to return to his country?

And we were supposed to believe that the Khomeini's life was going to end in a matter of hours -- or days, if not hours. But there would be a different government. I have to say that our relationship with the Shah -- and even though he was, in the sense of royalty, a ruler -- Nancy and I were there shortly before the revolution that ousted the Shah, and it was amazing to see that country then. As you looked to the skyline, you saw derricks all over.

These were building low-cost housing apartments for the people. A land reform was put into effect that gave land, as we once did, through homesteading to the peasants. And maybe part of the reason for the revolution was that most of that land belonged to the Mullahs, and they didn't like having it taken away.

But, no, I know that there are moves on, and there are factions that are organizing right now with the expectation that, come the end of the Ayatollah, the country can actually be moved in one of several directions. And people are preparing for that. And I think that the United States would be very willing to be supportive of a regime that wanted to restore democracy and freedom to the people.

Mr. President, with the new emphasis in the Soviet Union and its economic prosperity and peaceful coexistence with other nations, how do you feel about the possibility of continuing these events in the absence of Gorbachev's power?

The President. Well, of course, it would depend on who followed him, but I think it would be a great setback if anything happens to prevent him from continuing the program that he has set forth. As I say, we saw it among the people there. And I believe that one of the things that explains what he's trying to do is that he had hurdled over Stalin -- and I have reason to believe and know that he has no respect or regard for Stalin whatsoever -- but he's gone back to some of the teachings of Lenin.

Lenin, admittedly, was the starting Communist force. But at the same time, remember some of the things that he advocated, that he publicly said to the people of Russia: You may find yourselves working beside Capitalists, but don't be concerned. You'll learn from them. Well, now, you didn't hear anything like that from Stalin or any of the people that have followed him. But this man seems to have some ideas of that in mind. I hope that he can continue and will continue on this path, but he does have a built-in structure opposed to him. On the other hand, the people in the street seem to be on his side.

The President. I am not familiar enough with him yet to know enough about that, other than that we -- and have for 8 years -- we have tried to have a closer relationship with the countries of the Americas. I think this is one of the reasons why there's been such a spread of democracy in Latin America, but also right here on our northern continent -- Mexico and Canada. And we started a custom of having regular visits between the heads of state: my going there -- at times, their coming here. And we think that we can be most helpful there in what has been a kind of one-party state for a very long time. So, we will be making our moves to extend the hand of friendship and cooperation to it.

The President. I didn't hear the last part of it. Well, first of all, whether it can be achieved or not, world peace must be the goal that we strive for. If you look back over the centuries and see how much the world had wars and bloodshed going on, seemingly all the time, in different areas of the world, we have to continue to strive for that.

World War II, more than 40 years. When, before that -- and I've often credited it a lot to the Marshall plan and to things that were done in the peace. Previously in Europe, where countries fought countries down through the centuries, every time a war ended, the peace agreement seemed to lay the foundation for the next war. And this time we did something different. We not only held out the hand to our allies, we held it out to our erstwhile enemies -- who are now our closest friends, or among our closest friends. So, we've had four and a half decades of peace.

And one of them has to do with the replacement of a President. I happen to believe now -- I didn't to begin with -- I believe now that the 22d amendment -- you see, I can say this now because it's not for me; it's for whoever follows me -- that that was an invasion of the democratic rights of the people of this country. You should be allowed to vote for who you want to vote for, for as many times as you want to vote for.

But my concern is not just being replaced, it's who the replacement is. [Laughter] And I have some very strong feelings about that. But again, let me tell you, the free time -- yes, we're looking forward to that. I don't think anyone ever leaves this job that I have without having things left undone, things that you'd hoped could be accomplished, and so you leave hoping that they will be then accomplished by someone else. So, I have something of that feeling. But I will also tell you something else. Nancy and I -- when you're a Californian and you're away for 8 years, you live in a perpetual state of homesickness -- [laughter] -- and we're looking forward to living in California.

Mr. President, I have a two-part question here which unfortunately is going to have to be the last question of the afternoon, due to time constraints: Do you agree with the recent statements by Secretary Carlucci that the American Jewish community should stop objections to major arms sales to friendly Arab countries? And do you believe that -- with your departure from the White House -- will the next administration continue your positive support of the state of Israel?

They can never use them to become aggressors and start a war. And I can understand Israel's worrying about what happens if these countries that have been so hostile and where there is this state of war are armed better and so forth.

On the other hand, if we are to be able to persuade those countries to come in and join in a conference to bring peace to that troubled part of the world, I think they have to see us as being willing to be fair and friends of theirs, just as they now see us as what I said before: the best friend of Israel. So, we've been very careful. We're not going overboard. We're not going to create any armed monsters and aggressor nations there. But I do think that our judgment should be respected on when we have decided that we can make a sale of that kind that we should be allowed to do so because, once again, our pledge to Israel is that if anyone ever violated that contract -- to use them there -- Israel would have an ally: the United States.

Well, that's the last question. There are just a couple of things that weren't asked about, that didn't get in, that I just would like to tell you if I could. I have a new hobby. I am collecting jokes. [Laughter] And these jokes are jokes that I can absolutely prove are written -- not written -- are invented by the people of the Soviet Union and told among themselves. And they reveal a great sense of humor that we would all find very simpatico with us, but they also reveal a certain cynicism about facets of their system.

Extensive efforts by Government and the private sector are underway in the fight against AIDS and HIV infection, and great strides have been made. In the 7 years since the first reports of AIDS cases, the virus has been identified; the ways in which it is spread have been pinpointed; an AIDS antibody screening test has been developed and is being used to protect blood supplies; the first steps toward development of a protective vaccine have been taken; and promising drugs to fight the HIV and its manifestations are being synthesized and tested.

Nevertheless, today we have neither a cure for AIDS nor a vaccine against HIV infection. For this reason, it is vital that every individual know how HIV infection is spread -- and that we understand how to prevent the spread. The virus is most commonly spread through sexual contact with an infected person, especially through homosexual practices; through intravenous drug use with contaminated needles; and through other transmissions of infected blood. The virus is not commonly spread through ordinary, everyday, nonsexual contact.

To prevent the further spread of AIDS and HIV infection, we must heed lessons taught by medicine and morality alike. The Surgeon General has reminded all of us that the best way to prevent AIDS and the HIV is to abstain from sexual activity until adulthood and then to restrict sex to a faithful, monogamous relationship. This wise counsel, along with saying ``no'' to illegal drugs, can prevent the spread of most AIDS and HIV cases. Parents should explain to their children the goodness and blessings of chastity before marriage, of solid family life, and of a drug-free way of life.

One of America's greatest strengths has always been our ability to work together in times of adversity. We must rely on this strength to sustain us as we work to prevent the spread of AIDS and the HIV and as we care for those already afflicted.

This easy task, maintaining and testing our smoke detectors, is one we cannot afford to neglect. The vast majority of the more than 6,000 fire fatalities in our land each year occur in fires in the home. Smoke detectors are a simple and economical way to prevent needless deaths in fires, because they can alert people and allow them to escape during the early stages of fires. Most American homes have at least one fire detector, but nearly half of these life-saving devices are inoperable at any one time because their batteries are dead or missing. We must all remember that we can avert tragedy by taking a few seconds to replace smoke detector batteries and to check our detectors' operation. That will go a long way toward protecting lives and property all across our Nation.

Not long ago a certain candidate for President said that this election is not about ideology; it's about competence. I'd like to take a few moments to talk about competence: competence in the Government and what we've done to improve it over the last 8 years.

George Bush and I arrived in Washington, we found a grossly mismanaged Federal Government. To give you one example, in the last year of the previous administration, Federal spending was increasing at the dizzying rate of 17 percent a year, which is to say almost two times as fast as the economy as a whole.

Now, with the cost of the Government growing that fast, you'd think those in charge would have been keeping track of exactly how much each dollar was spent. But in fact, at that time, the Government did not know until long after the fact how much was spent. And even when it knew how much it had spent, it couldn't say for certain exactly what it had spent your money on. This, together with excessive regulations; deteriorating services; evidence of rampant waste, fraud, and abuse in a number of agencies, pointed to a government that was too big and out of control.

We've cut by over 600 million man-hours a year the time that businesses, State and local governments, and you and I as ordinary citizens have to spend filling out Federal forms and doing other Federal paperwork. This achievement has been even more important than many of us realize. A leading historian has written that ``government intervention and regulation was among the principal reasons for America's economic stagnation in the seventies.'' Under George Bush's leadership, we lifted the weight of excessive regulations, and that played a major role in getting our economy to really fly.

We also set up the Private Sector Survey on Cost Control led by Peter Grace -- almost 200 top business executives. This Commission spent months looking at every part of the Government, finding out where modern business practices could eliminate waste, fraud, and abuse in the Government. When they were through, they'd come up with 2,478 suggestions. And almost every recommendation we could put into effect without congressional action has been implemented. And we've saved close to $80 billion. We're hoping that the next Congress will pitch in and do its part.

Within the administration, we set up the Council on Integrity and Efficiency. Thanks to the Council, the Government has saved, or put to better use, over $100 billion in the past 6 years. For example, it's put in computers so that we can now identify bid-rigging contractors or catch con artists who take out loans from many Federal agencies and default on all of them.

And we've initiated the largest management-improvement program ever: Reform '88. By installing governmentwide cash, credit, financial, personnel, payroll, and productivity systems, we've brought common sense to the way we handle over $2 trillion that pass through the Government annually. Most of these improvements are now up and running right on schedule, and the result is that we're now doing a much better job than has ever been done of managing every single dollar the Government spends to make sure it's spent in the very best way it can be.

It took 75 days for an export license; now it's 5 days to some countries and no more than 17 days for any. And processing a claim for a title I Department of Housing and Urban Development loan has dropped from 100 days to 22.

Yes, the results speak for themselves. But there are other results, too, results that show competence. These results include the longest peacetime economic expansion on record, more new jobs created than Europe and Japan combined, while cutting inflation to a third of what it was and interest rates in half. Come to think of it, I'll stack our record of competence against any, any day of the week, because you see, our ideas work, and they work for you. Yes, the leader of the other ticket says ideology doesn't matter, but of course it does. He says he's on your side, but he's wearing the liberal team's tax-and-spend jersey. Maybe it's just that, fourth quarter with the 2-minute warning sounding, he wants you to think he switched sides. But he hasn't changed; he hasn't changed his ideas. Look at the record, and you can see who's on whose side.

You know, for the last 8 years, I've had a unique opportunity to witness the extraordinary compassion of the American people -- people like each of you, like each of you have for those who are less fortunate. So, let me just say that, really, this award belongs to the millions of American volunteers -- to the parents and children involved in the 15,000 Just Say No programs around the country, and the 24,000 men and women participating in the Foster Grandparent Program, to the doctors and others working with the Gift of Life Program, and to all of those who have worked so long for the Special Olympics, and to so many, many giving and generous people. So, on their behalf, I very gratefully accept this award. Thank you very much.

The President. I'm honored more than you can know to receive this year's Humanitarian Award from the Simon Wiesenthal Center. To receive an award given in honor of one of the true heroes of the 20th century, a man whose name will ever be inscribed in the book of life, is indeed a humbling experience. For what Simon Wiesenthal represents are the animating principles of Western civilization since the day Moses came down from Sinai: the idea of justice, the idea of laws, the idea of the free will. God gave us this instruction in Deuteronomy: ``I call Heaven and Earth to witness against you today, that I have set before you life and death.

Those monsters who made the Holocaust -- they chose death, with results almost too awful to grasp. The mind reels from the enormity of the crime. It begs to be set free from so terrible a fact, to wipe it from the memory. But people like Simon Wiesenthal have made us understand that we must not, we cannot, and we will not. His life is testimony to his unwavering commitment to do honor to those who burned in the flames of the Holocaust by bringing their murderers and the accomplices of their murderers to the justice of a civilized world that, two score after, still reels in astonishment and disgust. And I salute him on his 80th birthday, as do we all.

But out of the ashes of the Holocaust there came a good thing, a great thing, called the State of Israel. And like Simon Wiesenthal, the animating principles of the State of Israel are justice and law tempered with compassion -- yes, the very principles of Judaism itself. And we Americans, with our Judeo-Christian heritage, have no better friends than the people of Israel.

We acknowledge this truth, and our administration has made the ties that bind us warmer than they have ever been. In the last 5 years, we initiated an unprecedented strategic understanding with the State of Israel. We negotiated a free-trade area between our two countries. Most important, perhaps, we promised that we would not permit Israel to lose its qualitative edge in the Middle East, and we delivered on that promise. This record of friendship and fealty moved the Democratic mayor of New York City to say the other week that our administration was the best friend Israel has ever had in the White House.

America and Israel share an understanding forged in the blood and horror of the Second World War. It is not enough for us to invoke our common traditions, to praise ourselves for our Judeo-Christian morality and our decency. We also must defend our traditions, our morality, and our decency. The West knows all too well what happens when the barbarians believe they can act unchecked. All we need do is look at Simon Wiesenthal's life: a stepfather dead in one of Stalin's prisons, a mother killed by Hitler's gas chambers, himself a survivor of the camps.

We must defend ourselves against the evil of totalitarianism. We must follow his example and never waver in our pursuit of justice, never waver in our pursuit of resolve. We must remain strong, and we must be willing to use force when we're under threat. This is a lesson that binds us still closer to the State of Israel, for the fact is: a strong Israel depends upon a strong America. An America that loses faith in the idea of a strong defense is an America that will lose faith in a nation at arms like Israel.

That same strength and resolve coupled with diplomatic vision and a commitment to political reconciliation are essential if Israel is to help achieve a negotiated settlement among the war-weary peoples of the Middle East. Strength and resolve will likewise be the means of resolving our quest for the freedom of those Soviet Jews who seek to make their lives in the West. And when these become realities -- and, ladies and gentlemen, I believe with all my heart they will -- then, and only then, will the struggle of Simon Wiesenthal achieve its ultimate aim: peace for the Jewish people.

I am withholding my approval of S. 437, a bill ``to authorize the refinancing of certain small business debentures, and for other purposes.'' The bill would have shortchanged American taxpayers by allowing certain borrowers to prepay their Federally guaranteed loans at reduced premiums.

Administration may guarantee a particular type of bond, known as a debenture, issued by State and local development companies. The companies have sold these debentures to the Department of the Treasury's Federal Financing Bank and used the proceeds received to make loans to small business borrowers.

The amendment made by Section 1 of S. 437 would have permitted development companies to prepay their debentures held by the Bank at substantially reduced premiums and to finance the prepayments by issuing new debentures fully guaranteed by the Government. Such an arrangement would in effect allow a borrower to change the borrowing terms to which it had previously agreed any time it is financially favorable to the borrower -- and therefore unfavorable to the Bank and American taxpayers -- to do so. Although prepayments under the amendments made by Section 1 of S. 437 temporarily would have reduced the Federal deficit, in future years the deficit would have been substantially increased as the result of the borrowers' avoidance of interest payments that would have been paid in the absence of prepayments.

Administration may purchase debentures issued by a small business investment company. The amendment made by Section 2 of S. 437 authorizes adjustment in certain circumstances of the interest rates on such debentures and provides that the face amount of the debenture with an adjusted interest rate will not be treated as new budget authority or new credit authority. This artificial budget accounting rule conflicts with the Federal budget accounting practices of the Office of Management and Budget and the Congressional Budget Office. The result of this accounting sleight of hand would have been to understate the adverse impact of Section 2 of S. 437 on the Federal budget deficit.

I'd had this kind of a supporting cast, I never would have left Hollywood. [Laughter] Well, good morning. And today we celebrate victory in the name of a right as old as the Union itself and as central to our Union as any: the right all Americans have to protect their property. We're here to sign into law the Berne Convention Implementation Act of 1988. It will enable the United States to adhere to the Berne convention for the protection of literary and artistic works. The Berne convention, which was originally concluded in 1886 and approved by our Senate earlier this month, provides for the protection of copyrighted works from international pirates who make their living by stealing and then selling the creative accomplishments of others.

We've been running a trade surplus of over $1 billion annually in copyrighted goods, and it would have been much larger had it not been for the pirating of American copyright work. In 1986 alone, the entertainment industry may have lost more than $2 billion in potential revenue, and our computer and software industries more than $4 billion in potential revenue. That's why adherence to the Berne convention has been such an important goal of the administration and why this occasion marks a watershed for us.

Ambassador Clayton Yeutter has said, joining the Berne convention will also boost U.S. efforts to strengthen intellectual property protection in multilateral negotiations. In 1986 we succeeded in placing the issue on the agenda of the Uruguay round of multilateral trade negotiations and committed the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade to address the relationship between trade and intellectual property rights. When trade ministers meet in Montreal in December for the midterm review of the Uruguay round, they must direct negotiators to commence substantive negotiations.

Officials in our administration worked closely with many key Members of Congress, such as Senator Pete Wilson and Congressman Carlos Moorhead, to get this bill passed in Congress. And we must also remember our good friend and former Secretary of Commerce, the late Malcolm Baldrige, who led the charge on this legislation.

The President. That is absolutely not true, but let me point something out. Terry Anderson -- in that terrible confinement at the hands of those barbarians -- any information he has, has to have come from them. There is no contact with the outside world. We've been doing everything we can do in the interest of our hostages, and the very simple answer to that is for those people to let them go. And we're going to continue our efforts until we get them back. But there's never been any interference, nor have we ever been negotiating any more than we would with any other kind of kidnaper on a ransom type of basis.

The President. Nor was I, because we were never doing anything of that kind. When the covert operation -- which was not with Iran or Iran's Government but with people who were looking forward to a day when there could be a decent government in Iran -- that we were talking to -- and it had to be covert, or they would have been executed instantly.

The President. George has been a part of everything that we've accomplished. I have always felt that a Vice President should be an executive vice president, as in a corporation, and not somebody sitting over on the sidelines waiting for me to have a relapse. [Laughter] But he's been a part of that, but in a constructive way, and that's why he's my choice in this coming election.

The President. Well, there have been instances before in which we have seen on the tape and film of hostages, in various circumstances, some message; and some of them have been able in their reading to indicate to those who are familiar with them that they were reading something they were forced to read and it did not represent their thinking. So, you have to remember, these men are in the closest type of confinement by people that -- as I said, the only way to describe them -- they're barbarians.

The President. I'm not going to give up hope for any of our hostages that are held. That's just too unthinkable. And as I say, we have kept every door open that we can, and the one thing we cannot do is negotiate with the kidnapers on a sort of ransom idea because that just encourages more kidnaping and more hostage taking.

The President. It is a distinct pleasure and an honor to welcome Your Majesties to Washington. I've been looking forward to meeting King Hussein longer than I've been President. One of the advantages of age is the perspective it gives to looking back. I've watched King Hussein from a distance for many years, watched as he ascended the throne and accepted great responsibility while still in his teens. And in the years since, he's proved himself time and again a brave man and, I might add, a wise leader.

Our friendship with King Hussein has stood the test of time. It's based on shared interests, but also on common values and mutual respect. During the three decades that he has led Jordan, America has maintained an unwavering dedication to the search for Middle East peace. And over these many years, King Hussein has been our friend. Such loyalty is not lightly regarded by the people of the United States.

Let it be understood that America seeks peace with honor and security for all the states and people of the region, undoubtedly a similar goal to your own. Yet at this moment, Your Majesty, there's much to discuss about how to reach our mutual goal. Recent tragic events make it even more imperative that we work together if solutions are to be found.

Today, let us achieve an understanding about ourselves and then reaffirm to the world that there are no differences between us that we cannot overcome and none that will lessen the friendship between the United States and the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan.

For our part, no one should doubt that the preservation of Jordan's security, integrity, and its unique and enduring character remains a matter of highest importance. Your Majesty, over the years your concern for the well-being of your people, your creative statesmanship, and your good sense have enriched Jordan. Under your leadership, King Hussein, the Jordanian economy has yielded fruit, literally and figuratively, to all the citizens of Jordan. And in Jordan today, the private sector is thriving and the standard of living is increasingly a model for developing nations.

In the last two decades, the literacy rate rose from 32 to 70 percent. Educated Jordanians now fill skilled jobs all over the Middle East. Meanwhile, unemployment has almost disappeared, and Jordan boasts an average annual economic growth rate of 9 percent. Your success offers hope that people who've known grievous adversity can rise above their conflicts to build a new life. Similarly, there are tremendous opportunities for economic betterment in your region, while political problems work themselves out.

Given freedom to do so, people who live in such proximity will interact to better themselves, even though divided by politics. Such peaceful interactions should be applauded. Furthermore, the United States encourages any mutually beneficial economic cooperation between nations. The problems of water and transportation, for example, are areas of potential benefit to you and your neighbors if a farsighted approach is taken.

Your Majesty, there are, however, other forces which seek to widen and exploit the divisions among the peoples of the Middle East. Tension and conflict both reflect and increase the power and influence of such hateful forces. When focusing on the internal problems of the region, we must never lose sight of the role of external powers in aggravating those problems.

In your book, ``Uneasy Lies the Head,'' you proclaimed, ``I fear only God.'' Well, in your life you've demonstrated this courage in so many ways -- as a pilot, as a soldier and, most important, as a statesman. But the point of that statement is not alone that you are brave, but that you are devout. It highlights your belief in and respect for the Supreme Being who's Father of us all. Americans admire such values.

Your Majesty, during your reign you have demonstrated the wisdom of your grandfather by maintaining a perspective on potential dangers while still providing leadership on the immediate issues confronting you and your neighbors.

The United States is concerned about outside threats to the Middle East, as well as those issues which most directly affect the people of the Middle East. We're sincerely attempting to do all that can be done to end the ongoing tragedy that has plagued that area of the world. A lasting peace is in our interest, just as it is in the interest of all people of good will. Respecting our differences and knowing you as we do, we're confident that you share our heartfelt desire for peace and stability. Your courage and integrity earned this trust and respect long ago.

The story is told that early in your reign, you decided to stay the night at a Bedouin encampment which was under threat of attack. And while walking in the darkness, you heard the voice of an elder tribesman proclaim from inside a tent, ``Abdullah would be proud of his grandson.'' Well, we think that's even truer today, and we want you to know that we, too, are proud, proud to have you as a friend.

The King. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, dear friends, it's indeed a moving moment for me as I express my sincere gratitude for the warm welcome to both Noor and myself and to our Jordanian colleagues who are with us today.

It is a great pleasure for us to be once again in the United States of America in response to your kind invitation, and to visit with you, the leader of this great nation. This year indeed marks the 25th anniversary of a unique relationship between the United States and Jordan, unique in its length and durability. It is a relationship seasoned by time and trouble. I recognized, as the leader of Jordan, 25 years ago, that the values and principles on which your nation's foundations were created were the same ones which are so dear to the Arabs and which were the foundations of the Arab awakening and resolve from the beginnings of this century.

It was my commitment to those ideals and principles that prompted me to proudly seek the establishment and consolidation of a friendship between our nations a quarter of a century ago. Meaningful and dynamic relations must always be based on mutual understanding. Throughout these eventful years, I've been totally committed to both the cause of the Arab people, which is my cause and motivation, and to a realization that it is an honorable and just cause. I deemed it my duty to present it and defend it and explain it to the best of my ability.

I'm a firm believer in the proverb that says you can hide the truth from all the people half the time, half the people all the time, but not all of the people all of the time, and that justice must inevitably, finally prevail. We must not permit the distortions of others to become a barrier to the understanding on which our relationship is based.

I know you, Mr. President, to be a man of honor, dedicated to the highest of ideals and principles. I know also that you have the courage of your convictions. You have displayed this throughout your public life and, because of it, have the respect of those who know you. I am confident that working together with all who truly seek peace and security for the people of the Middle East, that these qualities will provide the source of strength which that goal requires.

At this most turbulent and critical of times, I see in jeopardy not only Arab rights and legitimate interests but a threat to the very Arab identity and the rights of future Arab generations. I also see the larger threats to world peace, as well as to the vital interests of all those concerned with the security of our region, including the United States of America.

I hope that at this time I shall be able to present our case convincingly in the interest of us all, and thus achieve greater mutual understanding. In doing so, we can pave the way towards formulating proper policies and build once more lasting and strengthened relations between us, based on clear and solid foundations. It's a great task and a great challenge. It is, indeed, a duty. Despite the difficulties that surround us at this most critical juncture, I am optimistic, and I am determined. I am hopeful that upon my return home, I shall be able to carry to my people and to my colleagues at the next Arab summit, promising impressions and favorable news.

I can but do my best in these coming days. I hope it will be adequate, for what is at stake is both of our national interests and the future of so many. I am confident that on the basis of our long, close friendship and with courage, dedication, and God's blessing, we can -- and indeed, must -- successfully meet the challenge before us.

Mr. President, we are deeply in your debt for your friendship and the warmth of your welcome. May God bless you, protect you, guide your steps in leading the great American people towards a brighter future and in serving the cause of all mankind.

King Hussein once explained the three virtues upon which Bedouin life is based, saying, ``We believe to be an honorable man, you must have the courage to defend your honor; we believe you must always show hospitality; and what is yours belongs to your guests.'' Tonight it gives me great pleasure to extend American hospitality to King Hussein and lovely Queen Noor. We cannot hope to match the graciousness of the Bedouins, but we do hope you'll consider what is ours is yours.

Tonight, we honor a man for whom liberty has personal as well as political meaning. Heads of state often find themselves restricted by their own staffs. King Hussein, for example, was once told that he could pilot airplanes as long as he didn't fly solo. His aides now know better. [Laughter] Today when many Americans think of King Hussein, an image of a swashbuckling pilot strapping himself into a jet comes to mind. And however attractive that image may be, it's Hussein's integrity that captures the hearts of Americans.

We are here to honor a head of state who's been a leader in the search for a just and lasting Middle East peace. Such a peace has been one of the most vexing international problems in the post-war world. Yet His Majesty has never abandoned the belief that people of good will, through dedication and vision, can find the means to bring peace with dignity, justice, and security to his region.

Our talks today ranged over numerous issues. The path ahead is fraught with both danger and opportunity. After our conversation, I remain certain we will walk this path as friends. Where we differed, we did so in that spirit and discussed how we can work together in complementary ways to achieve our shared goals.

The King. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, no words would adequately express the warmth of feelings that I have within me, the pride in a friendship that has meant so much, between our nations, and which has weathered storms and which has lasted for only a fraction of the time, I hope, it will last. For I am convinced, sir, that what is between us in terms of the ideals that are dear to us, the principles we uphold, the hopes and dreams, aspirations for a better tomorrow, the dedication to those ideals and principles, and the commitment to the cause of a better tomorrow with peace and dignity in our part of the world, or anywhere else, are elements that will always keep us together as brethren and as friends, proud of this friendship, ever determined to make our contribution to the fullest possible extent.

Sir, you have kindly spoken of some of the Bedouin traditions. I am proud to belong to the oldest tribe in Arabia, but I would like to say very frankly and sincerely that if we were to be outdone, you have succeeded in that respect in the warmth of your reception and the feelings that I have felt on this day that I shall always remember. Twenty-five years, sir, and then, many an occasion when I visited the United States and had the privilege of meeting with the leaders of this great Nation, yet no visit has been more important than this one, at this time, at this point in history.

I am one of many in this world who have had a very deep admiration for you and respect for your courage, for the fact that you have always stood in defense of principles and ideals. And throughout these many years, we have been proud to belong to the family of free nations, and the cause of freedom and justice is very dear to us.

I must say, sir, I have been looking forward to this privilege and pleasure of meeting you. And before we met this morning, I was feeling the weight of the responsibility I bore, because there is so much at stake in terms which I can't even express, in terms of all that is important, for now and for tomorrow.

I can only say, sir, that having had this privilege, I feel more encouraged than I have felt for a long, long period of time; a greater faith that all will eventually be right; pride in knowing you, pride in our friendship. You, to us, are an example -- all the human, wonderful qualities that are yours.

There are many areas where we have common treasured possessions as well, sir. I was reminded today of the fact, when we were having lunch, that we were talking and sitting ``Philadelphia style,'' I believe was the expression used. I was reminded of the fact that we came from another Philadelphia. That is the name of the capital of Jordan, its ancient name. And Philadelphia here for you is the beacon for freedom and the beginnings of the creation of this, one of the greatest nations of all times, the City of Brotherly Love.

There is much that we share. There is faith in our hearts. There is a commitment to do our best and to work together to obtain our common goals and objectives. I pray to God to grant you always good health and every continued success, sir, in your great duties as the head of this great Nation and its leader and in fulfilling your tasks and facing up to the challenge for a better future for all mankind.

Ladies and gentlemen, I'd like you to join me in making a toast to President Reagan, President of the United States, to Mrs. Reagan, and to brotherly love, to friendship everlasting, and to a better tomorrow.

The President. Your Majesty and ladies and gentlemen, let me say a few words about the frank and very constructive meetings that I've just completed with His Majesty. We had wide-ranging discussions about the dangers and the opportunities we face in the Middle East.

We agree on much -- on the necessity of making progress toward a just, lasting, and comprehensive Middle East peace, on the profound dangers which threaten the security of the region, and on the necessity to work in complementary ways to address these serious issues.

We also discussed bilateral matters. The security and well-being of the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan is a matter of historic and enduring concern to the United States. We agreed that reinforcing this friendship is a primary goal and discussed how our relations can be strengthened.

The King. Thank you, sir. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to reiterate my feelings of very deep gratitude to you, sir, for the unique opportunity through which you enabled me to have the privilege and pleasure of meeting with you and visiting with friends in the United States of America at this critical juncture, critical time, which has a bearing and an effect on the future of our part of the world and on many common goals and interests that we share with you.

I thank you, sir, for the opportunity to be with a friend whom I admire and respect. Now more than before, I value our friendship. And it has been a very moving experience for me to meet you, sir, and to have the chance to talk with you frankly, openly on all matters of mutual interest.

I'll go back with impressions I will convey to my people and colleagues in the area. I can assure you that we stand together in our hopes for a better future, for a just and comprehensive peace in the Middle East, and from our vantage point, for the freedom of the Arab people, the safeguarding of their identity, and for a better future for generations to come.

Ever proud of the relations that exist between us, a deep-rooted friendship, our commitment to the same ideals and principles, and having had the chance to meet you, sir, I am very, very proud to look into the future with hope and conviction that we will work together and make our contribution for a better future and a better tomorrow.

We wish you, sir, every continued success, good health. God bless you. We are proud to be your friends, sir. And rest assured that we will be on our way home shortly, realizing that this particular meeting at this particular time, in comparison with all my previous visits to Washington, has left me more reassured than any in the past and more confident of the future.

This bill extends a number of programs for Vietnam-era veterans, including eligibility of educationally disadvantaged veterans for special noncompetitive appointments to the Federal civil service and for vocational training and secondary school education. It also extends the Vietnam-era veterans readjustment counseling program, with provision for shifting this program into regular Veterans Administration medical facilities at the end of fiscal year 1984.

The bill would grant eligibility for Veterans Administration medical care to veterans who may have been exposed to Agent Orange and certain other toxic substances in Vietnam and also to veterans exposed to ionizing radiation from nuclear weapons testing or the U.S. occupation of Nagasaki and Hiroshima following World War II. Eligibility would be provided without regard to financial need and on a priority basis.

I note, however, that the Congress has put a time limit of approximately 3 years on the new medical care eligibility, so that it can be reexamined after the initial results of the Agent Orange study are available. Moreover, I expect this provision to be implemented in a manner that will not add to budgetary costs of Veterans Administration medical care and treatment.

Another section of H.R. 3499 would establish the number of hospital and nursing home beds in Veterans Administration medical facilities at not more than 125,000 and not less than 100,000, and require the Veterans Administration to operate and maintain not less than 90,000 such beds. Such a limitation must not restrict the ability of the Veterans Administration to use an appropriate mix of health care services, including ambulatory care, to treat the maximum number of veterans.

This provision would also require that the President include in the budget transmitted to Congress for each fiscal year amounts for medical care and construction to enable the Veterans Administration to operate and maintain the required minimum number of hospital and nursing home beds. I interpret this language to mean what it says. This language does not, and in my view could not, require the President to request of Congress any specific amounts, for it is the President's constitutional duty to make recommendations to Congress of such measures as he judges necessary and expedient.

Finally, H.R. 3499 authorizes a new small business loan program in the Veterans Administration for disabled and Vietnam-era veterans. Because this program might duplicate a similar program in the Small Business Administration and would involve the Veterans Administration in an area in which it has no expertise, I intend to weigh carefully any efforts to fund this program.

Many of the provisions of H.R. 3499 are desirable and have been supported by the administration. A number of them will be particularly helpful to Vietnam-era veterans. In view of my strong commitment to the welfare of America's veterans, particularly Vietnam-era veterans, I am approving this measure despite some of the concerns I have noted.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The family is the basic unit of our society, the heart of our free democracy. It provides love, acceptance, guidance, support, and instruction to the individual. Community values and goals that give America strength also take root in the home. In times of change and challenge, families keep safe our cultural heritage and reinforce our spiritual foundation.

As the mainstay of our national life, family life must be preserved. When a family needs external assistance to help it to perform its unique role, this assistance should not interfere with the family's fundamental responsibilities and prerogatives. Rather, aid should be supportive and purposeful in strengthening the family's stability, self-sufficiency and permanence.

National Family Week is a time to be thankful for the family as a national heritage and resource. It is a time to recommit ourselves to the concept of the family -- a concept that must withstand the trends of lifestyle and legislation. Let us pledge that our institutions and policies will be shaped to enhance an environment in which families can strengthen their ties and best exercise their beliefs, authority, and resourcefulness. And let us make our pledge mindful that we do so not only on behalf of individual family members, but for America.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Since 1956 Mr. Archer has been a member of the law firm of Hamel, Park, McCabe and Saunders of Washington, D.C. As senior tax partner in the firm, he has participated in many contested and litigated tax cases at every level, as well as consultation, tax planning, and administrative and legislative matters for a variety of clients.

Zimbabwe is well into its second year of independence, and in the period which has elapsed since the last report to the committees, the state of the nation can be described as basically stable politically. The disarmament and integration of the two former guerrilla groups continued on schedule and is expected to be completed in the very near future. This process represents one of this young nation's most significant achievements.

Prime Minister Mugabe's position within the government and within his party is still strong and his overall position in the country was enhanced by his skillful handling of the dismissal of former Minister of Manpower, Planning and Development, Edgar Tekere. While Mr. Mugabe is still lobbying for the creation of a one-party state, he has stated that he will not move in this direction without a popular mandate. The Prime Minister is also becoming a more prominent spokesman among Front Line leaders and within the OAU. Of obvious concern, however, is the increasing sensitivity Prime Minister Mugabe and other government officials are beginning to display over what they perceive as unfavorable press. The government recently fired the editor of the Umtali Post allegedly for questioning the military arrangement with the North Koreans.

In making public the government's decision to conclude a military agreement with North Korea, the Prime Minister stated that the brigade to be trained and equipped by the North Koreans would be used for internal security only. He also said that the acceptance of military assistance has no political or ideological significance so far as Zimbabwe's non-alignment policy goes, but rather this action, balancing British military aid, is an affirmation of that non-alignment.

Economically, Zimbabwe appears to be going through a period of defining what government's policy and role in the economic sphere should be. This could be a lengthy process, and it is already generating considerable concern in the private sector about its own role in the country's plans for economic development. Zimbabwe's economic policymakers remain very realistic, however, and, for the most part, seem inclined to approach structural changes in the economy with caution and gradualism, recognizing the importance of relating ideology to attainable goals.

The government has attempted to maintain a favorable investment climate. However, in keeping with its commitment to the implementation of socialist goals, the government wants the private sector to become more responsive to its development concerns as well as to Zimbabwe's overall development goals. The recent decision to create a minerals marketing authority to control the production and marketing of the country's minerals and metals no doubt represents an attempt to manifest these concerns.

Although the new budget reflects a moderately socialist path, it contains no references to drastic income redistribution programs or plans for nationalization of the private sector. Tax hikes called for in the budget are high by Zimbabwean standards; they are designed to increase government revenue and will have the added effect of allowing the government to increase expenditures in the fields of health services, schooling and other social programs.

While there is no question that Zimbabwe is continuing to make economic progress and that the economy is growing, the rate of growth is slowing somewhat and inflation is up for both high and low-income families. Key factors contributing to the economic slow-down include constraints in foreign exchange and labor and transportation problems. The emigration of whites is continuing, but there has been no significant increase or decrease in the numbers leaving.

There are also indications that recent tensions between South Africa and Zimbabwe may be having a negative impact on the economy. Also, the Zimbabwe Government has acknowledged that the country cannot cut off commercial relations with its neighbor. South Africa's decision to cancel the preferential trade agreement and to phase out Zimbabwean contract workers presently in the Republic will certainly aggravate an already difficult foreign exchange situation. The reclaiming by South Africa of 25 of its railroad locomotives is also causing serious transport problems for Zimbabwe, particularly with respect to the transport of petroleum products and to the movement of surplus grain from Zimbabwe's record maize harvest.

Land distribution is being carried out very cautiously and carefully, to insure that the basic infrastructure is either in place or under construction before settlement takes place.  Present plans call for the resettlement of 18,000 families by the end of this year on presently unused land.

Section 1. Establishment. (a) There is established the National Productivity Advisory Committee. The Committee shall be composed of distinguished citizens appointed by the President, only one of whom may be a full-time officer or employee of the Federal Government.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Committee shall advise the President and the Secretary of the Treasury through the Cabinet Council on Economic Affairs on the Federal Government's role in achieving higher levels of national productivity and economic growth.

The President today announced the appointment of the following individuals to be members of the National Productivity Advisory Committee. The President also announced that William E. Simon will serve as Chairman. Roger B. Porter, Counselor to the Secretary of the Treasury, will serve as Executive Secretary.

From the day our administration took office, our top priority has been to rescue this economy from years of government mismanagement. We inherited the highest rates since the Civil War, the first back-to-back years of double-digit inflation since World War I, rising budget deficits, and a national debt ready to break through the trillion dollar barrier.

For years, government spending and taxation have grown faster than the underlying economy. The American people elected us to reverse that trend, and that's what we've begun to do. Our program has only been in effect for some 40 days, and you can't cure 40 years of problems in that short time. But we've laid a firm foundation for economic recovery in 1982.

We said we would cut taxes, and we've enacted the biggest tax reductions in history. And let's remember, those reductions will barely offset the built-in tax increases, already scheduled between now and 1984, that were adopted in 1977. We've slowed the growth of Federal spending. We've cut the growth of regulations by a third. Interest rates and inflation are both heading down.

Our reforms can stimulate new savings, new investments, new jobs, and a new America. But one condition must still be met. This government must stiffen its spine and not throw in the towel on our fight to get Federal spending under control.

The budget savings, despite all the talk of austerity, have been accomplished without sacrificing necessary government functions and services. Even with a $35 billion cut so far, Federal spending is still rising far too rapidly. The Federal budget has doubled since 1975, tripled since 1970. Who can honestly look Americans in the eye and tell them spending is under control?

Fiscal `82 is already 5 weeks old, but I have not received a single, regular appropriations bill. Most of the bills pending are overbudget. It is imperative that the Congress meet its own spending target and move quickly to pass appropriation bills or a second continuing resolution that fits our September 24th request. I stand ready to veto any bill that abuses the limited resources of the taxpayers.

It's ironic that those who would have us assume blame for this economic mess are the ones who created it. They just can't accept that their discredited policies of tax and tax, spend and spend are at the root of our current problems.

We will not go back to business as usual. Our plan for economic recovery is sound. It was designed to correct the problems we face. I am determined to stick with it and stay on course, and I will not be deterred by temporary economic changes or short-term political expediency.

Q. Mr. President, your recent statements on limited nuclear war, State Department memos, interviews, have all hinted at possible intervention against Qadhafi, Castro. A high state of belligerency seems to personify your foreign policy, and people say it's in disarray.

My question is, were you misunderstood on the question of nuclear war? Are we going to intervene in the Caribbean or anywhere else? Are we going to provide a military shield for Egypt if it goes into Libya?

The President. I have been just as disturbed as you are and just as confused by some of the things that I've been reading about our supposed foreign policy. Let me say that that statement that started the whole thing with regard to the possibility of the spread of nuclear war, I can't say that it was misunderstood. I don't think it was misunderstood by the editors who were in the room. I was having lunch with a group of editors, and I made a statement that I've made a number of times. I won't repeat it here, but it was an explanation of the whole strategic concept. And then, evidently hearing it secondhand, because it wasn't written by anyone who was in that room, to my knowledge, it appeared in an entirely different context. And we could go back and get the transcript of what was actually said, and I would stand by that.

We have no plans for putting Americans in combat any place in the world. And our goal is peace; it has always been. And at the end of this month, we will go into negotiations with the Soviet Union on what I hope will be reduction of the theatre nuclear weapons in Europe to the lowest point possible.

The President. We are interested, of course, in the Caribbean. This is why we've been helping Salvador, because we believe that revolution has been exported to that area and with design. Again, as I say, our economic help to El Salvador is three times the military assistance we're giving. And that military assistance is not in the nature of combat forces of ours, nor do we have any plans to make it that way.

Q. With the budget deficit continuing to grow, have you decided -- are you going to try to raise taxes in some way in '82, '83, or '84, or are you going to seek further budget cuts? And, also, now having said that your promise of a balanced budget by '84 can't be met, when do you expect to see a balanced budget, and what assurances do we have that this time it can be met?

The President. With the uncertainty, Jim, of when we can bring ourselves out of this recession which, I think, will take place in the first half of '82, I would hesitate to try and make a specific -- set a date or an amount with regard to budget deficits or when a balanced budget would take place. That is still our goal. That has to be our goal. Government has to return to staying within its revenues. Our goal remains the same. We recognize now that the likelihood of meeting it on the 1984 date has become an unlikelihood, because of unforeseen changes. And again, as I say, we can't predict when that will be. But we stay on target, that is our eventual goal.

I don't think, however, that just the balancing of a budget could justify any means to attain it. You could always balance a budget if you put it on the backs of the people with tax increases. I don't favor that at all, because every time you do that you find that it's like getting addicted to a drug, because of the very fact that those tax increases then reduce the prosperity and the productivity of the Nation further, and you find that you need more of the same and more of the same. You'll reach a point of no return.

The reduction of government spending is the answer, and the thing that we are going to attempt. And we have before the Congress now, requests for further budget reductions. And in January when we present the figures for the '83 budget and the out year of '84, we will be asking for more of the same. Whether there will be any changes in revenue procedures or not, that is a decision to be made, and that, too, will be addressed in January when we present the other budget.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to followup Helen's question. You mentioned El Salvador and the importance that El Salvador has to the United States and this region. Yet, the El Salvador Government is rapidly losing ground, and guerrillas already control almost one-fourth of the land there. How far will the United States go to keep the Duarte government in power?

The President. Well, first of all, let me say that there's some disagreement, a great deal of disagreement, about who is mostly in power or what the guerrillas might control. We have been urging, and hopefully cooperating with, a solution that would lead to an election and settle this dispute by peaceful means. It is true the guerrillas have switched their tactics now. Unable to win a military victory, they have switched them to hit-and-run tactics against the infrastructure of industry and the economy, trying to bring down the government by destroying the economy. But I don't believe that we could accept without question that there may be something of a stalemate in the inability to bring about a quick military solution to this, but we would prefer the other.

How far are we prepared to go? As I've said, we're giving economic aid. I think we should continue to do that. I don't believe this requires in any way, nor have we considered, aid of the kind of actual military intervention on our part. But we are hopeful, still, that with the help of some of the other neighbors in Central America who feel as we do, that we can bring about the idea of an election and a peaceful settlement.

It is true about one thing: It cannot be denied, the guerrillas, with their terrorist tactics in El Salvador, have failed miserably in an attempt to bring the population over on their side. The populace is still in support of the government.

Q. Mr. President, in your exchange with the editors -- I happen to have the transcript -- I'd like to read you what you said. You said, ``I could see,'' you said, ``where you could have the exchange of tactical weapons against troops in the field without it bringing either one of the major powers to pushing the button.'' Then, Secretary Haig last week talked of the possibility of a nuclear warning shot as part of NATO's contingency plans.

The President. Well, I have not been a party to the contingency planning of NATO that has gone on now for approximately 30 years and which, I think, has proven itself a deterrent to military action in Europe and for all this period of time.

What you've just quoted that I said there, the discussion was in the area of -- and I suppose it's hypothetical -- where you're talking about is it possible to ever use a nuclear weapon without this spreading automatically to the exchange of the strategic weapons from nation to nation. And I gave as what I thought was something that was possible, that the great difference between theatre nuclear weapons, the artillery shells and so forth that both sides have, that I could see where both sides could still be deterred from going into the exchange of strategic weapons if there had been battlefield weapons, troop-to-troop exchange there.

The President. Well, one in particular. I know that there's also some dispute about what I'm going to say between the parties concerned, but I believe -- and I have stated previously that I believe -- that it's implicit in the offering of that plan, recognition of Israel's right to exist as a nation. And this has been one of the sticking points so far, with the Arab world refusing to make that acknowledgement. This was why I have referred to it as a hopeful sign that here was an offer of a plan, whether you agreed with it or not, but indicated the willingness to negotiate, which does imply.

The President. Well, let me answer it this way. I think that the most realistic approach is the one that we are taking, which is, the attempt to bring peace in the Middle East must be based on the Camp David accords and 242 Resolution of the United Nations.

The President. Well, now, I don't know what his definition is of a ``real downer.'' I think that we're going to have some hard times for the next few months. I think we're going to see a pickup in the economy -- and I think that Don Regan believes this also -- in spring or at the latest, early summer of 1982. The interest rates, as you know, have come down 3\1/2\ points since September, and this has been one of the major causes of our stepping into a recession; that while we had predicted, as you well know, a stagnant economy -- and we refer to it as a ``soggy economy'' -- and so forth throughout the year, none of us had predicted the stepping over into recession. And it has changed some of the estimates, obviously, as witness our second question here about where we're going.

But I think all of us are agreed that we are going to come out of it in the next several months. And we believe as our economic program starts to work and has more than 40 days behind it, the oncoming tax cuts will take place that are scheduled for next July, and so forth, we think are going to bring about the reduction of unemployment and the stimulation of productivity. And we've had some pretty hopeful signs already with regard to the producer's cost index that has just recently come to us.

The B - 52, which has been hailed at the moment as the one that could be our craft for carrying missiles and penetrating, was never built for that. It would have to be rebuilt. So, you're not home free by using that older plane. There's a cost to that. The B - 1 carries anywhere from one and a half to two times the payload that it carries. The B - 1 has a target on radar that's only a fraction of that of the B - 52. And it has greater speed.

But the problem that has necessitated that is a gap that remains between what has to be the ultimate use of the B - 52, with their age, and the development of the new tactical bomber. That is only in a state of research and study right now. We cannot guarantee the date that it will be ready. It is that gap when we would have nothing that the B - 1 would fill. But the very fact that its one mission of penetrating enemy airspace might be eliminated in a few years time, at the end of that gap as, hopefully, the other plane comes on line, does not mean that you scrap it. There will be other purposes and functions for which it can be used. So, it isn't a total loss.

As to the figure given by Congress, Cap Weinberger was my finance director for a while in California, and I trust his figures better than I trust theirs. And I think that we go ahead, and I think that's a worst-case situation that they're taking with regard to cost.

Q. Mr. President, recently we've looked at unemployment that has nearly increased 20 percent and a minority portion of our economy that has experienced an unemployment problem of three times that. Is there any program, including your Urban Enterprise Zone Program, that you feel will add some measure of decreasing the unemployment and the depressive economic state for blacks and other minorities in this country?

The President. There is, and that problem is not new with this administration. As you know, the unemployment of minorities has been greater always than it is with the majority, the white community. And I don't think -- we've lumped the figures together into one figure, say, for black unemployment, ignoring the fact that that figure has been heightened by the excessive amount of youthful or teenage unemployment. It is not totally reflective of the earner for the household.

But we think that our economic program is designed to rectify, over the long haul, this problem which has been with us for these 40 years that I've been talking about and needs correction. It didn't just come into being in these last few months.

But also, we are looking at, very seriously, the idea of urban renewal -- well, that's the wrong name for it; I've criticized that too much to use it -- the enterprise zone, the specialized zones to hit targets of very high unemployment in our cities. And we are going forward with that.

Q. Mr. President, while you have made no decisions yet on your entitlements cuts for 1983 and '84, what is your feeling in principle about the cuts that have been proposed to reduce Medicaid and Medicare benefits and to also force welfare mothers to go out and seek jobs. Does that mean that the social safety net is really in tatters?

The President. No, it isn't. And the main goal of any of these reductions is still aimed at correcting those abuses that come about through the interpretation of regulations, to allow people who do not have real need that justifies their imposing on their fellow citizens for sustenance, for them to still be able to take advantage of these programs. The person with real need, we still want to help.

At the same time, when you say to force someone to go out and seek work, I think that the whole target of some of our social reforms, like welfare, always should have been to find a way to salvage those people and make them self-sustaining, instead of perpetuating them unto the third and fourth generation as wards of the government. And let me just give an example here of the type of thing that goes on that has to be corrected.

We just recently received word of a little girl who has spent most of her life in a hospital. The doctors are of the opinion that if she could be sent home and receive her care at home, it would be better for her; this spending most of her life there and away from the home atmosphere is detrimental to her. Now, it would cost $1,000 a month for her particular ailment to send her home. Her parents have no way that they can afford that, and the regulations are such that Medicaid now cannot pay for that if she goes home. The alternative is Medicaid continues to pay $6,000 a month to keep her in a hospital, when the doctors say she would receive better treatment and be better off at home. But her parents can't afford to have her taken off Medicaid.

Now, by what sense do we have a regulation in government that says we'll pay $6,000 a month to keep someone in a hospital that we believe would be better off at home, but the family cannot afford one-sixth of that amount to keep them at home?

The President. I feel that we have to look at these programs to see what we can do. But as I say, these will be presented as options that we have yet to go over and consider and see, make sure, that they're not going to unnecessarily hurt people that we don't intend to hurt.

Q. Mr. President, you say you want to stay on course with your September 24th program, but there's some confusion about what remains of that program which has never really been detailed to the public or to Congress.

The President. George, we'll be talking about whether there's going to be or should be any revenue changes in January, but also the entitlements. And it doesn't mean dropping them in any way. Those two will be presented in January with the budgeting process for '83, but those programs were never intended to go into effect until late in 1982 anyway. So even in January, we will be -- if that is the route we take -- they will be in time for when they were originally scheduled.

The problem has been, with the Christmas holidays coming, after all our discussions with our leaders in Congress, that we just can't produce or get anything done by Congress in this interim period. And so it's the best advice, that since they don't have to be set back by delaying their presentation until January, that's when we're going to do it.

The President. Well, we've got that 12-percent cut before them. They've got about 14 appropriation bills up there. Not one has come to my desk as yet. Now they're discussing a second continuing resolution of the kind that took us all the way through 1981, and here we go into 1982 and, as I say, we are waiting. Most of the appropriation bills that they're considering are above budget, the budget that we set. And as I've said, I will not stand still for budget-busting bills.

But whether they send those up or whether, in this interim period, they send up another continuing resolution, I don't know. But if they do, I hope that it is within our budgeted figures. The first one was not, which means that they enforced spending through a continuing resolution that was above our budget.

Q. Mr. President, what adjustments are you planning in your foreign policy structure or in your staff to avoid situations such as that last week, when your Secretaries of Defense and State were making conflicting statements on nuclear policy and which made it necessary for you to call your Secretary of State and your National Security Adviser into the Oval Office for a private meeting?

The picture that has been given of chaos and disarray is a disservice to the country and to other countries and allies as well. We are not in disarray with regard to foreign policy. I think our accomplishments have been rather astounding.

I have had 70 meetings with -- bilateral and multilateral -- with heads of state, foreign secretaries, ranging from Southeast Asia, to Asia, to Europe, Africa, and certainly here within the Americas. We have a better rapport established now between the three North American countries than I believe we've ever had. We have -- our allies -- I don't think we've ever had a stronger relationship than we have with them in Europe.

We were supposed to be destroyed at the Ottawa summit, and suddenly you decided that by some fluke we weren't. And then came Cancun, and I was not burned at the stake. [Laughter] Everything turned out just fine, and I had bilateral meetings there with 17 individual heads of state that were there. They were very pleased with the presentation we made about how to meet some of their problems.

I think in the Middle East, we've progressed there. I think that we've made great progress and rectified some things that had been giving the country problems for a time. And tied with this, is our economic plan and our defense program to refurbish our defenses, so that I am greatly encouraged. Our meetings here with heads of state in every instance have -- they have responded with statements to the effect that they have better relations than they've ever had before with our country, better understanding of where we stand with relation to each other.

Q. Mr. President, you gave a rather dramatic example of a person who could be better treated for $1,000 at home or $6,000 of Medicaid funds in the hospital. Can that be taken to mean that you would approve the use of Medicaid funds for home treatment? And let me just add to that, when you talked about protecting the needy, are you aware that Secretary Schweiker's memorandum would permit for the first time since Medicaid started that the States levy charges on the poor for their Medicaid treatment?

The President. Well, the idea in government medical programs of putting some minimum charge in which the recipient, unless they're totally needy, pays some share has been found to be very successful in reducing overuse of some programs. Now, again, you're citing something that has not yet come to me, if it is going to come, as an option. So, we'll wait and see.

On the first part of your question, which I think is the main question, yes. Let me give an example. In California, we have some programs in which the choice could be between home care for the individual or institutionalizing them. I'm speaking of such things -- mental retardation and so forth. And we have a program where a family that elects to go the one way -- and there's certain means tests connected with this -- gets a grant, which is far more economical, just as this hospital bill is, than in institutionalizing the person. And I think that when we see a case of this kind it reveals that hidebound regulations can be a tremendous expense to the taxpayers and doing no good to the patient.

The Federal facilities at Fort Drum near Watertown, N.Y., will be utilized as a temporary holding facility for aliens arriving illegally in this country, pending construction of a permanent facility. A thorough search was conducted by the Departments of Justice, Health and Human Services, and Defense. All these Departments agreed Fort Drum was the one site that met the key criteria, including capacity, availability, and minimal impact on defense operations.

Use of this site will allow the Immigration and Naturalization Service to continue the administration's policy of detaining aliens arriving illegally in the United States, pending resolution of their status.

In connection with this decision, the President today met with Representative David Martin of New York who has been particularly concerned with the preservation of Fort Drum's role in national defense plans. The President reassured him of the administration's commitment to the long term development and use of the base as a key defense installation. The President also indicated that the temporary use of Fort Drum as a detention facility will in no way compromise current activities at the base. No decision has been made for the location of a permanent facility.

Seriously, to see this, the largest building, as I understand, devoted totally to electronic news, is really something -- and to know that in the late fifties, your entire staff here in Washington consisted of four TV commentators and one for radio. But I'd just like to take you back a little further, being the only one here, I think, that's old enough to do it. But, yes, in those WHO days in Des Moines, Iowa, 50,000 watts, another network in the middle thirties, even the four and the one that were here in the fifties sounds pretty extravagant.

Now, I can't claim -- maybe it isn't true if we look far enough -- that we were the first to do radio news. But we had a kind of free soul that owned our company, B. J. Palmer. The Fair Trade Practices Act said that radio could not do news in those days because it was unfair to the printed media. And our boss came to a day in which he said we were going to do it. UPI was the only one that would sell us a news service. We hired a newspaper reporter who later became H. R. Gross, the conscience of the United States Congress in his many years as a Congressman here. But he did the news, and I did the sports, and the only other news source we had, legally -- [laughter] -- was a Western Union ticker that in the appropriate season would bring in whatever scores there were. And Charlie Gross and I -- that was it.

There was an illegal source. I had a 10:30 at night sports summary, and I found that it went much easier if I ducked out of the studio a little before 10 and picked up the early morning edition of the Des Moines Register and Tribune -- [laughter] -- and from which I would ad lib a very entertaining sports summary.

But we've come a long way in all of this, and I am very proud and happy to be here. I understand there's going to be an unveiling of the plaque and all. And I'm not going to go into any great dissertation about freedom of the press, and you know how I feel about regulations. Let me just say that in our efforts to reduce them, cut them down and get rid of the unnecessary ones, your industry is included. We'd like to go to work on that, too, and free you up as citizens.

Mr. Donaldson. Mr. President, what would a newsroom be -- [laughter] -- try to make a little news from you. Let me ask you, sir, can David Stockman continue to be effective after saying such damaging things about your economic program?

Although the crisis which existed in the fall of 1979 and throughout 1980 between the United States and Iran has substantially abated, the internal situation in Iran remains uncertain. The war between Iran and Iraq continues and the Soviet Union still occupies Afghanistan. In January 1981, Iran and the United States entered into agreements for release of the hostages and the settlement of opposing claims. An international arbitral tribunal has been established for the adjudication of claims of U.S. nationals against Iran and by Iranian nationals against the United States; but it must decide four disputes between the United States and Iran over the proper interpretation of the agreements before it can address private party claims. It appears that full normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the U.S. and Iran will require more time. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed to respond to the process of implementation of the January 1981 agreements with Iran and the eventual normalization of relations.

Mr. Rollins was appointed Deputy Assistant to the President for Political Affairs on January 21, 1981. Previously he served as the Republican staff director for the California State Legislature. He also served as the principal staff assistant to the Speaker of the California Assembly, in addition to other legislative staff positions.

Mr. Rollins has been involved in managing many legislative and congressional races in California and other Western States. During the second Nixon and the Ford administrations, he served as Deputy Assistant Secretary for Congressional Affairs, and as a special assistant in the Office of the Secretary at the Department of Transportation.

He has received undergraduate and graduate degrees from the California State University system in political science and public administration. He has also held teaching and administrative positions at California State University (Chico) and Washington University (St. Louis, Mo.). He also served as dean of the faculty and deputy superintendent at the National Fire Academy in Washington.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation America has much for which to be thankful. The unequaled freedom enjoyed by our citizens has provided a harvest of plenty to this Nation throughout its history. In keeping with America's heritage, one day each year is set aside for giving thanks to God for all of His blessings.

On this day of thanksgiving, it is appropriate that we recall the first Thanksgiving, celebrated in the autumn of 1621. After surviving a bitter winter, the Pilgrims planted and harvested a bountiful crop. After the harvest they gathered their families together and joined in celebration and prayer with the native Americans who had taught them so much. Clearly our forefathers were thankful not only for the material well-being of their harvest but for this abundance of goodwill as well.

In this spirit, Thanksgiving has become a day when Americans extend a helping hand to the less fortunate. Long before there was a government welfare program, this spirit of voluntary giving was ingrained in the American character. Americans have always understood that, truly, one must give in order to receive. This should be a day of giving as well as a day of thanks.

As we celebrate Thanksgiving in 1981, we should reflect on the full meaning of this day as we enjoy the fellowship that is so much a part of the holiday festivities. Searching our hearts, we should ask what we can do as individuals to demonstrate our gratitude to God for all He has done. Such reflection can only add to the significance of this precious day of remembrance.

Let us recommit ourselves to that devotion to God and family that has played such an important role in making this a great Nation, and which will be needed as a source of strength if we are to remain a great people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

During the next six weeks, I expect to make final decisions on nearly all aspects of the 1983 budget that I must submit to the Congress in January. This budget will reflect my firm commitment to hold down government spending and reduce the serious adverse effect that government spending and government-stimulated borrowing is having on the national economy.

In September, you were advised of the outlay ceilings for 1983 and 1984 that I approved for your department or agency for the purpose of guiding the development of the request that you have submitted to the Office of Management and Budget. There will be very few, if any, cases where it will be possible for us to exceed those outlay ceilings. In some cases, it will be necessary to go even lower.

The Office of Management and Budget is reviewing your requests, and you will begin receiving the results of these reviews. I hope that there will be very few appeals but, if you find that an appeal is absolutely necessary, you should submit that appeal within 72 hours of the time you are notified of the initial decision. I have instructed Dave Stockman and his staff to work with you to resolve as many appeals as possible.

If some unresolved issues remain, I will look to the Budget Review Board that I established last July (consisting of Ed Meese, Jim Baker and Dave Stockman) to meet with you to consider any remaining appeal. You should be prepared to submit any matter unresolved at that level to me within 24 hours after you are advised of the Board's decision.

Astronauts. Thank you very much, Mr. President. We're awfully honored that we got the opportunity to take part in this, and I'm sure that we're very glad that you're getting a chance to meet all the people there in Houston that are making it happen.

I don't know whether that works with States or not, but anyway, I suppose you've been wondering what we've been doing up there these last 9 months or so. Well, this dinner, as you've been told, expresses what we've been trying to do, and that is to make America strong again -- I'm so grateful for John's generous words about that -- to make it strong economically, militarily, and spiritually. And I believe we're on the right track for all three.

And to show you how it's going, this morning in one of the last meetings we had before we left to come here, the Secretary of Agriculture was waiting for me at a Cabinet Council meeting and presented me with a giant replica of a check. It was for $27 million that the Department of Agriculture has saved on personnel and travel costs -- not a budget item, just saved by management.

Militarily -- military enlistments are up, so are reenlistments. The educational level of those enlisting is higher than it has ever been, and the morale of our Armed Forces is something that makes you proud every time you see it.

And one of your cities here -- to tell me how the leading corporate heads and business heads in the city had met, the special projects they were engaged on, that they had decided to increase their United Way campaign target by 20 percent, just because there was more need now to do things voluntarily.

Then I received a letter from a man who said he is on -- he lives and is supported by the government. And he said, ``If it means cutting what I receive in order to restore fiscal integrity to this land,'' he said, ``you cut what I receive.'' His letter was written in braille. Thirty seven years ago as a GI in World War II, he lost his eyesight.

Somebody once told me before I became Governor -- I think maybe I repeated it to Bill once when he was getting ready to take over as Governor here -- that some days you'd go home feeling 10 feet tall. Well, I want to tell you, yesterday -- you know, George Bush is heading up a task force to cut away and hack away at those regulations which have tied the hands of local government, which have tied the hands of business and industry in this country, and they're having great success.

But a couple of days ago, we ran into another regulation, and I told the press about it, because I learned about it in time for a press conference we were having -- about a little girl in the Midwest, 3\1/2\ years old, who couldn't live at home. She has been ill virtually since birth. Maybe you saw it on television. We never intended that; I did not give her name or anything. But the enterprising press found out and on the news that night publicized it. She has spent her entire life in a hospital, requiring a care that costs about $12 thousand a month, and she could be cared for at home for $1 thousand per month. The doctors think she'd be better off at home. Her parents, a lovely couple, want her at home, but they can't afford that, and so the $10 thousand or $12 thousand a month is being paid by the government -- but under a regulation that would cease if she went home.

Well, when they made it public and who it was, yesterday when I came to the office, Dick Schweiker over at HHS was happy to tell me that that regulation no longer applies to her and she's going home. Some days this job is more fun than other days.

Well, right now the economy -- of course there's a lot of second-guessing about the economic plan that we adopted. We were determined to reduce government spending, to reduce the percentage of the gross national product that the government was taking in taxes, and some with the best intentions now would reject tax reduction as being financially unsound while there is a Federal budget deficit. But a deficit can result from waste and the weakness of the economy. And we can try to eliminate the deficit by raising taxes which further weakens the economy, or we can restore to full prosperity this nation and balance the budget with the revenues that such an economy would generate.

In the 14th century there was a Moslem philosopher -- I've told about this a few times -- who knew this about the economy. He said in the beginning of the dynasty, the dynasty reaps large tax yields from small assessments; at the end of the dynasty, it is reaping small tax yields from large assessments. Well, John F. Kennedy knew this in the 20th century. And he said our true choice is not between tax reduction on the one hand and avoidance of large Federal deficits on the other: An economy stifled by restrictive tax rates will never produce enough revenue to balance the budget, just as it will never produce enough jobs or enough profits.

Well, I'm being asked now the same question by the Democratic leadership of Congress. And John Connally told you who has been responsible all these years for the problems that we're now in. Perhaps we should just refer them to the history of those years just prior to the Kennedy tax cut, when employment in America was increasing by 1.19 percent a year, and how in the years immediately following, the rate of increase in employment was almost doubled. The real gross national product, the rate of growth, went from a little over 3\1/2\ percent before the tax cut to over 5 percent after the tax cut. The savings, the growth rate of personal savings, jumped from 2\1/3\ percent to 8 percent of the American people's earnings.

Now, this is not only evidence of recent history of what can happen when more money rather than less is left in the hands of the people. There is more: 1969 -- there were 698 American business firms, each one with a net worth under $5 million, who were in the stock market, raising by way of that marketplace $1.4 billion to fund expansion and continued growth. And then in '69, the capital gains tax was doubled. And shortly thereafter, there were only four such firms in the stock market raising a mere $15 million.

With the help of your Congressmen and, yes, with the help of you, because, believe me, when the phone started ringing in Washington when we asked for it, and the telegrams and the letters -- there were an awful lot of them that were coming from the State of Texas. With their help and your help, we have passed the greatest reduction in Federal spending in history. We didn't get all we asked for; we got about $35 billion worth.

And now the recession, brought on by high interest rates and the increased cost of government borrowing to pay for the built-in deficits that we inherited, has altered our estimates of revenues and deficits for the next few years ahead. And so immediately, someone pushed the panic button and says we should call off the tax cuts or we should pass new increases in taxes so that we could take back with one hand what we'd given with the other.

The Democratic leadership in September proclaimed that our plan doesn't work. Well, as John told you, it didn't start until October. [Laughter] But they were like Monday morning quarterbacks who were sounding off on Friday night. Our plan, as I say, didn't start till later, and we won't really feel the effects of it, as John indicated, for some time now, because additional tax cuts will go into effect in January, more in next July, and so forth.

Now, in the meantime, we are asking for additional cuts in spending, and that isn't new. When we got the first package, we told them that there were at least 70-odd billion dollars in unspecified cuts that we would require over the next 3 years to make this plan work. But there's one thing I don't believe we need and one thing I'm against: We're not going to have a tax increase.

Now, let me give you a figure that doesn't appear, static numbers that are used in estimating the future deficits. They're all related to the budget. We must cut the budget x amount or we must get more tax revenue by a tax increase to meet this size budget.

Well, let me tell you some figures that aren't static. If our belief in improving the economy is correct, by just reducing unemployment by 1 percentage point, you will reduce the deficit by $25 billion. And you can take it from there as to having a goal. What should it be? To stifle the economy with increasing the taxes on the people's backs, or to improve the economy by placing not only 1 but 2 and 3 percentage points of those unemployed back to work in an industrial America that is once again leading the world? That's what our target is.

You know, Senator Kennedy at a dinner just recently, the 90th birthday party was being celebrated for former Governor and Ambassador Averill Harriman. Teddy Kennedy said that Averill's age was only half as old as Ronald Reagan's ideas. And you know, he's absolutely right. The Constitution is almost 200 years old, and that's where I get my ideas.

Marie Montessori, when she was asked why she didn't reply to her critics, replied if she were climbing a ladder and the dog came yapping at her heels, she would have two choices. She could either stop and kick the dog, or she could continue to climb the ladder. And she preferred to climb.

Well, I'll confess, I'm awfully tempted every once in a while to do some kicking. [Laughter] But I think that all of you sent us up there to climb. And with the help of these people that you've sent from your State, and those others from other States up there, I think we have a great team. And no matter how much they pick on us, we do enjoy each other. We're working together. And we're doing just exactly what you sent us up there to do: We're going to make a stronger America, with your help.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I am transmitting herewith copies of the reports of my Pay Agent and the Advisory Committee on Federal Pay, the alternative plan, and the Executive Order I promulgated to put these pay adjustments into effect.

President Herrera and I had the opportunity to get to know each other at last month's summit in Cancun. While we were there, we reaffirmed that our two nations share common goals and mutual concerns, especially about liberty and progress in the American family of nations. The challenges facing the people of the Americas are greater than ever before. Maintaining independence and freedom will require the same dedication demonstrated during the struggle for independence that is common to every American nation.

Venezuela played a unique role in America's struggle for independence. Its role in the future of the region is no less important. The great liberator Simon Bolivar once said, ``It is harder to maintain the balance of liberty than to endure the weight of tyranny.'' He lamented that all too often mankind is willing to rest unconcerned and accept things as they are.

President Herrera, if Bolivar were alive today, he would be proud indeed of the current generation of Venezuelans and what it has accomplished. In two decades, you have built a free nation that is a beacon of hope for all those who suffer oppression. After courageously casting off the chains of dictatorship, Venezuelans rejected the tyranny of left and right and held firm in their commitment to dignity and freedom.

While still in its infancy, your young democracy withstood a serious challenge from an external force that still threatens other emerging nations, undermining legitimate attempts at social change in order to exploit chaos and promote tyranny. But, clearly, in a tribute to the decency and values of your people, the love of liberty has prevailed. It is to Venezuela's credit and in keeping with Bolivar's dream that you are now helping others overcome similar challenges to their freedom and prosperity.

Venezuela's development program, particularly in the Caribbean region, is an example of humanitarianism and farsightedness that has the highest respect and admiration of the people of the United States. Your recognition of the private sector's role in development is much appreciated here, but this, too, is in your tradition.

Just a few months ago, President Herrera, you spoke to the United Nations and eloquently outlined your nation's commitment to principle. There you stated, ``Venezuelans believe in and practice democracy. We do not attempt to impose our own values and concepts of society on anyone, but we know that freedom is the road of history.'' Let me say to you as clearly and directly as I can, in this expression of Venezuela's cherished goals, you have the firm and lasting support of the people of the United States of America.

Mr. President, thank you on behalf of my wife, the people who accompany me, and in my own name, for your kind words of welcome. The United States and Venezuela have enjoyed throughout their history friendly and cordial relations with inevitable coincidence and divergences, but with the unalterable constant of friendship and understanding in a spirit of mutual and strict respect for the national dignity of our countries.

Venezuela has acquired a growing weight in international affairs. Today, we constitute an obligatory point of reference for all issues related to hemispheric dialog and relations between the industrialized and the developing worlds. We follow an honorable, independent, and serious international policy, attempting at all times to project the image of our democratic institutions, observant of the demands of freedom.

We have attained and consolidated since 1958 our democratic stability, following the effort made by our democratic organizations and the national armed forces to achieve mutual understanding and respect and after overcoming the threats of a Marxist-inspired subversion that meant to destabilize our process of democratization.

The presence of Venezuela in the hemisphere and in the world is enhanced by our position as a producer and exporter of strategically valuable energy resources, our status of promoter and founder of the Organization of Oil [Petroleum] Exporting Countries, and holder of a privileged geographical position in a region afflicted by international tensions. We labor indefatigably so that peace will not suffer impairment or wrong.

Mr. President, the foreign policy actions of my government are not characterized by any kind of notion against, anti, anything. They are governed by an unyielding purpose of acting in favor of, pro, in favor of the interests of Venezuela, of Latin America, of the developing world, and of all of mankind.

In our observance of this principle, when we coincide with other nations, we do not do so in submission. And when we disagree, it is not because of aversion. When we coincide, it is without complexes. When we differ, it is without fear. We are not, and shall not be, passive subjects or instruments in the struggle between the superpowers over the issue of world supremacy.

Our foreign policy is, as you well know, autonomous and sovereign, as is fit for a country that is the birthplace of Simon Bolivar, the liberator, father of our independence and fighter of Latin American integration. It is this intellectual and political legacy that inspires our domestic and foreign policies.

My visit to this great nation, Mr. President, comes at a precarious moment in world affairs. I hope that the talks we will hold will produce more points of coincidence than discrepancy both on the political and the social-economic issues.

We shall speak on the tense reality of the Central American and the Caribbean regions, all the complex factors that affect it and serve as breeding ground for convulsions resulting from social imbalances which are seized upon by political hegemonic aspirations and destabilizing ideological radicalisms. We want to preserve this region from the tensions of bloc politics.

We shall pursue, led by the same constructive spirit, the dialog begun in Cancun on the urgency of making substantial changes in the present international economic relations. The peoples of the world continue to hope to see global negotiations held within the framework of the United Nations. And even if they are to be initially frail, they will build up gradually as trade develops.

We shall discuss the improvement and expansion of bilateral relations between our two countries, both of which enjoy systems of freely elected democratic governments and a historical commitment to defend the freedom of mankind.

Note: President Reagan spoke at 10:18 a.m. in the East Room, where President Herrera was given a formal welcome. The ceremony was not held on the South Lawn, as is customary, due to inclement weather. President Herrera spoke in Spanish, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter.

Fiscal year 1981 was an important milestone in the history of America's all-volunteer armed forces. It demonstrated that, in a healthy, just society, men and women will serve their country freely, when given the proper encouragement, incentives, and respect.

All of the services met their recruiting goals in fiscal 1981; test scores improved dramatically; recruits included the highest proportion of high school graduates ever; and enlistment rates were up for all services.

Working with the Congress, we have begun to reverse the negative trends of the last few years in the standard of living of our military personnel. We have done this through more competitive pay, increased enlistment and reenlistment bonuses, and enhanced educational benefits. Just as important, we have fostered an attitude of increased appreciation and respect for the men and women who wear their country's uniform.

There is a new spirit of pride and patriotism alive in the land, and the impressive manpower record of the armed forces during fiscal year 1981 reflects this. Just as volunteer warriors won American independence more than two centuries ago, they stand as proud guardians of our freedom today. The success of this past year shows that the voluntary system can work and represents the best way to meet our manpower requirements in times of peace.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Alan C. Nelson to be Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization, Department of Justice. He would succeed Leonel J. Castillo. Norman Braman, who was announced on September 29, 1981, has asked that his name be withdrawn from consideration due to personal reasons.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Richard Norman Perle to be the Department of Defense member of the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe. He would succeed David E. McGiffert.

He was a reporter for the Stamford (Conn.) Advocate (1974 - 80). He won five journalism awards, including the 1978 Pulitzer Prize for investigative reporting. His investigations into government corruption and organized crime led to the dismissal or resignation of more than 12 city and State officials and a number of indictments and convictions.

President Carter, under provisions of the Trade Act of 1974, proposed legislation which would amend the Internal Revenue Code to deny a deduction, otherwise allowable under the Code, for expenses of an advertisement placed with a foreign broadcast undertaking and directed primarily to a market in the United States. This restriction would apply only if a similar deduction is denied to advertisers in the country in which such station is located for the cost of advertising directed primarily to a market in that country when placed with a U.S. broadcast undertaking. It would, therefore, be applicable to Canada.

Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 requires that if the President determines that action by the United States is appropriate to respond to any act, policy, or practice of a foreign country that is unjustifiable, unreasonable or discriminatory and burdens or restricts United States commerce, he shall take all appropriate and feasible action within his power to obtain the elimination of such act, policy or practice. The intent of section 301 is to resolve disputes and thereby eliminate the unjustifiable, unreasonable or discriminatory trade practices which burden or restrict United States commerce. The Canadian tax law is the subject of one such dispute. Notwithstanding a good faith effort on the part of the United States Trade Representative to resolve the dispute and have the offending practice eliminated, this dispute has not been resolved. Therefore, I am acting under the authority of section 301 to recommend legislation similar to the amendment proposed by President Carter. This amendment to the Internal Revenue Code would mirror the Canadian law as it applies to broadcast undertakings, i.e., it would deny a tax deduction for expenses of advertisements placed with a foreign broadcast undertaking and directed primarily to a market in the U.S. This restriction would apply only if the laws of the country in which such foreign broadcast undertaking is located deny a similar deduction to advertisers in that country. Thus, the legislation will establish a disincentive to the transfer of U.S. advertising revenues to foreign broadcast undertakings only if the laws of the country in which such broadcast undertakings are located create a similar disincentive vis-a-vis U.S. broadcast undertakings. Thus, if Canada should repeal its law, the amendment will cease to apply to Canada. It would be effective with respect to deductions attributable to transactions entered into on or after the date of introduction of this bill.

At this time, the mirror image legislation is an appropriate response to the Canadian practice. The intent of such legislation is not to erect new barriers to trade, but rather to encourage the Canadians to eliminate their unreasonable and restrictive practice. I recognize, however, that this amendment by itself may not cause the Canadians to resolve this dispute. Therefore, I note that I retain the right to take further action, if appropriate, to obtain the elimination of the practice on my own motion under the authority of section 301(c)(1). Hopefully, this will not be necessary.

This legislative proposal is being submitted at this time because I feel it is imperative that the Government of Canada be made to realize the importance the U.S. Government attaches to the resolution of this issue. I urge its early passage.

President Herrera once said, ``History shows that only those human actions which are based on ethical principles have a truly lasting significance.'' Tonight, we honor a man and a country that has chosen a path of principle, one that will have lasting significance.

Democracy and respect for human rights is not the easiest course, but it is the most moral. President Herrera, a man of deep religious and moral convictions, long ago decided to stand for what is right. As a boy, he witnessed a chain gang composed of political prisoners. This sight frightened lesser men; it instead strengthened Herrera Campins' resolve to fight dictatorship. Later this love of freedom led to his own arrest and exile, yet he stood firm with the other brave individuals and, eventually, they and the principles of human freedom triumphed.

Such dedication is deeply admired here, but politics is not the only way to catch a glimpse of one's soul. Now, to many Americans, Venezuela has come to mean excellence in sports. David Concepcion and Tony Armas and many other fine baseball players have come to us from Venezuela. And interestingly, President Herrera and I both were sports journalists at one time.

Mr. President, you're a man, and Venezuelans are a people, whose love of life and of freedom are something with which the people of the United States can identify. You and your country stand for those values and those principles that reflect the best of mankind. You honor us by this visit, and Venezuela honors us by its friendship.

The ideals of liberty, human respect, and democratic government inspire our two countries. These principles are the fundamental basis of the good relations between Venezuela and the United States: mutual respect, the desire to understand each other's realities, and the conviction that dialog and negotiation enable us to overcome differences when inspired by a sincere willingness to achieve understanding.

We shall soon commemorate 250 years of George Washington's birth and, in 1983, the bicentennial of the birth of our liberator, Simon Bolivar. In the example of these two great men, we can and must seek and find the common source of our ideals of liberty and human dignity, those profound roots of friendship and cooperation between our two countries.

Allow me, Mr. President, to recall that in May of 1781, Francisco de Miranda, forerunner of Latin American independence, fought in Pensacola the battle that paved the way for Cornwallis' surrender in Yorktown. Between the 18th and the 19th centuries, the first Venezuelan cosmovisionary, Miranda, acted thus on all the great stages where freedom of man was at stake: the American Revolution, the French Revolution, and the Latin American Revolution -- three related political processes of undeniable projection to the rest of the world.

We are faithful to the Bolivarian teachings on the achievement of continental integration in a world of peace. Latin America is a region that feels a natural calling to multilateral relations. The Organization of American States, CARICOME, the subregional Andean Pact, the Amazonian Pact, the Latin American Organization for Energy, the Latin American Economic System, the Central American Common Market, the Latin American Integration Association are but part of those multilateral organizations where Latin American plurality is of the continental scope.

Multilaterality is both our inclination and our strength, notwithstanding the importance of bilateral ties which in no way deny and basically reinforce multilateral relations. More and more do we strive for oneness in a united comprehension of our diversities, so we will not go separate and divided, drifted by discord, disparity, and anarchy.

We wish to achieve a comprehensive, harmonious development. There are still many needs to be provided for, much want to be met, and social injustice to be redressed. The evils of underdevelopment resist all efforts to dislodge them and strike root by singular lack of understanding. The path that is to guide us at a lower social cost towards the future is that of cooperation based on solidarity.

Such a cooperation must range from the cultural to the economic. We aspire not only to a numerical increase of per capita income, but also to a fair distribution of wealth so that well-being and prosperity can be placed at everyone's reach and the population be guaranteed an access to the goods basic to human dignity. This must be the result of a joint effort, that of the government and that of the people. Education and work are the tools of progress and self-improvement. Personal, individual, and combined efforts must be encouraged. We believe in the promoting role of the state, a promoter state that fosters individual and social initiatives, yet does not waive its social function of intervention, regulation, and control.

We believe in foreign investments to be measured according to national convenience when they constitute financial injections and not simple patent permits that will absorb national savings and derive from them their profits without incurring the risk of investing their own capital. We act in this respect within the framework of Decision 24 of the Andean Pact because we wish to strengthen our own sources of financing.

We know that in many cases foreign capital, without losing sight of its profit-making goals, attempts to create wealth and employment in our countries. If it comes to us with that purpose, we welcome it. However, we have suffered exploitation and exaction from transnational companies whose doubtful procedures and excessive pursuit of profit forced the United States to legislate against monopolies.

We desire as much as you do a democratic Latin America -- peaceloving and respectful of human rights. Liberty must be supported on social justice if it wants to overcome critical poverty, disease, lack of culture, and backwardness. It is on the basis of nonintervention and respect for free self-determination of nations that we shall be able to achieve collective security and protect our region from the great world tensions where threatening language can trigger conflicts capable of destroying peace.

We are committed to democracy. Neither the traditional dictatorships nor the new leftist totalitarianisms represent valid solutions to nations whose vocation is liberty. In this line of conduct, we give active political and moral support to the government junta of El Salvador, presided by our distinguished friend Jose Napoleon Duarte, who is trying to offer a democratic and institutional way out of the situation of violence and terrorism existing in his country.

We have stretched out a hand to Nicaragua, as Latin America awaits its conversion to democracy after it supported its struggle against a dynastic dictatorship. As long as there remains any rational hope for a pluralistic society to be achieved there, we shall maintain our attitude of cooperation.

We are aware of the existence of destabilizing tensions and predications in the Caribbean, but we must weigh wisely our actions there so as to prevent conflicts from expanding and endangering world peace. We oppose any kind of foreign intervention and reject all provocative action taken by underpowers that act as mandataries in the Central American region and in the Caribbean.

The summit conference of Cancun took place a few weeks ago, and we had there the opportunity to exchange views on the international situation. You were witness to the seriousness, the dignity, and independence of Venezuela's position as stated in my speeches.

We did our best so that this unique, historical, momentous dialog between industrialized countries and developing nations would not end in failure. We all made a joint effort to avoid confrontation and seek foremost the positive coincidences that would lead to the necessary cooperation. The step taken was yet a modest one, but it brought out the political will of the 22 attending chiefs of state and government to pursue global negotiations within the framework of the United Nations.

Upon your return from Mexico you said that the efforts and constructive spirit which characterized the discussions at Cancun must continue. And the American Ambassador to the United Nations declared recently that every one of us bears the responsibility for transplanting the spirit of Cancun to all the forums of the United Nations system. This time we cannot fail. These words bring optimism to the developing world, which trusts the understanding and the good disposition of the United States.

Mr. President, Venezuela projects democracy and freedom in its foreign policy and has made its energetic wealth act as a concrete instrument of negotiation, cooperation, and international solidarity. A great many coincidences with the United States enable us to march side by side on the road of human freedom.

In your two speeches today, Mr. President, you referred first to Venezuelans such as Simon Bolivar, and in your speech tonight to young compatriots of mine who are in this world of sports, who, at a time not too far away nor too near this day, were people that were of interest to you and me when we were sports journalists.

You have called our compatriots, David Concepcion and Tony Armas, who today are excellent players in the big leagues. And if you allow me this association of ideas, perhaps you might have believed in the talks I had today with you and with high representatives of your government that my position as was stated on Central America and the Caribbean is too optimistic. But I am an optimist, and I believe you are one, too.

You were playing the role of a pitcher, a great pitcher, who suddenly felt, let's say, a drop in his physical conditions, and it was the trust of his friends and his moral conviction that he had to play to have his team win that made the team win.

And I am sure that your quarry of optimism has not run dry. And although perhaps the situation might seem sometimes dramatic, we can be certain that it is people -- men and people like those of the United States and Venezuela who love freedom -- those are the ones that will win.

To reiterate, allow me to reiterate my gratitude and that of Betty and the persons who accompany me for all your kindness, and as I do so, I raise my glass in a toast to your personal happiness, that of your distinguished wife, to the democratic success of your government, and the prosperity and happiness of the people of the United States, a people forever committed to liberty.

The overall relations between the United States and Venezuela are excellent, and we've discovered that both nations share similar concerns about the international situation. We took a close look at development in the Caribbean Basin Region and discussed what can be done to promote peace, freedom, and representative government in that part of the world.

We agreed to pursue the initiative begun by Venezuela, Mexico, Canada, and the United States for the Caribbean Basin Region. We will continue, and strengthen where possible, our individual assistance programs and encourage other states to do likewise. And furthermore, we agreed that we must promote the economic and social development of the hemisphere through international cooperation. We can be expected to continue our opposition to any interference in the internal affairs of Western Hemisphere countries.

We agreed that efforts must be made to strengthen democracy, liberty, and pluralism against extremism and totalitarianism. We continued discussions we started at Cancun about global economic relations and exchanged views on the alternative paths to Third World development.

Finally, we conducted a comprehensive and forthright review of the relations between Venezuela and the United States. We found that there is a high level of cooperation and respect between our nations and pledged to continue this friendly relationship.

In addition to the usefulness of reviewing these issues, I want to emphasize how much I enjoyed sharing the past 2 days with my friend President Herrera, with Mrs. Herrera, and the distinguished delegation that accompanied them. We expect to remain in close contact on matters of crucial importance to peace and to the well-being of the hemisphere.

President Herrera. Allow me first of all to thank very heartily the President of the United States, my friend Ronald Reagan, for the kind invitation he extended to me to visit this great democracy. Allow me to thank him for the excellent organization of this visit, for having made possible for us to have contacts not only at the highest level, that of the Presidency of the country, but also at the level of high officials and personalities coming from the executive and the legislative powers of the United States.

I wish to say that I believe that this is a fortunate coincidence -- the fact that I was here in Washington the morning of the extraordinary speech made by President Reagan. And I believe that this speech will have a great impact throughout the world, especially in regard to the need of limiting nuclear armament in Europe both by the United States and the Soviet Union. I believe that the four points you stated, Mr. President, in your speech to the National Press Club will be a great contribution to detente. And I must say I am very happy to have been here this morning.

We studied the bilateral relations between Venezuela and the United States, relations which, I must say, are presently at an optimal level. And we reviewed the need to continue implementing agreements, signed in the past between our two countries, most of them related to matters of technical exchange.

We also analyzed the difficult political situation existing in the Central American area and the Caribbean. And I must say that I expressed the independent, dignified, and serious position of our foreign policies with frankness, and I expressed in this way the views of my government. And allow me to say also, that I was listened to with respect and not only with respect but also with cordiality and understanding. And the concepts of peace, liberty, and democracy were ever present, were like a backdrop to our talks on the area.

As you know, the line of action of my government, the one we have always followed, is a line of non-intervention and respect for the self-determination of nations and the projection of the good of democracy and of freedom. And when we spoke about such a delicate situation as the one existing in Salvador, we coincided in the need to encourage the achievement of a democratic way out that will enable that country to overcome the subversion coming from Marxist radical movements.

We know of the great efforts made by the junta of the government, presided by Jose Napoleon Duarte in El Salvador, surrounded by so many difficulties in order to achieve an institutional way out to the situation there.

We have ratified the will of the Governments of the United States, Venezuela, Mexico, and Canada, to promote an ambitious program of cooperation in the area of the Caribbean and Central America and also a program where not only we would participate, but also we would encourage other governments to cooperate in the political, cultural, and economic, social development of this crucial area.

It has been of utmost importance for us and the developing nations of the world to have heard throughout my talks with President Reagan, and again in the speech he made this morning, a ratification of the political will expressed in Cancun, favoring global negotiations to be held soon, and thus bringing hope for peace through concrete and effective actions to all developing countries.

And finally, let me insist in extending my thanks again for all the kindness shown by President Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, and the team working with them, to me, my wife, the members of the Venezuelan party, and the special guests on this trip I made to Washington. And allow me to say that I appreciate greatly the generous concepts you have formulated time and again for my own person, for the government, democratic government I preside [over] -- a government that tries to search for peace, development, participation, and respect of human rights everywhere.

The President. This, of course, is a great tradition, of Thanskgiving in our country, and I'm very happy -- we used to do this all the time in California, with the California association. And they came to the office, and I had a few adventures there, too. Finally one day they turned to the custom of actually bringing it in cooked, and we would have a lunch right there with the staff in the office. But I had to carve it for all those gentlemen and ladies of the press with their cameras on me. And I remember one day I was carving, and I thought they hadn't cooked it very well, because there was a lot of blood appearing, which didn't look very appetizing. I found out I'd cut my thumb. [Laughter] Sort of spoiled lunch.

The President. What we're talking about here is a sort of in-house -- a gentleman named Merv Amerine in California in the '66 campaign when I was running for Governor. We chartered his plane, a DC - 3, for part of the campaign, and found out that when he hasn't chartered it to us -- he was a turkey grower and was using it to haul turkeys. And now I don't want anyone to say the obvious thing that comes to mind, that he hadn't really changed -- [laughter] -- in that new charter.

Mr. Walts. Oh yes, Mr. President. We're delighted to be here, and it's certainly a pleasure to see you again. And I think you know that the National Turkey Federation is very solidly behind your programs and you.

The President today announced his intention to nominate William J. Bennett to be Chairman of the National Endowment for the Humanities, National Foundation on the Arts and the Humanities. He would succeed Joseph D. Duffey.

Dr. Bennett has written a number of articles in professional journals such as the Harvard Civil Rights and Stanford Law Review, and for major news magazines on subjects pertaining to social issues. He is a trustee of the Institute for Educational Affairs and the Committee for a Free World, a member of the National Research Council of the National Science Foundation and a special panel of the National Academy of Education.

Now, I don't know whether you're to this age or not, but I gave Howard a suggestion that I've found very useful over the years, and that is if you are past 39, subtract 39 from you present age and refer to this as whatever that anniversary would be of your 39th birthday from here on. [Laughter] And that way we'll all stay in trim.

I hadn't realized, Howard, that it was exactly a year ago. I was about to stand up here tonight and say ``about a year ago.'' I was here, we were all here under much the same circumstances -- with a couple of important changes. I had not yet checked in at the timeclock, and your majority had not yet attained voting status in the Senate. But we were all both looking forward to those things taking place.

Let me just take a few minutes here to say what, in my mind, has happened in this year. ``Family'' is not a bad word to describe it. I served 8 years as a Governor. During only 1 of those 8 years did I have a bare majority. The rest of the time I was up against pretty much what we're up against with regard to the other House. And many times I've said I'll go to my grave wondering what it could have been like in that State if we had had our party in control of the legislature as well as the executive branch. And now I have a second chance. Many of you do, too.

I remember we discussed the last time a year ago when we were here, that there was only one among us who had ever served on a Republican majority before. He is still in the Senate. And I've already issued an Executive order that those fellows that are up for reelection are going to be reelected -- [laughter] -- we'll accept no change in that.

As I look back over these months and what we've accomplished, it's been kept a secret by the Washington Post -- [laughter] -- the rest of the country knows what we've done. And I just have to say a thank you to all of you, because when the chips were down, always you were there. And I know it's going to continue that way.

When I say we've accomplished much, I'm not going to go into details of the things that you know better than anyone else. And probably each of you, from your mail count, could match the very things that I have received in the mail from those people we represent out there -- letters that have made me so proud at times of what you've done and what we've accomplished together.

A young man in college who writes to tell me that he's been going to college on government loans, but he is going to drop out a year and work and save, because he doesn't think under the circumstances it would be right to impose another year on the government of his country by accepting another government loan. The man that wrote to me a letter that had to be translated for me because it was written in braille -- he lost his eyesight 37 years ago in Germany in World War II -- and he wrote to tell me that if cutting his benefit would help his country, then go ahead and cut that benefit.

The incident of just a few days ago that I know you're all aware of -- that almost accidentally came to our attention -- of the little 3\1/2\-year girl who had never lived at home with her parents and couldn't, actually, because of a regulation with regard to the government grant they had to have for medical expenses of 10 to 12 thousand dollars a month. And Dick Schweiker found out within 24 hours after we made it public that, by golly, he could change that regulation and got it changed. And I had the pleasure of calling those parents and speaking to them and their unspeakable happiness that the fact that their little girl was going to come home. The doctors had said she would be better off at home, and it would only cost a thousand dollars a month at home.

I could go on picking out letters like this of people expressing their willingness -- the young sailor that wrote to tell me that he was writing for 180 of his crewmates on a submarine, and he said, ``We just want you to know how good it feels to once again be Americans.'' And he said, ``We may not be the biggest navy, but we're the best.'' And I don't think we've been hearing things like that for quite some time around here. And I'll get maudlin if I keep on going, so I'd better not.

I hope that we'll be here many more times for anniversaries of this and with a larger majority every time. And maybe after the next election we'll be able to invite a few representatives from the other House simply because they're a majority too, and when we have them both, then I think this country will go forward faster than it has. But I have to say, even with that handicap, thanks to all of you, we've made gains that I don't think any of us could ever have believed possible when we were here just a year ago today. With one House and the executive branch -- somehow we've managed to make it work over on the other side. It's just that it'll be easier when they're a majority as you're a majority.

So, God bless you all. Thank you all for the relationship that we've had. If there's anything lacking in it and I don't know about it, well, please let me know about it, because, so far, I've felt nothing but warmth and a kindred spirit and feeling from all of you.

Q. Mr. President, a lot of the local government officials who have been listening to you talk about your dream of returning responsibilities and resources are saying that they've received the responsibilities, and now they are wondering when the next shoe is going to fall. Will your 1983 budget have a definite source of revenue for the local government?

The President. Well, we've been meeting with them, and they have been here in meetings with our people at OMB and with Don Regan of Treasury about these. And I can't say that any actual or final decisions have been made. I know that there has to be some pain for them also. But during these 10 months, I have met with over 1,200 State and local officials, going from Governors on down through counties and mayors and so forth, legislators, on all of these. And we have a commission, as you know, appointed to see how we can turn back tax sources to the local government.

This is what it comes down to. We wanted and asked the Congress for far more block grants than we got, a block grant where they can set the priorities within that and the method of using it. I'd learned as Governor that the categorical grants -- where the government ties the red strings to it and tape to it and says this is exactly the way you have to spend it and so forth -- results in a large administrative overhead cost. And we didn't get all that we wanted. We did get a certain number of categoricals into block grants, but there still remains too many categoricals.

And, then -- maybe this is more than you bargained for in this answer, but let me get it all in -- my dream is that the block grants are only a means to an end. And the end is that the government, which has preempted over the years so much of the tax revenue potential in this country, that we could turn back not only the responsibility to governments of tasks that I think they can perform better than the Federal Government can perform, but turn back tax sources so that the tax source itself goes to them. And they, therefore, then have the responsibility for collecting the money which they're going to spend for this by way of the tax.

The President. I don't know yet. We have a task force, as I say, working on that under Ed Gray, that's to work and see how this could be done, what the mechanics of it would entail, and whether we could do this at the same time we give the responsibility that goes with it. But it just seems to me that there's an awful lot of money lost, simply in the process of bringing it to Washington and then sending it back out there minus a carrying charge that comes off the top here in Washington. It would make a lot more sense if it was there in the first place.

Q. Mr. President, the Governors have suggested a sorting-out process of what the Federal Government should have and what the States and locals should have. One of the things they suggested is, as you know, that the Federal Government pick up most of the welfare costs and that they would then pick up more schooling costs and more transportation costs. Would you go along with that? And if not, what sort of sorting out would you like to see? What functions do you think the Federal Government should have on the domestic side, and what would you pass on to them?

The President. Well, we have, again, a Presidential commission that is made up of representatives of State and local government, only their own people on this, to sort this out. But I would think that we might start with the tenth article of the Bill of Rights, the 10th amendment, which says that the Federal Government -- those powers which are granted to the Federal Government are in the Constitution, and all others shall remain with the States or with the people.

I think that over the years, probably coming out of the Great Depression and the traumatic experience of that, the Federal Government has gradually involved itself in areas that were never before thought of as the Federal Government's province.

This is a very diverse country. The problems of a welfare client in New York City are far different than those from out in some small town in the rural areas in the Middle West, or something in more rural States. I believe that there's much more chance of waste and of fraud in trying to run it from the national level than there is in running it at the local level.

Now, when we reformed welfare in California -- and it was the most successful reform that's ever been attempted while I was Governor there -- we found that our biggest difficulty was getting waivers from the Federal Government in order to do some of the things that we felt had to be done.

And when we finished, we not only over a 3-year period had saved the taxpayers of California $2 billion, we were able to give the welfare recipients the first cost-of-living increase they'd had since 1958 -- and average increase of 43 percent in their grants. And it was simply just the application of common sense and the fact that these are your neighbors there that you're trying to help, and you're better able to know what to do for them than Washington is 3,000 miles away.

The President. Well, the first one, of course, is national security. That is the prime responsibility of the National Government. You would have me doing the sorting out that we've got a commission trying to do.

But I would think that first of all, education -- we built the greatest school system the world has ever seen and built it at the local level and the local school district level. And then the Federal Government got into the school business only by having preempted so much of the tax resources, and those tax resources that grew with the economy faster than something like the property tax, which is the principal basis for educational funding. Then they got into it through that money thing, having preempted the money, created the problem, and then they said, ``Well, now we want to help you.'' But in return for the help, they wanted to also regulate, and have interfered to a large extent.

Welfare -- welfare is presently administered at the local level. It is, in most States, done at the county level. They have a county welfare department, but they do it under regulations imposed from Washington. And I can tell you, those regulations would line the walls of this room, and they're constantly changing. They have got employees at the county level that do nothing but try to keep up and inform the workers of what the new regulations are.

Incidentally, we've already been pretty successful here with something of that kind. The regulations that govern HHS grants out there used to fill 318 pages of the Federal Register; they now only fill 6.

Excise taxes of the kind you've mentioned might be a way, as the example I gave of Norris Cotton when he suggested one. I think it would depend a lot on what is the revenue that's going to be gained, compared to the responsibility that you want it to cover. Is it one that is going to grow as the economy grows? Or is it going to be a static kind of tax that might meet the situation now, but won't meet it down the road a ways?

The President. Oh, I won't rule anything out. Right now there is a sizable Federal gas tax, and most States -- like our own has a gas tax also. The Federal gas tax came into being for the Federal interstate highway system -- and I'm wondering if that's ever going to be completed -- and it was supposed to be a temporary thing.

Q. Mr. President, towards the sorting out, there seems to be a new mood of great impatience among the Governors, combined with this year's budget situation, the growth of the entitlements, the defense budget, the tax cut, which the Governors perceive as being negative to the interest of the State and local government, which took a large portion of the cuts in the first round and then will be hit again by the 12 percent that you proposed in September. And as a matter of fact, they're so angry, the Western Governors' meeting in Scottsdale 12 days ago passed a resolution saying they would flatly oppose further cuts in the domestic discretionary budget proposed by your administration unless negotiation begins for a significant sorting out of functions between the Federal Government and the States.

The President. Yes. I think most of those Western Governors are Democrats now -- [laughter] -- it might have had something to do with it. No, we recognize that we have to straighten out this financial situation on the Federal level. They will benefit, also, to a great extent by the fact that inflation will come down. And indeed, it has come down faster than we had anticipated right now. Now that's got to be reflected somewhat in their costs. And as I say, we didn't get all that we wanted with regard to the switch to block grants, and I'm still going to continue striving for that because, again, the savings to them -- we can reduce the amount of money in a block grant to less than a categorical grant because of the savings in administrative overhead.

The President. Oh, yes. I think it's vital. You know, if we remember back some years to -- I think it was around 1914 or something, that was recognized in the fact that Senators were not popularly elected. They were chosen by State legislatures to represent the State. The House of Representatives represented the people. And then they made the change in the Constitution and changed it to make them all popularly elected. That was why in the whole bill of impeachment, the Senate had been picked to be the trial court and the judge, because they would not be bound by political considerations. Now that they're elected, they're just as bound as the other House would be.

But yes, that relationship has to exist. And I hope that not just on these things of budget and so forth, that bring in the people that we've met with -- the 1,200 or so -- that we would have ongoing meetings. And I should, while I'm here, have a department for that purpose.

The President. No, I think that is up to the States. My first reaction to that is that this is one of the -- the built-in guarantee of freedom is our federalism that makes us so unique, and that is the right of the citizen to vote with his feet. If a State is badly managed, the people will either do one of two things: They will either use their power at the polls to redress that, or they'll go someplace else. And we've seen industries driven out of some States by adverse tax policies and so forth.

Q. But Mr. President, on that very point, Senator Durenberger has made quite an issue in the last few months that some States are energy rich and some energy poor; that there's a transfer of hundreds of billions of dollars within this decade going from the energy poor to the energy rich States. So he asks whether it's in any way fair to expect the States and localities that suffer from a declining economy to provide the same level of public services, including new services devolved from the Federal Government, as to expect from those States that are flush with energy generated revenues.

The President. Well now, if you take it that way, just in energy, then couldn't you make the same argument with regard to the great agricultural States that provide the food for the people of this country? California, for example -- I hope it still prevails in spite of the fruit fly -- but California, over the years, puts about 40 percent of all the fruits and nuts and vegetables that are on the tables of America, puts them on those tables. And the same thing might be said. There is a great natural and rich resource and a production. I just think the marketplace regulates that.

Q. How do you feel about States putting fairly steep taxes on the resources that they extract from the ground -- whether it's food or minerals or oil -- and ship to other States and thereby in effect pass on that additional tax burden to the consumers in those other States.

Q. In the Senate hearings that were held on the 5th of November, Governors Snelling and Busbee and Matheson made a point that the State budgets were in a condition of disarray and chaos because of the deep and the continuing Federal budget cuts. They pointed again to the inflation-driven entitlements, defense spending, the extent of the tax cut, feeling that more should be seen in that area in terms of the next economies. And Governor Snelling, for the Governors, proposed a 2-year moratorium on further cuts and discretionary grants to the States and localities so they would have a chance to catch their breath, institute some rational budgeting and planning, perhaps start some discussions with you about more block grants and a sorting out of responsibilities.

The President. I think it would be great if we could afford it. And I know that part of their problem -- which you didn't mention there -- it was not just the change, it's the fact that the States all have varying budget or fiscal years and in many States were caught with their budget already determined. And then we, by doing something at the Federal level, changed their -- or ordered their estimates of revenues and so forth. And I just think our emergency is so great, I don't know how we could hold back and wait for all of this.

What we've tried to do and now with these meetings, and with Rich [Richard S. Williamson, Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs] in continued contact with them, is try to not throw any surprises at them, but to keep them informed so that, for example, in planning the next budget, they will know what we are considering and they can make allowance that in case we get what we ask for, why, they'll know what it's going to be like.

The President. I think that as the people -- we've been and still are a very migrant people. I think Americans move more than anyone else. And in many instances, it's the job holder; something happens and he starts exploring for work some place else and maybe goes and then sends for the family. But whatever means they have to use they do it. I can't see any way that the Federal Government could set up a program for moving people, because then you get into the element of would there be something compulsory about it, would the government decide that somebody had to move. And many people -- during the campaign I talked to people out in Ohio and Michigan there, and the great unemployment in the automobile industry, and you talk to someone who'd say, ``I'm third generation in my family living here. I don't want to live anywhere else.'' So he's going to sweat it out until jobs open up and he can get a job there.

The President. The suggested 12-percent cut -- we didn't see how -- and I think all of us recognize that this was going to be a blow to many communities, particularly the local level, not the State level, and again I'd seen it in our own State work. But we felt we had to go across the board, and we were asking other equally important programs to take that cut. There were only a few exceptions, such as hospital medical care for veterans. You couldn't cut that. But it extended to every place, including the White House, and so we felt that we had to do it.

Now realistically, the question is are you doing to get 12 percent -- and I doubt it -- from the Congress? But again, as I say, we had to hope that if we get control of this economy at this end, that this might be a temporary setback to some communities -- a painful one, but the off-setting thing of reducing inflation and interest rates and, hopefully, having a surge in the economy would also begin to offset that.

I think one of their concerns when they came here -- I've just met with a large group of both city and county and State officials, Governors, on this. And a lot of them, it was a fear -- they'd been led to believe that maybe we were phasing it out entirely. And I could assure them that there was no such thing in our minds, that the only way it would ever be phased out is if we had an alternate source, a tax that we were going to give to them for their own use.

The President. I'm not sure that it could, because I believe that in the federalism thing that we're approaching or approving, I believe that there is, in the long run, the reduction of government cost, as I say, the administrative overhead that is involved in the Federal Government doing so many of these things.

Q. The opinion of the Governors and the local officials seems to be that deregulation isn't going to get them where they need to be quickly enough to run their own operations properly. In the same Senate hearings I was referring to on November 5th, Governor Busbee, for example, expressed such distress about the current national and State and local fiscal dilemma and the lack of legitimate Federal reform, as the Governors see it, that he said it is time that we had a domestic economic summit involving the President, the bipartisan leadership of the Congress, and our, that is the Governor's leadership, so that we might gain general agreement on ultimate prime responsibilities for government programs, the budget targets we should all plan for, and the timeframe in which we are going to reach these goals.

The President. Listen, I will buy that, because those Governors, and led by Busbee, were the greatest help in the world in our getting the economic package that was passed. But where we all were helpless was, we could not convince the majority leadership in the House, particularly, to give up Federal strings on so many -- particularly the block grants.

The President. Again, as I say, start with the Constitution and eliminate first of all those functions that properly belong at the Federal Government -- interstate commerce and the national defense and things of this kind. Then find those functions -- maybe we'd do well if we looked at the past. I know that everyone used to say I'm trying to take the country back -- no, only as far as the Constitution. Find out those things that are, today, more or less administered in partnership at the local level and yet under Federal control, and see if you need that extra layer of bureaucracy on top.

I would think that this would include such things as welfare; certainly, it would include education. And then with this, under this federalism, review again what legitimately and honestly belongs at the Federal level and at the local level in the system of taxes.

Back when I was growing up, the governments of the United States, between them, only took a dime out of every dollar earned. Only a third of that or less went to the Federal Government; two-thirds to local and State government. Today, they are taking more than 40 cents out of every dollar, and two-thirds of that goes to the Federal Government. It's just reversed; the other way around.

And have this fairness in revenues so that wherever possible, you can have the responsibility for raising the money and the responsibility for performing the function in the hands of the same government.

We live with history in this community, and Nancy and I never cease marvelling at actually living in the history of that home. Madison was the second to occupy it; the picture of Washington that Dolley saved hangs in the East Room. And there's a portion outside of the White House, not seen by too many people, where you can see the smudges of smoke on the stone from the fire when the Executive Mansion was burned.

I feel a great affinity with James Madison. I'm told that his worry over the size of the national debt drove him to distraction. [Laughter] I could sympathize; the debt was not of his making either. [Laughter] But I am proud to participate in this dedication of the first national memorial to James Madison.

The leadership of men like Madison gave shape to a nation that would become the greatest the world has ever seen. Our Founding Fathers began the most exciting adventure in the history of nations. In their debates with the principles of human dignity, individual rights, and representative democracy, their arguments were based on common law, separation of powers, and limited government. Their victory was to find a home for liberty.

Led by Madison and Jefferson and others, the authors of the Constitution established a fragile balance between the branches and levels of government. That concept was their genius and the secret of our success -- that idea of federalism. The balance of power intended in the Constitution is the guarantor of the greatest measure of individual freedom any people have ever known. Our task today, this year, this decade, must be to reaffirm those ideas. Our Founding Fathers designed a system of government that was unique in all the world -- a federation of sovereign states with as much law and decisionmaking authority as possible kept at the local level. They knew that man's very need for government meant no government should function unchecked.

We the people -- and that is still the most powerful phrase -- created government for our own convenience. It can have no power except that voluntarily granted to it by the people. We founded our society on the belief that the rights of men were ours by grace of God. That vision of our Founding Fathers revolutionized the world. Those principles must be reaffirmed by every generation of Americans, for freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction. It can only be passed on to a new generation if it has been preserved by the old. And that's what I meant last January when I spoke of an American renewal -- a rededication to those first principles.

Let it be said of this generation of Americans that when we pass the torch of freedom onto the new generation, it was burning as brightly as when it was handed to us. Then we will have kept faith with Madison and those other remarkable men we call the Founding Fathers. And we will have kept faith with God.

This concert and those that will follow bring the accomplished talents of master performers together with artists of the new generation waiting to be recognized. Together, they represent the best of mind and spirit that America has to offer. They add to our tradition of creativity and freedom.

The grand designs of soldiers and statesmen are often forgotten by history. More often than not, people are remembered for the quality of their ideas and the beauty of their art. We in this country have a cultural record to be proud of. Through private and voluntary contributions, the American people maintain more orchestras, more opera, more ballet, more nonprofit theater, more libraries and other cultural activities than all the rest of the world put together.

As the White House Young Artist series demonstrates, the arts in America are rich, diverse, and growing -- a vital creative expression of our free society. American artists, like the ones we have seen tonight, guarantee that we will indeed be remembered for our civilization as well as for our strength.

The President. Well, I'm hoping that I won't have to. I have suggested that perhaps we have an extension of the present continuing resolution, so that they can all go home for their planned holidays and we'll take this up when they come back. But I just did not feel that I could pass what has finally been decided, which was several billion dollars more than we had suggested for the budget.

The President. Well, it's just that it is several billion dollars. I haven't had too much of an opportunity in the late-night rush there to know what has been done within the overall framework of moving funds here and there, which I would also be bound by in this continuing resolution.

Q. Aren't you concerned about the country running out of money? Congress has sent you the bill that they think they compromised on, and you indicated they won't sign it. Won't that have a very harmful effect?

The President. That depends. Obviously, if there is no choice but to veto and then the country is left in the situation of coming to a halt at the end of this, no, I would not go. And they wouldn't go home, either.

The President. Yes. The fact that this country has gone on now for a year without a budget and is 2 months into the second year without a budget -- that is no way to run a railroad. And it's even less of a way to run a country.

The beginning of the fiscal year you should have a budget in place in which you know what the cost for each department is going to be. This continuing resolution is a process whereby the Congress can add to the spending, and the only choice left to a President is to literally close down the government by veto, unlike vetoing a budget figure. And it's time for us to get legitimate appropriations bills passed and to have a budget. We haven't had one. There wasn't one when I came here, and they're continuing down the same path.

Q. Speaker of the House John McCormack will have passed away a year today, and today is the day that Jack Kennedy was assassinated. Do you have any comment at all about these great people -- just like they are great, they were great?

This resolution presented me with a difficult choice: either to sign a budget-busting appropriations bill that would finance the entire government at levels well above my recommendations -- and thus set back our efforts to halt the excessive Government spending that has fueled inflation and high interest rates, and destroyed investments for new jobs -- or to hold the line on spending with a veto but risk interruption of government activities and services.

I have chosen the latter. The failure to provide a reasonable resolution means that some citizens may be inconvenienced and that there is a possibility of some temporary hardship. Nevertheless a far greater threat to all Americans is the sustained hardship they will suffer by continuing the past budget-busting policies of big spending and big deficits.

On September 24th I asked for a reduction of 12 percent in the appropriations for nearly all nondefense discretionary programs and a modest reduction in our planned program to strengthen the national defense. The 12-percent cut would have saved $8\1/2\ billion -- a significant contribution to reducing the deficit, but a modest sum in a budget which will total more than $700 billion.

By refusing to make even this small saving to protect the American people against overspending, the Congress has paved the way for higher interest rates and inflation, and a continued loss of investment, jobs, and economic growth. At the same time, the continuing resolution fails to provide sufficient security assistance to allow America to meet its obligations.

The practice of loading the budget with unnecessary spending and then waiting until after the eleventh hour to pass a continuing resolution, on the assumption that it was safe from a Presidential veto, has gone on much too long. It's one of the principal reasons why the growth of government spending is still not under control.

For much of the past fiscal year, most of the domestic budget was funded in this manner -- through a continuing resolution, without regular appropriations bills subject to Presidential approval or disapproval. These so-called stopgap resolutions are actually budgetbusters that can last for an entire year and create the kind of economic mess we inherited last year.

A few days ago I offered to meet the Congress halfway. But the continuing resolution the Congress has now passed provides less than one-quarter of the savings that I requested. This represents neither fair compromise nor responsible budget policy.

In the hours ahead the Congress has the opportunity to reconsider, and I urgently request that it do so. In the meantime we are making every effort to avoid unnecessary dislocations and personal hardship.

I can give assurance that social security and most other benefit checks will be paid on schedule. The national security will be protected. Government activities essential to the protection of life and property, such as the treatment of patients in veterans hospitals, air traffic control, and the function of the Nation's banks, will also continue. But in order to prevent unnecessary inconvenience and hardship as Thanksgiving approaches, I must urge the Congress to act promptly and responsibly.

The President. They can do one of two things: They could continue -- and then this is all I can take -- they could continue a brief continuing resolution until after the holidays -- continuing the present continuing resolution -- extension is what I should say -- of that and then come back and take this up and arrive at a settlement. Or they could come in and pass what I said in the first place, that I would split the difference with them between our request for help and their budget figure, instead of doing what they did.

The President. No, I just think that it is time that we recognize we have been -- we're into the second year without a budget with the government running on continuing resolutions, which heretofore a President has felt -- and it's very difficult for me to see how you could veto that with all the ramifications. And now here we go again. And I think it's time someplace along the line that we've got to say let's quit this and do what 50 States manage to do on time every year, and that is have a budget.

I have chosen the latter. The failure to provide a reasonable Resolution means that some citizens may be inconvenienced and that there is a possibility of some temporary hardship. Nevertheless, a far greater threat to all Americans is the sustained hardship they will suffer by continuing the past budget-busting policies of big spending and big deficits.

On September 24, I asked for a reduction of 12 percent in the appropriations for nearly all non-defense descretionary programs and a modest reduction in our planned program to strengthen the national defense. The 12 percent cut would have saved $8.5 billion -- a significant contribution to reducing the deficit, but a modest sum in a budget which will total more than $700 billion.

The practice of loading the budget with unnecessary spending -- and then waiting until after the eleventh hour to pass a Continuing Resolution on the assumption that it was safe from a Presidential veto -- has gone on much too long. It is one of the principal reasons why the growth of Government spending is still not under control.

A few days ago I offered to meet the Congress half-way. But the Continuing Resolution the Congress has now passed provides less than one quarter of the savings I requested. This represents neither fair compromise nor responsible budget policy.

The President. And I asked for an extension, and of course, we now must come back and do the work all over again in the Congress on a bill that can be signed. But I'm glad for this extension so that no one's holidays were disrupted.

I would have called, not only just being late now, but, earlier, but I had a little problem there. I'm probably the first President to reach a Governors conference by direct long-distance dialing. All the White House telephone operators were furloughed today because of the veto.

You know, I thought I was going to turn out earlier today to be the first President to have to carry out the trash himself and mow the South Lawn. At noon, Washington was quite a ghost town. The last time I remember that much peace and quiet was when I was doing a ``Death Valley Days'' segment in Death Valley.

But, listen, I want to thank all of you for the resolution you adopted today in support of my veto and the support that you've given me all this time on the economic program. It was very heartwarming for me to find this out.

Last night, when I informed them that I would veto what they had passed, I suggested that after the veto an extension of the present continuing resolution, just for 20 days until December 15th, when we could come back from the Thanksgiving holidays and really settle this issue.

I don't know whether you're aware of this or not, or have heard the news, but this morning the House met, and then at noon the Senate convened, and before we left, the House had a solid victory for this 20-day extension. The House leadership had tried to get an extension all the way into the middle of February, which would have come after we'd even tried to get a 1983 budget, let alone find a solution to the 1982 budget.

And then, well, all the Republicans in the House stuck together and were aided by 43 Democrats, and they passed it. It went over to the Senate, where it passed 88 to 1. I signed it and, 10 minutes later, was on the plane heading for my own Thanksgiving.

This was my first veto, and as I mentioned in my statement this morning, the failure of the Congress to agree to a reasonable compromise, I felt, had left me no choice. The only alternative would have been to cave in to the big spenders.

I think that Congress has fallen into a bad habit when, if you stop to think that we didn't have a budget all the way through 1981 and now we're 2 months into 1982 and we still don't have a budget -- they just wait until the 11th hour to force through unnecessary spending. It's a kind of legislative game of chicken because for a Governor to veto -- a President to veto -- see, I'm getting right back in the swing of things, I still think I'm a Governor -- but it is a game of chicken, and someone just had to bring it to a halt.

There's no reason on Earth why the National Legislature can't act with the same responsibility as its counterparts at the State level. You've all had to make hard calls. It's a part of the job. And as Republicans, I know you share my commitment to making government at all levels less wasteful and more responsive to the American people.

Your meeting there in New Orleans couldn't have come at a more important time. In the year ahead, 36 States will hold gubernatorial elections, including 16 States with Republican incumbents up for reelection. A lot is at stake. And I hope that I can be of help to you and will be in every way I can.

Right now, of course, I think that means standing firm against those people, the sharpest critics, the ones who tried to pass this lengthy resolution today who really are the ones who took us down the path that has led to the trillion-dollar deficit over these last few decades. And they've offered nothing except a repeat of going down that same road. Well, I think it's time to choose a different road and to bring spending relief and tax relief for our overburdened citizens.

I know that I've talked to so many of you about federalism and my belief that we've drifted away from that concept. My dream is that we can return more authority, more autonomy and responsibility to you at the State level and, at the same time, turn back to you tax sources that have been preempted by the Federal Government and which they should no more have than the responsibilities that they have also preempted.

I think the people voted for a change in 1980. I think they'll be voting for much the same thing if we stay with this plan, and that's just what we're going to do in the congressional and State elections across the country in November of '82.

So, please believe that I'm not going to give up the fight for the block grants, for getting to you more flexibility in spending the money that comes from the national level. And we'll do this while we work and continue to work to get to that point that we can turn actual tax sources over to you.

Governor Dalton. Mr. President, we appreciate your calling. We've got 21 Republican Governors here, and we read a unanimous resolution there this morning. And Governor Dave Treen of Louisiana is here to speak to you also.

Our nation's potential vulnerability to raw material supply disruptions during a period of emergency mobilization is well known. In answer to this, last March we began the first major purchase program for the Defense Stockpile in over 20 years with the expectation of implementing a long-term, fiscally responsible program to redress stockpile deficiencies.

This bauxite acquisition program represents another necessary step. Bauxite is a raw material used to produce aluminum, a major element in almost all modern military weapons systems such as the B - 1 bomber and F - 18 aircraft. It is a critical input to industries that are essential to support a mobilization effort. During World War II a substantial portion of our bauxite ore-carrying ships was sunk in the South Atlantic by enemy submarines, thus pointing up the need for wartime resources of bauxite within our nation's boundaries. Currently the stockpile is critically deficient in Jamaican-type bauxite, with an inventory 12 million tons below requirements.

This large and cost-effective acquisition program will be accomplished through a combination of direct cash purchase and exchange with excess materials from our stockpile by General Services Administration, and barter, using agricultural commodities with the Department of Agriculture. Agricultural barter to require needed raw materials will thus be used for the first time in almost 15 years. This barter arrangement follows from the congressional mandate contained in section 6 of the Stockpiling Act of 1979.

While improving our own defense posture, this program will contribute to Prime Minister Seaga's strategy for Jamaica to rely to the maximum extent possible on production and exports to fuel its economic recovery. The stability and economic strength of Jamaica are important to our national security interests in the Caribbean.

The 1979 Regulations constitute a revision of, and a complete replacement for, the Radio Regulations (Geneva, 1959), as amended by six Partial Revisions, to which the United States is a party. The primary purpose of the present revisions is to update the existing Regulations to take into account technical advances and the rapid development of certain services and to harmonize the decisions taken at specialized radio conferences since 1959. The new Regulations, with the few exceptions noted below, are consistent with the proposals of and positions taken by the United States at the 1979 World Administrative Radio Conference.

At the time of signature, the United States Delegation submitted reservations to several of the decisions included in the Regulations. It was felt in these few cases, that the decisions could adversely affect an important national interest. In addition, the Administration considers it necessary to maintain in force the reservation of the United States associated with a frequency allotment plan included in the Partial Revision adopted by the 1974 World Maritime Administrative Radio Conference. The specific reservations, with reasons, are given in the report of the Department of State.

The 1979 Radio Regulations will enter into force on January 1, 1982 for Governments which, by that date, have notified the Secretary General of the International Telecommunication Union of their approval thereof. Subject to the reservations mentioned above, I believe the United States should be a party to the Regulations from the outset, and it is my hope that the Senate will take early action on this matter and give its advice and consent to ratification.

I have authorized a $30 million food grant to the people of Poland. The food, consisting of flour, grain products, milk, and oil, will be donated by the United States through Public Law 480 (Title II), the ``Food for Peace Program,'' to food programs managed by CARE and the Catholic Relief Services over the next 6 months. The groups within Poland to be primarily assisted by this food aid are those that have been affected by the severe shortage of staple goods. These groups include preschool children, pregnant women, the elderly, the hospitalized, and orphans.

This food grant reflects the humanitarian concern of this Nation for the well-being of the people of Poland. It demonstrates U.S. recognition of longstanding ties and friendship between the American and Polish people and the administration's commitment to the peaceful resolution of the current Polish situation.

Doctor West, Governor Graham, it's a pleasure to be able to talk to all of you there tonight. It would be a greater pleasure if I could be there with you. I'm most grateful to Prime Minister Seaga for his invitation, which I couldn't accept. I'd like to express greetings to all of you and to my friend, President Duarte, who is present, and I wish you success in this work that you're doing. With such a group of distinguished and talented business and government officials, I expect the conference could be a turning point in the economic development of a large region.

I share the spirit and the dream and the task that we've all set before us. The enormous importance of the program that we're jointly developing -- strengthening cooperation with our neighbors in the Caribbean Basin -- this is one of my highest priorities.

We're neighbors. We share not only opportunities for mutual benefits but also each others' troubles. I know that economic success is crucial to resolving problems of political instability, and I know that economic and social progress occur most often and most vigorously in societies that protect individual freedoms and democratic processes.

Each nation's approach to development should reflect its own cultural, political, and economic heritage. But there are common problems; therefore, an opportunity as well as the need for a regional approach.

We seek to formulate a regional approach which is genuinely cooperative. We have consulted closely with both government and private leaders in the region. This has included discussions with Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, whose development needs must be taken into account in any comprehensive set of measures. And it's on this basis that we're developing a program. Because we seek an innovative program, we've already begun discussions with our Congress, where approval for some of the contemplated actions will rest.

Let me just touch, if I can for a moment, on the principles underlying the program. Action must be cooperative. External support will be very important, but internal efforts are indispensable. The people of the Caribbean Basin themselves must decide what needs to be done and how to do it.

Second, governments and the private sector complement each other. Governments set the framework within which economic activities can flourish, but governments can't do it alone. The private sector has formidable powers of creativity and risk-taking, and it requires and deserves more support than we've given it over the past several years.

Third, our program will integrate trade, investment, and financial assistance to spur self-sustaining growth. In this sense, the program is tailored to the modern period and shouldn't be confused with more simplistic approaches that were pursued in earlier periods.

Alone, each of these tools makes an important contribution, and when each supports the others in a well-focused program, the effects are going to be multiplied. From such a program, the region will be able to secure relief for its most pressing problems, but will enjoy larger benefits from the cumulative impact of the measures.

I'm delighted that former Senator Bill Brock, and now our United States Trade Representative, is there with you and, I know, will give a more detailed outline of what it is we're talking about in this plan for the Caribbean and for Central America.

Thank you all very much. It's always a pleasure to be here in Ohio and have a chance to acknowledge the great help that your Governor has been to me over the years. It seems now a long time back, but I turned to him for counsel and advice when I was a brand new Governor. We didn't know each other. We met, and I had his unstinting and very effective support then, and counsel and advice, and I had it last year in the election, and I'm having that same kind of support now for our economic program.

These are exciting times. The Columbia has been orbiting the Earth, Senator Glenn is in orbit around New Hampshire -- [laughter] -- and the Federal budget is off somewhere in the wild blue yonder. You know, we're completing 14 months without a budget. Your State isn't run that way, and we didn't run California that way. In fact, I don't believe I can remember any State ever practicing the fiscal irresponsibility that has characterized the majority party leadership in Washington over these past three or four decades.

In the debate over the continuing resolution the weekend before Thanksgiving, some of those who must share responsibility for our economic situation protested that I was making a theatric gesture over a mere $1 or $2 billion. Well, in the first place, they must be practitioners of the new math. The figure in dispute was nearer $10 billion over and above the budget that I'd asked for in September.

But aside from that, how does one use the word ``mere'' in talking about a billion or $2 billion? A few years ago, one of that same spendthrift fraternity, trying to explain the increase in government spending, said in all seriousness, ``Well, you know, a billion here and a billion there; it adds up.'' [Laughter] Well, he was right. Their billion here and a billion there have added up to a national debt of more than $1 trillion. Now, that's an unimaginable figure. Just think, if we started paying off that debt at $1 billion a year, it would take us a thousand years to lift the mortgage.

But let me state something that I know about the Federal budgets of the past few decades. Thanks to the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend policy of our opponents, those budgets are always much bigger at the end of the fiscal year than they were at the beginning, and they were too big at the beginning.

Now they've found an easier way to spend. It's called the continuing resolution. Now, let me explain what such a resolution really is. It's a means whereby spending can go on out of control. The resolution simply says that government can continue at a prescribed spending level while it goes on talking about a budget for 14 months.

Well, in the fiscal year that ended October 1st, the continuing resolutions came in way over the budget figure announced by the previous administration in 1980. And now the same process appears to be starting and is going on for 1982.

Now Nancy and I have flown to California for the holidays, and now we've flown back here, and I'm still waiting for the sky to fall, and it hasn't. You know, if it goes on like this, a fellow might be tempted to try doing some of those other things they say are impossible, like reducing the size of government, eliminating inflation, reducing tax rates, and even maybe having a budget, before we're finished.

When this administration began, interest rates were the highest they'd been since the Civil War -- 21\1/2\ percent. Taxes were taking a higher percent of the workers wage than food, shelter, and clothing all put together. Yes, we've had an increase in the number of unemployed, but there already was great unemployment in the auto industry, in steel, and in construction. While there are more unemployed today, there are also more working. There are 266,000 more people working today in the work force than there were when we took office.

There have been other changes. Inflation is a little more than half of what it was, and interest rates have fallen by more than 4 percent in the last few months. Some banks now are at 15\3/4\ percent, and on the way in here -- I didn't have time to write it down -- someone just told me outside that the prime rate of the Fed has dropped today and gone down again.

We've already cut the rate of increase in government spending to less than half of what it had been. We said unnecessary regulations must be eliminated. Well, last year the Health and Human Services Department, the old HEW, the regulations filled 316 pages of the Federal Register. Now they fill six.

And we've just begun to phase in the biggest single tax cut in history. In 1977, you will remember we were handed the biggest single tax increase in history. It hasn't all gone into effect. That legislation passed increases in the social security payroll tax that will go on from now till 1987, the next increase will be in January coming up.

Now many of those responsible for that increase are now the most vocal opponents of our economic program, both the cuts in spending and the reduction in tax rates. With all their opposition to what we proposed doing, they have yet to suggest anything other than a return to their bankrupt policies of higher spending and higher taxes. All they can say is they're against what we're trying to do, but they haven't anything new to offer against those things that have gotten us into the mess we're in.

What we don't need is more spending, and what we don't need are taxes, and what we do need is a lot less of both. Our programs are designed to encourage savings, investment, and productivity. They'll get this economy moving again, growing again, and lift the standard of living for all Americans.

John Kennedy knew this 20 years ago when he proposed a tax cut based on the same principle. He knew an economy stifled by restrictive tax rates can never produce enough revenue to balance the budget, just as it can never produce enough jobs or enough profits. History proved him right. After enactment of the Kennedy tax cut, the rate of increase in employment almost doubled. The rate of growth in gross national product went from a little over 3 percent before the tax cut to 5 percent after the tax cut, and personal savings jumped from 2.3 percent to 8 percent of the American people's earnings. If our tax policies result in an increase of only 2 percentage points in the level of savings, that will mean $40 billion more in the money available for investment and mortgages.

In November of 1980, the American people voted overwhelmingly for change, for a new beginning. Together we've set a new course for freedom and prosperity. I believe that America can and will heal itself as it has so often in our past history.

Ours is a special destiny, both as Republicans and as Americans. Abraham Lincoln once said, ``We Americans, the freest people in the world, will determine our own fate. If it is to be greatness, we will have built it,'' he said. ``If it is destruction, then we will have wrought it. As a nation of free men,'' he said, ``we must live through all time or die by suicide.'' That responsibility is now ours. Let it never be said that ours was the first generation of Americans to falter.

You're gathered here as a kind of headstart on preparing for the 1982 campaign. Well, let me tell you, we need more Republican Governors if we're to realize the great strength built into our Federal system of 50 sovereign States. We need our Republican Congressmen returned to Washington. In the recent battle, they stood together 100 percent in the final vote that brought us more time to work out the budget. We need more like them. We need a majority in the House to match our majority in the Senate. And I could point out, you'll have an opportunity to send a new Senator to increase our narrow majority there.

And if you need encouragement, let me tell you just one thing. There's one Democrat Congressman already that has announced that he will seek reelection as a Republican. And in announcing that, he said he believes in our Republican principles and he believes in our economic program. And he has supported it all the way. Well, I promised him for what he's doing, and I will promise you for what you're doing -- just because of what you are -- we will not retreat 1 inch in our determination to proceed with our program and to restore fiscal integrity, productivity in the industry of America. We're going to stick with it.

Thank you all very much. And let me just close with one thing. A lot of wonderful things happen, and there are some days when you go home feeling 10 feet tall. And part of it is what I'm hearing from all of you, the people of this country, wonderful letters that are just unbelievable, ranging from a sailor in a submarine that goes to the trouble to write and tell me -- he says, ``Okay. So we're not the biggest navy in the world, but we're the best.'' And then the other day I received a letter that I thought was one for all time. It had to be translated from the braille. A GI that had lost his sight in World War II in Germany wrote, in braille, to tell me that if cutting his pension would help get this country back on its feet, he'd like to have me cut his pension. But we're not going to cut his pension. But we're sure going to get this country back on its feet.

Mr. Rice. Mr. President, there were reports recently that Libya had sent people to the United States to assassinate both yourself and other top government officials. Do you give any credence to these reports? And exactly how far will your administration go in dealing with people, such as Qadhafi, who obviously hate the United States?

The President. Well, we're studying right now our economic relations with them. I think he has made it obvious that he is against most of the things that we're trying to achieve, such as peace in the Middle East, appealing to the moderate Arab nations, and so forth.

Mr. Rice. Ed Meese said today that there was no guarantee that Richard Allen would return to the White House if, in fact, the investigation cleared him. I wonder how you personally feel about the entire Allen affair, and would you like to see him back there if he is given a clean bill of health?

So far, most of it has just simply been innuendo and accusation. And what I'm hoping a review will do will be what we've always held as a fair thing in our system, and that is wait until the facts are in and then make a judgment and a decision.

Mr. Rice. You said at your October news conference that it was unrealistic to expect to cure in 40 days problems that developed over 40 years. Now, at what time do you think it will be fair for the American people to make a judgment on whether or not your economic program has been a success, and what goals would you set in your own mind in terms of inflation, unemployment, home interest rates?

The President. Well, we ourselves had evolved a plan that was to go into effect over a period of 3 years to try and bring spending down within reason. Our tax program is implemented over a 3-year span. I think at least we should wait until that program is actually functioning and that there has been time to see some indication of whether the tax program, for example, has contributed to an increase in productivity, a broadening of the economy. I couldn't pin a particular time on it. I think that we have to go by trends.

Now, there are so many imponderables. We made, in good faith, some projections based at 1984 on the basis of things as they were. Well, the interest rates stayed up longer than had been anticipated. And I'm sure they had something to do with the recession, which, while no one ruled it out as a possibility, everyone was hopeful that while the economy was -- well, the economy we inherited was down, with great unemployment, steel and the automobile industries and construction hurting. We still had thought that we knew the economy would be soft. But the recession came, and this has obviously changed our own estimates.

No, I would think that we're going to begin to see a turn in the economy before then. But that's it. It's got to be a progressive thing. But the direction is set, and you see the direction that we're going, that it is up and not down. And right now, we see the interest rates are going down. We certainly have had an impact on inflation.

And, as I said in my remarks tonight, even though recently the figures in what I think is a rather haphazard way of determining unemployment in this country, you know, there's no real hard and fast count. It's taken by a telephone poll of some thousands of households. But, even so, when they came up with the word that there were 500,000 more unemployed than there had been, you can count the figures of the employed much more accurately. And there are 266,000 more people working, in the work force, than there were when I took office.

Now, the error can go either way. If you were ultraconservative, were off 1 percent, you'd be $40 billion better off. If you go the opposite way, such as this recession could have done to us, you could be $40 billion off in your estimates and under what your projections had been.

The President. Oh, sure. I want to see them down. I think that if we can get down to around 10 percent it would be a great boon to the construction industry particularly and to the automobile industry.

The President. No, I can't really tell you on this. I do know this: People have to be aware that with the interest rates starting to come down, a lull in these industries that are affected can continue. Because once they start down, history shows us people then tend to wait, thinking, well, they're going down; I'll wait till they get lower.

Mr. Rice. You said in 1975 that the Federal Government should shift some of the Federal programs back to the States and at the same time give them the tax resources to finance these programs. Now, we're faced with the budget deficit now, and given the current Federal financial situation, how far in the future do you think it might be before we might see some of these tax sources transferred back to the States? And do you envision the government being able to do anything in the next year or two to cushion the impact that the budget cuts have had on the cities and the States?

The President. We have a task force working right now on this whole front, men working with local and State governments. You see, it isn't -- when I say a total loss to the Federal Government, if the Federal Government could find a tax, let's say a tax of an excise nature, and turn it over to local government along with a function that it's to perform, it simply replaces grants, where the Federal Government is taking the money in taxation from the people, taking it to Washington, then going through the administrative process of doling it out again. Well, if you turn the tax source over to that other level of government, then you would cancel the grant that it is replacing. And the idea is that there would be a lot less administrative overhead.

We have been working -- and not as successfully as I wish we could have been with the Congress -- to transfer what are called categorial grants to block grants. Now, having been a Governor, I can tell you what the categorical grants do. They come to you with Federal money, but with enormous amounts of redtape and regulation prescribing exactly what the priorities are and how this money must be spent. Well, no one in Washington can set rules of that kind that will fit New York City and some small town in the urban area or a city in the South that doesn't have the same problems or the West. So, it makes those programs needlessly extravagant.

As I say, we haven't been able to persuade Congress to change as many as we'd like, but we have -- as one thing, this answers the part of your question about helping local and State government -- we have been able to get some of those changed into block grants. And in so doing, they will have the flexibility to make better use of the money.

Mr. Rice. Is there any promise of immediate relief, though, for the States and the local governments who are now faced in situations such as Ohio where they had to raise taxes to offset a budget deficit?

The President. Well, you've got several States like Ohio that have abnormal unemployment rates because of the industries that were predominant here and in Michigan, other States like that. And so, they have the abnormal unemployment rate, their revenues are down because of that, and costs are greater.

One of the things that we're talking about is the program we're trying to get underway of the free enterprise zones in cities, that we should, if we get those operating -- I hope we can soon -- that we should put those into States that have these problems that we're talking about, and on a kind of an experimental basis before you're actually going nationwide with a program.

The President. No. You know, as bad off as many of the States are, who's worse off than the Federal Government? We've got a trillion dollar debt. Any program of help to these States would be coming out of the pockets of the same people that they must tap for taxes.

Mr. Rice. Mobil Oil Company is now trying to take over Marathon Oil Company, which is an Ohio-based company, against the wishes of the officers of Marathon. My question is, do you feel that it's in the best interests of the public to have a large conglomerate such as Mobil take over a smaller, locally based company, and what position might your Justice Department take in terms of any antitrust action?

The President. Well, let me say on this one that I understand there are several companies now that are in the bidding for this takeover, and we try to leave that to the private marketplace unless there is violation of the antitrust laws and unless it is felt that under the fair trade practices and the Justice Department that there is some violation of those. Then the Federal Government has to intervene. But other than that, I don't think it's the place of the Federal Government to intervene in the marketplace.

Mr. Rice. Mr. President, approximately a year ago four American churchwomen, two of them from Cleveland, were killed in El Salvador. Since then the Salvadoran Government has been holding some soldiers for questioning. Now, they recently released a report that contained little new and did not contain anything on the events after February 17th, which was before the soldiers were arrested. Are you satisfied with the way the Salvadoran Government has handled this situation?

The President. I have to tell you that I don't have an answer to that. This doesn't mean I haven't been interested and we haven't been trying to keep track. I haven't had the latest report back on this situation. I do know that earlier we were informed that there was no real hard evidence with regard to the people who had been arrested. Now, I would have to -- and will, of course -- attempt to find out what we know about this, and we have been keeping close track of it.

I think that the Duarte government is trying very hard to have a democratic regime and to bring about a political settlement of this war that's going on down there, not a military settlement. And I think that they are doing what we ourselves have advocated, which is, they are in the middle and they are opposed to both extremists of the right and left.

Mr. Rice. Mr. President, you're meeting at the White House, Wednesday, with Lane Kirkland and some other labor leaders who have been somewhat critical of you in the past. There is some speculation among labor leaders that you might offer some kind of an olive branch, possibly on the PATCO situation, to organized labor. Is there anything in the works on PATCO, or what do you expect to come out of this meeting?

The President. No, I can't say that there is. I intend to, before this meeting, talk to the Department of Transportation, Secretary of Transportation, about PATCO. I have to call your attention again that they had plenty of warning. They were informed in the negotiations that the strike, if they took one after they'd threatened, it was illegal, that they themselves had taken personal oaths, and that there was no way that we could stand by and not recognize that the law had been broken. So, what we informed them was that they might call it a strike, but in reality they were quitting their jobs.

Now, I think a great consideration we must have -- we're not trying for vengeance or anything else of that kind, but I do think that there must be great consideration given to those who did continue to work.

The President. I'd be very happy to hear any suggestions that they may have, but I also feel that they ought to recognize that the people they represent, the members of their unions, are the employers of public servants. And when there's a strike, it's a strike against them, the people.

And labor once recognized that. I've a little background in labor myself, but when public employees first began to organize, unionize, organized labor said they would help them only if public employee unions put in their constitutions that they would not strike.

Mr. Rice. You made a reference tonight to the senior Senator from Ohio, John Glenn, who has been in New Hampshire and other States testing the waters. I wonder in your own mind, sir, what your current thinking is about whether you'll run for reelection and exactly how formidable an opponent you view Senator Glenn as.

As for myself in 1984, I don't think about it, because I set a policy for myself when I was Governor for 8 years -- well, the second 4 years didn't matter. But I said that there would be no consideration of political matters in any decision that our administration had to make, because the minute you do that then you begin compromising in your own mind. And I said we would meet every issue simply on the basis of was it right or wrong for the people.

Mr. Rice. The arms control talks, sir, began today in Geneva. Do you expect the current round of negotiations to produce anything substantive, or is it more likely to lead to a summit meeting with yourself and President Brezhnev?

The President. Well, I don't think the two are related in that way. I've not ruled out a summit meeting. As a matter of fact, I think that's something that has to be thoroughly prepared for. But I am very hopeful about these negotiations.

It is the first time in a great many years that we will have met with them on supposed arms limitation -- I prefer to call it arms reduction -- when we ourselves were not unilaterally disarming. The Russians could sit at the negotiating table, and they didn't have to give up anything. We were doing it to ourselves. And this time, with our determination to rebuild our military, I think they may find they have a reason to want to meet us halfway on disarmament.

And so, as I say, I'm hopeful that -- I think it would be wonderful for the world and for Europe if those missiles planted there near the NATO border, in that vicinity -- able to hit every population center in Europe -- if those were taken out and we did not have to counter them by poising the same kind of missiles aimed at their country.

Deputy Press Secretary Speakes. You know, one thing we ought to point out on this State -- money for the State governments, that the first relief that they will begin to feel is when the economic program starts to work. And that'll benefit State governments as well as their own citizens.

The President. Yeah, it sure will. I just talked to a man tonight that's starting a new plant in Ohio. But the other thing also I should have mentioned -- one thing for the States. You've got to remember that they also benefit a little in the reduction of their costs as inflation comes down. Governments spend money, too, and then feel inflation.

Settlement Agreement of January 19, 1981, is now actively engaged in the process of arbitrating the several thousand claims filed before it by the January 19, 1982 deadline. Although it has only recently begun to schedule significant numbers of prehearing conferences and hearings on the merits, the Tribunal has rendered decisions on twelve claims of U.S. nationals against Iran. Eight of those decisions approved settlements reached by the parties directly concerned; two more represented adjudications in favor of the U.S. claimants. The remaining two resulted in the dismissal of claims for lack of jurisdiction. In total, the Tribunal has made awards of more than $7.6 million in favor of U.S claimants. The Department of State, with the assistance of the Departments of the Treasury and Justice and other concerned government agencies, continues to coordinate the presentation of U.S. claims against Iran as well as the U.S. response to claims brought by Iran, and also assists U.S. nationals in the presentation of their claims against Iran.

The Tribunal decided the last question first, ruling on May 14 that such settlements may be paid from the security account if the Tribunal determines that it has jurisdiction over the underlying claims and accepts the terms of the settlement agreements as the basis for rendering an award on agreed terms.

The decision on the other three issues was rendered August 3, 1982. The Tribunal decided that interest earned on the security account should continue to be credited to a separate suspense account established pursuant to the interim arrangements under which the security account had been managed since it was established. The Tribunal further decided that any such interest may be used by Iran to fulfill its obligation to replenish the security account whenever the payment of awards causes the balance to fall below $500 million. The decision thus prevents the diversion of the interest to any purpose other than payment of awards in favor of U.S. claimants, without the agreement of both the United States and Iran, until all claims are decided and all awards paid.

On the questions of management fees and indemnification, the Tribunal decided that fee payments should be shared equally by the two Governments and that indemnification should be joint and several, leaving open until an actual case arises the question of how ultimate responsibility for indemnification should be allocated between the United States and Iran.

Iranian Assets Control Regulations that sets forth a licensing procedure for the sale and disposition of tangible property that is currently blocked because of an interest of Iran in the property. The purpose is to conserve the value of the assets and to permit the satisfaction of certain claims against the property. Licenses for such sales may be issued after a case-by-case review of license applications.

Diabetes is a complex disorder in which the body is unable to convert sugars and starches properly into the energy necessary for daily activity. As a major public health problem, diabetes can result in certain long-term complications that may involve virtually every tissue of the body, particularly the blood vessels, nervous system, kidneys and eyes. At present, there is no cure for this chronic disorder that now affects an estimated 11 million Americans.

In recent years, research has yielded promising new information on the possible causes and improved management of diabetes and its complications. This research has provided significant advances ranging from a better understanding of factors that cause or contribute to the disease to the development of laser therapy for eyes damaged by diabetes. There still exists a great opportunity for medical science to reduce human suffering and improve the lives of diabetic patients.

In cooperation with private voluntary organizations, the Federal government is actively participating in this ongoing scientific challenge. Through the combined efforts of government, university, and private researchers, it is hoped that steady progress will continue to be made toward more effective methods of diabetic control. The goal of this work is to improve the lives of patients and reduce the impact of this disease on our nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Chronic diseases of the lung afflict well over 18 million Americans, cause more than 200,000 deaths annually, and cost the Nation more than $45 billion each year in lost wages, productivity and direct costs of medical care.

United States in the past 14 years. Over six million Americans, including two million children, suffer from asthma. It is expected that lung cancer will soon surpass breast cancer as the leading cause of cancer deaths among American women.

Leading the fight to prevent illness, disability and death from lung disease in the voluntary sector is the American Lung Association, a nonprofit health organization supported by individual contributions to Christmas Seals and other donations. Beginning in 1907, Christmas Seals were used to raise funds through private contributions to provide education to Americans with the disease.

Today, the American Lung Association works with the National Insititutes of Health to support research, training, and demonstration programs relevant to diseases of the lung. This year, the Association's Christmas Seals will be in 60 million American homes.

Alzheimer's disease, a major brain disorder, results in the progressive loss of mental faculties, often beginning with impairment of memory, learning, attention, and judgment. While some types of dementia are curable, Alzheimer's disease is not. In time, it erodes thought, feeling, and behavior and leads to death. Family members and friends of the afflicted fully comprehend the special suffering imposed by this depersonalizing illness.

Thanks to progress in neurobiological research, we know that Alzheimer's disease is not, as once thought, a normal consequence of aging. Rather, it is a pathological deviation from the norm -- and as such must be susceptible to prevention or treatment once its underlying cause or causes are known. Alzheimer's disease is being fought through several approaches; promising early studies are spurring further vigorous research.

The fight against Alzheimer's disease needs many allies. I salute the many Americans who are working for increased public awareness of this baffling disorder and the scientists whose research holds the promise of hope.

The President. We've just decided that some of you must be sleeping late, because your ranks seem to have diminished here after the long night. But we've been through the long night and just wanted to say to you that we're very pleased with the results.

Our target in the one House had been, as we said, somewhere between 17 and 27. Well, apparently it's turned out between 17 and 27 that we've lost in the House, but the main point is, and we're gratified, that we have not only maintained control of the Senate but that when we started 2 years ago we had 53, and we now have 54 Republican Senators. And we look forward to working with this Congress now in a bipartisan fashion to solving the major problems that still have to be solved.

The President. Well, Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News], we've had trouble for 22 months. It's been a struggle every foot of the way. But we approach this -- there have been concessions and compromises in both directions on all of the major issues, and we expect to continue to work with the Congress in that way.

We never achieved all that we had asked in budget reductions. We compromised very broadly in the tax program. We started asking for a 30-percent cut across the board retroactive to January 1st, '81. We settled for 25 percent beginning in October of 1981. And we then further, in order to get further budget cuts, we were willing to compromise on the tax package in which we agreed to certain tax increases.

The President. Well, as I've said, we will work with them in a bipartisan fashion in an attempt to solve these problems. We won't compromise on principle -- of what we absolutely believe is essential to the recovery. And we go into this session with the awareness that everyone must have, and that is that what has been done so far is apparently working very successfully.

The President. Well, we have met with leaders, both Democrat and Republican, in the various fields that you've mentioned -- whether it's business, finance, agriculture. We've done that as a regular matter of course.

House majority that he brought in with him. The average in times of economic stress -- the average loss in this 2-year election is 46. We feel very good about what's happened. Sure, we'd like to have won everything, but we knew we weren't going to.

Q. Now that this election's over, could you give us your assessment of what sort of a campaign it was? Many have charged it's one of the most backstabbing ones we've ever had. There were some tough words between you and Speaker O'Neill, particularly on unemployment and social security.

There was no truth behind them. There never was any secret plan written by us. And we're waiting for the Commission to come in with its recommendations on the needed reforms that must be made if that program is to remain fiscally sound.

The President. Well, partly, I go by history. I gave you what the average was -- or the average loss for when the economy was in the condition that the economy is today, but even the overall average loss is 31. So, we beat the odds.

The President. What are the issues that will dominate it? They will continue to be the economy, to continue doing the things that will reduce unemployment, the resolving of the issue we just talked before, that there has been a long-time postponement.

The first time that I ever made a speech pointing out that social security was actuarily out of balance -- and at that time by $300 billion -- was in 1964. And in all the years since, nothing has been done to do anything about that. And now the imbalance has caught up with us, and within the next several months, we're going to have to actually face the issue of where the money's coming from. So, I think that's an issue that can no longer be swept under the rug.

The President. Are we going to stay the course with high deficits? We're going to stay the course, because the best way to reduce the high deficits is to continue the reduction of unnecessary Federal spending and the necessity of restoring the economic base, because the high deficits have come about through several factors. But one of the most important is the high unemployment, which has taken people off the tax rolls and at the same time has increased the output for subsistence for those people who are penalized by unemployment. So, when we can get the economy back working again, that will take care of the revenues that are necessary to help us reduce those deficits.

The President. No, Bill, if you really analyze the unemployment situation, there is a constant returning to work and others -- this is not a steady pool of individuals who have formed that unemployment. I'm trying to remember exactly the figure here, but I can tell you that it is a third or better of the people that are unemployed, are unemployed for less than 6 weeks and a figure that gets up to around 60 percent are unemployed for less than 16 weeks. And so, there are -- part of the present increase in unemployment was not additional people losing jobs, although some did. But a portion of the increase in unemployment was new people entering the work force for the first time.

The President. It may; it may go up a few fractions of a percentage point. But what I am saying is that the unemployment problem is one of an ever-shifting pool of unemployed, and what we have to do is get the economy going, creating the new jobs to meet the increase in the work force -- that the work force is constantly increasing in size.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, Prime Minister Spadolini and I have had a most productive and harmonious discussion today covering a wide range of important issues. Our discussions confirmed the wide-ranging accord that exists between our two countries on matters affecting world peace, Western solidarity, and international economic cooperation. And this is only fitting as between allies as close as the United States and Italy.

Italy, and the other allies must pursue discussions aimed at establishing a broad transatlantic consensus. Our trade and financial relations with the Soviet Union must take into account the nature of the Soviet conduct toward its neighbors. The Prime Minister shared with me Italy's special perspective in this regard.

We discussed the current situation in the Middle East, where our two countries are working closely both to guarantee the peace which prevails in the Sinai and to assist the Government of Lebanon in securing withdrawal of all foreign forces and restoring its full authority throughout the territory. The Prime Minister stated a readiness in principle to support the expansion of Italy's contribution to the multinational force in the context of broadening the force's mandate and its composition. And I want to take this occasion to extend my personal appreciation to the Prime Minister for his vigorous and constructive contributions that Italy is making to the promotion of peace and stability in that critical region.

We also discussed the importance of the aerospace industry in strengthening the technological capability of the West, and we've agreed to instruct the appropriate authorities in our respective governments to facilitate cooperation in this sector. In this connection, the Prime Minister and I agree that our governments would establish working groups to explore the means of future cooperation between our two nations.

During our discussion of Western security issues, I expressed appreciation to the Prime Minister for Italy's indispensable contribution to the December 1979 NATO decision on the intermediate-range nuclear forces. I reaffirm to him my commitment to pursue vigorously negotiations leading to the elimination of such forces by both sides and to the deep reduction in strategic nuclear forces as well.

I'd like to close on a personal note. This was my fourth meeting with the Prime Minister, and my admiration and respect for him has grown with each encounter. The United States has no better friend in the world than Italy, and the West has no more erudite and distinguished a leader than my friend, Giovanni Spadolini. After our meetings in Europe, it was a great pleasure for me to receive him here at home, and I look forward to seeing him once again when he returns to the United States for the economic summit that will be held in Williamsburg next spring.

Colombo, not only in behalf of Italy but also as the interpreter of the concerns and common feelings of Western Europe -- that Europe that finds itself in the values of freedom and tolerance and of respect of man for man, which are part and parcel of the Atlantic community.

I have told President Reagan about the absolute need to find a global strategy in the economic and trade relations with the Eastern countries. The misunderstandings of the last months must be replaced by a new partnership on a basis of equal dignity and a mutual understanding based on the agreements of Versailles and on which the Italian contribution was determining.

First, no undue gift to the Soviet Union as far as credits are concerned; [second], greater strictness in the transfer of technologies to the Soviet Union; third, implementation of a security net within the Western system so as to reduce the dependence on the Soviet Union concerning raw materials and energy products; fourth, the contracts that have already been signed by European countries concerning the pipeline must be honored, so as not to prejudge the credibility as far as the trade of the Western World is concerned.

But I think that, amongst these four points, we also feel that it is indispensable to have a prejudicial position that would affect in a legitimate manner the past or that would create obstacles for the future.

Following the first meetings that I have had here in Washington, the United States has made a further step forward towards the solution of this problem through a formula which will be presented this evening to the Ambassadors of the countries concerned. And within this perspective, and aware of the need of the lifting of sanctions as a consequence of the new agreement, Italy will continue to commit itself to find a conclusion and a solution, so as to have a global agreement -- a solution which I think is very near.

President Mitterrand. The political solidarity between Europe and the United States that we want to defend at all costs also implies the overcoming of these conflicts which are not necessary and that we are having because of the Soviet Union.

Italy is and will always be coherent to the principles that have been inspiring for more than 30 years its foreign policy, and which are based on the strengthening of the bonds with its partners of the Western World and, first and foremost, with the United States, which is the essential premise to start, once again, and on the basis of a guaranteed security, the East-West dialog, which is undergoing new tensions today which torment us and concern us very much. I am thinking in particular of the situation in Poland and in Afghanistan. This is why, in spite of the international difficulties -- and I think that because of these difficulties -- we are convinced more than ever about the fact that we should pursue in the negotiations undergoing in Geneva for a balanced control and reduction of armaments.

I have reaffirmed to President Reagan the conviction that Italy has: that to find peace in the world it is necessary to also act for the development of a policy which would favor the dialog between the north and the south on our planet. And I am referring in particular to the difficult areas of the Mediterranean. And it is in this framework that I am thinking of satisfaction of the joint action of our two countries -- first in the Sinai and today in Beirut, an action that we want to strengthen in agreements between our two governments and that in the next days will find a further development with the parallel decisions which will increase our presence in Lebanon, always with the aim of giving to that torn country a condition of true independence and stability.

Republic, Mr. Sandro Pertini, seeing with satisfaction that in the last 2 years Italy has confirmed its role amongst the most industrialized countries of the Western World. And this is why I've been able to come here expressing the voice of an Italy which is determined to respect its international commitments and to, therefore, begin working from the strengthening of defense in the Atlantic alliance; to struggle, therefore, against economic difficulties which are common to the whole Western industrialized world. And we are doing this in a very strict and steadfast manner.

All Europeans know how much they owe to the United States that twice has given back freedom to our continent. And I, therefore, have been interpreter of these feelings to my friend, President Ronald Reagan, a man that I admire very much for his loyalty, dedication to individual freedoms of the whole world.

President Reagan and President Monge met for about 30 minutes in the Oval Office, where they discussed a number of subjects. First, they discussed the Conference on Free Elections, which is the reason for President Monge's visit to the United States. At President Reagan's invitation, he will be addressing the Conference Friday. Both Presidents noted the important contributions it can provide to the strengthening of democratic institutions. In this regard, they also discussed the San Jose Conference of October 4, which produced agreement by the eight democratic states attending on the conditions necessary for the establishment of peace and stability in Central America. That Conference also created a regional organization to provide technical assistance to countries wishing to hold democratic elections.

Congress has approved one of the major elements of this initiative -- a $350 million economic assistance supplemental. President Reagan is treating the remaining elements of the program -- the trade and investment incentives -- as a top priority and will urge Congress to enact those features when it returns later this month. He told President Monge he will work hard toward that goal, and the Costa Rican leader reiterated his strong endorsement of the initiative as vital to the region.

Europe's advanced industrial democracies with traditions of representative governments stretching over generations are represented here. So, too, are Asia's new democracies. And we also welcome representatives of international parliaments: President [Jose Maria de] Areilza of the Council of Europe Parliamentary Assembly, Vice President Elles of the European Parliament, Vice President Townsend of the Latin American Parliament.

Minister Spadolini of Italy, who could not attend this luncheon but who has sent a message of greetings in which he expressed on behalf of his people -- well, he did it, I should say, not in sending a message, in delivering a great keynote address to this gathering, which you heard. King Juan Carlos of Spain has sent a message of greetings in which he expressed, on behalf of the Spanish people and himself, support for the principles and objectives of this Conference.

And we are here today to celebrate a common vision, a vision of a world where right to self-government is openly acknowledged -- where the state is seen as not the master, but the servant of man. In particular, this Conference is concerned with free elections, the very foundation of democracy. There's no more striking symbol of democracy than the picture of a citizen casting a ballot, electing a leader, choosing his or here own destiny.

Earlier this week, elections were held here in the United States. I spent the last 2 weeks on the road working for votes and trying to understand my country's problems better. And so did thousands of candidates for local, State, and Federal offices with a wide variety of views. On Tuesday of this week, the people gave their verdict in free elections. And the process is the same in your countries.

The free flow and the open competition of ideas is the heart of our free societies. What a striking contrast this is with those nations of the world where the people have no role but must sit weakly by and wait for a small group of men to conclude their struggle for power behind closed doors and then rule without being accountable to anyone.

One of my predecessors in this office shared this excitement. General Eisenhower wrote in his personal diary less than a year after the end of the Second World War, ``Our most effective security step is to develop in every country where there is any chance or opportunity a democratic form of government. To lead others to democracy we must help actively, but more than this we must be an example of the worth of democracy.'' Well, I can think of no better way to express the challenge to those of us participating in this Conference and free men everywhere than those words of Dwight Eisenhower's.

That this Conference is taking place is testimony to the growing power of democratic ideals. And their appeal has led me to suggest to the British Parliament last June that you and I live at a turning point, a moment in time, and when time and circumstance and the sound instincts of good and decent people can unite to redirect history, to bring about a new and more hopeful life for future generations.

Some may see this prognosis as too optimistic. I do not underestimate the capabilities for repression of dictatorships of either the left or the right or the devastating effect of terrorism. But the imperishable democratic ideal and the democratic movement -- these are stronger. As shown in country after country on the continents which all of you in this room represent, mankind has an unquenchable aspiration to control its own destiny.

It's our duty to speak out against the evil and the cruelty of misused state power. Unless we speak out, unless we give voice to the decent impulses of mankind and our own deepest held convictions, a kind of moral atrophy sets in, and we too may ultimately lose faith in the appeal and the power of our convictions.

This Conference is a further step in our support for the democratic movement. It's an opportunity to point out to the world that democracy gives to the people of each nation a chance to chart their own course. It's an opportunity to point out how free elections place the hand of the people firmly on the tiller of state, how the free competition of ideas at the ballot box is an invitation to stability and flexibility that is so necessary for economic and social progress, how universal suffrage is the certain route to popular support for institutions and policies, how the accountability of elected officials is the surest guarantee that the people's will is respected and that the fruits of growth will not be channeled to only a few.

All of these realizations provide a powerful antidote to those who argue that state power and armed might are the only means to social or economic progress. In case after case, we have seen the democratic states, which rely on the initiative of their own people, develop their economies and societies far further than centralized states. We must not underestimate the task that we face in supporting the growth of democracy.

Democracy cannot be imposed from outside and it frequently evolves only after patient, incremental steps. It must be the product of free institutions -- churches, labor unions, independent judiciary, and the press -- and its life-giving, rejuvenating process is a citizen placing his vote in a ballot box -- the subject of this Conference.

Your presence today already provides inspiration to those who believe in and work for democracy. I'm confident that your deliberation will be a source of new insight and wisdom. Yet, we must do more than note the lessons of the past and the challenges of the future. It is my hope that this Conference will produce not only a new commitment to freedom but a positive program for international action.

Your Excellencies and ladies and gentlemen, I wish you success in your deliberations and ask you to join me in a toast to our distinguished guests and most of all to our most prized heritage of our past and the most promising prospect for our future: personal freedom, the right to self-governing democracy.

So we have come to this event, an event which I consider to be of the greatest importance in the struggles of peoples for freedom and democracy. We are gathered here together, peoples from different places throughout the world, but they are all together in their identification with the ideals of democracy.

People have come here to this gathering from all corners of the world, all of them with a deep faith in democracy. In spite of adversities that might come up in each one of our countries from time to time in the struggle for democracy, we all share the deep faith that in the end there will be a triumph of democracy throughout the world.

And so this position adopted by the United States of America, through its President, of calling us here together and of establishing the theme and the title for this Conference is a position of the utmost importance for the future in our day-to-day work in defense and for development of democracy, because free elections, thanks to this clear-cut, categorical position of the United States, have been enhanced. And this is the way to promote the cause of democracy, because we cannot conceive of democracy without there being, first of all, free and fair elections in which the will of the people can be expressed as to the type of government that they choose for themselves.

And so, for those of us who want to preserve democracy and freedom for our peoples and, above all, of those for those peoples that are debating internally, that are shedding blood in the search for freedom and democracy throughout the world, the adoption of this position by the United States of America in favor of democracy in a militant and active way without a doubt will serve as a tremendous injection, a tremendous source of encouragement that we sorely needed at this time in which we are at a great and significant crossroads as far as democracy is concerned in Latin America and indeed throughout the world.

And so, this position announced by President Reagan is a sign that is very deep, that goes much deeper than what I've said already, and has an additional dimension as far as the future is concerned, because it destroys what many people have been saying, that there is a false choice and that the peoples face in their struggle for freedom that the choice is only when you have the aggression and the advances of Marxist-Leninist totalitarianism, that the only choice for that, alternative to that, is conservative military dictatorships equally oppressive of the people. And I think that the clear-cut expression of this position by the United States in favor of free elections has been irreplaceable, because it is irreplaceable as far as the development of democracy is concerned. And I think that the United States, by expressing this position, has shown that there is another choice when you are faced with the possibility of a Marxist-Leninist totalitarian system and that that choice is authentic and true democracy with freedom and social justice for the people.

And so, if democracy is going to win, as was very well said by President Reagan, we have to consider what is it that we are going to offer a small country such as ours to this cause of achieving democracy -- as I said, a country that is small. It is small in terms of population. It is small as far as territorial extension is concerned. And so, what can we do? What can this small democracy of ours do to help -- a country that has decided generations ago to disarm itself unilaterally, a country that decided on its own to abolish its own army, and that has built a democracy, a democracy which we acknowledge is not perfect. Because democracy will never be perfect, we must always seek perfection. But we must always realize that we will never achieve it and must, therefore, continue to work on it.

So, what can a small democracy, as I said, offer in this struggle of the peoples to find themselves a democratic system? I think we do have a lot to offer. It's an offer that we make with all modesty.

And we offer an alternative that will represent the defeat of false theories that have been expressed in the past -- theories, for example, the claims of some people that have gone as far as to say that democracy is a plant that cannot grow in the tropics. And I say to you today that we are of the tropics. We are men of the tropics. And we offer this effort of many generations that have established democracy so deeply in our country so that it is deeply rooted in the minds and hearts of our own people. And we offer this to the peoples of the world who want to achieve the same democracy.

And there are others who have said that democracy is a sort of a dessert that can only be afforded by rich countries. Well, I say to you today that we are a poor country, an underdeveloped country. But we have been able to consolidate democracy in our land. And so, we reject all of those people who have been battering at us, from the military, oligarchical despots in the past who have tried to attack the democracy of our republic throughout our history. And we also reject the present attacks at the present time of Marxist-Leninist totalitarianism that is trying to break our intractable tradition and efforts in order to continue democracy among our people.

And so, at this present juncture in our history, surrounded by turbulence, surrounded by violence, there are attacks presented by the people who are the enemies of democracy. And we'd like to have the historic pretentiousness and vanity perhaps to say that yes, in spite of all the history that is past, we have a new contribution to make to this cause of democracy. And you may ask what that new contribution is. And my reply is that we reject a strategy of blackmail that is trying to seek and has achieved in some countries a division, a separation, create a distance between democracies that exist in poor and small countries and the democracies of the rich and the large countries. And this strategy has divided sometimes our efforts and has drawn our attention, has weakened our energies that should be devoted to the defense of freedom and democracy, not only in the Americas but also throughout the world.

So, this contribution is that we reject this strategy. We will not accept it. We will not be afraid, no matter what the aggressiveness is against the Goverment and the democracy of Costa Rica that is promoted by the apparatus of international communism, because we believe that we should continue to make efforts to solidify and develop all democracies throughout the world and that we will defeat the strategy of dividing the democracies of the rich and the strong from the democracies of the poor and the weak.

Thank you, President Reagan, on behalf of all of us who work for the defense of freedom and of democracy. The position adopted by your government is extremely significant, the position to which I have referred to several times during my comments. And I would dare go as far as to announce that the people of the United States will be deeply grateful, a country that has such a strong vocation for the cause of democracy and freedom, will be deeply grateful for the position that you've announced so clearly, which has done so much to help and to present the true image of the democracy of the United States of America.

Sec. 2. Disputes. Disputes between a labor organization and the United States Forces as to whether a particular matter is covered by one or more of the suspensions set forth in this Order shall be referred to the Secretary of Defense. The decision of the Secretary in such disputes shall be made after consultation with the Secretary of State and shall be final. The Secretary of Defense may delegate this authority, but only to the Deputy Secretary of Defense, an Under Secretary of Defense, or an Assistant Secretary of Defense. The functions assigned to the Secretary of State may not be delegated or assigned to anyone below the rank of an Assistant Secretary of State.

The President today signed an Executive order which excludes from overseas labor-management bargaining any policy or regulation that substantially impairs the implementation of international agreements. These are usually referred to as Status of Forces Agreements (SOFAs).

Between 1962 and 1979, the Federal labor relations program authorized the suspension of collective bargaining provisions for installations or activities located outside the United States where determined necessary in the national interest. Since 1979 this authority was vested by statute in the President (5 U.S.C. 7103(b)) where he finds such suspension is necessary in the interest of national security. This authority was previously invoked in November 1979 under Executive Order No. 12171, when the Drug Enforcement Administration's overseas units were removed from coverage of the Federal labor relations program.

Past experience indicates that the Executive order will not affect the traditional bargaining issues which are of concern to some 10,000 U.S. citizen employees of the Department of Defense in overseas bargaining units.

Employees at overseas bases generally bargain on the same matters of personnel policy and working conditions as their counterparts at Federal activities in the United States. They bargain on such issues as promotion plans, grievance procedures, safety and health matters, duty hours, equitable overtime assignment practices, and many other subjects. Overseas employees are subject to most of the same personnel policies and regulations as their U.S. counterparts as well as those applicable only in overseas areas. Additionally, various aspects of their daily lives are affected to varying degrees by treaty provisions and agreements negotiated between the United States and the host countries (SOFAs).

Recently, labor organizations representing U.S. citizen employees in overseas areas have sought to bargain on matters affecting the implementation of a SOFA. The union proposals demanded exceptions from SOFA implementing policies of the United States dealing with (1) the registration of privately owned vehicles in Korea, and (2) ration control policies directed at ensuring that duty free goods purchased in government exchanges are not illegally disposed of in the host country.

The Federal Labor Relations Authority has ruled that such proposals relate to conditions that affect conditions of employment in overseas areas. This Executive order is the President's determination that such proposals substantially impair the implementation of a SOFA. Further, it is the President's determination that bargaining on such proposals would result in complicating the execution of country-to-country agreements and exacerbate relations with the host government such that the suspension of certain labor-management relations provisions is necessary in the interest of national security. However, the Executive order is narrowly drawn and the exemption of any specific proposal must be grounded on a finding that it would substantially impair the implementation of a treaty, agreement, or understanding between the United States and the host nation.

Employees in the Republic of Panama are not affected by the Executive order because labor relations in the former Canal Zone are governed by special provisions of U.S.-Panama agreements and the Panama Canal Act of 1979.

Administration by Secretary Hickel. Bonneville operates the largest high voltage transmission system in the free world. He was subsequently appointed Administrator by Secretary Morton in 1972 and served until 1977.

After his initial service in government, Mr. Hodel formed his own consulting firm. In this capacity he served as a consultant to the president of the National Electric Reliability Council. He has been a delegate to the World Energy Conference. He has served as Under Secretary of Interior since his appointment by the President in 1981.

I have read carefully the letter recently addressed to me from numerous Venezuelan intellectuals, political leaders, and other persons in public life regarding the threats to world peace and the current situation in Central America and the Caribbean.

War II, is to prevent nuclear war. Twice in my lifetime, I have seen the world plunged into wars costing millions of lives. Living through those experiences has convinced me that America's highest mission is to encourage the world along the path of peace, and to ensure that our country and all those who share our aspirations of peace and freedom can live in security.

Since taking office, I have sought practical measures to reduce the risk of such a war, and to limit the destructive potential and costly competition in nuclear arsenals. Last year I wrote to President Brezhnev urging him to join me in this effort and proposing that we begin negotiations to reduce nuclear weapons and to strengthen peace.

Last November, I offered to begin discussions with the Soviet Union to find a way to eliminate land-based intermediate-range nuclear missile systems. We are now negotiating in Geneva with the USSR on this proposal, which calls on the Soviet Union to dismantle the more than 600 such systems it has in place, in exchange for which the U.S. and our allies would agree not to install similar systems in Europe.

In May, I proposed a far-reaching approach to nuclear arms control -- a phased reduction in strategic weapons beginning with those that are most dangerous and destabilizing, the warheads on ballistic missiles and especially those on intercontinental ballistic missiles. In a second phase, we will seek even further reductions in the destructive potential of nuclear forces. We are now negotiating with the Soviet Union in Geneva on these very proposals.

These negotiations, and others which are in progress or which we will be proposing, provide a historic opportunity for us to reinforce the framework of peace and reduce the risk of war. With the support of our friends and allies, we will do everything in our power to achieve that goal.

There are two fundamental causes of the conflict in Central America: economic, social and political under-development and the violent exploitation of that under-development by Cuba, Nicaragua and the Soviet Union. To bring about peace in the region, we think both causes have to be addressed.

Together with Venezuela, Colombia, Mexico and Canada we are attempting to promote economic development in Central America and the Caribbean through the Caribbean Basin Initiative. No regional objective has a higher priority than passage of this legislation to provide trade and investment incentives to economic development. Our Congress has already approved provision of $350 million in emergency supplemental funds and these are being disbursed to recipient governments.

The development of democratic institutions to complement economic growth is a parallel objective to which we are equally committed. We have supported and have been encouraged by the striking trend toward democracy in Central America and the Caribbean. Honduras and El Salvador have held free and fair elections in the last year, as did traditionally democratic Costa Rica and Colombia. Venezuelan democracy in our judgment continues to provide a worthy model compelling in its vibrancy. The trend toward democracy elsewhere in the hemisphere -- we applaud the return of Bolivia to democratic rule -- has our full support.

We are also seeking to support democratic political development by directing resources to the development of core skills of democracy. This week, for example, we are hosting a Conference on Free Elections to which democratic representatives from all over the world have been invited.

Our diplomacy has supported the efforts of countries in the region to lessen tensions threatening peace. We participated in the conference Costa Rica convened on October 4 to coordinate efforts for regional peace and democracy. We hope this conference will contribute to defusing tensions in the region.

As we direct efforts toward economic and political development we cannot ignore the legitimate security needs of countries threatened by external support of internal insurgency. The United States is supplying modest amounts of military equipment and training to the governments of El Salvador and Honduras. Around 85 percent of our aid to these countries, however, is economic.

The commitment to democracy, self-sustaining economic development and non-intervention which we share does not, however, characterize the action of Nicaragua, Cuba and the Soviet Union. Subsidized by the Soviet Union, Cuba and Nicaragua have persistently provided aid to insurgency in El Salvador. Both Costa Rica and Honduras have been victimized by Nicaraguan-supported terrorist attacks. Nicaragua has developed its military potential entirely out of proportion to its objective defense needs. The root cause of so much concern in the region, however, is Cuba's military buildup, which has resulted in resources which could be better allocated to economic development being directed to arms procurement.

Our two peoples, who have sacrificed blood and energy to obtain, safeguard, and nourish democracy, know well the importance of freedom and the right of free choice. Venezuelans and Americans alike share a mutual desire for peace and freedom in not only this region of the world but throughout the globe. By continuing our efforts, we can together advance the cause of peace.

Reflecting the sentiments of ample sectors of the people of Venezuela, we would like to express to you our deep concern over the growing threat of another world conflagration which, if it does occur, would bring with it the destruction of all mankind, eliminating all chances for anyone to be the winner.

Within the realm of this concern, the situation now in Central America and the Caribbean strikes us, as Latin Americans, as being rife with serious threats that could even eventually endanger world peace. For this reason, we are opposed to any type of interventionism that threatens the self-determination of the people of this region and impedes their progress as well as popular and democratic development.

These are the reasons that bring us to ask you, in virtue of the important position you hold, to act diligently and decidedly against the threat of another world war and thus save mankind, provide perspectives for a world free of tension, and allow everyone to walk the certain path of peace and social progress.

You may not have been aware, but last Tuesday, when we voted we were being observed by representatives of countries from five different continents. Officials from Africa, Asia, Europe, and South America joined us here to watch and learn as a part of the international Conference on Free Elections.

Sometimes it's good to stop and think how unique we really are. We accept our right to vote as normal, but it is revolutionary. In the eyes of much of the world, it's a miracle. Last Tuesday as Americans of every race, creed, and walk of life went to the polls and voted, we demonstrated once again that we are the freest people on Earth.

Now that we've chosen the women and men who will represent us and shape our future, we must get on with the business of the Nation. There are serious problems America must face and genuine opportunities we must seize. You, the people, have sent a workable combination of Republicans and Democrats to Washington, and we must get on with the job.

When the Congress recessed last month for the election campaign, it hadn't finished some of its most important work. So, I've asked them to come back. Our needs are too urgent to wait until next year. We must not fritter away the time while millions of our people are barely hanging on.

In this session, as in the next, cooperation will be the key to continue leading America to recovery. Campaign rhetoric and partisan politics must be set aside. Every elected official must bring to his or her work a bipartisan dedication to the good of the Nation. The Congress and the executive branch, Democrats and Republicans, must join together, not to do what's easy, but to do what is right.

In these times of deep unemployment, the Congress must act to bring about growth and new opportunities. First, the Congress must do its part to control government spending. It has not yet lived up to its promise to save $3 in outlays for every $1 already passed in new revenues. Eleven appropriations bills must still be passed, and I will use the veto, if necessary, to keep them within the budget. Second, I urge the Congress to reconsider the constitutional amendment to balance the budget. That bill was among the most important to pass the Senate this year. It was blocked in the House by a minority of big spenders, despite the overwhelming support of the American people. Third, the Congress should act on regulatory reform to help make government and industry more economical and efficient. And fourth, we need the jobs, growth, and opportunities our enterprise zones proposal will stimulate in depressed areas. That has been before the Congress for about a year. And fifth, we need the clean air bill, both to protect the environment and make it possible for industry to rebuild and create more jobs.

Just yesterday, the Labor Department announced that the unemployment rate reached 10.4 percent. Now, that's only a cold government statistic, but behind it are real people who are hurting. I'm not going to sugar-coat this news, because I cannot hide my own personal ache. I remember what it's like to be 21 and to feel your future has been mortgaged by the generation before you. That's a terrible tragedy we must never allow to happen again.

How deeply I wish that we could relieve our current situation with some immediate magic method. But there is a new spirit building -- of optimism and hope for America's future. The severe problems which have been neglected for years and which caused unemployment to trend steadily higher -- problems of runaway spending, taxing, double-digit inflation, and skyhigh interest rates -- are now being attacked at their roots. Inflation is down to 4.8 percent. Interest rates have dropped by nearly 50 percent, and taxes on the people are being cut.

Well, her letter reflects the growing confidence in our country. As more and more Americans see daylight ahead, our economy will grow stronger. We're seeing it begin to happen. Last month, new home sales rose by 24 percent, and new orders for capital goods also increased. Personal savings reached a 6-year high, which helped bring down interest rates and fuel the historic advance in our stock and bond markets. This will provide American industry more capital to invest in our future, and that means better productivity and more jobs.

Donald Baldwin is an independent government relations/public affairs consultant and serves as executive director of the National Law Enforcement Council in Washington, D.C. He resides in Alexandria, Va.

This is the fifth Presidential agricultural task force to be sent to a developing country. Earlier teams visited Peru, Thailand, and Honduras. A task force is currently in Venezuela. Plans for the teams were established at the direction of President Reagan following the North-South summit talks in Cancun, Mexico, in October 1981. At the request of a developing country, members of a task force review a country's agricultural policies and the state of technology for small and medium farmers. They suggest ways to improve the agricultural production and marketing systems.

The task force for Liberia, arranged by the Agency for International Development (AID), will be headed by Dr. E. T. York, chancellor emeritus of the State university system in Florida. Dr. York has served as chancellor and as provost for agriculture of the University of Florida and as Administrator of the Federal Extension Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture. He has traveled in more than 50 countries as consultant to the State Department, the Agency for International Development, and foreign governments in the field of education, agriculture, and economic development.

The crisis between the United States and Iran, which began in 1979, has eased, but it has not been fully resolved. The internal situation in Iran remains uncertain. The war between Iran and Iraq continues, and the Soviet Union still occupies Afghanistan. The international arbitral tribunal established for the adjudication of claims of United States nationals against Iran and by Iranian nationals against the United States continues to function. Full normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the United States and Iran will require more time. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed to respond to the process of implementation of the January 1981 agreements with Iran and the eventual normalization of relations.

I know that marines pride themselves on being gung-ho. I also know that it's a great risk in talking to any group to try to tell an anecdote or story that has to do with their particular calling. But I'm going to do that even at the risk that you probably already know it. It has to do with that gung-ho spirit.

Since the beginning of the corps, at the Tun Tavern in Philadelphia, on November 10th, 1775, the term ``marine'' has been associated with courage, military efficiency, and soldierly virtue. You have established a reputation of being the first to fight, and you did it in the old-fashioned way -- you earned it. For 207 years, you've been there whenever and wherever our country needed you.

And today as we celebrate, your fellow marines are standing watch in Beirut as part of a multinational force that is carrying out this government's commitment to help bring peace to that troubled area. The rapid and successful landing, the continued strong, responsible presence of our marines in Lebanon is in the finest tradition of the corps. Your readiness for such situations is vital to our national security.

Whether on land, sea, or air, marines have been semper fidelis -- always faithful -- to their country, and speaking for all Americans, I thank you for it. And I am convinced that when we get to heaven, we'll find the streets are guarded by United States Marines.

Chronic obstructive lung diseases afflict an estimated 17.2 million Americans, with more than three million being disabled to a greater or lesser degree by such disorders as chronic bronchitis, asthma, and emphysema and many other serious lung diseases of known and unknown causes.

Many of these disorders are presently incurable, but often much can be done to relieve their symptoms and to enable resumption of a reasonably normal existence despite lung conditions that formerly would have made the victim a respiratory cripple. In other situations, the patient whose life is threatened by acute respiratory failure can be restored to health if the lungs can be given a temporary respite while the patient battles back from a potentially lethal injury or illness.

In the treatment and rehabilitation of patients with incapacitating or life-threatening lung diseases, the respiratory therapist frequently plays a critical role. Patients may range from a premature infant with respiratory distress syndrome, through the child with cystic fibrosis, to an elderly patient with advanced emphysema. To all, the therapist applies his skills and knowledge to relieve distressing symptoms, restore normal lung capacity, or help the patient conserve and make the best use of his remaining lung function. Therapy can lead to a complete recovery, prolong life, or make the patient's existence more comfortable.

During recent years, improvements in the diagnosis and treatment of chronic respiratory disease have made increasingly important the contribution of the respiratory therapist in rendering the best possible care to those afflicted by these disorders.

For more than 50 years, Mr. Weeks has exemplified the finest traditions of American voluntarism by his unselfish service to his country. As director of the National Veterans Day Celebration in Birmingham for the past 36 years, Raymond Weeks, a World War II veteran himself, has devoted his life to serving others, his community, the American veteran, and his nation. He was the driving force behind the congressional action which in 1954 established this special holiday as a day to honor all American veterans.

It's a pleasure for me to present Mr. Weeks the Presidential Citizens Medal, given to those who have made outstanding contributions to their country. And, Mr. Weeks, in honoring you, we honor the ideals that we hope to live up to. Your country is mighty grateful for what you've done.

It is fitting that we pay tribute to Mr. Weeks on this day when we remember the sacrifices of those who donned this country's uniform and did their part to protect our freedom and independence. Words alone cannot express our gratitude to the brave men and women who took on the task of protecting our country from foreign threats and aggression.

Nothing is more important to the soul of America than remembering and honoring those who gave of themselves so that we might enjoy the fruits of peace and liberty. And that is the spirit of this special day and of this coming Saturday, when the Nation will dedicate the Vietnam Veterans Memorial, a tribute that is long overdue.

For too long, America closed its heart to those who served us with valor. It's time that Vietnam veterans take their rightful place in our history along with other American heroes who put their lives on the line for their country. Certainly, mistakes were made. But the reality of Vietnam today -- massive prisoner camps for torture and political indoctrination, hundreds of thousands of boat people sacrificing everything and risking a painful death to flee Communist oppression -- all this suggests that the cause for which our Vietnam veterans fought was an honorable one.

And although we'll be putting the divisiveness of Vietnam behind us, we will not forget those who are still unaccounted for. Today I renew my pledge to the families of those listed as missing in action that this nation will work unceasingly until a full accounting is made. It's our sacred duty, and we will never forget them.

War on the 11th hour of the 11th day of the 11th month of the year in 1918. And I might add, I not only remember when it was called that day, I guess we may be the only ones that were on the streets in the wild celebration of the first and actual Armistice Day when it was signed.

Armistice Day honored those who gave their lives in ``the war to end all wars'' -- a day of hope that they had not given their lives in vain. But within a few years, and in spite of an impressive effort on the part of the Western democracies to limit arms and to outlaw war, aggressors rearmed and war came again. Ironically, Armistice Day was made a legal holiday in the United States in 1938, just 1 year before a second and more terrible conflagration swept across Europe.

Winston Churchill labeled it the ``unnecessary war,'' because he said there never was a war more easy to stop. And no man had more right to say that than Winston Churchill. He had fought the illusions that led to war, pleaded with his countrymen to recognize and arm against this expanding totalitarian war machine, pleaded with his countrymen to be strong and to have courage -- not because he wanted war, but because this was the only way to preserve peace. Yet, for all this, Churchill was castigated as a warmonger.

Even after war broke out in Asia and in Europe, our own country was slow to take the steps necessary to defend itself. Warning us of the impending crisis, a young Harvard student, John Fitzgerald Kennedy, wrote a book titled ``Why England Slept.'' His thoughtful study holds as true now, 42 years later, as when it was first published. After describing how a dictatorship with a controlled press and the power to silence political opposition can carry on a vigorous arms program, he noted, ``In contrast, in a democracy, the cry of warmonger would discourage any politician who advocates a vigorous arms policy. This leaves armaments with few supporters.

Among the reasons for England's failure to rearm in time,'' Kennedy wrote, ``probably the most important was a firm and widely held conviction that armaments were one of the primary causes of war.'' Well, the Western democracies didn't wake up till it was too late. It took Pearl Harbor to shake Americans from their complacency.

Today, in this era of much more dangerous weapons, it is even more important to remember that vigilance, not complacency, is the key to peace. This administration is committed to rebuilding our national defenses, which were permitted to erode during the last decade. We're now in the initial phases of that rebuilding, and we must continue to press forward in the years to come if we're to maintain a credible deterrent.

But let the world understand: Our purpose is not belligerency, but respect; not conflict, but deterrence; and not war, but peace. None of the wars that I have mentioned, or others before them, ever came about because this country was too strong. We shall never flag in our pursuit of a more peaceful world.

Earlier today, we received word of the death of Soviet President Brezhnev. And I want to read to you, if I might, the letter that I have sent this morning to Vasiliy Kuznetsov, First Deputy Chairman of the Presidium in Moscow.

Now, I've said for many years there are fundamental differences between the Soviet system and our own system here in the United States. But I believe our peoples, for all our differences, share a desire and a dedication to peace. On this day, dedicated to American veterans, we honor the brave men and women who have by their service preserved our liberty. Our parades are a celebration of freedom. Our banner is Old Glory, and we hold her high and proud. This is the legacy of the brave men and women that we honor today.

So let us go forth from here, having learned the lessons of history, confident in the strength of our system, and anxious to pursue every avenue toward peace. And on this Veterans Day, we will remember and be firm in our commitment to peace, and those who died in defense of our freedom will not have died in vain.

I would also like to convey through you to the Soviet Government and people the strong desire of the United States to work toward an improved relationship with the Soviet Union. I look forward to conducting relations with the new leadership in the Soviet Union with the aim of expanding the areas where our two nations can cooperate to mutual advantage.

As leader of the Soviet Union for nearly two decades, President Brezhnev was one of the world's most important figures. President Brezhnev played a very significant role in the shaping of U.S.-Soviet relations during his Presidency.

President Reagan in conveying to the Soviet Government the strong desire of the United States to continue to work for an improved relationship with the Soviet Union and to maintain an active dialog between our societies on all important issues. The President looks forward to a constructive relationship with the new leadership of the Soviet Union.

Allen, how proud we all are of what you're doing and how much our prayers are with you for success and how everyone down here is watching and how pleased we were with the beautiful sendoff this morning.

Sometimes I wonder -- just seeing some of the results of your flights, the pictures and all -- I wonder if more of us could see it from that angle we might realize that there must be a way to make it as united in reality here on Earth as it looks from outer space.

Following their conversation with the President, the astronauts released a communications satellite from the space shuttle into space. Plans called for the deployment of a second satellite the following day.

The President. I'll be answering your questions tonight, of course. But I want you to know here that I've asked Ambassador Habib to be my representative in the Middle East and take charge there. Ambassadors Fairbanks and Draper will continue to serve under him as we continue on the Middle East policy. And he's going to be in charge of that as well as the continued pursuit of overall peace in the Middle East and -- as well as stabilizing the situation in Lebanon, and he has agreed to do that.

Middle East. Ambassador Habib will assume responsibility for the President's Middle East peace initiative. He will be assisted in this task by Ambassador Richard Fairbanks. Also in this capacity, Ambassador Habib will retain responsibility for coordinating the United States role in the negotiations concerning Lebanon, now being carried out by Ambassador Morris Draper.

Those events could have a critical impact on our future -- a future we face with confidence and resolve. If there is a lesson for us, it is that we, as a free people, must always be prepared for change, so that when it comes we're ready to meet new challenges and opportunities. Our system of government is unique and best able to adapt to change and move forward without disruption or break in continuity of purpose.

Soviet Union. Our two nations bear a tremendous responsibility for peace in a dangerous time -- a responsibility that we don't take lightly. Earlier this year, we put forth serious and far-reaching proposals to reduce the levels of nuclear and conventional forces. I want to reconfirm that we will continue to pursue every avenue for progress in this effort. But we shouldn't delude ourselves.

Today we honor American veterans -- men and women who, by their courage and dedication, protected our freedom and independence. In the wake of events in the Soviet Union, we remain hopeful for a better relation. Conscious of our national interest and determined to remain a free people, I can think of no better day than Veterans Day to rededicate ourselves to peace and to do those things necessary to maintain the peace and to preserve our freedom.

Q. Mr. President, who will be leading the U.S. delegation to Leonid Brezhnev's funeral? If you won't be going, how come? And also, aside from your personal hopes for peace, do you have reason to believe that the next coming months might see the new Soviet leadership flexing its muscle a bit and a period of increased tension coming about?

But with regard to the service, we've had no direct, official word yet on anything about the service, although we are in communication directly with them. And it was just a plain case of looking at schedules and my own schedule calling for visits here by a head of state next week, and it was felt that it would be better for George to head that delegation. But it will be an appropriate and a very distinguished delegation.

The President. Well, we've had periods of tension before. And I think you just -- you can't guess that in advance or what the answer would be, except that I think we must remember that our goal is and will remain a search for peace, and we would try to find the best way to achieve that. And, incidentally, I believe that we can continue that search without my attendance at the services.

Q. Mr. President, at your last news conference you said it would take a palace coup for you to approve a five-cent-a-gallon increase in gasoline -- build highways and create jobs. Have you changed your mind? And I'd like to follow up, if I may.

The President. But on the thing that we're talking about, this particular subject is under discussion. But it was under discussion a year ago, and at that time I asked the Department of Transportation, Drew Lewis, the Secretary, to hold off certainly for another year because of the economic problems that we face.

I don't view this proposal as, let's say, a job-creating program, although, obviously, there would be jobs created by going forward with that effort. But what we're talking about here is, also -- and we have used the term to try and make people understand what it would be -- that if we do it, it would be a user fee. It would be dedicated to the rebuilding of our highways and bridges. This a problem that must be met sooner or later. I wish the economy were such that we didn't have to worry about it at all.

But it is still under discussion. No decision has been made. And if it is put into effect, it isn't anything that would in any way reduce the incentive features of our tax cuts, because the average individual's tax would only -- for that purpose -- would only go up about $30 a year.

Q. It sounds like you're leaning toward it. And while I'm on the subject, Mr. President, with 11.6 million people out of work, would you be willing to have some cutbacks in defense spending to help these people who are out of work?

It is true that there are other voices that are being raised in the Congress who are suggesting that the answer is to go back to things that have been tried before in previous recessions, namely make-work job programs with the Government taking billions of dollars out of the private sector to spend on these projects. And no one has ever noticed or looked to see how many people might have lost employment over here because of the transfer of funds to those Government projects.

The truth is that over a 7-year period, which includes 1981, a year in which that budget was not ours -- we inherited that -- but through 1981 the Government has spent $66 billion on the kind of job programs that some of them are talking about now on the Hill. And that $66 billion got us nothing but an increase in unemployment. It did not resolve the problem. We can't resolve the problem and really do what is right for the unemployed unless we make the economy sound, expand the economy, and thus create the jobs that we must have.

One of our problems, if I may just point out -- and then I'll quit lecturing -- one of the problems is that 3 million of the unemployed are the result of that many new entrants into the work force over the last 2 years. And because of the stagnant economy, we did not create the 3 million new jobs for those new entrants into the work force. And this has got to be one of our great problems -- is creating the jobs to keep up with that kind of expansion.

The President. We have been trying to do that in the area of quiet diplomacy, tried in the summit conference, tried in the NATO conference, of various things. We are prepared and ready -- and they know that -- about trying to have a better relation. But it's going to require some action, not just words. For 10 years detente was based on words from them and not any deeds to back those words up. And we need some action that they -- it takes two to tango -- that they want to tango also.

Q. After the last set of unemployment figures came out, your spokesmen said that there would be an improvement in the situation in the near future. Do you foresee the unemployment situation becoming worse before it gets better, or should we look for an improvement next month?

The President. The unemployment, as I've said so many times before and as we all know, is the last of the indicators that comes up as you're coming out of a recession, when you're in that period of transition. But also if you look back at history, you find that in that same period it is very volatile. It could possibly go up some more; it could go the other way or could stay level. It isn't a sound indicator to look at that and say, which way is the economy going?

But we believe that what we're doing is the only course that can stimulate the economy. And I think we've seen evidences of that in the marketplace. We have just received word that in September the applications for FHA home mortgages, single dwellings, has gone up to a point that is higher than it has been for the last several years -- in the last 4, at least. The sale of homes in October of new homes, already built, was way above the normal level for the month of October. And you can find other things -- automobile sales last month increased 3.9 percent.

So we think we're on the right course. But this doesn't mean that we don't do some of the things, such as our job-training program to try and solve that problem of the increasing people in the work force, which will train a million people a year; the program for export trading companies that we have passed. They estimate that for every billion dollars of exports that it's about 40,000 jobs in our country. We're pursuing that. We're still trying to get action -- and we've been trying for about a year -- on the enterprise zone proposals.

Q. Mr. President, if I can return to the defense budget question, a number of Republicans, not just those who want to return to policies of the past, have suggested that in the spending cuts that are necessary in this next budget, that it would be good if the Pentagon also participated in this. And some have even said that in the long run the defense budget would be better if the economy is healthier. Have you ruled out the possibility that you would modify in any way your call for an increased defense budget, maybe just for this 1 year, when the economy is not what you'd like it to be?

The President. Well, Lou, it isn't the kind of a budget that you can do it for just 1 year. There is weapons systems and so forth, are things that have to go on down the line. You don't just call up a supplier and get a delivery on what it is you want to buy, or call him and say, send it next month. And you've got to remember that a great share of the defense budget is for humanity. It is for the men and women in the Armed Forces, the pay scale that is now approaching some reasonable level.

But we're looking at everything, and we're not prepared to give any indications yet of what we're looking at. I would have to say that, yes, we're looking, if there are savings that can be made without delaying or setting back what we think is the improvement we must have if we're going to close that window of vulnerability that we inherited. We can't do that. The first and primary function of the Federal Government is the national security.

The President. Well, Prime Minister Begin is coming here, and I'm sure that he and I will have some talks on that, as well as other subjects. We do think that it is a hindrance to what we're trying to accomplish in the peace movement.

Obviously the solution to the Middle East must be what we outlined earlier, and that is to bring the Arab States and Arab leaders and the Israelis together at a negotiating table to resolve the differences between them. And that begins with them recognizing Israel's right to exist as a nation.

The President. Well, I don't think that it would be good diplomacy to be threatening or anything, and I don't believe that's necessary. I think that all of us realize that peace is the ultimate goal there.

Senator doing that in view of the experience we've had with others laying back and then offering no proposal to solve a problem. If you will recall a little history, a year ago when we talked about the threat to social security solvency, they claimed there was no such threat. But we said at the time it could not get through July of 1983 without having its house put in order. They denied that.

I do feel this. The answer to this problem is so serious, the solvency of social security, that it is time that those who have frightened the senior citizens of this country the way they have, quit frightening them, because I know of no one -- and especially me -- who is going to support any program for restoring fiscal solvency that reduces the checks below the level that the present beneficiaries are getting. And these people, poor people, have been frightened to death by charges that there were some of us out there that were trying to take this away from them. And we're not.

Now, I don't want to get into whether we should do it or not, but what he is saying is what has to happen. It is time for the leadership of both of us, both sides of the aisle, to come together with the knowledge that we've got to sit down around a table and work out a solution to this problem.

Q. But, sir, excuse me, but if you don't want to answer my question, I understand, but may I try another one then? If you don't want to reduce the benefits, the only other way is to raise taxes or to remove from the rolls some number of people in the future who might otherwise be on it. What course do you prefer?

As for taxes on social security, I think it's time the American people knew that for the next 8 years, beginning in 1983, there is going to be a tax increase every year in social security tax. Five of the 8 years, it will simply be for part of the wage earners, because their tax increase will come from the increase in the amount of salary or wage that is being taxed. But 3 of those 8 years will also be in addition to that -- an increase in the rates.

Q. Mr. President, back on the gasoline tax. Secretary Lewis briefed you yesterday. Can you at least tell us what you see as some of the pros and cons of that proposal -- particularly the mass transit aspect? And can you make it equitable for all States, or will some States bear an unfair burden of that tax?

The President. Well, again, as I indicated earlier, you'll have to wait on that one, because that one was just presented yesterday. No decision has been made. It is under consultation and deep thought by all of us, and we are faced with the need, both at the local and State level and for our own interstate -- the Federal highway system. And the program that has been proposed deals with both those problems.

Q. Sir, you like to describe yourself as an optimist, a man who sees opportunities instead of problems. And in that light I'd like to hear what you think are the opportunities that the United States now has with the death of President Brezhnev?

I have felt for a long time that we have an opportunity, because while the entire world, including the Soviet Union and ourselves, is involved in a deep recession and deep economic problems -- all of us -- it would seem to me that out of those troubles, that might be a time where, in a cooperative sense, we could find out that we'll all be far better off if we decide to get along with each other, instead of one pursuing an aggressive policy and the other one resisting that and so forth.

Q. Mr. President, in view of your earlier statements about jobs and employment, will you firmly oppose the jobs bills coming down from Capitol Hill, or are there certain guidelines or criteria under which you will support them?

I will say that several proposals I've heard sound exactly like the kind of job programs that I was criticizing a little while ago, in which they're simply going to take billions of dollars for the creation of temporary work without realizing that that would be a drag on the economy and would slow down our effort to really restore legitimate employment.

Q. Mr. President, you've said recently that you believe a number of sincere Americans who support a nuclear arms freeze are being manipulated by those who want the weakening of America. Could you elaborate on this for us? Do you have any evidence of foreign involvement in the U.S. peace movement?

The President. Yes, there is plenty of evidence. It's even been published by some of your fraternity. There was no question but that the Soviet Union saw an advantage in a peace movement built around the idea of a nuclear freeze, since they are out ahead. And I want to emphasize again that the overwhelming majority of the people involved in that, I am sure, are sincere and well intentioned and, as a matter of fact, are saying the same thing I'm saying. And that is, we must have a reduction of those nuclear weapons, and that's what we're trying to negotiate now in Geneva. But to put the freeze first and then believe that we have not weakened our case for getting a reduction, when the other side is so far ahead, doesn't make sense.

The President. Well, it isn't 400 billion in any single year that I know of. That's exaggerating. I've read also the same articles, also, and having access to information closer to the source, I don't believe those things about the weaponry.

Obviously in any new weapon system there are problems and there are bugs that have to be worked out. But I have faith in our technology and the level of that technology, and I know that we have been markedly increasing our defensive capability with what we're doing. And as I say, some of my sources I can't reveal.

Q. Mr. President, as you may recall, last June in Berlin you talked about the danger of accidental nuclear war and put forward the idea that this might be a new initiative that the administration could consider in the arms control field. I wonder whether in your planning for next year you have some arms control initiatives in the works.

The President. Well, all of the these things are in the works, and that's why we have three teams negotiating -- one on the matter of conventional arms, one on the matter of strategic missiles, and the other on the matter of the INF [Intermediate-range Nuclear Force], the zero option that I announced a year ago. But I tell you what I'd rather ask you to do and wait for is in the very near future I am going to be speaking in a major address on that entire subject.

Q. Yes, sir. Thank you, Mr. President. You said in September that you could not determine how long American marines would remain in Lebanon. But since that was 6 weeks ago, don't you think it's time to give the American public an indication of how long they'll be there?

Lebanon to stabilize and to be able to take charge of its own borders. This calls for, as quickly as possible, also, the removal of all foreign forces from that soil. And that's why our multinational force is there.

I can't give you a close-out date on that. But I can tell you that we're trying to push as fast as we can on the two things that must happen. And that is the ability of the Lebanese Government to heal the wounds and bring their people together and have control. But also it hinges on getting the three foreign factions -- the PLO, the Syrians, and the Israelis -- out of Lebanon. And we are pushing on that as fast as we can.

But I think the important thing is that that force, that multinational force is there in the name of helping bring about peace. And I think the most important thing is to see that that job is done, and I believe they understand that.

United States might cut back on aid to Israel in direct proportion to the cost to that country of establishing new settlements on the West Bank, all this as a means of achieving the freeze that you're seeking?

The President. To answer that question one way or the other, I don't think would be helpful in the situation that we're in today, where we have made so much progress with the Arab States, the unusual, the unique thing of the representatives of the Arab League being here to meet with me as they were just some days ago; the need now for Israel to itself recognize that they too must play a part in making it possible for negotiations; the part that must be played and recognized and that one of President Gemayel's problems now is reconciling Muslim groups within his own country. I don't think to start talking about whether I should or should not make threats of some kind or other is going to be fruitful at all.

Q. [Inaudible] -- got a request here for some factual information. Is it true that the Begin government now is spending about a hundred million dollars a year to subsidize settlements on the West Bank?

Brezhnev, inevitably there are comparisons between the two systems. Could you take just a minute to tell Americans why at this time they especially should be thankful for their blessings and give a comparison of the two systems?

The President. Yes, because I think the comparison is so obvious, and you don't even have to use our own country. Turn to some of the newer and the developing countries, and those that have chosen our way -- the free way, free trade, democracy -- are so far ahead in standard of living and the happiness of their people than the others that have chosen the other, the controlled, the authoritarian way -- and I think here is -- Lincoln said it then, and it's truer even today, this is the last best hope of man on Earth.

We are freer than any other people; we have achieved more than any other people. And if you looked around this room -- I thought the other day, when we had all those representatives from all over the world, all of those representatives in this room, who were here to look at our election, to learn how they could spread the word about that kind of freedom in their own countries and in other countries on the other continents, I thought that we could have a meeting of Americans in this room, and the ethnic heritage of the Americans in this room would be as diverse, and there would be as many represented as there were in those hundreds of people who have come from foreign lands here today. And here we all live together proudly as Americans, in spite of that difference in birth. There just isn't any comparison with what we have and what we have to be thankful for.

The President. [Laughing] I don't think we messed up on anything at all. But I am not prepared to announce who is going to be the designee at this time. That will be announced properly in the proper time.

We started this long before there were sanctions. We started at Ottawa last year. We tried again in Europe in the two meetings there -- in the summit meetings. We have continued. We had a team negotiating over there. We finally put the sanctions in effect. But we're discussing that relationship -- or that arrangement with our partners without the sanctions playing any part in it.

America great, and the family is basic to our nation's inner spirit. The family is our school of conscience, of service, of democracy, of love, of all things that we as a people esteem and treasure. Our basic values determine how well our Republic holds together, whether it transmits to new generations sources of its inspiration and strength.

Someone once said there are only two lasting bequests that we can hope to give our children. One of them is roots, and the other is wings. Well, the family can help to provide to both -- the security of roots, the inspiration of wings. And this administration has tried hard to encourage both.

Our goals are plain. Where families are threatened, we seek to lessen those threats. Where families lack opportunities, we seek to provide them. And as Thanksgiving nears and we count our blessings, the family should be held chief among them.

And speaking of blessings, Nancy is here. She's just accepted the honorary chairmanship of the first annual Great American Family Awards program, which will honor families across the Nation who are involved in their communities.

The family has always been the cornerstone of American society. Our families nurture, preserve and pass on to each succeeding generation the values we share and cherish, values that are the foundation for our freedoms. In the family we learn our first lessons of God and man, love and discipline, rights and responsibilities, human dignity and human frailty.

Our families give us daily examples of these lessons being put into practice. In raising and instructing our children; in providing personal and compassionate care for the elderly; in bringing the handicapped into the mainstream of community life; in maintaining the spiritual strength of religious commitment among our people -- in these and other ways, America's families make immeasurable contributions to America's well-being.

I invite the Governors of the several States, the chief officials of local governments and all our citizens to observe this week with appropriate ceremonies and activities. During a week in which we will also observe Thanksgiving Day, I especially invite all Americans to give thanks for the family relationships with which we have been blessed.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

During the campaign 2 years ago, I spoke of the need for the United States to restore the balance in our relationship with the Soviet Union. For too many years we had stood still while the Soviets increased their military strength and expanded their influence from Afghanistan to Ethiopia and beyond. I expressed a belief, which you seemed to share, that it was time for the United States to chart a new course. Since then, we've embarked upon a buildup of our defense forces in order to strengthen our security and, in turn, to strengthen the prospects for peace. We still have a long way to go. But the fact that we've started on a new course has enabled us to propose the most comprehensive set of proposals for arms reduction and control in more than a quarter of a century. It's always been my belief that if the Soviets knew we were serious about maintaining our security, they might be more willing to negotiate seriously at the bargaining table.

In the near future, I will be speaking to you in more detail about this matter of arms control and, more importantly, arms reductions. But right now I have something in the nature of news I'd like to bring you.

The Soviet Union faces serious economic problems. But we -- and I mean all of the nations of the free world -- have helped the Soviets avoid some hard economic choices by providing preferential terms of trade, by allowing them to acquire militarily relevant technology, and by providing them a market for their energy resources, even though this creates an excessive dependence on them.

By giving such preferential treatment, we've added to our own problems -- creating a situation where we have to spend more money on our defense to keep up with Soviet capabilities which we helped create.

Since taking office, I have emphasized to our allies the importance of our economic as well as our political relationship with the Soviet Union. In July of 1981 at the economic summit meeting in Ottawa, Canada, I expressed to the heads of state of the other major Western countries and Japan my belief that we could not continue conducting business as we had. I suggested that we forge a new set of rules for economic relations with the Soviet Union which would put our security concerns foremost. I wasn't successful at that time in getting agreement on a common policy.

Then in December of 1981 the Polish Government, at Soviet instigation, imposed martial law on the Polish people and outlawed the Solidarity union. This action showed graphically that our hopes for moderation in Soviet behavior were not likely to be fulfilled.

In response to that action, I imposed an embargo on selected oil and gas equipment to demonstrate our strong opposition to such actions and to penalize this sector of the Soviet economy which relies heavily on high technology, much of it from the United States. In June of this year I extended our embargo to include not only U.S. companies and their products but subsidiaries of U.S. companies abroad and on foreign licensees of U.S. companies.

Well, it's no secret that our allies didn't agree with this action. We stepped up our consultations with them in an effort to forge an enduring, realistic, and security-minded economic policy toward the Soviet Union. These consultations have gone on over a period of months.

Well, I'm pleased today to announce that the industrialized democracies have this morning reached substantial agreement on a plan of action. The understanding we've reached demonstrates that the Western alliance is fundamentally united and intends to give consideration to strategic issues when making decisions on trade with the U.S.S.R.

As a result, we have agreed not to engage in trade arrangements which contribute to the military or strategic advantage of the U.S.S.R. or serve to preferentially aid the heavily militarized Soviet economy. In putting these principles into practice, we will give priority attention to trade in high technology products, including those used in oil and gas production. We will also undertake an urgent study of Western energy alternatives, as well as the question of dependence on energy imports from the Soviet Union.

In addition, we've agreed on the following immediate actions. First, each partner has affirmed that no new contracts for the purchase of Soviet natural gas will be signed or approved during the course of our study of alternative Western sources of energy. Second, we and our partners will strengthen existing controls on the transfer of strategic items to the Soviet Union. Third, we will establish without delay procedures for monitoring financial relations with the Soviet Union and will work to harmonize our export credit policies.

The understanding we and our partners have reached and the actions we are taking reflect our mutual determination to overcome differences and strengthen our cohesion. I believe this new agreement is a victory for all the allies. It puts in place a much needed policy in the economic area to complement our policies in the security area.

As I mentioned a moment ago, the United States imposed sanctions against the Soviet Union in order to demonstrate that their policies of oppression would entail substantial costs. Well, now that we've achieved an agreement with our allies which provides for stronger and more effective measures, there is no further need for these sanctions, and I am lifting them today.

The process of restoring a proper balance in relations with the Soviet Union is not ended. It will take time to make up for the losses incurred in past years. But acting together, we and our allies are making major progress. And I'm happy to say the prospects for peace are brighter.

I have just returned to the White House from the Soviet Embassy, where I signed the book of condolence for President Brezhnev. New leaders are coming to power in the Soviet Union. If they act in a responsible fashion, they will meet a ready and positive response in the West.

I hope you feel comfortable here. This is your house as much as mine. It's our national home. This white mansion and the gleaming marble monuments that we have in the city here represent the ideals of generations of young people before you. If you're inspired by the great marble monuments of Washington and identify with the passion behind the inscriptions, well, that's as it should be. Those monuments, this city, and this country are dedicated to you in a belief that you'll reach for the stars and lift mankind to even greater heights.

Every generation sees farther than the previous generation because it stands on the shoulders of those who went before. Seeing you today and knowing of the energy and dedication you bring to the American volunteer spirit, I know our nation will only become stronger and greater when you are leading us.

Most of you are members of the national volunteer organizations, I understand, and I'm sure you understand the importance of helping others in these difficult times. But you may not be aware that volunteering is an old American tradition. We've always been a country of neighbors dependent on one another. A strong, cooperative community spirit is the heart and soul of our democracy and the key to our quality of life. Your efforts at this national youth volunteer meeting and the projects that you will tackle afterward have a great potential for enriching that American spirit.

I sat here at dinner one night, in one of the state dinners, and had someone from another country, which I won't name. I was talking about something to do with our voluntarism program bill, and this person said, ``Well, yes, you can here in America.'' And I was kind of curious, and then what she was frankly admitting was that not in very many places in the world but this one do we have that spirit where we get together and do something voluntarily and have those kind of programs.

By improving the recruitment and recognition of youth volunteers, you could greatly increase their impact on community welfare. With better communication and cooperation, you could bring about even greater and more dramatic results. My challenge to you young people here today is to return to your hometowns with a special mission -- initiate a collaborative program similar to the Washington, D.C., Youth Volunteer Fair and then keep me informed of how you do. If we can start those fairs in cities and towns across America, the momentum of youth building a better tomorrow will inspire all our citizens to join in the renewal.

There's an old Irish proverb that says, ``Praise youth, and it will prosper.'' Well, my praise for you today comes from my heart, and I hope it will encourage you to work even harder for even greater goals.

Now, I hope that praise and recognition for all our young volunteers will be a byproduct of this meeting. But more than anything, I hope to encourage your ideals and dreams so they'll grow with you and America will prosper. And when we're congratulating our younger volunteers, we musn't forget the adults who have guided you and guided this young people project into an active leadership role.

Force on Private Sector Initiatives, who have devoted so much time and energy on behalf of you young volunteers. And Bill Verity [Chairman of the President's Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives] tells me that voluntarism is being successfully promoted across the country from youth to senior citizens, and you're all proof of that. And to help tell the story to the policymakers, I understand the Private Sector Initiatives Task Force has produced a publication entitled ``Volunteers -- A Valuable Resource,'' which I look forward to reading.

You know, I have to tell you just a little -- and briefly as I can -- a little, poignant story of the opposite way. And it made me think that maybe we ought to have billboards of this kind up all over the country. It was one of those nights in California in the storm season, and down at Newport Beach the homes along the beach there were being destroyed, washed away by the high tides and the waves that were breaking against them. And the TV stations from the community were down there getting this, and it was 2 o'clock in the morning. I was still watching TV, because they were getting this, and you were seeing damage that was being done, but you were seeing the volunteers working throughout the night to sandbag these homes and try to save them.

I thank you for coming here today, for lifting my spirits. And I'm sure my spirits will be lifted even more after I read the additional letters from the volunteers, which I understand you have for me today. I thank you for the work that you've done, the work that you're going to do. I wish you good luck, and God bless you.

Q. I'm Angela Williams from Nashville, Tennessee, and in every respect follow your administration around from the previous ones that I've seen. And I just want to know how we as volunteers can carry out this dignity into America and enable it to spread?

I believe in and believe this country has and that we were in danger and have been in danger of losing, is drifting into a belief that, well, government would do it all, that we didn't need to do things voluntarily. And if you carry on with that, and as far as dignity's concerned, that goes with what we have the most of of any country in the world, it is the dignity of individual freedom, the dignity of the individual that he is supreme.

Almost all of the constitutions -- or all of them that I've seen -- of other countries say, here are the things that the government allows the people to do. And our Constitution says, we the people will allow the Government to do the following things. Our Constitution is our bill of particulars that says to the Government, these are the only things you can do. And if they aren't in here, you can't do them. And it's a very unique thing. And we should always remember it.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Patrick O'Donnell. I'm a Red Cross volunteer from New York. I was wondering if you could give us just one message for all of us here to bring back to our communities to help us promote voluntarism -- just one short, simple message.

Well, yes. It is that these volunteer efforts can do it so much more efficiently -- the things that you're doing -- so much more effectively than government can, that it isn't a case of waiting for government to do it. But take a look at the neighborhood, the community, the thing that needs doing, and then find out how you can enlist people to do this.

But I've also, been connected with many of the worthwhile and the charitable efforts. And, frankly, I think, also, the job I've got right now is a kind of a volunteer job. [Laughter] But the reward for it -- but then I was raised to believe in the principle of tithing, and believe in giving of yourself, as well as whatever material resources you have. And I think it was summed up better than I can say it by a man who spent his entire life with the Salvation Army. He said, ``Life begins when you begin to serve.'' And I think that I believe that, and believe it has for me.

The President. Yes, and it is in this very overall thing. Oh, there are lots of goals and things that, I mean, are part of my job that we have to get done. We have to restore the economy. We've got to solve this tragic problem of the extensive unemployment in our land. But I think the real goal is summed up in getting back to the very thing that Bill Verity is heading up for us, as a volunteer himself, this private initiative thing, where we find all the areas that are out there and the things that can be done, and that don't call for a gigantic bureaucracy or a government program, because those, somehow -- there isn't the heart in it, done that way, that there is when it is neighbor to neighbor. And to see America seek out and solve these problems for itself -- if we could get back to that, I would feel that I had accomplished a great deal if we had that in our country.

And a man named Hoover headed that commission up as a citizen volunteer, and it was a volunteer effort. We fed the hungry of the world. When the great earthquake destroyed Tokyo, again, it was America to the rescue, and it wasn't done by a government program. It was done by volunteers.

When I was a young man as a sports announcer in radio, just starting, I remember doing, I guess, what must have been the first -- it wasn't a telethon then; it was a radiothon -- all night at our radio station out in Iowa, because in Ohio the floods had done such damage. And we were raising money, and it was the volunteers who came in and a volunteer effort for restoring what had been done there.

And if we could remember one thing: When World War II ended and it looked like maybe we could have been falling into another Dark Ages, Pope Pius XII in Rome said, ``God has placed the fate of an afflicted mankind in the hands of America, and America is known and is capable of great and generous deeds.'' In fact, he said we had a genius for those deeds. Well, by this time we were beginning to do it kind of governmentwise with the Marshall plan and so forth.

The President. Let me just say that the agreement that we've reached is what we set out to get, and only turned to the sanctions when we were unable to get it. We had two different delegations in Europe over a year ago, and I tried again at the Versailles summit. But we have all come together on this, and it is so much more effective. The sanctions have served their purpose.

Before my visit to the Federal Republic of Germany earlier this year, Chancellor Kohl, who had not yet attained the high office he now holds, helped organize several rallies. He wanted to let us know that we were welcome and to reassure all Americans of the sincere good will of the German people. Chancellor Kohl, I appreciated very much that magnificent gesture. I understand that in Bonn, where some 75,000 people attended the rally, one of the banners read, ``Say Something Good About America.'' Well, today it certainly makes all Americans happy to repay this compliment, because there are many good things to say about you, Mr. Chancellor, about the German people, and about the strong bond that unites us.

A recent study has revealed that today more Americans trace their ancestry to your country than to any other nation. German immigrants provided the hard work and determination that settled much of the Midwest, taking rugged frontier land like that in the Dakotas and reaping from it bountiful harvests that helped feed the world. In other industries, German energy and German ingenuity helped build the factories and firms that catapulted our standard of living and elevated the lot of the common man from a life of drudgery to new progress consistent with individual dignity and respect. But, as you are aware, Mr. Chancellor, it wasn't simply hard work that built America; it was freedom available here -- freedom to which German immigrants greatly contributed.

In the middle of the 19th century, when turmoil was sweeping through Western Europe, we were the recipient of many political exiles who made significant contributions to American liberty. One of the most remarkable, Carl Schurz, was one of the original members of the Republican Party.

With us today to greet you is a group of young people from your country who are spending the autumn months living with American families in Virginia. They're part of our youth exchange project between our two countries, and these kinds of ties bode well for the future.

The future of both our nations depends so much on friendship and the values we share. In these uncertain times, when a power to the East has built a massive war machine far in excess of any legitimate defensive needs, the Western democracies must stand firmly together if our freedom and peace of the world are to be preserved.

The German people are on the frontlines of freedom. When I was in your country a few months ago, I told your citizens, ``You are not alone. We're with you.'' Well, today, Mr. Chancellor, I can tell you we're happy that the German people are with us. The Western democracies, the future freedom of mankind, and the peace of the world would be far less secure if it were not so.

Your personal commitment and that of your government to the needs of our alliance are well appreciated here, as is the depth which you add to the meaning of our covenant. In truth, as you recently observed, we are not a military alliance. The community of arms, you said, is there to defend the community of ideas. The important point is that we have common ideas regarding human rights, civil rights, our moral values, our moral laws.

I look forward to our talks today, as I would expect that a meeting of the leaders of the two great nations whose interests are so intertwined, there are many vital issues to discuss. As all good friends do, we will disagree at times, but in free societies we're accustomed to differences and also to a peaceful resolution to achieve our common goals.

As we stand here today, I am confident that our shared interests, our common vision of the future, and our joint commitment to human freedom will overcome any differences between our countries. Our governments will work in the closest consultation, in a spirit of amity and straightforwardness.

Recent opinion polls have shown, once more, that in the Federal Republic of Germany there is wide-based, firm confidence in the Atlantic partnership. And to all Americans, therefore, I say today, most emphatically, you can count on your German friends. The North Atlantic Alliance and our friendship with the United States are the foundation of our active policy for safeguarding peace in freedom.

Our alliance is strong because the citizens of 16 North American and European countries have a common goal. They are determined to safeguard the freedom, the common heritage, and civilization of their peoples, founded on the principles of democracy, individual liberty, and the rule of law. This goal is laid down in the preamble to the North Atlantic Treaty.

We must constantly remind ourselves and, in particular, our young fellow citizens of these foundations of our equal partnership and of our deep friendship, because our shared fundamental convictions are the key to unity. And from unity ensues the strength to attain our goals: to safeguard peace and freedom through firmness and the readiness for negotiation, to ensure economic and social stability, and to cooperate fairly and constructively with the countries of the Third World.

Despite domestic changes in our countries and changes of government, eight American Presidents and six German Chancellors have contributed towards German-American partnership. For us Germans, gratitude, too, is an element of our friendship with America.

My generation, my wife and I, know from our experience that after terrible war, when we were still children and pupils and students, the Americans saved us not only from hunger -- we have not forgotten what the Hoover aid program and what the Quaker aid program and the CARE parcel gifts action meant for us at that time -- the Americans helped us to build a free state. And our Constitution, especially the Catalog of Basic Rights, owes much to the American experience of democracy.

Today there are 245,000 American troops and their families in our country where they are welcome guests. These troops serve together with 500,000 members of the Bundeswehr and the forces of five other allied countries. What clearer proof could there be, Mr. President, that we are dependent on one another? The more than 50 million American citizens of German descent also constitute a strong bond of friendship between Germany and the United States. And I convey particularly warm regards to all of them today, on my first visit to Washington as Federal Chancellor.

Next year will mark the tricentennial of the first wave of German immigrants to America, and to mark this occasion, Germans and Americans intend to hold a big celebration together. We will recall our common origins and from this past draw strength, courage, and confidence for our common future.

Mr. President, let us make the forthcoming anniversary the start of a period of particularly close, intensive, and fruitful German-American cooperation. Let us start here and now. I'm looking forward to this cooperation.

The President. Chancellor Kohl and I have just concluded a series of conversations that covered a wide range of politics and security and economic issues of mutual interest to our countries. We agreed on -- close consultations are necessary, as in the past, and we fully intend to stay in close touch.

I would like to take this opportunity to announce, as part of our initiative to increase contacts between the German and American peoples, a high-level commission for the United States and German tricentennial has been formed. And this group will coordinate the many activities celebrating the 300th anniversary of the arrival of the first German settlers in America at Germantown, Pennsylvania. And Chancellor Kohl and I have just met with several distinguished Americans, who are standing behind us now, who have agreed to help in this effort. We'll be closely following their progress.

I'm sure that the commemoration of the deep and lasting friendship between our two countries will be a great success. And again, let me just say, it's been a great pleasure to welcome Chancellor Kohl here to our country again.

The Chancellor. Mr. President, I consider it to be a most happy coincidence that today, on my first visit to the United States as Federal Chancellor, President Reagan has announced the appointment of a special commission on the tricentennial of German-American relations. What we will be commemorating together next year is not merely the immigration of 13 families from the German city of Krefeld. We will also be celebrating an intensive and fruitful relationship of give and take between Germany and America extending over three centuries.

You, Mr. President, have spoken of the Germans who have helped to build this great and free country. America, your country, has repaid that contribution many times over. I call to mind the catalog of human rights and freedoms embodied in your Bill of Rights. It served as a model for the first attempt to set up a free and democratic constitution in Germany in 1848 [1948]. In our present constitution, the basic law used that same catalog of fundamental rights as the foundation for our constitutional and legal system.

I recall that in the dark years of Germany's history, hundreds of thousands of Germans found refuge in America. I will mention only Carl Schurz, Walter Gropius, and Thomas Mann, and Albert Einstein, who represent so many more.

Following two great wars in which Germans and Americans were adversaries, we Germans came to experience the greatest virtue of the Americans -- their generosity and their desire to help. In my remarks responding to your address of welcome, Mr. President, I referred to the fact that my generation remembers with gratitude the Hoover aid program and the CARE parcels, and without the Marshall plan, the speedy recovery of my country would not have been possible.

Today relations between our two countries are characterized by a wide variety of exchanges in the fields of culture, science, and research. Every German knows Ernest Hemingway, John Steinbeck, and Thornton Wilder. And young people in our country read Susan Sontag, to name only a few.

Mr. President, members of the Presidential commission, let us make the past an obligation for the future for ourselves and for the next generation of our children and their children. This is our responsibility in these days.

States and the Federal Republic of Germany are partners as well as friends, sharing common ideals, human and democratic values. In today's uncertain world, this commitment has become more important than ever. Our shared values form the unshakeable foundation for our joint efforts to maintain the freedom and prosperity of the Western world.

These challenges are as critical as those which faced the great statesmen who founded our partnership more than three decades ago. During the past thirty years the Atlantic partnership has been successful in guaranteeing to our peoples more freedom, security, and prosperity than at any time in history. The President and the Chancellor reaffirmed during their discussions their common view on the central role played by the Atlantic Alliance in the foreign policies of their respective governments.

A major reason for success of the Atlantic Alliance has been the close relationship which has developed between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany. German-American ties are deeper than simple calculations of national interest.

After World War II and after the destruction caused by it in Germany, these ties originated from the generous humanitarian aid and the political support which the United States granted to the German people and their young democracy. German-American relations are based on a close affection among our two peoples and are supported by intimate personal and familial ties between Americans and Germans. Ours is a relationship based on mutual support and open discussion between equal partners.

During the discussions it was agreed that high level consultations between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany will be continued during a visit to Bonn by Secretary of State Shultz in early December.

Chancellor anticipated with pleasure the joint celebration in 1983 of the Tricentennial of German immigration to the United States. President Reagan announced today the formation of a Presidential commission to help prepare American commemoration of this important event.

Chancellor Kohl described plans for celebrations in the Federal Republic of Germany. They stressed that the Tricentennial should be a joint celebration among the peoples of their two nations and reaffirmed the intention of President Reagan and President Carstens to meet in the United States in October, 1983, to highlight the American celebration.

U.S.-German contacts and to set up a multilateral youth exchange among Western industrialized democracies. The purpose is to pass on to the younger generations in our nations the sense of partnership which the older generation feels so deeply.

The President and the Chancellor reaffirmed the Alliance's overall concept for successfully safeguarding peace in Europe as embodied in the declaration made by the heads of state and government of the Atlantic Alliance in Bonn on June 10, 1982. As stressed in that declaration, they agreed that in accordance with current NATO defense plans, and within the context of NATO strategy and its triad of forces, they will continue to strengthen NATO's defense posture, with special regard to conventional forces.

The Alliance has demonstrated that it serves the cause of peace and freedom. Even in difficult situations, it has been able to do so because its members have acted in a spirit of solidarity. The Alliance does not threaten anyone. Nor does it aspire to superiority, but in the interests of peace it cannot accept inferiority either. Its aim is, as before, to prevent any war and safeguard peace and freedom. None of the weapons of the Alliance will ever be used except in response to attack.

The Chancellor paid tribute to the crucial contribution that the United States renders to the joint security of the Alliance through the indispensable presence of American troops in Europe. The President and the Chancellor agreed that a unilateral reduction of American troops would have a destabilizing effect and, at the same time, would undermine efforts for negotiated force reductions.

The President expressed his great appreciation for the significant and uninterrupted German contribution to the common defense. In particular, he paid tribute to the German-American agreement of April 15, 1982 on Wartime Host Nation Support, which entails considerable additional expenditure by the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States of America for common defense.

The President and the Chancellor stressed the need for close, comprehensive, and timely consultations to strengthen the Alliance's cohesion and its capacity to act. They attached particular importance to German-American cooperation. They hoped that informal meetings of the foreign ministers of the Alliance would be continued.

The President welcomed the resolve of the Government of the Federal Republic of Germany to strengthen European unification. The President and the Chancellor paid tribute to the important role of the European Community and all its member states for economic and political stability in Europe and the world. The development of a united Europe will strengthen cooperation between Europe and the United States and, hence, also reinforce the Alliance.

Federal Republic of Germany and the Three Powers in all matters relating to Berlin and Germany as a whole. They concurred in the view that the preservation of trouble-free conditions in and around Berlin was an essential element of East-West relations and of the international situation as a whole.

A major subject discussed during the meetings was relations with the Soviet Union. The values and goals of the Soviet Union do not correspond to our own. The USSR restricts freedom on its own territory and in countries under its influence, and has shown that it is ready to use force or the threat of force to achieve its foreign policy aims. Security of Western societies requires constant attention to the military threat posed by the USSR. The Federal Republic of Germany and the United States of America gear their policies in East-West relations to the concept of renunciation of force, human rights, and the right of nations to self determination.

The President and the Chancellor called upon the Soviet Union to comply with internationally recognized rules of conduct. This required respect for the principles enshrined in the Charter of the United Nations and in the Helsinki Final Act as well as a world-wide policy of moderation and restraint.

Soviet Union. They are ready to conduct relations with the new leadership in Moscow with the aim of extending areas of cooperation to their mutual benefit if Soviet conduct makes that possible. It is especially important at present for the West to approach the Soviet Union with a clear, steadfast and coherent attitude which combines the defense of its own interests with the readiness to pursue constructive relations, dialogue, and cooperation with the leadership of the Soviet Union.

In this regard, the President and the Chancellor greeted with satisfaction the recent agreement on measures leading to a broader consensus on East-West economic relations. They attached the greatest importance to a common approach to this issue. Close consultation and cooperation on East-West economic issues is as vital to Western interests as is the traditional cooperation on political and security questions.

It is the purpose of our common efforts that trade with the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe should be conducted on the basis of a balance of mutual advantages. While noting the important part which our economic relations with the Warsaw Pact countries can play in the development of a stable East-West relationship, the President and the Chancellor agreed that those relations should be approached in a prudent and diversified manner, consistent with our political and security interests.

The Chancellor expressed his appreciation for the lifting of the embargo on oil and gas technology and equipment, which he considered as evidence of successful efforts on the part of all concerned for improved coordination of Western policy in the economic field.

They drew attention once more to the Soviet Union's responsibility for the events in Poland. They called upon the Polish leadership to lift martial law in Poland, to release all detainees, to reverse the ban on the trade union Solidarity and, through serious dialogue with the Church and appointed workers' representatives, to seek national consensus which is the only way to lead Poland out of its present crisis, free from any external interference. They hoped that the release of Lech Walesa will promote these objectives. The President and the Chancellor welcomed the numerous initiatives for humanitarian aid for the Polish people. They agreed that this aid should be stepped up wherever possible.

Helsinki Final Act and advocated that it be continued. It is a long-term process which has been gravely affected by events in Poland. It can prove successful only if the participating countries observe the principles and provisions of the Final Act in their entirety. They expressed support for the new proposals, responsive to events in Poland and the USSR, put forward by the West in the resumed Madrid session, as reasonable and essential elements of a balanced outcome.

Madrid on November 9, 1982, should agree on a substantive and balanced final document which leads to progress in the important humanitarian field of East-West relations and contains a precise mandate for a Conference on Disarmament in Europe (CDE), envisaging militarily significant confidence and security building measures covering the whole of Europe, from the Atlantic to the Urals.

The President and the Chancellor noted that arms control and disarmament as well as defense and deterrence were integral parts of NATO's security policy. They agreed that significant progress towards reduction of the levels of nuclear and conventional forces through balanced and verifiable agreements would be an important contribution to the reduction of international tensions. The incessant unilateral increase in Soviet armaments in recent years has threatened the security of the Alliance and international stability and made even more urgent the need to establish a balance of forces between East and West. The goal of the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany remains to achieve a stable balance of both nuclear and conventional forces at the lowest possible level.

The President and the Chancellor recalled the comprehensive program of arms control proposals put forward by the United States on the basis of close consultation and adopted by the entire Alliance at the Bonn Summit on June 10, 1982. They stressed their common belief that this program provides the best hope for true reductions in arsenals of both intermediate and intercontinental strategic weapons. They rejected the proposals to freeze existing levels of nuclear weapons, or for one-sided reductions by the West, as inadequate for substantive arms control and as harmful to the security of the Atlantic Alliance. They noted also that the Soviet Union had in recent years refused to reciprocate the unilateral restraint in this field by the United States. They expressed the strong judgment that true reductions in nuclear armaments would be possible only when the Soviet Union is convinced of the determination of the West to maintain its defenses at the level necessary to meet the threat posed by massive increases in Soviet nuclear forces.

In this connection they attached particular importance to negotiations on reductions of strategic arms and of intermediate range nuclear forces now underway between the United States and the Soviet Union in Geneva. President Reagan reaffirmed his determination to do his utmost to achieve true reductions in nuclear armaments through balanced and verifiable agreements. The President and the Chancellor pointed out that negotiations in Geneva are serious and substantial.

In conformity with their policy for actively safeguarding peace through firmness and negotiation, the President and the Chancellor reaffirmed their commitment to both parts of the NATO dual-track decision of December 12, 1979, consisting of a program of INF modernization and an offer to the Soviet Union of arms control negotiations on INF. An important aspect of Western security policy remains the common determination to deploy modernized longer-range INF missiles in Europe beginning at the end of 1983 if negotiations on this subject now underway in Geneva do not result in a concrete agreement making deployment unnecessary. The President and the Chancellor noted that the decision to deploy the systems in Europe was based on a unanimous finding by members of the Atlantic Alliance that increases in Soviet weapons, in particular introduction of SS - 20 missiles, had endangered the security of Western Europe and thus of the entire Alliance. They stressed that the complete elimination of Soviet and United States land-based, longer-range INF missiles, as proposed by the United States, would be an equitable and fair result and would be a substantial contribution to serious arms control. They called upon the Soviet Union to negotiate seriously toward this end. The Chancellor restated his full confidence in the American negotiating effort in Geneva and welcomed the close and continuous process of consultations within the Alliance.

President Reagan described the ideas behind his Berlin initiative of June 10, 1982 for an agreement between the United States and the Soviet Union on measures to help avoid the danger that accident or miscalculation could lead to a nuclear exchange between East and West. He stated that the United States was preparing proposals for nuclear confidence building measures which would be presented by American representatives at the Geneva negotiations. The Chancellor and the President expressed their hope that the Soviet Union would join with the United States in progressing rapidly to an agreement on such measures. They also remain commited to halting the spread of nuclear weapons through the pursuit of vigorous non-proliferation policies.

The President and the Chancellor underscored their undiminished interest in substantial reduction in conventional forces in central Europe. They recalled the new draft treaty which the Western participants had presented at the Vienna negotiations on mutual and balanced force reductions.

This proposal provides an excellent foundation for a balanced agreement on reduction of conventional forces in Europe. The President and the Chancellor called upon Warsaw Pact participants to react positively.

The President and the Chancellor were in complete agreement on the requirement for special attention to Alliance needs on the Southern Flank. They emphasized in this connection their resolve to support the Turkish Government in its efforts to lead Turkey back to democracy.

The President and the Chancellor expressed confidence that our free societies would overcome the current difficult economic situation. They attached paramount importance to restoring the conditions for sustained growth through higher investments, in order to reduce unemployment and to maintain price stability.

The economic policies of industrial nations must be closely coordinated. Each country must bear in mind the effects that its political and economic measures will have on other countries. These factors will also have an important effect on the Economic Summit to be held in Williamsburg at the invitation of the United States. Both sides reaffirmed the importance of conducting the discussions at this summit on the basis of openness, trust, and informality.

The President and the Chancellor discussed the dangers posed by rising protectionism to world trade and the economic well being of nations. They reaffirmed their commitment to the multilateral trading system, looking forward to a successful GATT Ministerial meeting in Geneva this month.

The President and the Chancellor agreed that it is imperative to respect and promote the independence of the countries of the Third World and that genuine nonalignment is an important element of stability and world peace. The President and the Chancellor reaffirmed their readiness to continue to cooperate with Third World countries on the basis of equal partnership.

President and the Chancellor deplored the fact that the Soviet Union continued to defy international opinion and ignored United Nations resolutions calling for the withdrawal of foreign troops from Afghanistan, as well as the right to self-determination for Afghanistan and restoration of its non-aligned status. Afghanistan remains an acid test of Soviet readiness to respect the independence, autonomy, and genuine non-alignment of Third World countries and to exercise restraint in its international behavior.

The Chancellor welcomed President Reagan's proposal of September 1, 1982 as a realistic attempt to promote the peace process in the Middle East. They agreed that negotiations between Israel and its neighbors in the framework of UN resolutions 242 and 338 offer the best opportunity for peaceful resolution of disputes in that area. The United States and the Federal Republic of Germany, together with its partners in European Political Cooperation, will, as before, seek to ensure that the American and European efforts for a comprehensive, just, and lasting peace in the Middle East, on the basis of existing achievements, are complementary to each other. They called for early withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon. They continued to urge that the sovereignty and unity of Lebanon be restored and expressed their support for the reconstruction of Lebanon.

In recent years, home health care has rapidly gained acceptance as an important and successful element of high quality care. Many Americans have found that caring for the needs of our sick at home or in a community setting is not only as effective as in an institution, but that it is less costly and often more desirable for the patient. Communities, together with States and the Federal government, have begun building integrated networks to provide care for the elderly and disabled in homes and in the community.

Federal expenditures on Medicare and Medicaid, two of government's largest programs serving the elderly, poor, and disabled, are expected to exceed $75 billion in 1983, about two out of every ten dollars spent on health care in this nation. Over the past fourteen years, the number of home health agencies participating in Medicare has increased by two-thirds, and there are now more than 4,000 certified providers of home care. My Administration has initiated reforms and expansions of home health care benefits provided under Medicare to complement this work.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Well, on behalf of my wife and on behalf of the delegation accompanying me on this trip, I would like to express to you, Mr. President, and to you, Mrs. Reagan, my very warm thanks for this warmhearted, for this friendly, and for this very kind reception you have given us here in the White House. There are receptions of this kind or that kind -- [laughter] -- and the President of the United States of America has to give a good many receptions. This is part of this job.

It was extremely elegant. I had an oversized coat, but it wasn't necessary, because I was not as broad and wide as today. [Laughter] Today I need a tailor and the assistance of a tailor to cover the reality and the facts of life. And I assume that this suit, which was given to me by the Quakers, used to belong to a farmer who voted Republican. [Laughter] Well, I had that suit for a very long time.

I'm telling this story, not because of the joke in it, because this was a very fundamental experience in my life. We, the Germans, at that time were outlaws. Nobody would have taken a piece of bread from young couples. At that time we even didn't have a piece of bread.

And who helped us at that time? Morally, it was Pope Pius XII and the Americans. And I have never forgotten it, nor have millions of my fellow countrymen ever forgotten that. Of course, we have to discuss politics, tough issues -- arms buildup, modernization, steel -- all very important issues in themselves. But it's only part of life. What we received in the way of help, assistance, friendship -- and this goes far beyond the other concrete issues.

The President announced today the creation of Presidential Emergency Board No. 199 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a current dispute between the Long Island Rail Road (LIRR) and employees represented by 14 labor organizations.

Stainless Steel Industry Committee and the United Steelworkers of America. Petitioners principally allege that the EC and the above-mentioned countries have subsidized the production of specialty steel in a manner inconsistent with their obligations under Articles 8 and 11 of the Subsidies Code.

Petitioners' allegations are well founded. The United States believes that subsidies have been provided by the Government of Austria in the form of grants and capitalization, by the Government of Sweden in the form of preferential loans, loan guarantees and grants, and by the European Communities and its member governments in the form of preferential loans, loan guarantees, capital grants, ``recapitalization'' of financial losses, interest rebate programs, exemptions from taxation, and other practices.

The injury to the domestic industry is clear. The specialty steel industry is an efficient, technologically up-to-date and export-oriented branch of the steel industry. Its output is used in a wide range of demanding applications critical to an industrial economy and thus commands a price far higher than ordinary steel. Regarded as an advanced, innovative and competitive industry, specialty steel producers in the United States have tended to be more profitable than the industry as a whole and far more so than most of their major competitors abroad. Nevertheless, the industry is facing an unprecedented challenge to its continued prosperity, and a number of its member firms are fighting for survival.

Part of the problem can be traced to the recession that began in America's basic industries more than two years ago. However, it is clear that since the lifting of import quotas in February 1980, imports have steadily captured a larger share of the U.S. market, further depressing operating rates, employment, prices and revenues. Through the first eight months of 1982, imports were at historically high levels, with import penetration ratios ranging from 11 to more than 50 percent, depending on the product. In every product category, imports now exceed the surge levels established by the Department of Commerce.

Section 301, the countervailing duty statute, or the antidumping duty statute. However, they do not cover all important, or potentially important, sources of specialty steel imports. A partial remedy against unfair imports can be rendered meaningless by a substitution of new foreign suppliers for those whose shipments are affected. Thus, the specific subsidy complaints could lead to a remedy that fails to resolve the overall import problem. Moreover, dealing with the specific subsidy problem itself probably would not have a great impact on the world steel trading environment in which our industry must compete. Subsidies are only one of a wide range of trade restrictive and trade distortive practices that many of our trading partners engage in to protect their industries and to stimulate exports. If we are ever to put an end to constant trade disputes in steel, we must stop dealing with discrete import and export issues in isolation and instead begin a coordinated approach to the problem. By combining the Section 201 and Section 301 approaches, the United States hopes to stabilize the immediate import situation and to reverse the global trend toward greater excess capacity, increased subsidization, and closed markets.

It's a great pleasure to be back in this beautiful Bayou country. Today brings me a very special honor, too. I understand that I'm the first sitting President to ever address the U.S. League of Savings Associations. Well, that makes me happy, because when one thinks of the people who live by the values and traditions that made America great -- faith in God, love of family and freedom, service to community and country -- the leaders of your industry come immediately to mind.

Thomas Sidebotham's Tavern in Frankford, Pennsylvania. Their aim was to form a club to pool their savings to finance their homes. The Oxford Provident Building Association offered its first mortgage in April of 1831 to a local lamplighter named Comly Rich. And he used $375 to buy a home, which still stands today on Orchard Street in Frankford. And from that idea has grown the $625 billion savings and loan business, devoted to the business of savings and homeownership.

You know, thinking about what your group has been through reminds me of the story of the three gentlemen who had departed this Earth and were standing at the gates of heaven waiting for admittance. One was a surgeon, the other one an engineer, the third one an economist. They'd all been good, upright people, but it developed that there was only room inside for one. So St. Peter said, ``I'll tell you what, I'll pick the one who comes from the oldest profession.'' The surgeon stepped right up, and he said, ``Well, I'm your man. Right after God created Adam, he operated.

Well, chaos is what your industry faced in 1980 -- a situation that was created by people with noble intentions but without a solid grip on how the real world works. Housing, the bedrock industry that provides your daily bread, had been brought to its knees. For millions of Americans, the dream of homeownership was shattered by soaring costs, record interest rates, and economic mismanagement. Between 1977 and 1980 -- in those 3 years -- the average monthly payment for a mortgage loan nearly doubled.

Now, those policies of big spending and big taxing left a trail of disappointment and broken promises. With the economy going haywire, the thrift industry was trapped in the vise of an earnings squeeze and over-regulation. Others capitalized on the financial revolution of money market funds, but there was no light at the end of your industry's tunnel, no way to make a new niche in the market and compete for the saver's money.

Well, I've said before, we didn't go to Washington with more snake-oil remedies for quick fixes, and we don't suffer from paralysis by analysis. [Laughter] We're determined to make America well again. We intend to rebuild this country, not from the government down, but from the people up.

The goal of our administration has been, and will remain, to restore to families, communities, and places of work their rightful positions of honor, strength, and leadership so, together, we can lift America to new progress and opportunity for all her citizens. The means of reaching that goal have been, and will remain, to liberate individuals, deregulate markets, and place limits on the size and authority of the Federal Government. No longer must government be allowed to ride roughshod, absorbing the people's wealth, usurping their rights, and crushing their spirit.

This is why the health of your savings and loans, the community builders of America, is so important to our future. So, yes, we designed a program to attack our economic disease at its roots. And I know this comes as a shock to some, after what you've heard the last few months, but our program is beginning to do exactly what it was intended to do.

In 1980 the growth of Government spending was zooming at 17-percent annual rate. That was a blueprint for bankruptcy, the end of our American way of life. We cut spending growth by nearly two-thirds. And today, America no longer suffers from double-digit inflation. Inflation has been beaten all the way down, here in this 11th month, to 4.8 percent so far this year. And I'll let you in on a little secret: We're not finished yet; 1982 could go down as our best victory against price increases in the last 10 years.

We pledged to provide new, strong incentives for Americans to invest in their future, to save again, to put their money in institutions like yours that supply the mortgage loans families so badly need. So, we expanded the limits on IRA accounts and Keogh plans; we cut the top rate of tax on interest and dividend income; we're reducing everyone's personal tax rate by 25 percent; we're aggressively pursuing deregulation of financial markets; and we're encouraging business savings by permitting more rapid depreciation of plant and equipment.

I'm pleased to report to you that an old-fashioned American value -- thrift -- is making a strong comeback. Personal savings, the lifeblood of your industry, have not only reversed their decline but reached their highest level in 6 years. Seventeen percent of all American households opened up IRA accounts in the first part of 1982. With your help, we'll see another big surge in the remainder of this year and in 1983.

This greater pool of savings helped fuel the historic rise in the stock and bond markets, which means more investment for jobs. So, here's the clincher: This nation's nest egg is beginning to grow again. For the first time in nearly 20 years, hard-working families can keep more of their income that they work so hard to earn. I happen to believe that's an important part of what justice and compassion are all about.

Now, I hope that I'll be pardoned for pointing out that the conventional commitment rates for long-term home mortgages peaked at nearly 19 percent in September of '81 -- that was the month before our program began. By last week, the nationwide average had fallen to 13 percent. And I want you to know that we're determined to bring those rates down further.

These are all reasons for hope. But we're also trying to go to the root of the special problems making life so difficult for your industry. Early on, we appointed a Presidential Commission on Housing, headed by Bill McKenna, to come up with responsible policy recommendations. And I realize I'm not impartial on this, but I just have to believe that Richard Pratt is the best darn Chairman the Federal Home Loan Bank Board has ever had. After many years of struggle, your industry now has greater flexibility in the instruments it can use to raise funds and a greater variety of opportunities for investing those funds, including the variable rate mortgage. So, now you can compete on a more level playing field.

Now, we're not promising a panacea. We're just saying, as Winston Churchill did, we'll give you the tools and you'll get the job done. This historic legislation can increase competition. It can open up a supermarket of services for small savers, grant them greater access to loans, a higher return on their savings. And, when combined with recent sharp declines in interest rates, it'll mean more housing, more growth, more jobs. It can mean we hit the jackpot. We think the next Congress can go even further with financial deregulation.

We still have a long way to go before we make things right again. Far too many people are still hurting. But we believe the turnaround in your industry signals a turnaround in the rest of the economy, and that's mighty good news for America. So, the question now is, where do we go from here?

We cannot permit the Congress to take away the third year of the people's tax cut or the indexing provision, and we're not going to allow them to do that. This would mean a net tax increase of about $3,000 over the next 5 years for a typical working family. It would compromise incentives to save, just now beginning to pay off. And it would send up the white flag of surrender to big spenders. Reducing deficits on paper by raising taxes on people invariably leads to more red ink, not less.

Above all, we intend to wage a full-court press for economic truth. What this economy needs to grow stronger, to become more productive and competitive, to create new jobs, and to ensure higher real wages and incomes for our people is the power of investment. Savings finance investment, and investment creates growth. Tragically, our rate of savings and net investment in America during the last decade has been pitifully weak -- less than half that of our principal competitors in Europe and Japan. A little more than a year ago we passed our program of tax incentives to begin correcting the investment gap. It represents a mere downpayment on what needs to be done. We don't need fewer incentives to save and invest; we need more incentives.

And let's quit kidding ourselves: We will not solve the problems of unemployed auto-workers and steelworkers with another giant, temporary public works program financed by depleting still more of the Nation's precious seed corn. Over a 7-year period ending in 1981, government spent $66 billion on so-called job programs, and during those 7 years, unemployment increased and the economy worsened. What the unemployed need most is a broad-based economic recovery. We must seek out and develop new markets around the world, make our goods more competitive, accelerate job training, and give greater incentives to the pioneers creating products, technologies, and jobs for our future.

Repairing America's infrastructure is important; indeed, it's necessary. And I'm considering an initiative for that. But our highest priority is to restore America's industrial power to get America back on the cutting edge of growth through greater investment.

The investment challenge is America's challenge for the eighties. For the sake of every citizen who wants and needs a job, I ask the Congress to work with us on initiatives that will move America forward, not backward. The American people weren't put on this Earth to become managers of decline.

Now, deficits are a great threat, because government borrowing eats up savings that should be financing investment. When I arrived in Washington, we faced a trillion-dollar debt. This year Uncle Sam must borrow $110 billion just to pay the interest. And we face large projected budget deficits in the future.

A propaganda campaign would have you believe that these deficits are caused by our so-called massive tax cut and defense buildup. Well, that's a real dipsy-doodle -- [laughter] -- because even after our tax reductions are fully in place, they will barely neutralize the enormous payroll tax increases that were approved in 1977. One installment of that increase went into effect last January, and there will be a tax increase on some or all of the people every year from now on, between now and 1990, either by raising the amount of pay that is taxed for social security or by raising the actual tax rate.

During the next 5 years our planned defense increase will come to less than 2 percent of the gross national product, or $70 billion at the 1982 level of gross national product. As a matter of fact, defense spending as a share of gross national product will be below the level that it was in 1960, which was before our Vietnam buildup and, more importantly, before the unprecedented Soviet buildup. Defense spending is 30 percent or less of our total budget. It used to run regularly around half of the Federal budget.

There's simply no escaping the truth: Current and projected deficits result from sharp increases in nondefense spending. If the United States is to meet its investment challenge, we must get the growth of nondefense spending under control once and for all.

In the past 2 weeks, I've been conducting an intensive review of our economic and budgetary situation. Difficult choices lie ahead. They'll require political courage. No one ever said that democracy was easy. But we do know that democracy works if we make it work. So once again, we're asking for your help. We need your support at the grassroots as we put together a program to reduce projected deficits. It must be a balanced program that brings deficits down without violating our goals of reducing the burden of taxation, protecting the needy, and moving forward with our program to rebuild America's badly neglected defenses. I believe we can do this. And I know the American people will respond to reason and leadership.

Well, I travel a little bit. I receive a letter or two. And let me tell you, the spirit of America is good. Her heart is strong and true. Never has the world known a more generous and industrial people. Maybe we don't always see them on the news, but ours is a land of quiet, unsung heroes.

I told you that I get a letter or two. The other day, there were a group of young people, teenagers, at the White House. They were from all over the United States, from your towns, your States. They were young volunteers who have engaged in volunteer, kindly deeds and charitable work in their communities. And they gave me, leather-bound, a book of handwritten letters that each one of them had written about what this meant. And just one incident from one, a little girl who the -- you know that very Special Olympics for the children who are retarded. It's going to be held here, I believe, very shortly, the world Olympics.

But this little girl was to help out with just one of the more local Olympics, and it was raining cats and dogs. And her chore was to be out on the softball-throwing contest, returning the balls in the rain. And she was pretty depressed, and she was cold, and she wondered what she was doing there. And then she saw a little boy, one of the participants, one of those handicapped children, and he looked cold and wet and as if he was wondering what he was doing out there in the rain.

Following his remarks, the President was presented with a medal with a portrait on the front side of Isaac Shallcross, the first secretary of the first savings and loan association when it was founded in 1831. The special medal was struck in commemoration of the President's address before the convention.

Wright made man's first successful flight in a mechanically propelled flying machine. Although this first successful flight lasted only 12 seconds and covered a distance of only 120 feet, the Wright brothers' historic feat opened the door to the age of aviation.

Today aviation is a key element in American life. It has grown to become one of America's greatest enterprises for jobs and services as well as for national defense. America's air transportation system is the finest in the world and a prime public carrier in the United States.

Although the Wright brothers undertook the first flight long ago, the adventurous spirit exhibited by them continues to inspire the Nation's progress in space and aeronautics. Last year, the United States Space Shuttle Columbia made its first space flight. This year, the fourth and final orbital test flight phase of the Space Shuttle program was successfully completed. Completion of this program now opens a new door to the exploration of space and reflects another outstanding contribution to American aviation. This year also marked the Nation's first successful private launch of a space vehicle, giving rise to expectations of a new era of direct private sector involvement in space ventures.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

I thank you all very much, and, Admiral Gracey, I wonder if you and those assembled here can understand just exactly the mixed emotions that I'm feeling right now, having been a horse cavalryman. It seems a long ways away from home. But it is wonderful to be here today for the men and women of the United States Coast Guard, our nation's oldest continuous sea-going service.

Throughout its long and remarkable history, the Coast Guard has adapted itself to many critically important missions. In times of peace, the Coast Guard is responsible for law enforcement, navigation and marine safety, search and rescue operations, and oceanographic research. And during the war, all wars, the Coast Guard has served valiantly.

Some of you may not be old enough to remember, but I recall during the great South Pacific invasions of World War II, it was Coast Guardsmen who drove the landing craft on some of the most perilous assignments of that conflict.

The contribution those of you here have made in south Florida is further evidence of the strength and flexibility of your service. The work you do every day is not easy or safe. The work that you've undertaken on behalf of the South Florida Task Force adds even more hardship and danger. And, believe me, each one of you is helping to write another glorious page in the history of the Coast Guard. Each one of you is making a personal contribution to your country far beyond the call of duty.

I hope all of you here know the tremendous difference your efforts are making not only in the lives of the people of Florida but throughout America. In the short time that it's been in operation, the South Florida Task Force has brought about a 27-percent increase in drug-related arrests and confiscated over $3 billion worth of illegal drugs. Without your efforts, these drugs would have been on the marketplace providing profits for organized crime, fueling the drug culture that has done so much damage to so many lives in our society.

I'm pleased to be able to say that our drug enforcement and search and rescue capability will be further enhanced by the commissioning of two new ships in Key West today. Prompted by the fine example set by all of you working here in the South Florida Task Force, we're also establishing 12 more task forces throughout America to expand the fight against organized crime, especially the illegal drug trade. This will mean substantial new resources devoted to combating the drug and crime menace, and it's due in no small part to your dedication and sacrifice.

And I want to take a moment to recognize your outstanding record of readiness and devotion to duty by presenting the Dauntless with a Coast Guard Unit Commendation. I would like to congratulate the entire crew on this occasion and ask Commander Newhoff to accept the medal symbolic of that citation.

I've come here today not only to thank you as your Commander in Chief for the work that you've done here in Florida but also to thank you for your service to America in the Coast Guard. One of the most fulfilling moments of any President's life is an opportunity to speak to the men and women who, like yourselves, wear the uniform of our country. You make many sacrifices and endure many hardships for the sake of your belief in our country and the values for which it stands. I want you and your families to know that the American people are grateful to you, and they're proud of you.

Thank you very much, Mr. Chapman. I'm delighted to be here in the prosperous and lovely State of Florida. And I'm especially delighted to meet with those of you who are doing so much to keep it that way.

Here at Homestead Air Force Base, we see visible evidence of the Federal commitment to the war on criminal drug smuggling in south Florida. Under the leadership of Vice President George Bush, as you've just heard, with the help of his Chief of Staff, Admiral Dan Murphy and the Task Force Director, Charles Rinkevich, the Federal Government has also brought in additional prosecutors and judges, extra courtrooms and hundreds of new investigators. But most important, for the first time, we have brought together the resources of the many agencies of the Federal Government.

As I was briefly -- knowing that you were waiting -- looking at that exhibit over there, those emblems are the emblems of the various agencies and departments that are all united in this particular program -- from Customs to the Drug Enforcement Agency [Administration] to the FBI and to many others, all to assist you in a coordinated and concentrated attack on the powerful, highly organized criminal rings that deal in illegal drug trade.

We've also mobilized the Navy, the Army, and the Coast Guard resources to assist in the interdiction of these drugs. And we appreciate the assistance we've received from Caribbean nations, especially the Bahamas. They've made a significant contribution, and we look forward to their continued cooperation in this effort.

Drug seizures are up about 50 percent in the area that's covered by the Task Force. The amount of marijuana seized has increased by 35 percent, the amount of cocaine by 56 percent. And the street value of all these drugs is estimated at more than an incredible $3 billion.

The Task Force shows what can be achieved when local, State, and Federal authorities cooperate closely. The South Florida Task Force is a brilliant example of working federalism, an illustration of how the genius of our political system, created more than 200 years ago, can still be harnessed to serve the interests of the people and to attack the social problems that confront them.

Force. I don't have to tell you how bad conditions were only a year ago. I don't have to remind you of the growth in crime, the increase in violence, and the gang killings. The citizens of Florida, of Dade County, and of Miami took upon themselves the duty of combating crime and the drug menace. They made this fight their fight. They brought it into their homes and schools and churches and community organizations.

The tour that we've just taken over here, the exhibits we've seen, and the dedicated men and women that we've met are a tribute to your efforts and to the willingness of so many of you to take time out of busy lives and do something extraordinary for your community and your country.

You demanded action from the elected officials at all levels. You saw those demands met, not only at the Federal level but by local and State authorities who agreed to spend millions more for policemen, prosecutors, judges, and prisons. Through the wide range of self-help measures, you mobilized all the resources of home, neighborhood, and community for the battle against drug smugglers and their criminal associates. And in doing all this, you tapped the real strength of our political system -- the spirit, energy, and will of everyday people who, acting through their private social institutions as well as their political system, achieved far more than any government planner or bureaucratic dreamer could ever hope to achieve.

Now, this is not to say the battle is won. The influx of drugs into south Florida and other areas of the Nation is still a serious problem. Much of the work against this menace lies ahead of us. But the measure of your initial success here is not just found in the statistics that I cited. The measure of that success is also found in what we at the Federal level, inspired by your example and your leadership, are now setting out to do.

A month ago in Washington, I was pleased to announce a sweeping, nationwide anticrime initiative developed by Attorney General William French Smith, based largely on the example that was set by you who are responsible for the South Florida Task Force. This initiative will establish 12 new regional task forces which, like yours, bring together all our resources to combat the major drug traffic and the crime problems in those areas. It'll bring a thousand new investigators to the fight against illegal drugs and other forms of organized crime. It will also increase the ranks of Federal prosecutors by 200, a significant increase over the current strength of organized crime's strike forces.

Incidentally, let me just give you an example. Sometimes, hearing that term ``the exclusionary rule'' -- this is a rule -- it isn't a law; it's case law. It was a judicial decision once made that now has evidence thrown out of court if they feel there was some technical violation in the way that the evidence was obtained. And I'll give you a classical example of how foolish we can be in our adherence to technicalities.

In my own State of California a few years ago, two narcotics agents had enough evidence to get a search warrant for a home where they believed the man and woman, the husband and wife there, were engaged in the narcotics trade. They came in with their warrant. They searched this house, found nothing. And as they were leaving, on a hunch, one of them turned back to the baby in the crib and looked in his diapers and there was the heroin -- the evidence thrown out of court because the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched. And the two -- the couple went free.

Now, there are those, of course, who say the program is too ambitious and who point to failed efforts in the past and predict our certain failure in the future. No government can ever fully eliminate crime or the human impulses that lead to it. But your South Florida Task Force proves that we have the will and the resources to break up organized crime -- syndicates that, for too long, have been a terrible blot on our nation's history.

America and nothing short of it. We mean to end their profits, imprison their members, and cripple their organizations. And if anyone doubts what Federal, State, and local authorities, working with the support of the people, can achieve, let them come to south Florida, to Dade County, and to Miami, and to see here what we've seen today: aroused citizens and responsive officials who mean to make their county, their State, their cities a place where decent, law-abiding people can live without being victimized by career criminals and professional wrongdoers.

Rudy Giuliani reports that doing something about our lax bail and parole system and criminal forfeiture laws is constantly mentioned as effective crime-fighting reforms. I wonder how many of you know that we have already proposed to the Congress reforms in these areas that would make life much tougher for the professional criminal. I wonder how many of you know that parole reform passed the Senate by a vote of 95 to 1, that bail reform passed the Senate by a vote of 95 to 1, and that strengthened criminal forfeiture laws passed the Senate by a vote of 95 to 1. And I wonder how many of you know that in the House of Representatives our crime package has remained bottled up in committee.

The Congress owes it to the American people to act on these proposals and on the rest of our anticrime agenda. Today I ask for your support and the support of the American people in urging the Congress to take immediate action on this program.

I know that support will be forthcoming. What you've done here in south Florida is one example of how seriously the American people take the issue of crime and the extent to which they're willing to go to do something about it. I'm especially pleased that Senator Paula Hawkins could be with us here today. She's one of the 95.

Now, what you've done here is an inspiration to those of us in Washington and to all of your countrymen. And today on their behalf I want to thank you, promise you our continued support for your efforts to make America's homes and neighborhoods safe again. We're going to get the job done between all of us.

Prior to his remarks, the President viewed an exhibit of drugs and other contraband seized during operations of the South Florida Task Force, as well as equipment used in the seizures. The exhibit was mounted in Hangar 741.

The President today announced his intention to nominate David L. Slate to be General Counsel of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission for a term of 4 years. He would succeed Michael Joseph Connolly.

No member shall be entitled, however, to receive the pay provided for in this subsection if, during any month or portion thereof, he is also eligible to receive incentive pay for other hazardous duty under the provisions of Section 301 of Title 37, United States Code.

Well, that's great news, because I know there's one concern all of us share. While we've made solid progress against the disease that crippled our economy -- the runaway inflation, taxes, and interest rates -- unemployment remains far too high. It is unacceptable. Our administration's most urgent priority is to see that we have enough jobs for all the people who want to work. We need the strength of every back and the power of every mind if we're to lift our country up again to greatness.

As lower inflation and interest rates began sparking a rebound in bedrock industries, something that's now begun in housing, we will see the job market expanding again. Recovery will come gradually, because we're determined not to repeat the quick-fix mistakes of the past. Our administration intends to build a new kind of recovery, a recovery that will last. But as our program takes hold, we can take action to bring unemployment down faster without igniting the bonfires of high inflation and interest rates.

We can take action to lower structural unemployment and to promote more savings and investment -- the keys to stronger growth, more jobs, and a higher standard of living. These initiatives can be taken at the national level, but their success depends on your leadership and support at the grassroots.

When we talk about structural unemployment, we mean the kind of unemployment that is not always cured by a general economic recovery. Our goal is a full-employment economy. So, we must design policies to solve structural unemployment.

For example, 40 percent of the unemployed in America are less than 25 years old, and almost one-half of that group are teenagers. They are unemployed because our labor market is not matching people with jobs. We must find ways to strengthen their skills and to provide new opportunities for prospective workers of all ages as America works to get the investment -- or to meet the investment challenge, I should say, of the eighties.

Now, one such initiative, the Job Training Partnership Act, is the subject of this meeting today. I believe this program looks to the future rather than the past. When I signed the legislation last month, I pledged it would not be another bureaucratic boondoggle but would provide help and bring hope. Our aim is training for up to a million unemployed Americans each year in skills they can use in the private sector.

Private employers will work with Governors and locally elected officials to ensure a proper balance of activity within the States. With your leadership, the States can plan and carry out a training program that spends our resources the way they should be spent -- on training our people. Too often in the past, the bulk of funds set aside for Government job-training programs has been used to pay bureaucrats, not to help the needy. By embarking [earmarking] at least 70 cents of every program dollar for job training, we can eliminate the bureaucratic waste of the past.

No one knows better than private employers the skills today's employees need or how to train them for the sunrise industries that will pioneer products and technologies for tomorrow. Never have we had a greater need for job training in America. So, I'm making an appeal: Please do what you do best -- be leaders and help us make this program work.

The Job Training Partnership Act provides you with the opportunity to work locally to explore targeted policies to reduce high youth unemployment. This can include working on ways to improve the transition from school to work, to help those who do not go on to college but who often lack the requisite skills to handle available jobs. Here again, the answer is better training.

Company Act, which I know the U.S. Chamber strongly supports. This legislation will increase exports and create trade-related jobs by encouraging formation of trading companies. The idea is already being used against us by our principal competitors. With your help, we'll even up those odds. We'll win back America's reputation as the great Yankee trader.

Our administration will also push in the lameduck session for passage of our enterprise zones initiative. This bill can revive the most impoverished areas of America, provide new incentives to develop business and create jobs. In a time of high unemployment, there is no excuse for further delay on enterprise zones. We must not slam shut the doors of opportunity on those who look to us for help.

But they would help us lower structural unemployment. Still, let's remember the other solution we need, the long-term cure that will make America more competitive, more productive, better equipped to provide good jobs and a higher standard of living for our people. That's the power of investment. Savings finance investment and investment creates growth. But during the last decade in America, we saved and invested at less than half the rate of our major competitors. The investment challenge is America's challenge for the eighties.

Our program of tax incentives has begun to correct the savings and investment gap. But the program represents a mere down-payment on what needs to be done. America can and must do better. So, let me make something plain: We don't need fewer incentives for people and more spending by government; we need less spending by government and more opportunity for the American people. And that's the direction I intend to go.

Practically all the talk in Washington is about what government will do to the taxpayers. Well, it's time we got back to a dialog about what government can do for the taxpayers. We cannot create jobs and reduce projected deficits on the backs of hard-working American families. We must have an agenda of incentives for growth. Growth is the answer for America.

You know, the spirit of the American Revolution was born in an idea that remains true for all time. If freedom and opportunity are to flourish, limits must be placed on the size and authority of government. But no limit must be placed on the ability of any man or woman to reach for the stars, to go as far as their God-given talents will take them.

We came to Washington to revive the spirit of the American Revolution. Some are saying our work is already done. Well, I would answer, ``We have barely begun.'' With your help, we will put the age of inflation behind us and bring a new age of opportunity and progress to America's doorstep.

I was talking about structural unemployment, I think you should know that in the last couple of years, just 2 years, 3 million of those 11 million unemployed were newcomers into the job market, and there were no jobs available for them. But take a look on any given Sunday to a metropolitan newspaper. I've been doing it here with the Washington papers. I've been doing it with my hometown paper, the Los Angeles Times. And just a couple of weeks ago, the Washington paper had 34 full pages of help wanted ads, and the Los Angeles paper had 52 such pages. This is true in most metropolitan areas on any given Sunday.

Now, these are employers advertising for employees. And the reason those jobs are open is because there aren't people with the training or experience to fill those jobs. This is why our program is aimed at being implemented at the local level with your help, with business people out there and local officials aiming the jobs or the job training at the jobs that are open in those communities.

Mr. President, the Job Training Partnership Act calls for a much greater involvement of the private sector in employment programs. Do you believe that the private sector will step up to this challenge?

The President. Yes, I do, because, as a matter of fact, over a period of time, the private sector has been spending about $30 billion on job training, on-the-job training, as well as other programs of that kind. I know that a number of communities across the country, the private sector has -- and with, we think, some encouragement from our private initiative sector -- has started such programs themselves. And what we want to do is simply help.

We want to spread the word about successful programs to other communities. And I am convinced that from what I've seen so far the private sector out there is just simply waiting for someone to point a finger in a direction that they can go to further improve things.

Mr. Clay. Good morning, Mr. President. This act has been called a first step in the new federalism, because it gives Governors substantially greater authority. Based on your experience as Governor of California, do you believe States are prepared for this increased responsibility?

Federal programs that were sent to us came so encumbered with redtape and specific declarations of how we had to implement those programs that we found there was an ignoring on the part of the Federal Government of what our priorities might be. This is a great, diverse country, and we found that if we had had more say in directing that Federal aid, we not only could have saved money, we could have been more efficient, more effective.

I have talked to a mayor not too long ago who was telling about a Federal program that had to do with the handicapped and the buses in his city. And he said the program that was dictated to him by the Federal Government was so expensive that for less money than that, with regard to what he had to do with his buses, he could have afforded to send every handicapped person any place they wanted to go in taxicabs.

Yes, we have tried over the years. When I say ``we,'' let me change that. The Federal Government over the years, in the past, has tried to reduce the States to mere administrative districts of the Federal Government. But we're a federation of sovereign States, and I am fully confident that at the local and the State level they are better equipped to know what their priorities are and how best to approach them, and that's why we have been changing as rapidly as we can persuade Congress to do it -- specific grants from the Federal Government to block grants, giving the States that leeway.

Mr. President, this law provides for training unemployed people. The enterprise zone plan calls for developing jobs in areas where unemployment is highest. Do you expect the enterprise zone legislation to pass the new Congress?

The President. Yes, but I could use all your help, Cissy -- all of you there -- to let the Congress know. This has been a long time now, about a year, before the Congress, and it needs to be acted upon. As a matter of fact -- and this partly answers the previous question also -- the Governor of Louisiana has stoppped waiting for the Federal Government and at the State level has instituted an enterprise zone act or program down there that's working just fine.

And this program is one that there is no cost. There are tax incentives involved for both individuals and for business, businesses that will come into those enterprise zones. But those tax incentives aren't costing anything either, because right now we're not getting tax from those zones. The local government isn't getting property tax, because most of the property there has been taken over by the government for nonpayment of taxes. It's been abandoned. The individuals are not only not paying tax, but most of them are already wards of the government by way of our very many social welfare programs.

So, it benefits us to offer these incentives while those people stop being wards of the government, become useful employees and while businesses start up there that otherwise would not come in to take advantage of the available labor and those tax advantages.

New Orleans and the River Region, and I would like to ask you, if I may, whether spending this money on public service employment would not create more jobs and be a better investment of public funds.

The President. Mr. McCall, as a former Governor, let me tell you that while there were some programs -- some of the CETA programs and so forth -- that served a useful purpose, at a much higher cost I might say, a higher percentage of the dollars in administrative overhead than will be devoted to that in this program. Those programs that I speak of as having served a useful purpose were for the most part the programs that did involve training for the private sector. We found in California, in our experience, that too many of these jobs creating public employment became boondoggles. They just simply padded the rolls of the various levels of government with excess employees. And then if the program came to an end, it was either the local government and the taxpayers who had to then carry, keep on these excess employees, or they had to be dismissed.

So, no, I don't believe that taking on added employees or training for public service is equal to training people for the jobs that are open and waiting out there for skilled and experienced employees.

Mr. President, this act has a program for training displaced workers, those workers who, in many instances, have been laid off because of foreign competition. Do you see this program helping American workers become more productive and better able to compete with workers from other countries?

State was to broadcast an Iowa-Minnesota football game. But, I do believe this, because part of the structural employment problem has to do also with jobs that won't exist for those who have been laid off anymore, that there have been changes in the makeup of work here in our country -- modernization in certain plants in which the jobs will no longer be necessary. And these workers must be retrained for the other kind of jobs that are coming on line in this changing economy of ours. And, so, that is very definitely an important part of the program and an important responsibility.

When I keep saying ``structural,'' what I really mean is that if the recession ended tomorrow, there would still be a higher unemployment problem than we've been used to in the past because of the increased influx into the job market of workers, or the percentage of adults who are seeking work, and because of these people whose jobs have just been technologically wiped out. And we must meet that problem, too.

Ms. Comer. Mr. President, you've been very generous with your time. That's all the time we have for calls. I'd like to extend a thank you from the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the National Alliance of Business for taking the time to join us today for this 2-hour program.

As you know, they are touring the United States with these magnificent Lipizzaner horses. And we have only seen just a tiny bit of what they actually do in their exhibitions, partly due to the soft ground here. Mr. Sallinger, who's the president of the Chamber of Commerce in Austria, is responsible for not only this display, but that magnificent stallion, Amadeus, is a gift to the people of the United States by way of Mr. Sallinger and will remain here when they have finished their tour and go home. Ambassador, Mrs. Klestil, we are pleased and proud to be a part of this.

I don't know how many Americans realize, but the Ambassador and Mr. Sallinger just reminded me a few moments ago, and you should know, maybe it is -- well, it is particularly fitting that this is the first time this has ever happened on the White House lawn.

But we did play a part in the continuation of this ancient institution, this school of riding, and the continuation of the Lipizzaner horses. And in the great tragedy of World War II, it was the late General Patton, knowing of them and being a lover of the horse himself, who smuggled these horses away and saved them, preserved them so that they could then be given back to Austria when the war was over, and that this great institution would continue.

We're grateful to all of you for being here, for this fine exhibition, and more grateful than I can say for this gift to the people of America, symbolic of the great friendship between our two peoples.

Mr. Sallinger. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, as representative of the Austrian economy and of Austrian business, it's a great pleasure to me to have brought this white horse to the White House. And this horse symbolizes the gratitude that the Austrian economy owes to the United States for your generous support to bring us freedom and to bring us a free and efficient economy after World War II.

Other nations face very severe economic difficulties. In fact, both developed and developing countries alike have been in the grip of the longest worldwide recession in postwar history. And that's bad news for all of us. When other countries don't grow, they buy less from us, and we see fewer jobs created at home. When we don't grow, we buy less from them, which weakens their economies and, of course, their ability to buy from us. It's a vicious cycle.

Exports account for over 5 million jobs in the United States. Two out of every five acres planted by American farmers produce crops for exports. But because of their recessions, other countries are buying fewer American farm products than last year. Our farmers are hurting -- and they're just one group.

So, we are trying to turn this situation around. We're reminding the world that, yes, we all have serious problems. But our economic system -- based on individual freedom, private initiative, and free trade -- has produced more human progress than any other in history. It is in all of our interests to preserve it, protect it, and strengthen it.

When governments get too involved in trade, economic costs increase and political disputes multiply. Peace is threatened. In the 1930's, the world experienced an ugly specter -- protectionism and trade wars and, eventually, real wars and unprecedented suffering and loss of life.

There are some who seem to believe that we should run up the American flag in defense of our markets. They would embrace protectionism again and insulate our markets from world competition. Well, the last time the United States tried that, there was enormous economic distress in the world. World trade fell by 60 percent, and young Americans soon followed the American flag into World War II.

I'm old enough and, hopefully, wise enough not to forget the lessons of those unhappy years. The world must never live through such a nightmare again. We're in the same boat with our trading partners. If one partner shoots a hole in the boat, does it make sense for the other one to shoot another hole in the boat? Some say, yes, and call that getting tough. Well, I call it stupid. We shouldn't be shooting holes; we should be working together to plug them up. We must strengthen the boat of free markets and fair trade so it can lead the world to economic recovery and greater political stability.

And here's how we're working to do that: We insist on sound domestic policies at home that bring down inflation, and we look to others for no less in their own economies. The International Monetary Fund, the institution that deals with world financial issues, seeks to encourage its member countries to follow sound domestic policies and avoid government restrictions on international trade and investment to foster economic development and raise their people's standard of living.

We remind other countries that as the U.S. helps to lead the world out of this recession, they will benefit as we buy more goods from them. This will enable them to grow and buy more goods from us. And that will mean more jobs all around. That is the way of free markets and free trade.

Switzerland. They will seek ways to surmount challenges to the integrity of our international economic system. We were instrumental in convening this international meeting because we believe strongly that our trading system is at a crossroads. Either free world countries go forward and sustain the drive toward more open markets, or they risk sliding back toward the mistakes of the 1930's and succumbing to the evils of more and more government intervention. And this is really no choice at all.

The United States will reject protectionist and defeatist proposals. Instead, we will set new goals and lay out a program for limiting government intervention in world markets. We will lead with a clear sense of our own commercial interests and a quiet determination to defend these interests.

Let no one misunderstand us. We're generous and farsighted in our goals, and we intend to use our full power to achieve these goals. We seek to plug the holes in the boat of free markets and free trade and get it moving again in the direction of prosperity. And no one should mistake our determination to use our full power and influence to prevent others from destroying the boat and sinking us all.

The Task Force shall be composed of no more than twenty-one members who shall be appointed by the President from among leaders in the private sector. Members will be chosen primarily from the chief operating or chief executive officers of private enterprises, including agribusinesses.

For nearly 2 years my administration has examined the matter of the MX missile, the development of which has been supported by my three immediate predecessors, Presidents Carter, Ford, and Nixon. We all have strongly agreed that strengthening our land-based missile system is absolutely essential to maintain America's deterrent capability to deter war and to protect our nation.

I have sought the counsel of my predecessors, the opinion of Members of Congress, and the advice of the best technical and scientific minds in the field. My administration, as well as the ones before it, has examined a wide variety of options, including smaller or bigger missiles, the development of one missile for common use on land or at sea, and the possibility of greater mobility. And, like the preceding administrations, we have concluded that MX is the right missile and that now is the time.

MX missile itself. The missile work is now nearly complete. The first test flight is scheduled for early next year. While test flights are just that -- tests -- I have no doubts about the technical success, in fact excellence, of this missile.

In reexamining how to base the missiles, we concluded that by pulling the launch sites much closer together and making them a great deal harder, we could make significant savings. We would need fewer silos, much less land, and in fact fewer missiles. We would achieve a system that could survive against the current and projected Soviet rocket inventory. Deployment of such a system would require the Soviets to make costly new technical developments if they wish to even contemplate a surprise attack. Most of the Soviet countermeasures proposed are really no more than technical dreams on which no Soviet planner or politician would bet the fate of his country. Thus, Closely Spaced Basing is a reasonable way to deter attack -- which is our objective.

First, we recognize that the best survivability, and thus the best deterrence, lies in the modernization of all three legs of the Triad: submarines, bombers, and land-based ballistic missiles. Each gains security as all are rendered less susceptible to technological or operational surprise.

We will emplace 100 of these missiles (versus the 200 in some of the earlier plans) in launch canisters which can be moved, if necessary, between closely spaced superhard silos. We plan to build only 100 such silos, but we will design the system so that we can add more silos later, again within the confines of a small land area, if the Soviets will not agree to strategic arms reductions, or if they persist in the development and production of more powerful and deadly weapons. We would prefer that the Soviets dismantle SS - 18's, rather than we build more holes. But we can accommodate either and maintain stability.

As far as an active defense is concerned, we do not wish to embark on any course of action that could endanger the current ABM treaty so long as it is observed by the Soviet Union. Likewise, we do not wish to build even the minimal ABM system allowed us by the treaty, even though the Soviets have done so.

We plan to continue research on ballistic missile defense technology -- the kind of smart, highly accurate, hopefully nonnuclear, weapons that utilize the microelectronic and other advanced technologies in which we excel. The objective of this program is stability for our ICBM forces in the nineties, a hedge against Soviet breakout of the ABM treaty, and the technical competence to evaluate Soviet ABM developments. We currently have no plan to deploy any ballistic missile defense system.

The entire missile and basing program will cost about $26 billion in 1982 dollars, commencing with this fiscal year. That's a reduction by half, both in cost and in numbers of missiles deployed, from the other plans on the drawingboards when I entered office. The ongoing ballistic missile defense research and development will cost about $2.5 billion. Both of these programs are already reflected in the FY 83 budget projections, but the specific decisions announced today allow us to proceed with the reductions from my February budget request for this year of a billion dollars, which we have so carefully worked out with the Congress.

These programs to increase the stability and security of our strategic nuclear forces are urgently needed. The planning by my predecessors made them possible, but it is for my successor that I make these decisions. With every effort, the Peacekeeper missile still will not be fully deployed until the late 1980's, when yet another President shoulders these burdens.

President, who has made these difficult decisions. It is only by such steadfastness of purpose that we can maintain the peace which every nation needs to work out the hopes and dreams of its own people.

For many years, U.S. strategic forces have helped protect our Nation and the Free World by providing a capable and effective deterrent. Maintenance of these forces has historically enjoyed broad bipartisan support.

In recent years, our deterrent has become increasingly vulnerable in the face of a relentless Soviet military buildup. As part of our program to modernize the U.S. deterrent, I asked last year that you support improving the capability and survivability of the land-based component of our strategic forces by authorizing development and deployment of the MX intercontinental ballistic missile. I also agreed earlier this year to provide you with a permanent basing decision by December 1.

In response to this requirement, the Department of Defense forwarded to me a series of basing options, with associated analyses of technical, environmental, arms control, and other factors. I have also received the counsel of my senior advisers, former Presidents and Administration officials, and Members of Congress. After careful study, I have decided to emplace 100 MX missiles, now known as ``Peacekeeper,'' in superhard silos in a closely-spaced basing mode at Francis E. Warren Air Force Base near Cheyenne, Wyoming. Given Congressional support, these missiles will have an initial operational capability late in 1986. I am prepared also to consider deception and possibly ballistic missile defense, which are options if the Soviet Union continues its military buildup.

While the U.S. must and will improve its forces to maintain a credible deterrent, we remain fully commited to our standing proposals for significant reductions in both sides' nuclear arsenals. We seek to reduce ballistic missiles by about one-half and ballistic missile warheads by about one-third.

Under separate cover, I am sending you a copy of my full statement on the decision outlined above. I ask that you keep an open mind on this complex and important question and permit the Administration to make its case for the decision. We are prepared to respond, at your convenience, to formal and informal requests for additional information that you may desire. I look forward to receiving your counsel and assistance as we work toward our common goal of improving the security of our Nation.

We've just completed a meeting of the Cabinet, and I wanted to tell you that, after weighing all the considerations, I have decided that we should move forward now with a program to repair the Nation's major highways and bridges.

During the next few days, we expect to work out many of the details of this proposal. And I will consult further with Members of Congress before submitting it for consideration during the lameduck session.

I'm reviewing this proposal along with a series of other measures that would help to give our economy a fresh boost as we head into 1983. It's my hope that this package can be high on the agenda when the Congress returns to Washington next week.

As you know, this measure would mean an increase in highway user fee, or gas tax, of 5 cents a gallon. For the average motorist, that's estimated to -- that additional cost would amount to some $30 a year. But we wouldn't be considering such costs unless our needs were both large and pressing.

An estimated 10 percent of our Interstate Highway System -- portions of which are more than 20 years old -- need immediate resurfacing. We have 23,000 bridges in need of replacement or rehabilitation; 40 percent of our bridges are over 40 years old. Moreover, our cities face capital transit costs of some $50 billion as many buses and urban railcars need to be replaced or upgraded.

The President. No. When this was first presented by Secretary Lewis over a year ago, he presented it with the idea and the real need of the highway system. But at that time, because of the economic situation we were faced with, I asked him to hold off for a while. In fact, I think I even mentioned, hold off a year. And he did and came back this year with it.

The President. No, there's no question but obviously there will be some employment with it, but it is not a jobs bill as such. It is a necessity. It's a problem that we have to meet, and we'd be doing this if there were no recession at all.

The President. That was in the context, that whole discussion, of our tax bill. And it's true that a tax on gas was one of those that had been proposed as an excise tax to help with that tax package that we presented in the midcourse correction of our program. And that's what I meant that, I'd -- no -- would not use that as a source, as there were several other excise taxes that we wouldn't use as a source just for general revenue. And that's what I meant at that time.

He was elected a director of the corporation in 1961 and became vice president in charge of store operations in 1962. He serves on the board of directors of Mercantile National Bank at Dallas, the Chilton Corp., and is past president and board member of the National Association of Convenience Stores.

This special holiday weekend is a time when we all give thanks for the many things our land is blessed with. It's also a fitting time for us to think about ways in which we can preserve those blessings for future generations.

One of our great material blessings is the outstanding network of roads and highways that spreads across this vast continent. Freedom of travel and the romance of the road are vital parts of our heritage, and they helped to make America great. Four million miles of streets and roads make it possible for the average citizen to drive to virtually every corner of our country -- to enjoy America in all its beauty and variety. They also form a vital commercial artery unequaled anywhere else in the world.

Our interstate system has reduced by nearly a day and a half the time it takes to drive coast to coast. And more efficient roads mean lower transportation costs for the many products and goods that make our abundant way of life possible. But let's face it: Lately, driving isn't as much fun as it used to be. Time and wear have taken their toll on America's roads and highways. In some places the bad condition of the pavement does more to control speed than the speed limits.

We simply cannot allow this magnificent system to deteriorate beyond repair. The time has come to preserve what past Americans spent so much time and effort to create, and that means a nationwide conservation effort in the best sense of the word. America can't afford throwaway roads or disposable transit systems. The bridges and highways we fail to repair today will have to be rebuilt tomorrow at many times the cost.

So I'm asking the Congress when it reconvenes next week to approve a new highway program that will enable us to complete construction of the interstate system and at the same time get on with the job of renovating existing highways. The program will not increase the Federal deficit or add to the taxes that you and I pay on April 15th. It'll be paid for by those of us who use the system, and it will cost the average car owner only about $30 a year. That's less than the cost of a couple of shock absorbers. Most important of all, it'll cost far less to act now than it would to delay until further damage is done.

There's already a section of interstate highway in Illinois that's so far gone the truckers call it the only all-gravel interstate in the country. There are bridges that schoolbus drivers won't drive across until the children get out of the bus and cross on foot. Little league baseball actually had to be suspended on a field underneath the Queensborough Bridge in New York because of the condition of the bridge. And in one small community in Pennsylvania, a family living beneath a bridge that's part of I - 70 has told their children not to play outdoors because rubble from the bridge keeps falling into the yard.

Overall, we have 4,000 miles of interstate highway that need resurfacing and 23,000 bridges that need replacement or repair. Our cities also have vital public transit capital needs for new buses, new or rebuilt rail cars, and track improvements that will total $50 billion over the next 10 years.

Common sense tells us that it'll cost a lot less to keep the system we have in good repair than to let it crumble and then have to start all over again. Good tax policy decrees that wherever possible a fee for a service should be assessed against those who directly benefit from that service. Our highways were built largely with such a user fee -- the gasoline tax. I think it makes sense to follow that principle in restoring them to the condition we all want them to be in.

So, what we're proposing is to add the equivalent of 5 cents per gallon to the existing Federal highway user fee, the gas tax. That hasn't been increased for the last 23 years. The cost to the average motorist will be small, but the benefit to our transportation system will be immense. The program will also stimulate 170,000 jobs, not in make-work projects but in real, worthwhile work in the hard-hit construction industries, and an additional 150,000 jobs in related industries. It will improve safety on our highways and will make truck transportation more efficient and productive for years to come.

Perhaps most important, we will be preserving for future generations of Americans a highway system that has long been the envy of the world and that has truly made the average American driver king of the road.

Last May I had the honor of welcoming President and Mrs. Figueiredo to the United States. Our discussions taught me how much our two countries have in common and how important it is that we understand each other well. I also learned how easy it is for Americans and Brazilians to talk as friends.

In the course of my readings and conversations, I've noticed many similarities between our two countries and their people. We're both nations of immigrants, yet we have successfully capitalized on the cultural, religious, and racial diversities of our peoples. We're both committed to peaceful resolution of global and hemispheric conflict, yet we both understand the need for strong and vigilant armed services.

We are both in positions of economic leadership on our respective continents. At the same time, we're major trading partners. The winds of economic crisis have buffeted our nations over the past few years -- inflation, energy shortages, high interest rates -- and we're still struggling to gain ground and prosper in these turbulent times.

While I am President Figueiredo's guest in your country, my colleagues and I expect to spend many hours in close consultations with distinguished Brazilians. We will discuss how our two governments can best support each other's efforts to meet the economic, social, cultural, and political aspirations of our people and how we can best strengthen the future security of our countries, our hemisphere, and our world.

Our two countries have a great deal in common. We share a similar history, a similar form of government, and similar aspirations. We agree on many values and objectives. Both of our nations seek peace in the hemisphere, peace in the world, the growth of our economies, and the well-being of our people. We also share some problems, such as the impact of illicit narcotics on our societies.

We do not agree on every issue, but this is natural. Diversity is one of the great strengths of democratic societies. Democracy only requires that we work together to understand each other, that we listen to each other, and that we address our differences seriously with mutual respect. I promise to do that.

The peace of the hemisphere and the strength of the inter-American system are key issues for both of us. The United States is firmly committed to peace and security in your region. I take this commitment very seriously. When the peace of a democratic state is threatened, we're concerned.

Security can be threatened by military actions, but security is also threatened by economic distress. The Caribbean Basin Initiative will address the underlying economic and social problems that are retarding the development of the Caribbean Basin States. We in the United States warmly welcome Colombia's decision to participate in this initiative, and we greatly value your desire to contribute to the economic development and the strengthening of democratic values in the region.

We're impressed by your nation's success in maintaining a vigorous economy, even in a period of global recession. North Americans share your dedication to hard work, competition, and the creation of new wealth.

We in the United States respect and admire Colombia's strong commitment to democracy. Equally important, we respect Colombia's firm commitment to the rule of law as the guiding principle of international relations.

Our two countries, working together, can achieve a great deal for our hemisphere. This is what brings me to Colombia. I look forward to meeting many of you personally and seeing your beautiful country. I bring with me the best wishes of my own people to you, our neighbors to the south.

I learned once in a public speaking class that you never should open your remarks with an apology, but since I am the one that changed your schedule -- and I won't look at Mayor Bradley when I say this -- but you know California is the home of unusual weather. [Laughter] And that's why we had to change the schedule. But I thank you very much for that welcome, and I thank you, Ferd, [Ferd L. Harrison, mayor of Scotland Neck, N.C., and president of the National League of Cities. Mayor Harrison introduced the President.] for your very warm and kind introduction.

And looking back, I think the most prophetic point I made was the need for a clear and direct line of communication between us -- the need to maintain a direct relationship between the Federal Government and America's cities.

Since those first days in office and my first speech to you, I've gotten to know you better, and I've come to understand your problems more clearly. Hundreds of you have met with me individually, as Ferd said, or in groups at the White House. We've held many working sessions about the challenges we face, and together we've made significant improvements in this administration's original federalism proposal.

Cabinet Room, we will proceed shortly after the first of the year with our amended federalism package. It will encompass three important principles. First, we will return responsibilities and commensurate revenue resources to the levels of government closest to the people. Second, there will be mandatory pass-through provisions to protect local units of government. And third, this initiative will not be a vehicle for budget savings on either side.

Throughout the last 22 months, individually and together, you've had a tremendous impact on the way this administration views the needs of American cities. Ferd Harrison and Bill Hudnut [Mayor of Indianapolis, Ind.] have worked closely with me on our federalism initiative and provided me with a wide range of advice and counsel. Perhaps of greatest importance to you collectively, you have -- not me collectively, you collectively have driven home the absolute need for some programs and some funds to pass directly from Washington to your city without taking a detour by your State capital. Now, this kind of give-and-take, this kind of cooperation and communication will be essential if we're to take the first and the next steps toward national renewal.

As Calvin Coolidge once said, ``Our country was conceived in the theory of local self-government. It has been dedicated by long practice to that wise and benevolent policy. It is the foundation of our system of liberty.'' Well, today that principle faces tremendous challenge.

You represent the urban heart of our great country, our teeming centers of culture, innovation, and progress. But you and your cities are also saddled with concentrations of our nation's most troubling problems -- high unemployment, decaying neighborhoods, grim crime rates, idle industries, eroding tax bases, and roads and bridges that threaten to crumble beneath us.

I've come before you with no magic wand. I'm fighting in Washington to reduce, not increase, the big spending that keeps our Federal budget badly out of balance. Although Americans are laboring under the highest peacetime tax burden in history, their money is spent before it even comes in. In a very real sense our coffers are empty.

But I have come to promote an agenda for growth and to offer you a challenge. There was a time in our history when our cities were gleaming testaments to the notion that nothing is beyond America's power to accomplish. Our cities were once centers of hope and opportunity, and can be again. I've come to urge that America's cities take up that challenge and link arms in a united effort to lead America into a new period of growth and prosperity.

Some elitists in Washington have implied that local officials aren't up to the job. Thinking that you lack their worldly sophistication, they doubt your competence and assume that you need a Capitol Hill perspective to feel an appropriate degree of compassion. Well, sometimes I wish they'd exchange that lofty vista once in a while for your ground floor, closeup view of how the world really is. Forcing Americans to accept the dictates of government in Washington instead of dealing with their elected representatives in their city hall has got to be one of the more serious mistakes of the century.

City hall, county seats, and State legislatures are the very laboratories of democracy. By removing the possibility of resolving our problems where they occur, too many have turned their backs on the genius of our system. Too many have stopped believing in our ability to govern and provide for ourselves.

Well, I believe that you're the hope of our nation. I put my faith in the American people and the quality of the leaders they elect to local office. You, in turn, must call on all your imagination and creativity to find new local answers for today's urban problems.

The Federal Government will not turn its back on you, but it's no coincidence that our present troubles are proportionate to the intervention and intrusion in our lives by Big Brother in Washington. We'll not cure what ails us by drinking more of what caused our sickness in the first place. Yes, there are some services that you cannot provide without some direct assistance from Washington. And you'll get that assistance. But it's time to sort out who does what best. Have Federal grants or loans accompanied by Federal dictates as to your priorities been a solution or a part of the problem? Have we all become addicted to temporary bailouts, failing to realize that the only answer must be a restoration of our economy from sea to shining sea?

Your revenues, I know, are falling away as your tax base shrinks. For a time the answer could be found in help from the Federal Government, which had usurped much of the taxing source. But as Washington responded by taxing more and borrowing even more to maintain its Big Brother role, it became a drag on the economy. Investment and production suffered, and more and more of the people living in your cities found themselves unemployed. It's time to give up the temporary band-aids and placebos and get on with the business of a real cure.

I've proposed a growth agenda for the eighties to put us on solid footing once again to bring back incentive in America, to make saving seem like good sense again, and to make investment more worth the risk. We proposed, and the Congress passed, the largest tax rate cut in history, although that 25 percent, across-the-board tax rate cut won't quite match the largest tax hike in history that was passed during the previous administration. I believe it is already providing, however, the stimulus needed to get our economy moving again.

This next installment, the so-called ``third-year,'' will benefit working men and women more than anyone else and will have the most dramatic impact on our economy. In later years, taxes will be indexed. Then government will not profit by inflation, pushing Americans into higher and higher tax brackets every time they receive a cost-of-living raise.

Now, this tax talk is no pipedream. Think back. When was the last time this country enjoyed real growth? When was the last period of boom, when unemployment dropped low, personal savings piled high, real wages grew, investment steadily increased, our industries were pumping at nearly full speed, and our gross national product was climbing? The last great period of American economic growth, low inflation rates, was in the 1960's, following enactment of the tax rate cut proposed by President John F. Kennedy.

President Kennedy knew as we know today: All the government boondoggles in the world won't fix what's ailing us. The only way to cure our problems is to get the economy moving again. And one of the best ways to stimulate the economy is to give the American worker a break and cut his or her taxes.

To further loosen the Federal chokehold on the American economy, we in this administration have been simultaneously scaling back programs, slowing government growth, and sorting out responsibility between levels of government. As a result, inflation, once public enemy number one, has dropped from double digits to 4.9 percent so far this year. The prime rate, once as high as 21\1/2\ percent, is down to 11\1/2\. The personal savings rate is increasing, the housing industry has begun to recover, and the stock market has been sending a strong signal of confidence for some time.

The worst remaining problems are the tragedy of unemployment and the monstrous proportions of our deficit. We have, as I've said, sizably reduced the annual increase in spending but there's no way we can eliminate, by budget cuts alone, the structural deficit built into the budget, nor can it be eliminated by raising taxes.

In the 5 years leading up to 1981, taxes almost doubled, and so did the deficits. The answer lies in stimulating the economy and increasing productivity. Even the trillion-dollar debt will become more manageable if it becomes a smaller percentage of the gross national product, which is the true measure of our wealth. Therefore, our every action should be aimed at helping the economy.

Once we get our economy growing again, it will generate more jobs. When more people begin to find work, fewer will be forced to depend on government social programs. Americans will be earning more, and the government will take in more revenue without raising the tax rates. By contrast, raising personal income taxes stifles the economy, throwing more people out of work.

That's why I believe our economic recovery program, based on solid, time-tested economic principles, will work. But we'll not rely on the pillars of that program alone. We must take advantage of every resource available to us. For example, as people like Mayor Voinovich keep me painfully aware, enormous numbers of citizens are ready and able to work and yet don't have jobs. We'll need the strength of every back and the power of every mind to lift us to recovery.

But if we're to grow into the decades ahead, we must have the skills to work in them. But it's been estimated that at least 20 million American workers now rely on skills that won't be needed 20 years from now. The government has trained thousands more in skills that already aren't needed in their communities. Still others have been steered into make-work, government programs with no future.

Training Partnership Act to put more Americans to work where they live. That program will train more than 1 million of our citizens every year in skills that local business, civic, municipal, and labor leaders determine are needed in their own communities. And I'm asking the American business community to give us the support and leadership that we need to make the program succeed.

Now, we're blessed with an agricultural abundance unmatched in the history of the world. To better use this resource, we're seeking out new markets, lifting old barriers, and restoring our reputation as a reliable exporter. Today our agricultural system provides the foundation for about 24 million American jobs -- almost one-fifth of our nation's work force. We can do even better.

Earlier this fall, I signed the Export Trading Company Act to help small- and medium-sized exporting businesses. Experts say that this legislation will mean several hundred thousand American jobs. We've also reduced the tax burden on businesses promoting our products abroad, and are pressuring our trading partners to lift unfair export subsidies. Our export policies are key to our growth agenda and to the revitalization of America.

At home we're trying to nurture the seeds of renewal in the decaying cores of some of our older cities. When I visited Mayor Schaefer in Baltimore, I was shown a vision of a future that we can choose for our cities, and it's a future that works.

There's a renaissance in Baltimore, brought about by a shared commitment between government and industry -- a partnership for progress between the public and the private sector. It's a city of excitement, growth, and diversity. I know that Baltimore has received aid from a number of Federal programs and has made particularly good use of Urban Development Action Grants, but it has also been a center of innovation and incentive. For example, there is a Blue Chip-in program in Baltimore, where private companies are investing in programs that create jobs, train the unemployed, and provide some emergency services to the city. Baltimore is proof that our potential is unlimited if the public and private sectors will work together.

And Baltimore is not alone. Phoenix is also promoting public and private sector cooperation with great results. In that city, for example, local building and zoning regulations have been eased to encourage private development of lower cost housing. More and more cities are making creative use of their resources to solve their problems.

I proposed an enterprise zone initiative to bring some of this innovative growth and excitement to even more cities around the country. The plan would create a free-market environment in depressed areas through tax relief, lifting regulations, and reducing other government burdens. By creating opportunity in our urban centers, businesses will begin returning, jobs will spring up, and the healing process of economic rejuvenation will begin. I don't need to explain to you what that will eventually mean in terms of your tax base.

The idea already has popular support. Fourteen States have already passed their own enterprise zone legislation without waiting for the Congress to act. Hundreds of cities are mapping out enterprise zone sites, as you well know. And in a recent survey of Fortune 500 chief executive officers, 67 percent said they would seriously consider investing in the zones after seeing the final version of the legislation. Keep in mind that most of those who responded said they wouldn't even have considered bringing their businesses into those cities before the enterprise zone incentives were offered. Small and minority-owned businesses would find even more opportunity.

In these difficult economic times when overall unemployment is high and youth and minority unemployment in some places has reached depression proportions, you'd think the Congress would jump at the chance to bring about this kind of growth opportunity and jobs. Well, I call on them today as they prepare to take up the rest of their unfinished chores to complete action on the enterprise zone initiative and let our cities get on with the business of recovery. The Senate has acted on it. The House has not, and it's been before the House for virtually a year.

If we're to move new and more goods in and out of our cities, if our cities are to attract more residents -- there is another facet -- we must face the fact that their infrastructure is falling into disrepair, less and less able to support growing demands. I need only listen to Mayor Caliguiri tell me about Pittsburgh's crumbling bridges or Mayor Hance recite the problems of the transportation system straining to cope with the burgeoning population to understand the urgency of this problem.

The state of our transportation system affects our commerce. It affects our economy and it affects our future. For many cities such repairs have become critical to growth and renewal. But no matter where we live in America, we're all dependent on our world-famous transportation network for the food we eat, the goods we buy, and the mobility we prize. Once a wonder of the modern world, that network is decaying, and we must restore it. I'll ask the Congress to authorize a much-needed overhaul of our transportation system.

We built our highways with user fees -- or with money paid by those of us who benefited from the system. It was a fair concept then, and it is today. And that's why we're proposing to pay for today's repairs by increasing the highway user fee, or gasoline tax, by the equivalent of 5 cents per gallon. That fee hasn't been raised in 23 years, and it no longer meets our needs. The nickel per gallon that we proposed will mean an extra $30 a year for most carowners. But if we don't fix the roads, they might have to pay more than that to keep their wheels alined.

This program will be massive in scope, but it will not add to the deficit or increase your income tax. It will allow us to complete the Interstate System, make almost all the interstate repairs, strengthen all our dangerously weak bridges, improve thousands of others, enhance all of our safety, and address the critical public of transit needs of our cities.

The program that we're proposing will stimulate 170,000 jobs in the hard-hit construction industry and an additional 150,000 jobs in related industries. But while this is significant, the jobs are significant, the proposal's most important contribution is that it is needed for our cities and our country to grow again. It's an investment in tomorrow that we must make today. And I urge the Congress to pass it in this session, and I hope that you'll tell them also they should do that.

In the 1980 campaign, I pledged support for general revenue sharing. I proposed full funding of general revenue sharing in fiscal years '82 and '83. And while I haven't made any final budget decisions for fiscal year '84, I can promise you I will look at revenue sharing in the same light.

We must lift where we stand, struggle for tomorrow, and earn anew the reputation this country once had as the land of golden opportunity. That is the reasoning and the challenge behind the agenda for growth that I've outlined today.

America must once again be full of leaders dedicated to building shining cities on hills, until our nation's future is bright again with their collective glow. You have it within you to make it happen, to lead our people and our cities to the renewal we all seek.

I am committed to continuing a direct relationship between the Federal Government and our nation's cities. I will work with you, and the Federal Government will lend you support. But join together to take up the challenge, and there will be nothing to stand in your way. If you do, we will come alive again, we'll grow again, and America will be great again.

As you all know, I originally urged the 97th Congress to return for this session, because much work remained to be done on the 1983 budget. Senator Baker and Congressman Michel and the other GOP leaders who were here this morning have pledged that they will do everything they can to complete action on the 10 appropriation bills that are outstanding. Everyone recognizes that in working on these bills, we must hold the line on spending. And while the appropriations bills are among the highest priorities of this final session, we also agreed this morning that we must move forward on other fronts as well.

I've asked the leaders to work with me in coming days to pass two vital pieces of legislation that will help bring a fresh boost to our economy: a highway construction bill that will help restore the Nation's most important transportation arteries and stimulate several hundred thousand new jobs in the hard-hit construction and related industries, and the enterprise zone legislation that would provide a new lifeline to people who live in our inner cities.

We had a good discussion of tax policies in the meeting. While there continues to be interest in the possibility of accelerating the economic stimulus provided by our tax program, we agreed that our most important objective for this final session is to protect the cuts that are already in place, the third year of the tax cut that begins this July '83, and the indexing that follows in '84 [1985 - White House correction].

Looking beyond the economy, there are several other pieces of unfinished business which must also be addressed in this final session of the 97th Congress. The priorities I outlined to the leaders this morning included the following: the Caribbean Basin Initiative, which is so important to our relations with our neighbors to the south and which I'll be discussing with them in the next few days; and of great importance, I'm asking that the Congress provide funding so that our MX program can begin on schedule. Then there is the Clean Air Act, nuclear waste disposal, a revision of our bankruptcy laws, regulatory reform and immigration reform, Radio Marti, and the anticrime bill already passed by the Senate.

In the past several days I and others of the administration have had the opportunity to consult widely with Members of the Congress on both sides of the aisle. And from these conversations and from our meeting this morning, I'm convinced that there is a desire on everyone's part to get the job done in a spirit of cooperation. The economy needs it, our people deserve it, and I think all of us are prepared to answer that call.

The President. No, we discussed that very thoroughly. And while, as I say, there is still some interest in this, we're not going to make a push for that. We think the most important thing is to resist efforts that probably will be made to go the other way.

The President. Well, there are a number of facets to it. Among those could be what opening that whole subject up might do. But also there is a contrary one that we were aware of at the time, and that is, with the deficits, while I believe that's a stimulant to the economy, it's a stimulant that actually occurs down the line a little ways. And the first result in this time of high deficit would be an addition to the deficit.

The President. Well, I'll tell you what; I think maybe I'm going to let these gentlemen answer questions like that, because the whole thing was that after two or three of these for you, and because I'm going to be taking off from the South Lawn very quickly on this trip. And I've got some other meetings now to go to. I'm going to abandon ship here and turn it over to them.

But, no, we discussed the difficulty of getting this passed, because, as I say, there are elements up there who want to go the other way, which I think would be directly opposed to what is needed today if we're to restore the economy, would be to go the other way and take away that incentive.

The President. That would be one that I was not talking -- I was talking about the tax program itself. But this program -- I think by the time that got into place, it would ignore all the things that are happening to the economy and it would be self-defeating to have such a program as they're talking, up on the Hill.

Let me just say this, this one thing. This morning as you know, at 10 o'clock the economic indicators, the news on them was released again. And not only are they up again for October, but they revised September and it was up more than double what the figure had been given a month ago for the economic indicators in September.

This legislation proposes an increase in highway user charges by 5 cents per gallon to help meet the needs of our deteriorating highway and transit systems. These systems are essential for the efficient movement of people and freight and to a healthy national economy. Investments by all levels of government are falling well short of the amount necessary to complete the Interstate System and to keep our nation's highway system, including its bridges, from facing rapidly accelerating deterioration. Urban rail and bus transit capital investment needs will total almost $50 billion over the next 10 years to maintain our existing systems. Transit needs cannot be viewed as separate, since highways and transit form a complementary and interdependent system for the efficient and economical movement of goods and people in urban areas.

The primary objective of this legislation is to provide renewed investment to help rebuild our nation's deteriorating infrastructure. In addition to supporting economic recovery by providing an effective transportation network that is crucial to commerce, this bill sets the framework for several other beneficial effects on the economy. For example, this legislation would create an estimated 320,000 jobs, 170,000 direct and indirect in construction industries and 150,000 more jobs ``induced'' by the construction. The bill also proposes a reallocation of existing user charges to make the current user fee structure more equitable. The bill eliminates a large portion of the existing cross-subsidy from lighter to heavier trucks, and it assesses motorists as directly as possible for the highway costs they impose. Finally, this legislation proposes changes to truck size and weight laws to help bring about uniformity and provide significant productivity benefits for the trucking industry.

This bill does not contain a Federalism turnback. However, the Administration remains committed to Federalism and will strive to return to State and local governments programs that are primarily of local interest and responsibility. The Administration is consulting with the Governors, affected State and local officials, and the Congress on a bill which will implement the appropriate turnback of highway programs and accompanying revenues. The current status of the consultative process is that $2.2 billion (equivalent to 2 cents of the current motor fuel tax) and the Federal-aid programs relating to urban, secondary, non-primary bridges and safety construction would be turned back. The attached bill treats these programs in a manner that will allow them to be easily incorporated into Federalism legislation.

This legislation continues the direction established by the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1981. The extent of Federal involvement in all Federal-aid highway programs has been analyzed and the total program is restructured to emphasize the highway systems that warrant Federal interest. This legislation continues to make completion of the Interstate System and its rehabilitation and preservation the highest Federal priority. The bill provides program authorizations for the Interstate, primary, secondary, urban, bridge rehabilitation, and certain other programs through FY 1988. The 1982 Federal-Aid Highway Act provided authorizations in FY 1983 for several highway programs, but reduced the amount available for obligation by a factor based on the number of days in the continuing resolution passed by Congress (Pub. L. 97 - 276). This legislation establishes authorizations for the full fiscal year 1983 for the major highway programs.

Interstate discretionary funds. Rather than being allocated on a first come, first served basis as under present law, the funds will be allocated by the Secretary on a priority basis to projects that will help complete Interstate segments not open to traffic and to projects of unusually high cost relative to a State's apportionment. The discretionary fund will consist of $300 million per year set aside from Interstate construction authorizations and will also contain lapsed amounts from previous apportionments. Also, when Interstate substitute actions occur, sums equal to the amounts deducted from a State's unobligated Interstate apportionment will be added to the discretionary fund.

Interstate 4R apportionments not needed for 4R purposes may be used to fund Interstate construction or primary system improvements. Interstate 4R apportionments will be adjusted in FY 1983 and FY 1984 to compensate States for any reductions in total Interstate authorizations that might occur due to the elimination of the one-half percent minimum Interstate construction apportionment.

Primary Program. Authorizations are provided for this program through FY 1988. The priority primary program and the connector primary demonstration program are eliminated so that States can select those projects that reflect their own priorities.

Bridge Program. The bridge replacement and rehabilitation program authorizations are extended through FY 1988 and separate bridge apportionment formulas are established for primary bridges and non-primary bridges to provide more equitable distribution of funds. Apportionments are available for 2 years, after which unobligated funds may be redistributed to other States. A discretionary bridge fund of $300 million is set aside from the authorization for each year through 1988 for use on high cost bridges. Projects eligible for these funds must cost more than $10 million or at least twice a State's annual program apportionment.

Program Consolidation. The bill eliminates a number of existing categorical highway programs and rescinds any unappropriated authorizations. Unobligated balances will remain available until expended or the periods of availability expire. Most of these programs are eligible activities under regular primary, secondary, and urban programs. The bill also contains several provisions that will allow the Federal-aid highway program to be more effective and efficiently managed.

The mass transportation portion of this bill makes important changes in the structure of Federal transit assistance to begin to shift decisionmaking responsibility from Federal to State and local authorities. The bill would create a capital formula program for transit assistance and would phase out transit operating assistance by the end of FY 1984. In addition, the bill would establish a new transit infrastructure program to be funded from a portion of the proposed increase in the highway user fee. The bill would authorize Federal transit funding for fiscal years 1984 through 1988.

Approximately $1.1 billion would be available annually for transit infrastructure projects from the one cent of the proposed increase in the highway user fee. This bill would add a new section 22 capital infrastructure development program to the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, as amended (UMT Act), which would distribute these funds to urbanized areas by an administrative formula to be devised by the Secretary of Transportation. The funds would be available for transit infrastructure development projects involving the rehabilitation or replacement of transit facilities and equipment. These funds would be subject to the same streamlined requirements as that proposed for the new section 9 capital formula program (see below) with a proposed Federal/local share of 80/20.

Each State, however, would receive no less than one-half of one percent of the total funds annually available under this program. Moreover, apportionments to a Governor or designated recipient in an urbanized area would be eligible to be used for highway projects in the State or urbanized area instead of for a transit infrastructure development project. However, the decision to release these funds for highway purposes will limit the availability of transit discretionary funds to fund any project that could have been funded under this program.

This bill would add a new section 9 to the UMT Act, which would authorize $8.914 billion in capital funds to be distributed through a capital formula program for urbanized areas over 50,000 population. The Federal share for the capital formula program would be 80 percent.

The section 9 formula program funds would be eligible for capital purposes only, including planning, acquisition, construction, deployment of innovative demonstration results, and improvement of facilities and equipment. Capital activities would include the direct costs of spare parts for transit vehicles where the expected service life of the spare part exceeds one year.

Federal participation in the cost of spare parts will enhance the ability of transit operators to keep their equipment in service and help to protect the original Federal capital investment in these items. New rail starts and rail extensions would not be eligible activities under section 9 without the prior concurrence of the Secretary of Transportation.

The capital program funds would be distributed based on a ``revenue match'' formula. Under this new formula each urbanized area would receive an apportionment equal to its share of the total national non-Federal mass transportation revenues (including State and local assistance).

Federal requirements. This certification process would provide for greater simplicity and flexibility for State and local governments. It would reduce the complexity of applications and thus the paperwork burden at all levels of governments. Finally, it is consistent with the Administration's philosophy of placing greater responsibility for progam implementation at the State and local level.

Labor to the Secretary of Transportation, to provide greater flexibility to ensure that these labor protections are administered consistently with transportation policy. In addition, the bill contains a change in present procurement requirements which would allow the Secretary to determine a benchmark price for buses.

The revenue title features a five cent highway user fee increase. Four cents will be channeled into the Federal highway program and one cent of the increase will be available for public transportation or highway programs. This title also includes adjustments to the user charge structure to make a more equitable distribution of costs among the various classes of vehicles. As mentioned above, changes in the Federal size and weight standards have been coupled with the fee structure changes. This title provides that the user fee levels provided in this bill will be in effect through March 31, 1990 and permits expenditures to be made from the Highway Trust Fund through fiscal year 1991.

The program restructuring and authorization levels proposed in this bill represent a strong Federal commitment to an effective national transportation system. The new Federal focus on national interest programs accompanied by greater responsibility for the States will ensure fulfillment of the nation's transportation needs.

Today we embark on an important journey to visit our friends in the south, in Latin America. This will be an important visit not only for the United States but for others, too. As friends and neighbors of the New World, we have a vital stake in each other's economies, security, and general well-being. This is true for Central America, the Caribbean, and for the entire hemisphere.

This will be a working visit. I'll be meeting with six Presidents, and I believe we have a lot to learn from one another. We certainly have a lot to discuss: the steps we all need to take to get our domestic economies back on the path to growth, to reduce the threats to peace and security, and to promote the continued development of democracy. This will be a journey for the cause of democracy and peace.

The four countries I'm visiting have all had elections in the past year. There's a strong democratic tide running in the Americas. It's important that democratic leaders maintain a dialog with one another and that our actions foster the ideals of democracy in a climate of peace.

I've long held that one of the highest priorities of this administration would be to improve our relations with our neighbors in this extraordinary hemisphere. We are, as you know, most fortunate, for this half of the globe is the source and repository of many of mankind's noblest dreams. Our Caribbean Basin Initiative is a reflection of our commitment to sustaining those moral visions -- or noble visions. And when our neighbors are in trouble, their troubles inevitably become ours.

I'm pleased that the Congress approved the aid portion of my CBI request in September. I also attach great importance to the critical foreign assistance package for fiscal year 1983, which is currently before the Congress. But we need more than just an injection of critically needed funds.

We need the long-term incentives encompassed in the trade and tax provisions of the CBI legislation. In my meeting with the Republican leadership this morning, I underlined the importance that I attach to enactment, as soon as possible, of the trade and tax portions of the CBI, and they agreed.

I've spoken with Dan Rostenkowski, chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, who recently traveled to the Caribbean at our request. He saw firsthand the positive impact that the CBI would have on the economies and the societies of this area, and he, too, promised to help during the final days of this session.

Our trip is an opportunity to demonstrate firsthand our concern for our neighbors. Whether our nations be of the north or the south, we can work together as partners to pursue the dreams we share. We will strengthen the democratic bond, stimulate new growth and opportunity, and promote the sacred cause of peace. That's the purpose of the journey.

Q. The power of the democratic idea and economic progress allowed the West to win the battle for the hearts and minds of people almost everywhere and helped them resist totalitarian ideologies. But isn't there an implicit threat to those gains in the present economic crisis and, therefore, to the strategic interests of the United States, even in the hemisphere?

The President. There is no question that today's global economic crisis is a severe challenge to democracies everywhere. During an economic downturn, competition among labor, business, and government becomes more intense, and the relationships can become strained. This, in part, is the reason why I proposed last February, in cooperation with other donor nations in the hemisphere, an ambitious program to increase aid and stimulate trade and investment in the Caribbean Basin. It is also why the U.S. has worked closely with the international community to assist countries which are facing more serious financial difficulties during the current worldwide recession.

There, leftist guerrilla forces have undermined the economic infrastructure in order to spread dissatisfaction and opposition to the democratically elected government. El Salvador also shows, however, that even in a profoundly divided society, democratic institutions can rise above economic or political crisis to meet the challenge with a national consensus.

Other nations in Central America and South America are finding that the consensus building inherent in a democracy offers a firm foundation for responding to economic and other crises. So although economic difficulties test our democratic ideals, I believe that recent events, such as the elections in Brazil, Costa Rica, El Salvador, Colombia, Honduras, and Mexico, show that our democracies will emerge not only secure but stronger. That Brazil has just conducted a landmark election during a period of severe economic problems is a clear indication that democracy can not only be maintained but advanced, even during times of economic difficulty.

International Monetary Fund in the proportion desired by developing nations. In light of these initiatives, what expectations can Third World countries have in relation to U.S. participation in the North-South dialog?

The President. Your initial statement is inaccurate. We support an adequate increase in IMF quotas and a substantial replenishment of the Inter-American Development Bank. Moreover, I am committed to working with leaders of Third World countries to address their real development problems in a pragmatic, concrete manner.

The world community's most important contribution to growth in developing countries is through trade. Last year, the United States alone provided more than $68 billion to the non-OPEC developing world in payment for goods imported from developing countries. That is twice as much as LDC's received in official development assistance from all sources.

We are committed to fostering an international trade system which will continue to provide a powerful engine of growth. For example, in last week's GATT (General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade) meeting in Geneva, we proposed a round of North-South trade talks that would help increase trade between developed and developing countries.

We recognize, however, that concessional assistance also plays an important role in development, particularly for least developed countries. In a period when concessional financing is scarce, those limited resources should be concentrated on the world's poorest, least credit-worthy countries.

Congress will not support the initiative fully? If the access to the North American market contemplated as part of the as yet unapproved CBI is not approved soon, would your government be disposed to establish some kind of bilateral arrangement with the Caribbean Basin countries?

The President. The Caribbean Basin Initiative is an integrated program of emergency financial aid, trade preferences, and investment incentives. It will help revitalize the economies of the Caribbean Basin by stimulating greater investment, production, and exports in the region. That will create jobs and give people tangible hopes for a better economic future within stable democratic institutions. As you know, the U.S. Congress in September approved the emergency aid portion of the initiative, and those funds are now being disbursed. The trade and investment portions of the initiative will be considered by the Congress in the next few days. We have been working closely with the leadership in both Houses to see that the full legislative program of the CBI is completed before Christmas.

We will continue to seek a multilateral and regional approach, rather than isolated bilateral arrangements. I strongly believe that the cooperation of other countries -- both as donors and as participants in the program -- strengthens and increases the effectiveness of any individual country's efforts.

The President. We in the New World are very important to each other. Our mutual dependence -- our interdependence -- shows up in almost every statistic concerning hemispheric trade, capital flows, communications, and other forms of human interaction.

Much of the world's growth potential is here in our hemisphere. I know public attention is focused on alleviating the global recession; that is only natural. But we must focus on how to create the conditions for renewed, long-term growth.

We must recognize that the inter-American system has served us well. True, it was unable to prevent the tragic outbreak of war earlier this year. But let's not forget that thanks in large measure to the inter-American system, Latin America devotes less than 1.4 percent of its gross national product to military expenditures. What is called for now is not new institutions but a renewed commitment to making the system's emphasis on the rule of law and the peaceful resolution of disputes work better. That calls for political will. The United States is firmly committed to do its part in this endeavor. My visit to your countries will emphasize that commitment.

Ecuador, Bolivia, and Honduras. What importance does your government give to these democracies in contrast to military regimes in the hemisphere? What impact do you believe your administration's human rights policy had on these developments?

The President. The United States places great importance on the development of stable democratic institutions in our hemisphere. In addition to the special bond which the shared value of democracy brings to our relationship with another nation, there are certain practical elements in democratic systems which also deepen and strengthen our ties. Democracies tend to be more stable because they represent a broader spectrum of national opinion. Democracies tend to be more peace-loving because they must consult with their citizens regarding major foreign policy questions. Democracies tend to have more policy continuity because of their broad-based support.

But we in the United States can only influence, we cannot determine. I believe that the growth of democracy we have seen in recent years shows the power of the democratic idea -- from the unity and stability it brings to a nation, to the dignity and legitimacy it bestows on a government.

The President. You are quite right that Cuba, by its support for armed violence and subversion against its neighbors, is indeed a threat to the peace of the Americas. But more importantly, with its economy in a shambles, with tens of thousands of mercenaries in Africa, and with its extreme dependence on Soviet largesse merely to hold its head above water, Cuba has become more and more a Soviet satellite and a willing conduit for advancing aggressive communism. Were it not for the Soviet Union, which gives massive aid in the form of arms and money -- $3 to $4 billion this year alone -- Cuba could not afford to do what it is doing.

Our response has been threefold. First and foremost, we are working with the other States of the region to help the actual and potential victims of Soviet-abetted, Cuban-inspired attacks in the region. This includes as its most important element help to strengthen their economies through bilateral and multilateral programs, including the Caribbean Basin Initiative, which is key to the success of this joint effort. Where necessary, we also provide security assistance. Second, we hold the Soviet Union ultimately responsible for much of its client's behavior. And third, we maintain and have strengthened economic measures designed to increase greatly the costs to Cuba and its Soviet paymasters of their interventions in other countries.

Q. In the past, the United States permitted the Soviet Union to achieve strategic parity. You now appear to believe that only an American threat to regain superiority will cause the Kremlin to accept your plan to mutually reduce nuclear arms. However, this position has not produced results at the negotiating table. In fact, it appears to be exacerbating the arms race, with the resulting waste by the superpowers of resources that would be better utilized in the fight for development. In light of the change of guard in the Kremlin, isn't this the moment to revitalize detente and abandon the rhetoric of confrontation?

The President. The United States is not seeking strategic superiority. I am convinced that the preservation of peace requires that we follow two parallel paths -- deterrence and seeking significant arms reductions to equal and verifiable levels. These are the only paths that offer any real hope for enduring peace. I want to stress that the present disparity in forces brought about by the massive Soviet buildup of the 1970's has been very detrimental to international peace and stability.

I believe our strategy for peace will succeed. Although the United States has always led the effort for arms limitations and reductions, never before have we proposed such a comprehensive program of nuclear arms control. What we are saying to the Soviet Union is this: We will modernize our military in order to keep the balance for peace, but wouldn't it be better if we both simply reduced our arsenals to a much lower level?

We have stressed from the outset that we want a constructive relationship with the Soviet Union, based on mutual restraint, responsibility, and reciprocity. Unfortunately, Soviet-backed aggression in recent years -- such as Afghanistan, Poland, and Kampuchea -- has violated these principles.

Brazil looks to the United States, the richest nation in the world, for support. What types of specific assistance can your administration provide Brazil directly, in the terms of credit and loans, and indirectly, in its attempts to restore the confidence of private banks in the country and to increase the resources of multilateral lending institutions?

The President. The United States continues to be a strong supporter and the largest contributor to the World Bank (IBRD), the Inter-American Development Bank (IADB), and the International Monetary Fund (IMF). We believe these institutions have key roles to fill in today's world and provide important resources, both financial and technical. While we believe IMF resources are sufficient to handle current problems, we are working with other members of the IMF to ensure that adequate resources will also be available in the future. We hope that agreement on a new quota increase will come soon and that our suggestion for a special borrowing facility to meet possible extraordinary demands will be accepted.

Brazil can be proud of its well-established reputation for meeting its obligations in a responsible manner and for facing problems with skill, energy, and pragmatism. We have every reason to believe Brazil will continue to take whatever measures it finds necessary to deal with its problems, including any economic adjustments that may be needed to assure sound growth and development. This, in turn, gives lenders confidence in Brazil's creditworthiness -- confidence that I share. We believe Brazil will have adequate access to private international financial markets.

The President. Your question suggests that the foreign policies of Brazil and the United States are in direct conflict. I do not accept that suggestion. In our discussions last May, President Figueiredo and I found that there are many more points of convergence in our foreign policies than there are points of divergence. That is not surprising, since both countries are based on a similar value system and have similar origins and histories and are dedicated to peace, prosperity, freedom, and justice. As for the points of divergence, well, we live in a large and complex world with many difficult problems and situations, and it would be totally unrealistic to expect any two free and independent nations to hold identical views on all of them. You only find that automatic identity of viewpoint within the Soviet bloc, and I certainly would not like to see that replicated anyplace in the world.

In answer to the second part of your question, no, I do not intend to propose a new alinement between Brazil and the United States. I am interested in strengthening the bilateral relationship, in reviewing areas where there have been problems, and in exploring new possibilities for bilateral cooperation. This is important to me, and I think it is important to President Figueiredo -- not in the context of a new alinement, but as reaffirmation of the longstanding friendship between Brazil and the United States and our common commitment to the peace and progress of the hemisphere and the world.

American Government, in particular, has been accused of adopting economically repressive policies, ignoring the pernicious effects on the rest of the world. The U.S., according to critics, is exporting recession and unemployment today in the same way that it exported inflation in the past. Was your government somewhat insensitive regarding the negative repercussions of U.S. economic policies abroad?

The President. I know that slow economic growth in the U.S. is having serious impacts on other economies, and I wish we could have avoided this painful transition period for all of us. The continuation of past U.S. economic policies and the continued lack of control over U.S. inflation would have led to disaster not only for the U.S. but for the whole world economy. We are seeing the beginnings of recovery in the U.S. -- inflation has fallen dramatically, interest rates also are dropping fast, and there are encouraging signs of investor confidence, for example, in the stock market and in construction. What we are aiming for now is a revival of steady economic growth with price stability. I want to lay the foundations for a long period of U.S. growth not subject to exaggerated ups and downs which have caused so much pain around the world in the past. I think we are on the right road and that the U.S. economy will once again provide a significant stimulus to production and employment around the world.

States did not focus sufficiently on its relations with the hemisphere, I think it is clear that my administration has devoted considerable attention to our hemispheric relations, as evidenced in the Caribbean Basin Initiative, which we and Colombia support, and my current trip, which underlines the importance of our hemispheric neighbors for the United States.

Q. Beyond doubt, one of the most important problems between Colombia and the U.S. is drug trafficking, and certainly there have been some important advances such as the recent ``Operation Swordfish.'' Nevertheless, for those who are in the know, drug trafficking is produced not only by the sellers but also by the buyers, which in this case are the U.S. citizens themselves. What policies have been instituted to fight against the immense consumption of drugs in your country?

The President. On October 5, I endorsed our new Federal strategy which is designed to mobilize all our forces to stop the flow of illegal drugs into the United States and to prevent drug abuse, especially among our youth. This is a bold, confident plan, which simultaneously attacks organized criminal trafficking in drugs and international production and exporting of illicit narcotics and seeks to reduce demand for drugs.

I have charged two Cabinet-level councils with responsibility for domestic enforcement and international narcotics control and for overseeing health-related drug programs. The South Florida Task Force on Crime made significant inroads on narcotics trafficking, and we have announced plans to create similar task forces in other regions. My staff and interagency teams are coordinating a nationwide prevention effort -- with a strong assist from my wife, Nancy -- that involves government, health institutions, business, educational institutions, the media, other private sector interests, and importantly, parents and parent groups.

I have described drug abuse as one of the gravest problems facing us internally. We must undertake vigorous policies and programs at home and overseas where the major drugs are produced. In that context, I am pleased to be able to say that we have been cooperating very actively with the Government of Colombia. For several years we have been engaged in cooperative efforts to help improve the enforcement and interdiction efforts within Colombia against cocaine, marijuana, and other drugs. We have seen some good results. We hope in the future that we can work together to expand this cooperation on supply control. Such cooperation, together with progress on the demand side against drug abuse in the U.S., is the only way to effect a permanent improvement in the situation. My administration has committed more than $900 million per year to this effort, the majority of those funds being spent on reducing drug abuse within the United States.

Q. Many Costa Ricans believe that the present economic and security crises in Costa Rica and the area endanger our democratic system. What is your administration prepared to do to avoid the destruction of Costa Rican democracy?

In his speech to the free elections conference in Washington, D.C., President Monge said that in your February 7 elections, the Costa Rican people confirmed their faith in democracy as the means of resolving your country's economic problems. I share that faith in the democratic process, and agree that economic health is key to a secure future for the entire Caribbean Basin.

While congressional approval of the $350 million supplemental appropriations addresses some of the more immediate concerns, I think we must be equally concerned about the medium- and long-term issues addressed by the trade and investment portions of my own government's Caribbean Basin Initiative. This is a major policy priority for my administration, and we are actively working with Congress to enact those remaining parts of the CBI legislation in the congressional session now underway in Washington.

President Monge's leadership in the recent San Jose conference represented both a growing consensus among the democratic countries of the region as to the conditions necessary for peace, and a commitment among us all to find the means for reducing those tensions. During the past year we have seen free elections and orderly changes of government in Honduras, Costa Rica, El Salvador, the Dominican Republic, and Colombia -- all signatories of the San Jose final act. The challenges are real, but so is our commitment to succeed.

Q. In less than 6 months, President Monge has met with you twice in Washington. Now you will meet with him in San Jose. This level of contact is higher than usual in traditional relations between Costa Rica, and the majority of Latin American countries, and the United States. What is the reason for these close contacts?

The President. We cannot afford to forget that ony a few years ago, Costa Rica, long an historic model for democratic government in the hemisphere, was also virtually alone. In just the last year, six of the countries that participated in the recent San Jose conference conducted free elections and witnessed an orderly change of government. Democratic government has taken the initiative in addressing the economic, social, and political challenges facing the region. This will be my third meeting with President Monge, and it reflects both the common values which we bring to the issues and a recognition that the democratic process itself offers a better alternative than the historic and simplistic choices of the extremes of a violent right or a violent left.

Q. We know that the North American Congress has passed strict legislation with regard to sending United States troops outside the country; however, the President has the power to send troops for 30 days. In the event of Nicaraguan aggression against Honduras, could our country depend on the concrete assistance of the United States?

The President. The obstacles to peace in Central America stand clearly exposed, as the countries of the region grapple with severe economic challenges, demands for social justice and reform, strains on public services, and violence frequently born out of extremist solutions. Your own country has been in the forefront in having proposed constructive solutions to resolve these tensions.

Economically, we have collaborated on both the immediate and longer term solutions, and I am optimistic that my own administration's Caribbean Basin Initiative will receive congressional action shortly to address the pressing requirements in the trade and investment areas.

Politically, the recent San Jose conference final act reflected your own country's diplomatic initiatives aimed at reducing the likelihood of further military conflict in the region. As one of the eight democratic governments which signed that final act, the United States supports the growing regional consensus on those conditions necessary for peace in the region. As you know, the level of U.S. economic and military assistance to Honduras has risen significantly over the past year in response to our shared concerns in Central America, and I think represents a clear indication of our support for your country's democratic efforts to surmount these problems.

Q. Our country, a friend and an ally of the United States, has witnessed with surprise the imposition of sugar quotas. What was the reason that Honduras was given a substantially smaller quota than the quotas of countries that are openly hostile to Washington?

The President. As I have explained before, the drop in world sugar prices and the congressional reaction to this development left us no choice but to impose temporary sugar import quotas to protect our domestic producers. Quota allocation is based on an average of a country's exports to the U.S. from 1975 (the date when the previous U.S. sugar program expired) through 1981, excluding each country's high and low performance years. The Honduran allocation was determined by this nondiscriminatory formula, which we are applying across the board to all countries in accordance with our international trade obligations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of Nov. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

I am delighted to be here in Brazil, to have the opportunity to see this city which is famous the world over as an expression of Brazil's confidence in its destiny. I look forward to strengthening my friendship with President Figueiredo, so warmly begun in May, and to continue the discussions we began in Washington.

Our societies are similar in that we both have a frontier tradition, an openness, and vision for greatness. The roots of our nations are also similar. We are both melting pots -- nations that succeeded in giving their citizens, no matter what their origins, an opportunity to share with their initiative, hard work, and intelligence in the vision of freedom: freedom to worship and to work in dignity for a better life.

You in Brazil have great dreams, and a vast nation blessed with enormous resources in which to fulfill them. Here in Brasilia we see dramatic proof of the spirit of a people with unlimited drive, determination, and confidence in their future. We all know of the strong and steady advance of Brazil both domestically and internationally. Your elections November 15th demonstrate Brazil's confidence in itself and its stability in freedom. Similarly, the management of the Brazilian economy through times of economic difficulty around the world inspires us all that our present problems can be overcome.

The two parties remain committed to these U.N.-sponsored talks and to working for progress in this forum. We continue to believe that it represents the most fruitful course for negotiating progress. The parties are engaged in a genuine dialogue which has made it possible for each side to define its positions.

Education Week in the Senate, and Congressman Bennett, who sponsored it in the House, as well as Senator Thurmond, Congressmen Gilman and Rangel. I know Congressman and Mrs. Bennett have a strong personal interest in this proclamation, and let me extend a very special welcome to Mrs. Bennett, who is with us here today.

Nancy's told me so many times that few things in her life have frightened her as much as the drug epidemic, and this is something she's living with daily by virtue of her work with those who are endangered by drugs. She's told me many personal stories of grief, but the hard statistics are there, as well.

The numbers on drug abuse are terrifying. These statistics virtually overwhelmed us for the past two decades, paralyzing our will. It was as if the problem was so large that we couldn't do anything about it. But today, as never before, America's children are getting help in the battle to keep their minds free of drugs. We're making progress against drugs, because parents and other adults finally decided to do something about it.

No longer do we think of drugs as a harmless phase of adolescence. No longer do we think of so-called hard drugs as bad and so-called soft drugs as being acceptable. Research tells us there are no such categories, that the phrase ``responsible use'' does not apply to drug experimentation by America's youth. And as far as the recreational use of drugs is concerned, I've never in my life heard a more self-serving euphemism by those who support drug use. There is nothing recreational about those children whose lives have been lost, whose minds have been ruined. If that's somebody's idea of recreation, it's pretty sick. Too often we've fallen into the trap of using nice, easy, pleasant, liberal language about drugs. Well, language will not sugar-coat overdoses, suicides, and ruined lives.

One of the biggest indicators that America is awakening to the harm of drugs is the wonderful outpouring of people who will launch the Chemical People Project tomorrow evening on the Public Broadcasting System. That's the project combining community action with the power of television. On the next two Wednesday evenings, special broadcasts will be seen on over 260 of the country's television stations. Simultaneously, there will be local community meetings, thousands of them all across America, in all 50 States, the District of Columbia, and Guam. There are more than 10,000 task forces out there to assist mothers and fathers who, unfortunately, have felt for too long that they were alone in the battle against drugs. Over 50,000 volunteers and 35 national organizations have dedicated themselves to making this project a success.

Throwing taxpayers' money at a problem, sitting back with smug looks of self-congratulation, has been tried, and it didn't work. Business leaders recognize this and are lending a helpful hand. For example, the Keebler Company teamed up with Warner Communications last spring, and they came forth with a comic-book approach to getting the right kind of information about drugs into the hands of kids in a readable way. Other companies are coming forward, as well. The effort against drugs is coalescing with parent groups, government, business, and now, in the case of the Chemical People Project, the media is involved, as well.

Millions of our citizens are risking their health and their future by abusing drugs. The effects are clearly demonstrated by the tragic reports in daily news accounts of innocent people killed by drunk drivers, death by overdose, drug-related murders, drug smuggling, and other public outrages. Less obvious, but more pervasive, are the individual tragedies which destroy a person or family and which may cause loss of a job, interruption of schooling, and a reduction in our Nation's productivity.

Federal, State, and local governments have established programs to reduce the supply of illegal drugs. Similarly, government has encouraged the establishment of facilities for providing medical treatment for those suffering from this problem and sponsored extensive research on the effects of drug use. However, government cannot hope to solve the problems of drug abuse without the help of every American.

Drug abuse is a national problem and a target of a nationwide program. All across America, our citizens, community organizations, and the private sector have recognized that they can make a difference in the battle against this serious concern. Expanded drug abuse awareness efforts, the banding together of concerned parents, and the involvement of many community groups are lowering the rate of drug abuse which prevailed during the Seventies. There has been increasing attention focused on the potential of mass communications to discourage drug abuse.

Numerous public education efforts are epitomized in the excellent Chemical People Project which will be presented on public broadcasting stations across the United States on November 2 and 9, 1983. The Chemical People Project is an example of how a grassroots approach to organizing town meetings and community efforts can break through the ``wall of denial'' common to alcohol and drug abuse and can stimulate constructive action where it counts -- in ourselves. We must continue to encourage and support efforts to educate our citizens to the health and societal consequences of drug abuse. Such efforts are an essential foundation for a successful national program to reduce and prevent drug abuse in our country.

In order to draw attention to the seriousness of the drug abuse problem and to encourage the education of parents and children in the home, classroom, and community to the impact of illegal drug abuse, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 57, has designated the week of November 2 through November 9, 1983, as National Drug Abuse Education Week.

He has been with TRW Systems and Energy for 22 years and presently serves as manager of information resources. Previously he was project manager of a fiber optics technology project. In recent years he helped establish and is now a board member of the International Technical Assistance Corp.

Poland. Very serious problems still remain. The Polish Government continues to defy the wishes of the majority of the Polish people; a number of political prisoners are still incarcerated and indictments have been brought against certain of these prisoners; free labor unions have not been restored; no genuine economic reforms have been implemented and stringent censorship still exists.

In the hope of inducing the Polish Government to begin pursuing a path of national reconciliation and restore free trade unions, the President has endorsed two limited steps. Specifically, the United States jointly with its allies has agreed to enter into discussions on the Polish debt to official creditors. We seek repayment of U.S. loans to Poland. In this regard, the United States is not extending Poland new credits nor supporting Poland's entry into the IMF. As a bilateral step, we have agreed to permit Polish officials to engage in discussions with private fishing companies about potential fishing arrangements. Our ban on Polish fishing in U.S. waters still remains in place. Moreover, even though discussions have been authorized no actual allocation of fish will be provided at this time. Rather, any future allocation of fish at the end of the discussions will be contingent on the Polish Government's actions on human rights.

These steps taken represent a limited response to very modest improvement in the human rights situation in Poland. The United States has taken note of the successful June visit of His Holiness John Paul II to his homeland, and of the release of the majority of political prisoners in Poland.

We are waiting for the Polish Government to take definitive action to restore the human rights of the Polish people -- rights which belong to them from birth and which are not government's to take away.

What this means is that the situation is stable; no sniper fire or other form of military resistance is evident on the island. Our objectives have been achieved, and as soon as the logistics permit, American personnel will be leaving.

I'd like to add that the members of the Armed Forces have conducted themselves in the finest tradition of the military. We can be proud of the courage and professionalism that we've seen from the people down there. The American students called them rescuers. The citizens of Grenada have hailed them as liberators. I think the whole lot of them deserve the respect and admiration of our country.

The operation was not without cost. Those who were killed, wounded, or injured in this operation, I believe, are heroes of freedom. They not only rescued our own citizens, but they saved the people of Grenada from repression and laid aside a potential threat to all the people of the Caribbean. After viewing the massive horde of Soviet weapons found on that island, who knows what evil the liberation of Grenada achieved for us, or averted in the years ahead.

Rumsfeld as my special representative for the Middle East. I can't think of a better individual in whom to entrust the coordination of our role in the Middle East peace process and in the Lebanon negotiations.

Don Rumsfeld has had a distinguished career in public service. He's had experience in wide areas of government and public policy -- including military service as a naval aviator; in the legislative branch, as a Member of the United States Congress; and in the executive branch, where his many appointments included Chief of Staff of the White House, member of the Cabinet, and U.S.

Ambassador Richard Fairbanks, who is now in Geneva, has told me that he will continue his critical involvement in these issues, and I am grateful for his dedication. We intend to work and use the talents of our best minds to achieve a just and lasting peace in the Middle East.

I announced in September 1982 a realistic set of principles which we consider the best chance for a resolution of the Arab-Israeli conflict. No one's come up with a better proposal since. I'm confident that progress in Lebanon will add momentum to the serious efforts that are going on to establish this broader peace.

We hope that the leaders of Lebanon who are now meeting in Geneva will put the problems of the past aside. They have it within their ability to move toward a national consensus. Progress in their talks could lead to the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon and the establishment of a truly representative government.

We're proud as Americans of the part we're playing to bring peace to this troubled region, and now Don Rumsfeld will be our point man in that effort. I've known Don over the years, and I recognize the talent and vigor that he can bring to bear on these weighty problems. I hope all those who share our sincere desire for peace in the Middle East will work with our new representative.

It had exactly what we announced in the beginning: the need to protect the lives and the safety and freedom of about a thousand Americans, most of them students down there in a medical school, and in answer to a request on the part of the other nations bound by treaty together in the east Caribbean, that we lend our support to them in freeing this up because they lacked the strength and capability of doing it.

Q. Mr. President, some people say that the U.S. has now lost the moral high ground, that there's no difference between what we did in Grenada and what the Soviets did in Afghanistan. What's your response to that?

The President. Oh for heaven sakes. Anyone who would link Afghanistan to this operation -- and incidentally, I know your frequent use of the word ``invasion'' -- this was a rescue mission. But in Afghanistan, if you will recall, when the Soviets installed their choice of head of state for Afghanistan and in the process in changing the forces there, an American Ambassador was murdered in Afghanistan. And then, against all the opposition of the Afghanistan people, they have used every vicious form of warfare, including chemical warfare, the killing of women and children -- that has caused even some of their own men to desert because they will not carry out the orders to kill women and children. And they're still there after a long period of time, longer than I've been in this office. As compared to what we did in answer, actually, to an appeal that first came from the Governor General of the island, who was in house arrest, to his fellow states there in the Caribbean -- or appealing for rescue, and we helped in the rescue.

Granted that we contributed the bulk of the power, but only because the others were limited in their ability to do that. And this was a rescue mission. It was a successful rescue mission, and the people that have been rescued, and the Grenadians that have been liberated, are down there delighted with and giving every evidence of appreciation and gratitude to our men down there.

I will be very brief. The President has indicated the assignment. The President, as he indicated, has set forth the policy of this country with respect to the Middle East. And Secretary Shultz, as recently as last month before the House Foreign Affairs Committee, elaborated further. They have asked me if I could arrange myself to be helpful with respect to this, or try to be helpful.

Ambassador Rumsfeld. Well, I guess time will tell. It seems to me that it is such an important part of the world to our country, and that it is not surprising that successive Presidents have asked individuals to attempt to work on it for periods of time, and that that is in our interest to try to do.

The fact that the problems there are intractable and difficult and have persisted over long periods doesn't mean that the United States should ignore them. Rather, I think it suggests that it's worth our best efforts, and that's what's intended.

Americans. Although careful treatment can control many of the short-term metabolic effects of diabetes, the disease is also associated with serious long-term complications that affect the eyes, kidneys, nerves, and blood vessels of the heart, brain, and extremities. In addition to its devastating toll in terms of human suffering, the cost of medical care for diabetic patients and associated losses due to disability and premature mortality now exceed $10 billion annually in the United States alone.

Fortunately, the outlook for clinical advances related to the diagnosis, treatment, cure, and, ultimately, the prevention of diabetes and its complications has never been as promising as it is today. Recent research advances have included the synthetic production of purified human insulin to ensure adequate supplies of this essential hormone, the development of improved methods for insulin administration, new technologies for monitoring critical blood sugar levels, new therapies for the treatment of diabetes-related kidney, eye, and cardiovascular diseases, and improved clinical capabilities for reducing the increased perinatal morbidity and mortality associated with diabetic pregnancies.

In addition, remarkable advances have also been made in developing procedures that permit the successful transplantation of insulin-producing cells into diabetic animals without the need for chronic suppression of the immune system. As these and related studies are extended to humans, they may lead directly to the development of a cure for some of the most serious types of diabetes and to a means to prevent, arrest, or reverse the long-term complications of this disease.

Recent advances in basic biomedical research are providing new insights into the multiple causes of diabetes. We anticipate that these studies will help to identify individuals at risk for developing diabetes so that we may ultimately develop approaches that will prevent the disease and its complications altogether. Basic and clinical research advances have significantly reduced diabetes-related morbidity and mortality and have measurably improved the quality of life for people with diabetes. Nevertheless, much remains to be done before the cure and prevention of diabetes and its complications become a reality. Toward this goal, the Federal government, in cooperation with the private sector, will continue in the same determined spirit to lead the way toward eliminating diabetes as a major public health problem both for current and future generations.

Thank you. And for all of us up here, thank you very much for a very warm welcome. It always makes you suspect there's a Republican or two in the crowd. [Laughter] But I'm pleased to be here and to see so many old friends. And a special greeting -- I know someone is here -- my Press Secretary, Jim Brady, and his lovely wife, Sarah.

Well, I want to thank all of you for giving so much of your time and labor to make this administration possible. In the end, it's not glitter and gloss but the grit and determination from an army of supporters that makes victory possible -- and will make it so again in '84.

With your help, our administration was elected to put the pieces back together again. We cut the growth of Federal spending. We pruned needless regulations. And George Bush was in charge of the team that was doing that, and it has saved hundreds of millions of man-hours of work in filling out needless government papers. We reduced personal income tax rates, and we passed an historic reform called tax indexing.

Now, today, just 2 years after we set our policies in place, our nation has one big program to help every American man, woman, and child. It's called economic recovery. And you can tell it's working because, as I've said several times already, they don't call it Reaganomics anymore.

Washington to raise the people's taxes; we came here to restore opportunity and to get this economy moving again. We don't face large deficits because Americans aren't taxed enough; we face those deficits because the Congress still spends too much. And I am still opposed to those who suggest that now we should raise taxes on individuals and businesses, and I'm prepared to veto tax increases if they send them to my desk, no matter how they arrive.

Now just as we're turning the economy around, we've strengthened our national defense and have given a new sense of purpose to American foreign policy. In the military, the number of combat-ready units has increased a third since 1980, and morale has shot up high. We're attracting better recruits, and we're keeping them longer, because we're finally giving them better pay, better equipment, and the respect they deserve.

In foreign policy, we've let the world know once again that America stands for the political, religious, and economic freedom of mankind. And something else: Under this administration, our nation is through wringing its hands and apologizing. Americans don't put up walls to keep people in. We don't have armies of secret police to keep them quiet. And we don't put political and religious dissidents in jail, and we would never coldbloodedly shoot a defenseless airliner out of the sky.

In two places last week -- Beirut and Grenada -- Americans lost their lives and were wounded while protecting lives, defending freedom, and fostering peace. In Beirut, we won't be intimidated by terrorists. We will redouble our efforts to help the people of Lebanon find peace.

In Grenada, the thugs who seized power in a bloody coup have already been replaced by administrators of good will who will prepare the country for democratic elections. We've had broad and bipartisan support for our actions in Grenada. Yes, there were some critics, but I'd like to suggest that those critics take a moment to listen to interviews with Grenadians rejoicing at their new freedom, or to meditate on the photo of an American medical student rescued by U.S.

You know, as of last night, those in charge of that marvelous operation -- which they put together in 48 hours and kept it a secret until they could land there -- they, last night, declared hostilities at an end. And today, the engineers of the 82d Airborne are repairing roads and bridges and damaged buildings and homes down there. And the Medical Corps, now that our wounded have been evacuated, are taking care of the people on Grenada, vaccinating children, doing those things that are associated with public health chores. In other words, we're doing what America has always done, and I don't know that we've ever had any better missionaries for our country abroad than GI's in uniform.

But I just have to believe we can honor their memory best by not withdrawing from our role in the world, but by remaining the force for freedom and peace that makes America the brightest star of hope in the world today.

In 1980 our nation faced a crucial choice: We could continue to decline or we could work, instead, to make a new beginning. The American people chose the path of courage, and our administration was elected to make that new beginning. Everyone here, whether you stuffed envelopes or planned campaign strategy, helped to change the course of American history.

In 1984 we'll have another great political battle to wage. Republican candidates across the country will once again need your support, your time, your skill, and your sweat. For the good of our country, let's wage this battle with all the determination and dedication that we have in us. I believe all of us share a dream. It's a dream of an America that offers opportunity to all her citizens. It's a dream of America as a mighty force for good will among the nations. And with faith in our God and confidence in our cause, we're making that great dream come true.

In April of this year, I transmitted to Congress the Civil Rights Reauthorization Act of 1983. The leading features of my proposal -- a twenty-year extension of the Commission's life (the longest in history) and staggered, fixed terms for the members -- were fully consonant with the recommendations made by a unanimous Civil Rights Commission.

On August 4, the House rejected the idea of a lengthy extension and voted instead for a five-year authorization. It also rejected a proposal for specified terms, while adopting a provision which stated that commissioners could in the future be removed only for cause.

Although I continue to believe in the merits of my original proposal, I believe that we should all come together behind a reauthorization bill that will pass quickly, in the interest of saving the United States Civil Rights Commission from extinction at the end of this month. Accordingly, I very strongly urge you and your colleagues to adopt the House-passed bill, which is now being held at the Senate desk. That is the quickest and least controversial way of ensuring that the Commission's life will be extended.

The Commission's work is not done. It still has an important contribution to make to the Nation and to the cause of civil rights. I hope that the Senate will join me in the effort to guarantee the Commission's future life.

The President also announced that Ambassador Peter Dailey, who helped organize the administration's public diplomacy effort on European arms control and security issues earlier this year, will continue to advise the administration on these issues.

The crisis between the United States and Iran which began in 1979 has eased, but it has not been fully resolved. The internal situation in Iran remains uncertain; the war between Iran and Iraq continues. The international arbitral tribunal established for the adjudication of claims of U.S. nationals against Iran and by Iranian nationals against the United States continues to function; however, full normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the U.S. and Iran will require more time. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed to respond to the process of implementation of the January 1981 agreements with Iran and the eventual normalization of relations.

Of the remaining 20 decisions, 12 dismissed claims for lack of jurisdiction, seven dismissed claims on the merits and one approved withdrawal of a claim. As of October 1, the Tribunal had held 111 prehearing conferences and 68 hearings on the merits and scheduled another eight prehearings and nine hearings through mid-November. In addition, two full Tribunal sessions of five days each were scheduled for October and early November.

Iranian-appointed arbitrators, effective upon the availability of a successor. On September 14, Iran announced that it was appointing Parviz Ansari Moin to replace Mr. Sani. Mr. Ansari has worked in the Iranian Ministry of Justice for approximately ten years.

Markazi Iran concerning the payment of nonsyndicated debt claims of U.S. banks against Iran from the escrow account established at the Bank of England in January 1981 with the deposit of $1.418 billion. Significant progress has been made in the past six months in settling these claims.

Reye's Syndrome is a serious illness that may attack the brain and liver of a child recovering from influenza, chicken pox, or some other viral infection. The cause of this disease -- which affects an estimated 600 to 1,200 children in the United States each year -- is unknown.

The disease may progress to a life-threatening stage. If early symptoms are recognized and treated promptly, however, it is less likely that the disease will cause dangerous brain swelling, coma, or death.

New treatments are being developed to help victims of Reye's Syndrome recover. This improved outlook is a direct result of scientific research carried out by public and private investigators and physicians, many of whom are supported by the American Reye's Syndrome Associations, the National Reye's Syndrome Foundation (Ohio), the National Reye's Syndrome Foundation (Michigan), and the United States Public Health Service. Within the Public Health Service, the Centers for Disease Control, the Food and Drug Administration and the National Institutes of Health are carrying out research projects and constant surveillance of cases.

Much still remains to be learned about Reye's Syndrome. Coordinated research is needed to find better ways to treat this disorder and ultimately to prevent it. Public education is also essential, because parents and physicians can help to protect the Nation's children from its lethal effects if they learn to recognize this disease in its earliest stages.

The family and family life are central to our American heritage. Family bonds give us an anchor in the past, as well as hope for the future. It is within the family that tradition is created, individuals grow, and faith is nurtured. Through family living, we discover who we are, how to interact with our fellowman, and the values that make a free society possible.

Families perform the daily tasks that sustain and renew us, including raising children and caring for the elderly. Families not only provide better health but also serve the special needs of the handicapped. In particular, those who have opened their homes through adoption and foster care deserve special thanks for offering the gift of family life to our Nation's less fortunate children.

Today, amid new pressures and needs, America is relearning the importance of its families. For instance, success in the national fight against drug and alcohol abuse must begin with a strong and united family. We are newly aware that the family cannot be taken for granted, and that the support of a family can never truly be replicated.

Section 1. The head of each Executive department, Military department and Executive agency is hereby delegated the authority vested in the President to declare void and rescind the transactions set forth in section 218 of title 18 of the United States Code in relation to which there has been a final conviction for any violation of chapter 11 of title 18.

Sec. 2. The head of each Executive department and agency described in section 1 may exercise the authority hereby delegated by promulgating implementing regulations; provided that the Secretary of Defense, the Administrator of General Services and the Administrator of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration jointly shall issue government-wide implementing regulations related to voiding or rescission of contracts.

Next Friday, November 11th, we'll celebrate Veterans Day -- the day America sets aside to honor millions of our finest heroes. They are the men and women who defend our country and preserve our peace and freedom. This Veterans Day offers more reason than ever to think about what these special people mean to America.

Grenada -- carried on with the same dedication and valor as their colleagues before them. If we remember that their dedicated service is in defense of our freedom and if we understand that they put their lives on the line so we might enjoy justice and liberty, then their sacrifices will not be in vain. This is our obligation. And this has been the spirit of Veterans Day from the beginning.

Veterans Day was originally called Armistice Day. It was first celebrated in 1919, the year we commemorated the armistice ending a war that was to have ended all wars. Two years later, a solemn ceremony was held in Chalons-sur-Marne, a town in northeastern France. The ceremony would have deep meaning for America. The remains of four unknown American soldiers had been brought to the town square from four American military cemeteries in France. An American sergeant, Edward F. Younger, placed a bouquet of white roses on one of the caskets. The American Unknown Soldier of World War I had been designated. After transport across the Atlantic aboard Admiral Dewey's flagship, the cruiser Olympia, our nation laid this hero to rest in Arlington National Cemetery on Armistice Day, November 11, 1921.

Sixty-two years have now passed. Millions of people from every corner of the world have come to the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier to pay their respects to America's fallen heroes. The First World War did not end all wars. The assault on freedom and human dignity did not end. Our nation had laid to rest too many other heroes. From Guadalcanal and Omaha Beach to Mig Alley and Pork Chop Hill, from Khe Sanh and the A Shau Valley to Beirut, America's best continue to give of themselves for us and for freedom-loving people everywhere. Yes, veterans have given their best for all of us, and we must continue to do our best by them.

Today, I reaffirm my determination to obtain the fullest possible accounting for our Americans missing in Southeast Asia. The sacrifices they made and may still be making and the uncertainty their families still endure deeply trouble us all. We must not rest until we know their fate.

Our hearts turn also to our disabled veterans. Their sacrifices and hardship endure every day of the year. A compassionate government will show them that we do remember and honor them. We will meet their special needs. In particular, there is no substitute for caring, quality health care, and that care will be provided.

Yesterday, I had the opportunity to visit Camp Lejeune, North Carolina. I went there to pay tribute to the many who gave their last full measure of their devotion. They kept faith with us and, indeed, they were heroes. Where do we get such brave young Americans? And where do we get those that came to their aid -- the marines in Beirut who witnessed an unspeakable tragedy and returned to their posts with the same dedication and even greater resolve; the air crews working around the clock; the Army doctors performing medical miracles; and the sailors helping in countless ways? Such men and women can only come from a nation that remains true to the ideals of our Founding Fathers.

I've been so happy and, I might add, relieved to have such guests here on the South Lawn. So a very warm and grateful welcome to you all, and welcome to the Ambassadors and other special guests who are here.

You students sent me so many moving telegrams of appreciation about the military fellows who rescued you, I thought it might be nice if you had the chance to tell them yourselves. So, here in this more peaceful setting are representatives of all the four units that participated and were there with you on Grenada.

In letter after letter, you spoke of your deep respect for those who risked their lives and in some circumstances gave their lives so that you'd be safe. A great many of you said you believed you'd be dead or held hostage today if it weren't for the courageous men whose business it is to be courageous -- our soldiers, sailors, marines, and airmen. I wish I could give every military person who participated in the Grenada rescue copies of your telegrams and letters.

Ranger, is one example. His unit was engaged in an air assault on the Calivigny Compound which was held by Cuban forces. Sergeant Trujillo was in the first of four helicopters to go into the compound under intense enemy fire. Upon landing, Sergeant Trujillo saw the three other helicopters lose control and crash into one another. Immediately, and with complete disregard for his own personal safety, he ran across open terrain to the downed aircraft, exposing himself to enemy fire, flying shrapnel, and possible explosion of the burning helicopters. With only the lives of his fallen comrades in mind and while still in the open and exposed to intense automatic and small arms fire, Sergeant Trujillo began administering first aid to the critically wounded. Upon arrival of the battalion's physician's assistant, Sergeant Trujillo returned to the crashed aircraft several times, removing the wounded soldiers, carrying them across terrain to a safer location, and administering medical aid. During the entire time he came under automatic and small arms fire.

His unselfish actions were instrumental in saving the lives of a platoon leader and several other seriously wounded soldiers. And the inspiring thing is that Sergeant Trujillo would have risked his life for each of you, as well.

Some of you have asked how you can express that respect and affection. Well, you've been doing a marvelous job already. Nothing could make those men prouder than the statements you've made to America about their bravery and devotion to a cause larger than themselves.

A few years ago it seemed that America forgot what an admirable and essential need there is for a nation to have men and women who would give their lives to protect their fellow citizens. What you saw 10 days ago was called patriotism. What those men did for you they would do for any American in trouble. And the way you can best honor those who died in Grenada is to speak out about their courage and commitment as they risked their lives for yours and as so many of you have been doing already.

Grenada and the Soviets invading Afghanistan? And the question sort of touched my temperature control. [Laughter] I answered. And among the things I said was that there was no comparison between the savage invasion of Afghanistan with its slaughter of innocent men, women, and children -- civilians -- and the heroic rescue mission of our young Americans. Our troops are already leaving Grenada, but don't hold your breath waiting for the Soviets to leave Afghanistan.

The Afghanistan people aren't meeting the soldiers with friendly waves and gifts of flowers and fruit over there. A CBS news poll shows that an overwhelming majority of the Grenadians -- 91 percent -- are glad the United States came to Grenada. I think that tells a lot about the differences between democracy and totalitarianism.

Now, I'm not going to take up all the time here. But it's good to have both students and servicemen together under more peaceful circumstances. And would you do me a favor? When you all leave today, would you try not to be as dramatic as it was on your last leavetaking?

It is indeed a great honor to speak to you today. When I first spoke to the press and said that I wanted to thank President Reagan and the military, I never dreamed that I'd have a chance to do it personally.

School of Medicine. I think that I can speak not only on behalf of the students but also on behalf of all the families of the students in expressing our gratitude to both you, Mr. President, and every member of the military that took part in our evacuation. We owe each and every one of you a debt that we can never repay.

Prior to this experience, I had held liberal political views which were not always sympathetic with the position of the American military. I think a lot of us who don't have a firsthand view are often skeptical when we hear that our military is involved in a faraway place. We don't always understand why our soldiers are fighting abroad. Well, let me say that I have learned a lot from this experience. It's one thing to view an American military operation from afar and quite another to be rescued by one.

To you, President Reagan, I must add a special thank you. On behalf of my parents and of all the students' parents, thank you for bringing us back to the United States. There is truly no place like home.

Ms. Joel. I'm very proud and honored to be here today, and I believe I represent not only my own class but all of St. George's University School of Medicine when I say that I am grateful to the U.S. military for their actions. I never had so much faith or pride in my country than during the 24 hours I spent under war conditions in Grenada.

Probably the most poignant moment for me, personally, was Tuesday night, in the library that we converted into a makeshift medical unit. I thought about the fact that just 24 hours earlier I had been studying here and how abrupt the change was from academics to reality. They brought in a soldier with three bullet wounds in his right arm and chest, and the man was in excruciating pain.

While I attempted to assist the extremely self-sufficient thoracic surgeon as he inserted a chest catheter for drainage, I thought about this man on the table. I mean, a total stranger to me, and yet, an American who was willing to jeopardize his life not only for my personal safety but for the causes of our country.

These professional men, with their unspoken dedication to the United States and to our standards of freedom and democracy, have my great respect. My experience in Grenada, especially in the library medical unit, has reaffirmed my personal dedication to medicine and my commitment to complete my education. But it has also reaffirmed my faith and respect in the citizens of our country, especially those citizens in the military. As a representative of St. George's University School of Medicine, I would like to thank President Reagan and the military for their concern for our personal safety and to say that among such company, I am proud to be an American.

On behalf of the students of St. George's University School of Medicine, I would like to present you with this small token of our appreciation for saving our lives. To the United States military and you, President Reagan, in appreciation for your prompt action that guaranteed our safe return from Grenada, from the students of St. George's University School of Medicine.

University School of Medicine who appreciate both your rescue mission in Grenada and your continued support for all citizens pursuing their American dream, we give you a plaque in the shape of the United States for bringing us home to America. We thank you.

Mr. Shikanai. The bonds of friendship between Japan and the United States are among the strongest in the world. As President of the United States, do you have any special message for the Japanese people?

The President. Well, yes, I do. Number one, we're looking forward very much to our trip, which will begin tomorrow. And this will be the third time that we have had the opportunity of visiting Japan, so we are looking forward to this return.

But I think the message that I would have is that the close friendship that we do have and the relationship, overall, imposes on Japan and the United States a responsibility to the world to foster peace and prosperity. Between us, Japan and the United States are responsible for one-third of all the gross national product of the world. We are the two greatest trading partners -- our relationship between each other that way. But we can make such a contribution to easing the tensions in the world and bringing the prosperity and the peace that I think the people of all the world want. Some governments may not want that, but the people want it. And between us, as I say, we have a great duty.

The President. Well, I think that we have a number of things that we need to talk about, because we are such close friends and allies. I think, for one thing, we have some differences with regard to trade. And as we discussed when Prime Minister Nakasone was here for the Williamsburg summit, we discussed the need for all the world to get away from the idea of protectionism in trade, trying to maintain an advantage over someone else.

The great growth and prosperity of Japan in trade and industry is due to the idea of democracy and free trade. And so free trade must also be fair trade. And I am concerned that here in our own country some of the restraints on our exports to your country have led some to a feeling of protectionism and that they must do something in retaliation. I feel that as we loosen the restraints between us in trade, that is the answer to those who could give us political problems in both our countries -- to the Prime Minister, to myself, here. So, we will be discussing all those ways in which we can restore that trade.

The President. Well, I agree with Prime Minister Nakasone very much. The Pacific Basin is the area of the future, and Japan -- I recognize you have some constitutional problems with this -- but a strong Japan, a Japan able to manage more of its own defense, will be a great factor for stability in that whole area. And while we're talking peace, there are some who seem to suggest that if you're talking military strength, you're talking against peace. Well, I don't know of anyone that ever got into a war because they were too strong.

Soviet Union with their attempts at expansionism. What we need is to have the military strength to deter aggression at the same time that we try to convince the aggressors that they, too, will be better off in a peaceful world.

So yes, we appreciate very much what Japan has done in increasing their own defense. I know that a goal, and one I hope they'll achieve soon, is to be able to protect for 1,000 miles around your trade lines and your supply lines. And we want to continue the relationship we have in that regard.

The President. Well, I'm afraid I almost answered that question in advance to your earlier question there. Yes, those restrictions which I mentioned a moment ago. We must find where, fairly, we can reconcile the differences between our currencies. We must remove restrictions that impair trade back and forth, and we must -- just as we're friends and allies in everything else -- we must have that same kind of approach to our trade with each other, our opening of our capital markets to each other for investment.

The President. Well, with regard to the Republic of China, we are working very hard to establish a stronger relationship, one that has always in the past characterized the relationship between our country and China. I think we've been making great progress. Prime Minister Zhao Ziyang will be visiting here this winter, and next spring I expect to visit the People's Republic of China myself.

With the Soviet Union, we have to recognize there that there is where we must have the strength to deter aggression. They seem bent on worldwide expansionism. They have 50 divisions on the Chinese border. They have about 120 SS - 20 nuclear missiles on that border. They have the largest fleet, the largest of their fleets is in the Pacific, in the area of both Japan and the People's Republic of China. So, there we must have the patience to convince them that peace would be to their advantage, also. And in the meantime, the only way to protect the peace is to have the strength to deter.

Yes, you and I were born in the same year. I like to think it was a good vintage year. But we've had an opportunity to see war and peace throughout these years, to see how foolishly sometimes war came upon us, and at the same time to see the spread of democracy and what it has brought.

Kong, Taiwan, Singapore and see where the principles of free commerce and trade, the principles of democracy are at work, how much better off they are than those countries that have followed the totalitarian path of communism and statism.

Mr. Shikanai. Many people, both here and in the rest of the world, now refer to Japan as an economic superpower. Within the overall context of U.S.-Japan relations, what are your principal expectations for this new, more powerful Japan?

The President. Well -- and I think this is a classic example for the world -- there is one superpower in the world today that is recognized as such simply because of its military strength and not because of any achievements that it has made in commerce and industry or the living standard of its people. In fact, to maintain their military strength, that power has denied the comforts of living to its people.

On the other hand, you are the second industrial and commercial power in the world. So in that sense you have become a superpower in the peaceful pursuits of commerce and trade and good living for your people. And that is well deserved. That's why we are allies.

Mr. President, it seems to me that the timing of your visit to Korea couldn't be more timely and more appropriate to witness the anger and sorrow of the Korean people. What significance do you give to your forthcoming visit to Korea, sir?

The President. Well, hopefully, to talk over any problems we may have, although they would be very few because of the strong relationship that we have there. Certainly, my visit was not planned with these tragedies in mind that have taken place. But the very fact that they have and the two great tragedies that have befallen your own country -- the airplane massacre and then the terrible deeds in Rangoon -- make it even more imperative that we continue to strengthen the bonds between our two countries.

So, I'm looking forward to this trip. President Chun visited us here, and I'm happy to have the opportunity to make a return visit over there to -- well, I guess it could be summed up in that I think it's important that people talk to each other instead of about each other.

Mr. Jung. Last week, the Burmese Government announced officially that the North Koreans were fully responsible for the recent murder of 17 Korean Government officials and journalists. Yet the Government of Korea was very restrained in its response to this senseless provocation in Burma.

I had those same feelings about the tragedy in Beirut. But getting the people directly responsible and doing something to indicate that terrorism does have its punishment is a little different than just blindly striking out, and that's why, as I say, I admire the restraint that your government has shown.

The main thing that we must do about terrorism, though, is show the terrorists that it doesn't work. We know that the terrorist act against our own people in Beirut was designed to make us retreat, to make us say, ``Well, we'll take our men out of there. We'll abandon the mission that they were sent to perform.'' Well, we're going to prove to them that terrorist acts are not going to drive us away.

Mr. Jung.  The next question is about the Pacific Basin community evolution. A close cooperation among Pacific Basin nations is necessary to take a full advantage of the region's potential. In this context, President Chun of Korea has proposed a summit conference to discuss a closer cooperation. My question is, what future role the U.S. are playing in the Pacific region?

Pacific Ocean, that we are a nation of the Pacific Basin. So, I foresee much greater and closer cooperation and relationship between the United States and the nations of East Asia and look forward to it because I think that is the new frontier in the world.

Mr. Jung. Korea is among America's top 10 -- to be exact, 9th -- trading partners in terms of trade volume. However, complaints of protectionism have been heard by both sides. Mr. President, how can we best ensure that our trading relationship grows and prospers without any friction?

The President. Well, I think, again, that this is one of the things to be talked about, because we know from history and experience that protectionism might have a short-term advantage. But in the long range, it destroys prosperity, it doesn't create it. And since we are such close trading partners -- in fact, we import more from Korea than any other country in the world. And I think that where there are friction points with regard to trade restrictions, tariffs or whatever, we must study every one of those and make sure that we do not drift into protectionism but have the ultimate in free trade between us.

Mr. Jung. Prior to your taking office, the withdrawal of American troops from Korea was proposed by a previous administration. I understand you have no plan either to reduce or withdraw American troops from Korea. My question is, do you think, however, that one division of combat troops is enough in size to deter a North Korean attack?

The President. Right now, yes, I believe that it is, and with the knowledge of other forces that we have within range. And part of that is because of the great development of the Republic of Korea's own military forces and the great progress that has been made there. At the same time, we continue to watch this. When it was advocated that we withdraw those troops, before I was President, just as a citizen and a candidate, I objected and disapproved of that suggestion. So, I think it is imperative that while we see no need now for a change that we continue to observe closely, and if ever we feel the tensions have reached a point where that would be necessary that we augment those troops, that we do so.

Mr. Jung. The Republic of Korea and the PRC, that's China, currently have no diplomatic relations. While the PRC continues to support North Korea, their attitude towards Korea considerably seems to have softened since the normalization of the diplomatic relation with the United States. My question is, what do you feel are the prospects for normal relations between the PRC and the Republic of Korea?

The President. I would think that it would be stabilizing to the entire area and that, while care be exercised, that both countries should seriously look at the possibilities and the prospects for a better relationship.

The President. Well, from all that I had known of an earlier Korea and what I saw there on that visit made me think I was living in the presence of a miracle. The great development of Korea, the modernization that had taken place -- it was a thriving, energetic, industrial, and very productive society that I saw, and I came away greatly impressed.

We have brought inflation down to a fraction of what it was. We've cut our interest rates in half -- we have much further to go in that. And our unemployment is dropping rapidly. As a matter of fact, just last month our unemployment reached a point that in our most optimistic predictions we had thought we wouldn't reach for another year or more. And I believe that the United States recovering that much can have an effect worldwide in the other countries where recession has prevailed, so that I'm optimistic that we are on our way to a solid recovery and it will be worldwide.

Since my last report (August 18, 1983), the Greek Cypriots and the Turkish Cypriots have responded privately to an initiative undertaken by UN Secretary General Perez de Cuellar in early August to promote the resumption of the intercommunal talks which have been suspended since May of this year. At the same time, Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash proposed a meeting between himself and President Kyprianou with the Secretary General. The Secretary General is examining the responses and proposals with a view toward bringing both sides back to the conference table.

The Administration's policy throughout the period under review has been one of continued active support for the Secretary General's role, including his August initiative. We have assured the Secretary General and the two Cypriot communities that we support the early resumption of the talks to focus on the substantive issues separating the two communities.

Our activities over the period have included high-level meetings between senior State Department officials and leaders of both the Government of Cyprus and the Turkish Cypriot community. In addition, we have reiterated to both the Government of Greece and Government of Turkey our strong desire to see substantive progress in the intercommunal negotiating process.

A. Chapman, retired from the Foreign Service. Richard Haass was appointed by the Secretary to replace Mr. Chapman. Assistant Secretary Burt and Mr. Haass will appear before the House Foreign Affairs Committee soon to outline the present situation on the island and to describe the Administration's Cyprus policy.

Since November 1979 Mrs. Tuttle has been active in political campaign management, serving as chairman or finance director in a number of State, local, and national campaigns. Between 1975 and 1979, Mrs. Tuttle founded and operated a real estate investment, renovation, and interior design business in southern California. Prior to that, Mrs. Tuttle taught history at the secondary level in the Los Angeles County city school system.

Mrs. Tuttle has long been active in civic, cultural, and charitable organizations. Among other things, she has served on the board of trustees of the Coro Foundation, the Natural History Museum, the Junior League of Los Angeles, and was appointed by the President to the John F.

Telecommunications and Information Administration, effective October 28, 1983. During the many years we have known you, Nancy and I have come to regard you as almost a member of the family. We have relied on your expertise and your foresight to handle so many of the daily problems in communications and other areas that it is going to be very hard to imagine things flowing smoothly in your absence.

We want you to know, however, that we are delighted at the opportunity that has opened up for you in the private sector. You can be sure that Nancy and I send you our very best wishes for every future success and happiness, even as we remember with great pleasure the many years you have been with us.

This is to inform you that I have submitted my resignation to Secretary Baldrige. As you know, I resigned to accept a position with The Pacific Telephone and Telegraph Company. It has been an honor and a privilege to serve in your administration, and I will always treasure the memories of that service.

Well, in a few moments, as you know, Nancy and I will be aboard Marine One to begin the first leg of our trip to Japan and Korea. We've looked forward for a long time to visting both countries and, I can say, visiting them again. We make this journey as ambassadors for peace and prosperity between the citizens of our two lands -- or three lands.

We'll travel a great distance, but I know we'll meet with many good friends and people who feel close to America and to our people. Our country is a Pacific nation -- and I mean ``Pacific'' in the terms of an ocean, not just peaceful -- and this trip will spotlight the great importance that we place on our ties with Northeast Asia and the Pacific Basin.

Our three countries share treasures of a rich and varied past. As freedom-loving people, we also share a great dream. Japan, Korea, and America are the nations of the future. We're builders of tomorrow and working as partners to make tomorrow better and more secure. We can do this because Korea, for one, ranks among our top 10 partners in trade worldwide. Japan, of course, is our top partner, economically.

Our Pacific trade has exceeded our trade with Europe during the eighties. This dynamic growth points to the importance of our economic relations, particularly in trade and financial matters with both countries. Four out of five new manufacturing jobs created in the last 5 years were in export-related industries. We still work hard, and will, to foster a new era of equality and economic cooperation in our bilateral relations.

The Soviet shooting down of KAL 007, their continued military buildup in Asia, including the development of the SS - 20 missiles there, are grim reminders to us that we live in a dangerous world. I will reaffirm America's commitment to remain a reliable partner for peace and stability in the region and in the world.

Now, in both Tokyo and Seoul, we will look for ways to make the region even more stable and secure. Like all good things, partnerships require a willingness to listen and to work hard and to compromise. And that's the spirit of our trip. I'm confident that our bonds of friendship will be strengthened in the next few days.

As we reach out to each other, we'll also be reaching out to the rest of the world. Closer relations in the Pacific make for more prosperous conditions worldwide. And the increasing global responsibilities being undertaken by both Japan and Korea are very positive developments for those who cherish peace and seek economic progress and human freedom. I believe we'll grow closer and grow together if we keep our eyes fixed on our community of interests and shared values.

Again, we welcome this opportunity to get to show the good people of Japan and Korea that we want to know them better. And we're most thankful that we'll be able to spend some time on our trip also with our service men and women over there.

Now, I thank you all very much for coming to see Nancy and me off. And because some of you have suggested that you're doing this, thank you for your prayers, and you'll be in our thoughts and very close to our hearts. And now there isn't anything left to say but goodby, and God bless you.

Chronic diseases of the lung afflict well over 17 million Americans, cause more than 200,000 deaths annually, and cost the Nation more than $29.4 billion in lost wages and medical expenses plus untold dollars in lost productivity.

Almost seven million Americans, including over two million children, suffer from asthma. Two and one-half million Americans have emphysema, while almost eight million suffer from chronic bronchitis. Furthermore, it is expected that deaths from lung cancer will surpass breast cancer as the leading cause of cancer deaths among American women during this decade.

Leading the fight in the voluntary sector to prevent illness, disability, and death from lung disease is the American Lung Association -- the Christmas Seal people -- a nonprofit public health organization supported by individual contributions to Christmas Seals and other donations.

In addition, the American Lung Association, through its community lung Associations, helps educate the public, patients and their families about lung diseases; sponsors community action programs for good lung health; underwrites medical research; supports education for physicians and other health care workers; and wages vigorous campaigns against cigarette smoking and air pollution. The primary source of funding for more than 70 years has been Christmas Seals. This year, Christmas Seals will be in 60 million homes.

You know, I know that you are kind to a tenderfoot up here. I remember the story of one who arrived, and an old fellow up here was showing him the routine with the sledge dogs. And he said, ``Look, you can walk among them. You can pat them on the head. You can feed them. Don't fall down.'' [Laughter] And you know, that's good advice in Washington. [Laughter] I was going to even almost try to fool you. I could prove that I know a little about Alaska. I was going to recite ``The Shooting of Dan McGrew.'' But I won't.

But I want you to know I've always had an admiration for the spirit of this State. And I won't deny that I have a special kinship with your delegation. And, Governor, you'll forgive me, but I don't know of any other States where the entire congressional delegation is Republican.

But Alaska does represent something very special to most Americans. You are the conquerors of the last frontier. Many of your values and ways are reminiscent of those that built our great country. Your love of nature and the land, your individualistic pride, your spirit of enterprise, all these things have contributed to a well-deserved Alaskan mystique. My only request to you is keep doing what you do best.

Well, you may not catch them with dynamite, but your State is responsible for two-fifths, 40 percent of America's fish harvest. Your State is a treasure trove of resources vital to our economy and to the well-being of every American. One-eighth of our gold comes from Alaska. And just how vulnerable would we be had we followed the advice of those who opposed the Alaskan oil pipeline?

Today we should all say, ``Thank you, Alaska,'' because Alaskan oil accounts for one-fifth of our total domestic production. And all of this concerns more than economic growth, as important as that is. Alaska possesses 10 of the 16 vital materials needed for our nation's security. In short, you add tremendously to our economic well-being and to our security. And you do it with only 443,000 people, and that's pretty impressive.

Northeast Asia and the countries of the Pacific. In the 21st century we can foresee vastly expanding economic, political, and cultural bonds with these countries. I believe we'll witness a wave of productive and creative endeavors improving the quality of life on both sides of the Pacific.

They have the Yankee spirit that we once called our own. We're in the midst of restoring that spirit. Here in Alaska you never lost it. Alaska, with its vast resources, strategic location, and enterprising people, will play an increasingly important role as the potential of the Pacific unfolds.

Our progress depends on a strong United States. We've come a long way in strengthening our economy in the last few years. We've brought inflation down dramatically, and we've put our economy back on the road to robust growth after years of stagnation. And as I've said, you Alaskans contributed far beyond your numbers in these endeavors.

Peace is essential if we're to realize our economic potential. And to maintain peace we must maintain a strong defense. Alaska has much of which to be proud on this account -- [applause] -- you have much to be proud of in this account as well. You are a first line of defense. This is becoming ever-more apparent in the wake of the Soviets' brutal downing of a civilian airliner.

May I take this opportunity to thank all of our service personnel who are stationed here. Now, many of you are far from home; sometimes you're lonely. Sometimes, until you get used to it, I suppose the elements are tough. But each one of you contributes to our security in a very real way. I just want you all to know your families and friends appreciate you, and so do 230 million other Americans.

Congressman Young, for their unswerving support for a strong national defense. Your representatives to Washington are showing that Alaskans are willing to do what is necessary to protect our freedom and preserve the peace.

Now, Ted Stevens was unable to join us today because he's continuing his outstanding work in managing the Department of Defense's appropriation bill on the floor of the Senate. And just before we landed, I was told that it was worthwhile his staying there, because George Bush, as Vice President, cast the tie-breaking vote to pass the military appropriations bill.

Back in June, I signed into law a bill that was declaring what you were just told a few minutes ago, that January 3d would be Alaskan Statehood Day, marks that great milestone, your 25th anniversary as a member of the United States. And I'm certain that Alaska's next 25 years will be enriching and rewarding years for you, the residents of this mighty State and for the rest of your fellow citizens down below.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished guests, please allow me to say a few words on behalf of the Government and people of Japan and on my own behalf. Welcome to the President of the United States of America and Mrs. Reagan.

I wish to express anew my gratitude to the President and Mrs. Reagan and the American people of all walks of life for the most heartwarming welcome accorded to me during my visits to Washington in January and May.

In particular, I will never forget the wonderful birthday surprise the President and Mrs. Reagan arranged for me at the White House in May. Today I am deeply pleased to be able to reciprocate your thoughtfulness in my humble way.

Mr. President, you may recall that in our meeting in May, we promised to cooperate with each other, you as a pitcher and I as a catcher. We have been living up to our promise since then, not only as a formidable battery over the Pacific but also as excellent teammates of the free world.

The President. Mr. Prime Minister, Mrs. Nakasone, members of the Diet, distinguished guests, and ladies and gentlemen, just before this delightful luncheon we finished the second of two long, productive talks. I don't know who was pitching and who was catching -- [laughter] -- but those talks demonstrated that despite the 5,000 miles of ocean between us and the difference in our geography, history, and culture, Japan and America share the same deeply held values.

As the American educator Robert Hutchins wrote, ``Democracy is the only form of government that is founded on the dignity of man -- not the dignity of some men, or rich men, or educated men . . . but on all men.'' Democratic freedoms, we both know, make a nation not only noble but dynamic. Individuals in democracies can give full scope to their energies and talents, conducting experiments, exchanging knowledge, and making breakthrough after breakthrough.

In just the past few decades, men and women acting in freedom have markedly improved the health and living standards of the whole human race. Innovations in fertilizers, farm machinery, land use made in democracies have increased agricultural output across the world.

Medical advances made in democracies, from the discovery of penicillin to the identification of vitamins, means that people everywhere on Earth live longer than ever before. And electronics breakthroughs made in democracies have produced a telecommunications network that links nations around the globe. Of course Japan has been leading the way in one of those -- electronics.

And, Mr. Prime Minister, I can't resist telling you that we Americans who have traditionally prided ourselves in being the first with the most have now met our competition. [Laughter] I understand that in a single Tokyo store, one can find 205 varieties of stereo headphones and 100 different television models.

Today it's the democracies -- especially Japan and America -- that are leading a high-tech revolution that promises to change life on Earth even more profoundly than did the industrial revolution of a century ago. This revolution ranges from electron microscopes that can inspect molecules to satellites that are probing the dark infinities of space. It's a revolution that's making industries vastly more efficient, putting the world's great literature, film, and music at families' fingertips, and producing medical breakthroughs that are helping many of the blind see and many of the handicapped to walk.

State-controlled economies, by contrast, just haven't been able to keep up. Before Korea was divided, its industrial center was in the north. Today the Republic of Korea outproduces North Korea by 3 to 1. In Europe the per capita income of West Germany is more than twice that of East Germany. As we both know, Mr. Prime Minister, the true division in the world today is not between east and west, but between progress and stagnation, between freedom and oppression, between hope and despair.

Looking back on his long career, one of Japan's foremost leaders, Yukio Ozaki, said, ``For the happiness of one nation we should endeavor toward the enhancement of the happiness of the entire world.'' Both Japan and America share this view, and we both know that the happiness of the world depends on liberty.

Mr. Prime Minister, as a man who has worked tirelessly to defend and promote human freedom, you have led a career of long and varied service to your country. You first won a seat in the Diet in 1947; since 1959 you've held five Cabinet posts; and today you lead your nation. With gratitude for your efforts, on behalf of the American people, I salute you.

Earlier in the day, the President and the Prime Minister held an hour-long meeting in the second floor lounge of the residence. At the conclusion of the meeting, they were joined by Mrs. Reagan and Mrs. Nakasone and attended a reception which preceded the luncheon.

Yesterday and today, the President and I had very productive meetings covering a wide range of subjects. Through these meetings, we reconfirmed the importance for Japan and the United States, two countries sharing the common ideas and values of freedom and democracy of promoting further cooperation towards peace and prosperity of the world.

The President has a clear recognition of the importance of the Asian and the Pacific region. His present visit to Japan and the Republic of Korea and his planned visit to China next year amply testify this fact, together with his visit to the countries in Southeast Asia, which I am sure will be rescheduled in the future. The economic dynamism in the Asian and the Pacific region is one of the central elements in the expansion of the world economy. Thus, the President and I are in full agreement that we should continue to make efforts for the further development of the Asian and the Pacific region.

Williamsburg summit in May this year declaring that we should maintain the unity and solidarity among the Western countries in our joint endeavor in pursuit of freedom, peace, and stability of the prosperity of the world economy, and of the development in the Third World.

As I know the recent events of increasing tension in the East-West relations, as well as frequent occurrences of regional disputes and violence in various parts of the world, I am worried that the peace in the world could be gravely threatened if such trends continue and amplify themselves.

Under such circumstances, I firmly believe that the countries of the world should renew their resolve for the maintenance of freedom, peace, and stability, for the revitalization of the world economy, and for the prosperity of the peoples of the world.

I further believe that the rational dialogs and negotiations should be conducted to solve such international conflicts and disputes, and that the parties concerned should spare no effort in taking step-by-step measures or gradual approach in pursuit of ultimate goals, and should carry on steady and realistic endeavors. This I consider is particularly pertinent to the arms control negotiations.

The Western countries should stand firmly in unity and solidarity for freedom and peace and should not hesitate to bear any hardships in upholding this cause. All these points are included in the Tokyo Statement. It is, indeed, truly significant, Mr. President, that you have fully endorsed this statement in our meeting.

With regard to the INF negotiations in particular, it was reconfirmed that the negotiations should not be conducted at the sacrifice of the Asian region, but should be conducted on a global basis, taking the Asian security into consideration.

With respect to the recent bombing in Burma, the very act of terrorism, we agreed that it should be strongly condemned as an inexcusable conduct in challenge of world peace and order and that continued efforts must be made to bring about lasting peace and stability on the Korean peninsula.

The Japan-U.S. security arrangements are the foundation of the peace and security of Japan and the Far East. I wish to express that Japan will continue her efforts towards further strengthening the credibility of the Japan-U.S. security arrangements. With respect to the improvement of our defense capability, I wish to continue to make further efforts along the lines of the joint communique of May 1981.

As to the international economy, the President and I reconfirmed -- in line with the declaration of the Williamsburg summit -- the importance of obtaining sustained, noninflationary growth of the world economy, of rolling back protectionism, and of lowering the prevailing high interest rates.

With regard to bilateral economic issues, we acknowledge the achievements made thus far and agree to continue our efforts for the solution of the remaining issues. In this context, I highly appreciated the pledge by the President to combat protectionism in the United States.

The President and I are in full agreement on the importance of the yen-dollar issue. We have agreed on establishing consultative fora on exchange rate issues and investment. In this connection, I asked for continued U.S. efforts to lower U.S. interest rates.

The President and I have also underscored the importance of greater two-way investment flows between our two countries, and I expressed my concern that the unitary method of taxation is becoming a serious impediment to the Japanese investment in the United States. I stressed the importance of promoting the preparations of a new round of multilateral trade negotiations in order to consolidate the free trading system and to inject renewed confidence in the world economy. I am very glad that the President has strongly supported my view. We intend to call on other countries to join in our efforts.

Mr. President, in the present international situation, you are shouldering enormous global responsibilities. I will, on my part, make as much contribution as possible to the peace and prosperity of the world.

Prime Minister Nakasone, as you've been told, have just completed 2 days of very productive discussions on a wide range of bilateral issues and global affairs. As leaders of two great Pacific nations, we're guardians of a strong, rich, and diverse relationship. Japan and America are bound by shared values of freedom, democracy, and peace. We're committed to greater future cooperation across a broad spectrum of political, economic, security, educational, culture, and scientific affairs.

I have come as a friend of Japan seeking to strengthen our partnership for peace, prosperity, and progress. I will leave Japan confident that our partnership is stronger than before and confident that we're giving birth to a new era in Japanese-American relations. We have agreed to move forward with an agenda for progress by drawing upon the great well of talent, drive, determination, and creativity of our free peoples. We welcome Japan's more assertive role as a fellow trustee of peace and progress in international economic and political affairs.

We have discussed global issues, and we hold many similar views on opportunities for cooperation. The principles that Prime Minister Nakasone has enunciated as the Tokyo Statement are principles that I fully endorse. Together we have no greater responsibility than to make our world a safer place.

There are serious threats to peace on the Korean peninsula, in the Middle East, in the Caribbean, and over the Northwestern Pacific. Also, the attitude on the part of our adversary at the negotiating table on arms talks is at odds with the will of the world to reduce the weapons of war and build a more stable peace.

I conveyed to the Prime Minister my satisfaction that our mutual security relationship is proceeding smoothly. Japan is host to 45,000 American troops, and our bases in Japan, made possible by the Treaty of Mutual Cooperation and Security, are essential not only to the defense of Japan but also contribute to peace and prosperity in the Far East. As for Japan's defense efforts, the United States remains convinced that the most important contribution Japan can make toward the peace and security in Asia is for Japan to provide for its own defense and share more of the burden of our mutual defense effort.

During our discussions on arms control, I assured Prime Minister Nakasone that we seek global reductions in the Soviet's intermediate-range SS - 20's to the lowest level possible. The United States will take no action in the intermediate nuclear forces negotiations that adversely affects the security of Asia. We agreed on the urgency of achieving consensus on comprehensive international safeguards to prevent the spread of nuclear weaponry.

Prime Minister Nakasone and I discussed Japan and America's compelling international economic responsibilities as spelled out at the Williamsburg summit. Together we must press for continuing liberalization of the international trade and financial system, fight protectionism, promote economic development without inflation by encouraging the growth of free enterprise throughout the world, and share the obligation of assisting developing countries, including those facing severe debt problems. We also agreed to enhance coordination in foreign assistance.

Trade issues figure prominently in the Japan-U.S. relationship. There's no simple, overnight solution to our trade problems, but we have agreed to exert our best and continued efforts to solve these issues. We welcome recent actions by your government to reduce trade barriers, and I've emphasized the importance of further measures to open the Japanese market to trade and investment.

I didn't come to negotiate specific trade issues, but I did indicate certain issues of immediate importance to us. Because of both their trade and consumer significance, for example, we're seeking reductions in Japan's tariffs on certain products in which the U.S. is highly competitive.

Progress in Japan-U.S. trade issues can foster greater trade liberalization efforts worldwide, such as the Prime Minister's call for a new round of multilateral trade negotiations, which I heartily endorse.

We have noted the importance of the yen-dollar exchange rate, of free and open capital markets in each country. We stress the need for closer economic consultations between the two governments. A ministerial-level working group is being set up to monitor each side's progress in carrying out the agreed-upon actions to improve the yen-dollar exchange rate.

Our mutual commitment toward specific steps to achieve open capital markets will allow the yen to reflect more fully Japan's underlying political stability and economic strength as the second largest economy in the free world. In addition, we've agreed to instruct our economic sub-Cabinet members to form a committee to promote mutual investments.

Progress must come one step at a time, but Japan and America have begun taking those steps together. I've been heartened that beginning with our first meeting last January, continuing with the Williamsburg summit, and now again during our visit this week, Prime Minister Nakasone and I have agreed that our two great democracies share special responsibilities to each other and to the world. Let us continue to go forward, building on our progress step by step. We must set milestones to monitor the success of our agenda for progress and to assure the followthrough that is essential. And I will be discussing this matter in more detail with the Prime Minister tomorrow.

This visit has strengthened the bonds of friendship between our two great nations. We are now better prepared to work together as partners to build a more peaceful and prosperous future at home and throughout the world. We know what needs to be done; we know how it must be done.

Note: Prime Minister Nakasone spoke at 2:35 p.m. to reporters assembled in the auditorium of the Prime Minister's official residence. The Prime Minister spoke in Japanese, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter.

We're revolted that once again the people of Lebanon have been subjected to terror and injury, this time around Tripoli, by the radical and brutal behavior of Palestinian factions and their supporters. It is tragic that once again the civilian population of Lebanon is victim to hostilities not of their making and over which they are unable to exercise influence and control.

We urge the governments in the area to bring their influence to bear constructively to end the fighting. We suggest that all governments be open to any suggestions from appropriate international organizations for humanitarian and relief efforts to relieve the suffering. As a first specific step to assist, the United States is in the process of contributing $1 million to the International Red Cross to be used for relief activities in Lebanon.

Before I go any further, may I extend my early birthday greeting to someone who couldn't be here, my good friend and your distinguished former Prime Minister, Mr. Nobazuki Kishi, who in just 3 days turns 88.

This gathering marks the way that we Americans and Japanese rely on each other for our prosperity. Japan and America are separated by thousands of miles of ocean, different languages, and different cultures, yet in our robust trade -- everything from food to computers -- we've found a way to help each other create abundance.

And this year it's expected that Japan will account for a tenth of all of America's exports, more than any other nation overseas; that America will buy a quarter of all Japanese exports; and that total trade between our two nations will surpass $60 billion.

Our vigorous trade has given us a chance to learn from one another, and it is in large part because of that trade that today our nations are leading a technological revolution that promises to change life even more profoundly than did the Industrial Revolution of a century ago.

All of us want to keep Japanese-American business healthy and expanding. And that means we must continue to promote not just trade but free trade. To the Japanese here tonight, let me say, ``Congratulations.'' Many in this room played a key role over the past three-and-a-half decades in making Japan an economic miracle. Your imagination, energy, and determination have made this nation one of the most prosperous on Earth and focused economic growth throughout the Pacific Basin.

And now that Japan has become a giant in the world economy, your nation shares the responsibility for keeping that economy strong. In recent years, Japan has begun to open its markets to more goods and services from abroad. Prime Minister Nakasone has continued these positive actions, and we appreciate all your efforts.

America does have trade problems with Japan, and we seek the cooperation of your government so we can solve them together. We must work for lower barriers on both sides of the Pacific. And we hope to see your capital markets open to more foreign participation. This will help establish a greater international role for the yen and would contribute to an improvement in the imbalance between our two currencies.

As leaders of Japanese business, you can help make certain that Japan leads in the drive for greater free trade to strengthen the international economy. The well-being of both our nations will depend, to a large extent, on your efforts.

I've heard -- well, as leaders of Japanese business, you can make certain that Japan leads in the drive for greater free trade to strengthen the international economy. The well-being of both our nations will depend, to a large extent, on your efforts. I've heard about the private efforts of Japanese businessmen to establish a permanent home for the America-Japan Society of Tokyo and other organizations dedicated to expanding cultural exchanges and good will between our two countries. And I hope these efforts succeed.

To the Americans here tonight, let me say simply, ``Keep up the good work.'' You're pioneers, showing that although doing business here is hard work, the rewards are worth it. More and more, Japan is proving a fruitful market for American goods and services. Your fine example will encourage other American businesses to follow you here and expand Japanese-American trade still further.

And I want you to know that as Americans doing business in Japan, you have this administration's full support. We're working as hard in Washington as you are here to make certain your opportunities in Japan keep growing. The Tsukuba Exposition will provide an excellent opportunity for America to demonstrate the latest in technology. I hope many of your companies will be able to participate and cooperate in this exposition with Jim Needham, who's directing the U.S. Pavilion.

I understand that it's a tradition in Japan for businessmen to make contracts final simply by giving their word or shaking hands. That kind of transaction, of course, requires deep mutual trust and respect. Neither of our nations can open its markets completely in an afternoon. But working step by step and without delay, we can build that kind of mutual trust and respect.

One hundred and thirty-one years ago our ancestors began gradually laying the foundation for one of the most significant relationships between two countries anywhere in the world. When our people first met on shores not too far from here, we had difficulty understanding each other. Few cultures and histories could have been more different than our two were in the 1850's.

And today, the language of our two countries is still different, but we understand and appreciate each other as never before. We, in fact, depend on each other and benefit beyond calculation from our relationship. We're not only major trading partners; we're also cooperating in a host of international and political endeavors to strengthen peace and increase prosperity beyond our own borders.

Basic to all our efforts are the close and cooperative ties that we've built between our people, from young students who study in each other's schools and universities, to the daily interaction of our businessmen, politicians, scientists, creative artists, and athletes. The multitude of personal and professional relationships is like millions of threads binding us together with a strength and resilience that will not be broken.

The ties between our people are based on common ideals and values. But beyond this, our people like and admire each other. Americans appreciate the energy and hard work of the Japanese. And while in the arena of business we're indeed competitors, we are friendly competitors, and we respect one another.

If friendship has meaning, it can be found in the genuine feelings and commitment between our two peoples. As the American philosopher Emerson wrote, ``The only way to have a friend is to be one.'' The American people admire Japan, its great progress, its people's fortitude and dedication, its splendid and delicate culture, its increasingly vital role in world affairs.

We admire you, Your Majesty, because you symbolize this nation's history and traditions and represent the dramatic transformation of these beautiful islands and stalwart people. Your love of country and for Japan's democratic institutions, your devotion to science, to the search for truth, your deep attachment to nature around you -- these and many other aspects of your life and that of your splendid family, give your people strength and unite them in their beliefs and ideals.

Last year the Flower Association of Japan presented 1 million flowering cherry tree seeds to the people of the United States so this beauty could be spread throughout our country. In January of this year, our National Arboretum presented flowering dogwood seeds to your country. These flowers can serve to remind us of the beauty of our friendship. Unlike these trees which blossom only once a year, let the flower of our friendship be never ending.

Our two countries, beginning their relationship in confusion and uncertainty, now are the closest of friends and partners. My visit to your country has reaffirmed my confidence in the future of our relations. May they ever be as close as they are today.

Taking account of the energy prospects for the entire Pacific basin, the two countries agree that the sound expansion of U.S.-Japan energy trade will contribute to the further development of the close economic and energy security relationship which exists between the two countries.

They will continue to discuss and find ways of developing this trade for the mutual benefit of both countries, noting the importance of long-term cooperation, the central role of the private sector, and the need for a balance between economic cost and energy security.

Both countries consider Alaska to be a particularly promising area for joint development of energy resources. Both governments will encourage private sector discussions regarding the possibilities for such development.

A. The U.S. and Japan recognize that if legislative barriers can be removed, the U.S. has the potential to ship substantial quantities of crude oil to Japan, thereby increasing economic incentives for U.S. oil production and helping to diversify Japan's energy sources. The U.S. will continue to keep under review the removal of restrictions on exports of domestic crude oil.

B. The U.S. and Japan will encourage private industry in both countries to undertake now the pre-feasibility or feasibility studies necessary to determine the extent to which Alaskan natural gas can be jointly developed by U.S. and Japanese interests.

C. The U.S. and Japan will encourage private industry in both countries to discuss the possibility of concluding long-term coal contracts and jointly developing mines and transportation systems to make American coal more competitive in the Japanese market.

As economic recovery proceeds, Japan will encourage its industries to consider purchase of more competitively priced U.S. steam coal to meet future demands not already covered by existing contracts. In addition, Japan will invite the private sector concerned to explore the possibility of further increasing substitution of coal for oil in electrical generation.

E. With regard to metallurgical coal, both sides noted that the depressed state of world steel manufacturing had reduced demand for traded coal. However, in view of the fact that the U.S. has been a major supplier to the Japanese market, both sides will endeavor to maintain the level of Japanese imports of U.S. coal. Japan expects that imports of competitively priced U.S. metallurgical coal will not continue to decline, and will encourage its steel industry to increase U.S. coal imports when conditions in the industry permit.

F. As a first step toward developing U.S.-Japan coal trade, from a mid- to long-term prospective, a mission composed of representatives of major Japanese coal users and other appropriate interests will visit the U.S. to meet with major coal mining and transportation interests. The purpose of this mission will be to explore the possibility of expanding coal trade between the U.S. and Japan, and the possibility of conducting a major study of the opportunities for reducing the delivered price in Japan of U.S. coal.

There is so much in Japan's history and culture that impresses us. Americans are full of admiration for the Japanese people, the warmth of your ways, your spirit of initiative and teamwork, and your strong traditions of devotion to family, education, and progress.

You have brought great development and prosperity to your country. We know that the struggle for better living was often difficult in earlier days. But endurance, tenacity, and sheer hard work -- qualities which I understand are beautifully portrayed in your popular TV drama, ``Oshin'' -- have brought your nation great economic success.

Prefecture, which I understand is very far from Tokyo. Mr. Okumura invited Nancy and me to visit his country school and his 27 students. Mr. Okumura, I wanted to drop in on your school and talk with your students, but our stay in Japan this week has been too short. We wish we had time to meet more people and see more of your beautiful country, including such places as Kyoto, Hokkaido, Hiroshima, Nara, and Nagasaki.

Diet today, we may live thousands of miles apart, but we're neighbors, friends, and partners, bound by a community of interests and shared values. Michitaro Matsusaki, one of Japan's earlier diplomats, said to Commodore Perry in 1854 what millions of us feel today: Japan and America, all the same heart.

Our countries enjoy great prosperity. We live in free and open societies. But much of the world lives in poverty, dominated by dictators unwilling to let people live in peace and freedom. That's why our relationship is so important. Japan and America shoulder global responsibilities, but with every responsibility comes opportunity.

We can share with the world our secrets of economic growth and human progress. We can offer the sunlight of democracy to people everywhere who dream of escaping the darkness of tyranny to decide their own destinies.

Japan and America are nations of the future, builders of tomorrow, and together we can build a brighter tomorrow. We can make this world a much safer, more secure, and prosperous place. I know with all my heart that if we have faith to believe in each other, to trust in the talent and goodness of the hard-working people in our great cities and small towns, then, yes, we will make our partnership grow, and together there is nothing Japan and America cannot do.

Q. Mr. President, listening to your statement, like many other people I find that you are indeed a great communicator. I say this not because you said very kind words about our famous city of drama, but because I think that your personal style on television is more relaxed and informal than that of many other politicians. That is why, with your approval, Mr. President, I would like to conduct this interview in a very informal way so that the Japanese people can get a clearer view of your personality.

The President. Well, horseback riding is certainly one, and all the things that go with having a ranch. I do a lot of the work whenever I have the opportunity to get there that has to be done around a ranch. As a matter of fact, just this summer we had a number of days at the ranch, and I managed to build, with the help of two friends, build about 400 more feet of fence that we built out of telephone poles. [Laughter] And it can get a little back breaking, but I enjoy that.

Someone once asked me when I was ever going to have the ranch finished, and I said I hope never, because I enjoy that. But there are other things, of course. I enjoy reading. I enjoy athletics of other kinds. And now, thanks to the generosity of your Prime Minister since his last visit there -- while I don't get to play golf very often, I will now be playing it with a brand new set of golf clubs which he presented to me.

The President. Well, yes, I'm very pleased with what has taken place here. First of all the warmth of the reception from all your people, and I mean not just the people of diplomacy and government that I had dealings with, but your people there on the streets and their showing of hospitality and friendship has been very heartwarming. But I have always believed that we only get in trouble when we're talking about each other instead of to each other. And since we've had an opportunity here to not only speak with your Diet but then to meet with your Prime Minister and others -- and, of course, I have been greatly honored to have been received by His Imperial Majesty, your Emperor -- I think that we have established a human kind of bond, not just one that is framed in diplomacy, but an understanding of each other as people. And I think that the world needs more of this.

Q. Mr. President, I would like you to know, in the first place, that many of my compatriots will be surprised and very happily so at the inclusion of Hiroshima and Nagasaki on the list of the places that you'd like to visit or you wish you could visit. And to this end, of course, you'll have to be a young -- [inaudible] -- sagacious man so that you'll be able to fulfill your and our common desire in this regard. Now, are you going to be one? Are you going to be a sagacious man?

The President. Well, I'm certainly going to try. This is too dangerous a world to just be careless with words or deeds. And if ever there was a need for the world to work toward peace and to work out of the dangerous situation that we're in, that time is now.

Q. On a more, a little more serious note, Mr. President, my question is exactly related to this point. And that is, because of the experience that we in Japan went through, we are very genuine in hoping even for a very minimum, limited progress in the arms control talks which are currently underway. And just as it took another Republican President with very conservative credentials to effect a rapprochement very successfully with China, there are Japanese who hope that, perhaps, your hard-line policy may lead to the relaxation of East-West tensions. And in light of these hopes and expectations, Mr. President, could you comment on these talks? And, also, I would appreciate it a great deal if you would give us your assessment of the current state of and, perhaps, future prospects for U.S.-Soviet relations, particularly in the arms control area.

People's Republic of China. Yes, we're working very hard to improve relations there and establish trust and friendship. And I think we've made great progress. I know there is a question that is raised sometimes with regard to our friends on Taiwan -- the Republic of China. And I have to say, there, that I have repeatedly said to the leaders of the People's Republic of China that they must understand that we will not throw over one friend in order to make another. And I would think that that would be reassuring to them, that they, then, might not be thrown over at some time in the future.

But with regard to the Soviet Union -- and you mentioned my hard line. And that is -- I know I'm described that way a great deal. [Laughter] What is being called a hard line, I think, is realism. I had some experience with Communists -- not of the Soviet kind, but domestic, in our own country, some years ago when I was president of a labor union there.

And I feel that we have to be realistic with the Soviet Union. It is not good for us, as some in the past have, to think, well, they're just like us and surely we can appeal to, say, their kindliness or their better nature. No. I think they're very materialistic. They're very realistic. They have some aggressive and expansionist aims in the world. And I believe that, yes, you can negotiate with them; yes, you can talk to them. But it must be on the basis of recognizing them as the way they are and then presenting the proposals in such a way that they can see that it is to their advantage to be less hostile in the world and to try and get along with the rest of the nations of the world.

We're going to stay there trying, not as we have in the past to set some limits or ceilings on how many more missiles would be built, how much more growth they could take in those weapons, we want a reduction in the numbers. But really and practically, when we start down that road, and if we can get cooperation from them in reducing them, we should then continue down that road to their total elimination.

Many years ago, after he became President, Dwight Eisenhower, as President, wrote a letter to a noted publisher in our country. And he said in that letter that we had to face the fact that weapons were being developed in which we could no longer see a war that would end in victory or defeat as we had always known it. But the weapons were such that it would end in the destruction of human kind. And, as he said, when we reach that moment, then let us have the intelligence to sit down at a table and negotiate our problems before we destroy the world.

War is an ugly thing, but we had rules in which we made sure that soldiers fought soldiers, but they did not victimize civilians. That was civilized. Today we've lost something of civilization in that the very weapons we're talking about are designed to destroy civilians by the millions. And let us at least get back to where we once were -- that if we talk war at all, we talk it in a way in which there could be victory or defeat and in which civilians have some measure of protection.

Q. Mr. President, you referred to the current situation as being very dangerous. And in recent months we have witnessed one act of violence after another -- the assassination of Mr. Aquino in the Philippines, and the shooting down of the Korean Airlines passenger jet, the terrorist bombing in Rangoon, and again in the bombing in Lebanon, Beirut, and the regional conflicts that persist at many different parts of the world, including the Middle East and the Caribbean. I think we certainly live in a very dangerous world, and your administration has advocated very strongly for building more effective defense capabilities of the United States and of its allies.

Now my question is, Mr. President, my question is that the kind of danger that the world faces today would be minimized if the United States and its partners, including Japan, become stronger militarily?

The President. Yes, and this is part of that realism that I meant. I once did a lot of negotiating across a table as a labor leader on behalf of a union, and I think I know and understand the give and take of negotiations. But for a number of years now, recently, we have sat at the table in meetings with the Soviet leaders who have engaged in the biggest military buildup in the history of mankind. And they sat on their side of the table looking at us and knowing that unilaterally we were disarming without getting anything in return. They didn't have to give up anything. They saw themselves get stronger in relation to all of us as we, ourselves, made ourselves weaker.

I think realistically to negotiate arms reductions they have to see that there is a choice. Either they join in those arms reductions, or they then have to face the fact that we are going to turn our industrial might to building the strength that would be needed to deter them from ever starting a war.

Wars don't start because a nation is -- they don't start them when they are weak; they start them when they think they're stronger than someone else. And it is very dangerous to let them see that they have a great margin of superiority over the rest of us. There's nothing to prevent them from then becoming aggressive and starting a war.

Now, if they know that they cannot match us -- and when I say us, I mean our allies and Japan and the United States -- they cannot match us if we are determined to build up our defenses. So they then face the fact that as we build them up, they might then find themselves weaker than we are.

Q. Let me just follow up my question. Some of the dangers that I refer to do not take place only in the context of the confrontation between the United States and the Soviet Union. I think some of the regional conflicts have indigenous roots for that. And I just wonder if we are not having the kind of crises and dangers that don't lend themselves to the military solutions, which might call for some other approach to solving these problems and thereby reducing the tension in the world as a whole.

The President. Well, if I understand your question correctly, what we're talking about is -- you mentioned the Middle East. Once upon a time, nations like our own with oceans around us, we could have a defensive army on our own land, we could have coastal artillery batteries, and we knew that if a war came to us, it would come to our shores and we would defend our shores.

Today there are strategic points in various places in the world. The Middle East is one. Could the allies, Western Europe, could Japan stand by and see the Middle East come into the hands of someone who would deny the oil of the Middle East to the industrialized world? Could we see that energy supply shut off without knowing that it would bring absolute ruin to our countries?

There are other areas. More than half of the minerals that the United States needs for its own industries comes from spots all over the world. Well, an aggressor nation, a nation that maybe has designs on other nations, recognizes that also. We have to look and see where are those strategic spots which we cannot afford to let fall.

With the problem of Cuba in the Mediterranean -- in the Caribbean, we have to recognize that more than half of all of our shipping of those necessities we must have come through the Caribbean. It wasn't an accident that back in the First World War that the German submarine packs took up their places there. We know that the strategic waterways of the world -- the Soviet Union has now built up the greatest navy in the world, and the biggest part of that navy is here in the Pacific, in the vicinity of your own country. But they know, as anyone must know in world strategy, that there are a limited number of choke points, sea passages that are essential to your livelihood and to ours. You can start with the Panama Canal and the Suez Canal, but then the Straits of Gibraltar, but then right here in the passages that lead to your own island, the Malacca and the Makassar Straits. There are a total of no more than 16 in the whole world. And a nation that could dominate those narrow passages and shut them off to our shipping could secure victory without firing a shot at any of us.

Q. Mr. President, the American economy has been rapidly improving, we hear, yet unemployment is still high. Could you tell us what you believe will happen to the American domestic economy in the coming year and whether the improvement of the American economy, domestic economy will help to resolve remaining trade problems between the United States and Japan?

The President. Well, the American economy is improving. This recession that we've just been going through is the eighth that we've known in the last 40 or so years. And each time in the past our government has resorted to what I call a quick fix. It has artificially stimulated the money supply; it has stimulated government spending, increased taxes on the people which reduced their incentive to produce. And yes, there would be seeming recovery from the recession which would last about 2 or 3 years because it was artificial, and then we would be into another recession. And each time the recession was deeper and worse than the one before.

Well, we embarked on an economic program that was based on reducing government spending to leave a greater share of the earnings of the people in the hands of the people. We not only reduced the spending, we reduced taxes. And it was set out to be a lasting and real recovery.

When we started in 1981 our recession was about -- roughly 12\1/2\ percent. People were saying that it couldn't be eliminated in less than 10 years. Our interest rates were more than double what they are now. Our program, once put into effect, and as the tax cuts did have the effect we hoped they would have on the ability of people to purchase but also the incentive of their being allowed to keep more of the money they earned -- the inflation for the last year has been running at about 2\1/2\ percent or so, down from the 12.4. The interest rates, as I said, have been halved. We have a long way to go. The last thing to recover will be unemployment. But even there, last month our unemployment dropped to a rate that in our own optimistic predictions we had said would not happen until the end of 1984. And here it is in 1983, down to what we'd predicted that far ahead.

Q. Mr. President, you said that -- in the National Diet this morning -- that you have vigorously opposed the quick fix of protectionism in America. But there remains the danger of protectionist legislation to restrict Japanese imports to the United States. Do you believe such anticompetitive legislation will be passed? And in regard to this, what do you think of the steps which Japan has been taking to further open up its own markets?

The President. We heartily approve. And one of the things that we've been discussing are some of the points of difference that still remain between our two marketplaces. And I have pointed to the danger of those in our Congress who, because of the unemployment, think the answer could be protectionism. Well, I think that protectionism destroys everything we want. I believe in free trade and fair trade. And yet, the pressure on them as legislators to adopt these bills, these measures -- I am opposed to them -- and yet, as I say, I know they're under that pressure. And they're tempted.

But as I described it in the speech to the Diet this morning, protectionism is -- that's the case of one fellow shooting a hole in the bottom of the boat, and then the other fellow answers by shooting another hole in the boat. Well, you don't get well; you get wet. And I don't want us to start shooting holes in the bottom of the boat.

The President. Well, yes. I think we can increase our student exchange. Almost 14,000 of your fine young people are in our country now. We would like to see more of ours coming here. There is talk now of the Association of Japanese and American Businessmen in using private funds, having an American House in Tokyo as we have a Japanese House in New York, both designed for more cultural exchange, more things such as student exchange and all. And I believe, again, that's another example of people talking to each other instead of about each other.

I bring to you, Mr. President, to the people of Korea the warmest expressions of friendship from the American people. The friendship between our two peoples is a long and a close one. It has endured more than a century. It has been molded in struggle, hardened through danger, and strengthened by victory.

Since those days three decades ago when young Koreans and Americans fought together in the cause of human freedom, the world has undergone swift and sometimes violent change. Yet the peace, economic progress, and freedom from foreign domination that have characterized modern Korea are testimony to their vigilance and their sacrifice.

We are resolved never to forget the dangers they so bravely resisted, nor abandon the struggle they so willingly joined. Today, in a tense time of peace, we stand together as we once did in time of war. Our purpose is the same, our resolve unshaken. We renew today our commitment to each other and to the cause of Korean and American freedom.

As we begin a second century of friendship between our peoples, Nancy and I are particularly happy to return to this beautiful country. We look forward to seeing old friends and making new ones. But our hope most of all is that our visit will bring the people of Korea and the United States even closer together, and that our mutual efforts in pursuit of peace will bear fruit, not just for the Korean and the American people but for all the peoples of the Earth.

Your loyalty, your friendship, your progress, your determination to build something better for your people has proven many times over the depth of your gratitude. In these days of turmoil and testing, the American people are very thankful for such a constant and devoted ally. Today, America is grateful to you.

The journey from America is now swift. The winds and waves no longer endanger our way. But the rules of conduct which assist travelers are the same today as they were over a century ago, or even in ancient times. The weary are restored, the sick healed, the lost sheltered and returned safely to their way. This is so on all continents among civilized nations.

Our world is sadder today, because these ancient and honorable practices could not protect the lives of some recent travelers. Instead of offering assistance to a lost civilian airliner, the Soviet Union attacked. Instead of offering condolences, it issued denials. Instead of offering reassurances, it repeated its threats. Even in the search for our dead, the Soviet Union barred the way. This behavior chilled the entire world. The people of Korea and the United States shared a special grief and anger.

My nation's prayers went out to the Korean families who lost loved ones even as we prayed for our own. May I ask you today to pause for a moment of silence for those who perished. Please join me in this tribute in which the spirit of our two peoples will be as one.

In recent weeks, our grief deepened. The despicable North Korean attack in Rangoon deprived us of trusted advisers and friends. So many of those who died had won admirers in America as they studied with us or guided us with their counsel. I personally recall the wisdom and composure of Foreign Minister Lee, with whom I met in Washington just a few short months ago. To the families and countrymen of all those who were lost, America expresses its deep sorrow.

We also pledge to work with your government and others in the international community to censure North Korea for its uncivilized behavior. Let every aggressor hear our words, because Americans and Koreans speak with one voice. People who are free will not be slaves, and freedom will not be lost in the Republic of Korea.

We in the United States have suffered a similar savage act of terrorism in recent weeks. Our marines in Lebanon were murdered by madmen who cannot comprehend words like ``reason'' or ``decency.'' They seek to destroy not only peace but those who search for peace. We bear the pain of our loses just as you bear the pain of yours. As we share friendship, we also share grief.

I know citizens of both our countries as well as those of other nations do not understand the meaning of such tragedies. They wonder why there must be such hate. Of course, regrettably there is no easy answer. We can place greater value on our true friends and allies. We can stand more firmly by those principles that give us strength and guide us, and we can remember that some attack us because we symbolize what they do not: hope, promise, the future. Nothing exemplifies this better than the progress of Korea. Korea is proof that people's lives can be better.

In the early years following World War II, the future of Korea and of all Asia was very much in doubt. Against the hopes of Korea and other new nations for prosperity and freedom stood the legacies of war, poverty, and colonial rule. In the background of this struggle, the great ideological issues of our era were heard: Would the future of the region be democratic or totalitarian? Communism, at that time, seemed to offer rapid industrialization. The notion that the people of the region should govern their own lives seemed to some an impractical and undue luxury. But Americans and the people of Korea shared a different vision of the future.

Then North Korea burst across the border, intent on destroying this country. We were a world weary of war, but we did not hesitate. The United States, as well as other nations of the world came to your aid against the aggression, and tens of thousands of Americans gave their lives in defense of freedom.

Cities were in ruins; millions were homeless and without jobs; factories were idle or destroyed; hunger was widespread; the transportation system was dismembered; and the economy was devastated as a result of all these plagues. And what did the Korean people do? You rebuilt your lives, your families, your homes, your towns, your businesses, your country. And today the world speaks of the Korean economic miracle.

The progress of the Korean economy is virtually without precedent. With few natural resources other than the intelligence and energy of your people, in one generation you have transformed this country from the devastation of war to the threshold of full development.

Per capita income has risen from about $80 in 1961 to more than 20 times -- $1,700 today. Korea has become an industrial power, a major trading nation, and an economic model for developing nations throughout the world. And you have earned the growing respect of the international community. This is recognized in your expanding role as host to numerous international events, including the 1986 Asian games and the 1988 Olympics.

The other side claims to be the wave of the future. Well, if that's true, why do they need barriers, troops, and bullets to keep their people in? The tide of history is a freedom tide, and communism cannot and will not hold it back.

America provided almost $5\1/2\ billion in economic aid. Today that amounts to less than 6 months' trade between us. That trade is virtually in balance. We are at once Korea's largest market and largest source of supplies. We're a leading source of the investment and technology needed to fuel further development. Korea is our ninth largest trading partner, and our trade is growing.

This year marks the 30th anniversary of the mutual defense treaty between the United States and the Republic of Korea. The preamble to that treaty affirms the determination of our two countries to oppose agression and to strengthen peace in the Pacific. We remain firmly committed to that treaty. We seek peace on the peninsula. And that is why United States soldiers serve side by side with Korean soldiers along your demilitarized zone. They symbolize the United States commitment to your security and the security of the region. The United States will stand resolutely by you, just as we stand with our allies in Europe and around the world.

In Korea, especially, we have learned the painful consequences of weakness. I am fully aware of the threats you face only a few miles from here. North Korea is waging a campaign of intimidation. Their country is on a war footing, with some 50 divisions and brigades and 750 combat aircraft. The North has dug tunnels under the demilitarized zone in their preparations for war. They are perched and primed for conflict. They attacked you in Rangoon, and yet, in spite of such constant threats from the North, you have progressed.

Our most heartfelt wish is that one day the vigil will no longer be needed. America shares your belief that confrontation between North and South is not inevitable. Even as we stand with you to resist aggression from the North, we will work with you to strengthen the peace on the peninsula.

War II. Austrian unity was reestablished peacefully 10 years after the war. Germany remains divided, but some of the pain of that division has been eased by the inner-German agreement of a decade ago. I know the Korean people also long for reconciliation. We believe that it must be for the people of this peninsula to work toward that reconciliation, and we applaud the efforts you've made to begin a dialog. For our part, we would, as we've often stressed, be willing to participate in discussions with North Korea in any forum in which the Republic of Korea was equally represented. The essential way forward is through direct discussions between South and North.

Americans have watched with a mixture of sadness and joy your campaign to reunite families separated by war. We have followed the stories of sisters torn apart at the moment of their parents' deaths; of small children swept away in the tides of war; of people who have grown old not knowing whether their families live or have perished.

Today, I urge North Korea: It is time to participate in this TV reunification program and to allow your people to appear. I would say to them, whatever your political differences with the South, what harm can be done by letting the innocent families from North and South know of their loved ones' health and welfare? Full reunification of families and peoples is a most basic human right.

Until that day arrives, the United States, like the Republic of Korea, accepts the existing reality of two Korean States and supports steps leading to improved relations among those states and their allies.

We have also joined with you over the past 2 years in proposing measures which, if accepted, would reduce the risk of miscalculation and the likelihood of violence on the peninsula. The proposals we have made, such as mutual notification and observation of military exercises, are similar to ones negotiated in Europe and observed by NATO and the Warsaw Pact. These proposals are not intended to address fundamental political issues, but simply to make this heavily armed peninsula a safer place. For we must not forget that on the peninsula today there are several times more men under arms and vastly more firepower than in June of 1950. We will continue to support efforts to reduce tensions and the risks of war.

I have spoken of the need for vigilance and strength to deter aggression and preserve peace and economic progress, but there is another source of strength, and it is well represented in this Assembly. The development of democratic political institutions is the surest means to build the national consensus that is the foundation of true security.

The United States realizes how difficult political development is when, even as we speak, a shell from the North could destroy this Assembly. My nation realizes the complexities of keeping a peace so that the economic miracle can continue to increase the standard of living of your people.

The United States welcomes the goals that you have set for political development and increased respect for human rights for democratic practices. We welcome President Chun's farsighted plans for a constitutional transfer of power in 1988. Other measures for further development of Korean political life will be equally important and will have our warm support.

Now, this will not be a simple process because of the ever-present threat from the North. But I wish to assure you once again of America's unwavering support and the high regard of democratic peoples everywhere as you take the bold and necessary steps toward political development.

Over 100 years ago you asked earlier American travelers to make their wishes known. Well, I come today to you with our answer: Our wish is for peace and prosperity and freedom for an old and valued ally.

We've come to Korea to demonstrate the deep and affectionate concern that the American people have for your country. Our hearts went out to you in the wake of the two murderous attacks on your citizens, and we came today to say that we'll continue to steadfastly stand by you. We hope our presence in your country will show the world our firm support for Korea.

Probably the most important contribution we can make here is to continue helping protect your national security. Our shared commitment to your defense is symbolized by the presence of American soldiers standing with Koreans along the demilitarized zone. This is the shield that enables you to pursue your bold economic and political objectives.

States pays close attention to political developments in Korea, particularly those that are affecting democratic rights -- a matter very important to Americans. We do this not because we believe our security commitment gives us a right to intervene in your internal affairs, but simply because such issues are at the center of our own political ideology and, we feel, are reflected, then, in our foreign policy.

But in approaching such internal matters, I believe it's important to adhere to the discipline of diplomacy, rather than indulging in public posturing. This has been the policy of our administration throughout the world. Where we feel strongly about a particular situation, we make our views known, often quite candidly, to the appropriate level of the government concerned.

I have faith in the Korean people's ability to find a political system meeting their democratic aspirations, even in the face of the heavy security challenge presented by the North. You have accomplished so much already in the face of that threat. Who would have predicted a mere 20 years ago that an impoverished Korea would become one of the world's legendary economic success legends?

This was a Korean accomplishment. Your friends offered help and guidance as these were needed, but they didn't seek to dictate your course. Political development may, in some respects, be a more difficult process, but it, too, is one in which you alone must control.

Mr. President, Nancy and I both want to thank you and Madame Chun for your gracious hospitality and your warm words of welcome to us. We're delighted and honored to return here to visit your dynamic country.

Much has been written concerning the Korean economic miracle of the past decades. The startling industry and progress of the Korean people are gaining increasing international recognition and respect. Only recently the Interparliamentary Union met in Seoul, and a new series of international events will culminate here in the 1988 Summer Olympics. This will be a proud moment for Korea.

Mr. President, as Korea grows in international stature, you will hear increasing calls for assistance from allies and friends, calls to defend and promote the values -- political, economic, and humanitarian -- that both our peoples seek to live by.

Our mutual belief in economic freedom, for example, Mr. President, must not only be defended but spread as far as possible throughout the world. The 66 years that have followed the Russian Revolution and its attempt to turn Communist theory into practice have been marked by tragic failure. Innumerable variations of the Marxist economic system have brought stagnation, waste, and hardship to many countries and many peoples. We must never tire of reminding the world of this. We must never tire of explaining and promoting the free market system and its benefits.

And so, too, Mr. President, we must resist internal threats to our economic freedom, the calls to choke off international trade, to somehow protect jobs by denying our consumers the benefits of freedom of choice. The $12 billion in trade between our two countries has provided innumerable jobs to both our nations, and we must redouble our efforts to expand rather than constrict that trade.

Our political values also face unremitting challenges. Democracy and freedom of opinion are virtues the free world must cherish and defend. They distinguish us from totalitarian states. They are the source of our strength as nations, the very reason for our existence.

And finally, the most basic human values -- our concern for the rights of the individual, our belief in the sacredness of human life -- there also, these go to the heart of our existence. The murder of 269 innocent people in a defenseless airliner, the very absence here tonight of some of your nation's finest public servants -- these events have written in blood the stark contrast between those nations that respect human life and those that trample it. The vicious attack in Rangoon dramatizes the threat your people face. We must stand together to confront this dangerous challenge and to preserve the peace. And this we will do.

The increasing strength of the United States, our allies, and the progress of nations like Korea -- as contrasted with the continuing failure and moral decline of the Communist nations -- only serve to strengthen my conviction: The tide of history is a freedom tide, and communism cannot and will not hold it back.

Our first hundred years of friendship are history; we are now beginning to write the history of our second hundred years. May the new era of Korean-American partnership be even more fruitful than the last. And may it bring to both our peoples a stronger prosperity, a renewed friendship and confidence, and the genuine peace and security which we so fervently seek.

The great energy and vitality of these free people is most impressive, and we're enchanted by the treasures of their past. We visited the revered and lovely Meiji Shrine in Tokyo. While there, we watched an exhibition of Yabusame, a spectacular equestrian sport dating hundreds of years, where riders gallop at full gait shooting arrows at three separate targets. On Friday I had the honor of being the first American President to address the Japanese Diet, their national parliament.

I will underline our commitment on Sunday when I visit our GI's along the de-militarized zone at the 38th parallel. Our soldiers are serving with our Korean allies to deter aggression from the Communist North. Working with our partners to make tomorrow more prosperous and more secure is what our trip is all about.

America is a Pacific nation with good reason to strengthen our ties in this region. Mike Mansfield, our Ambassador to Japan, likes to say, ``The next century will be the century of the Pacific.'' The citizens of our lands may live 5,000 miles apart, we may be different in customs, language, and traditions, and yes, we are often competitors in the world's markets. But what unites us is more important -- our love of freedom and our optimism for the future.

Japan, Korea, the United States, and our many other friends in the Pacific region are building a better tomorrow. Individual opportunity coupled with hard work and reward produces astonishing results. When an entire society pursues these goals, miracles occur. Japan and Korea are classic examples of nations rising from the ashes of war to set standards of economic prosperity that dazzle the world.

There's much talk in the Congress of protecting American jobs, but protectionism is defensive and dangerous. Erecting barriers always invites retaliation, and retaliation is a threat to the one out of every eight American jobs dependent on our exports. At the end of this vicious cycle are higher costs for consumers and lost American jobs, the exact opposite of what we all want.

Let's recognize Japanese and Korean efficiency for what it is. If their products are better made and less expensive, then Americans who buy them benefit by receiving quality and value. And that's what the magic of the marketplace is all about.

The best course for us to take is to take the offensive and create new jobs through trade, lasting jobs tied to the products and technology of tomorrow. I'm confident American products can compete in world markets if they can enter foreign markets as easily as foreign products can enter ours. Currently they can't. Restrictions and tariffs limit U.S. imports into Japan and Korea. In our meetings I've insisted that reciprocity and open markets are vital to our mutual prosperity.

Prime Minister Nakasone and I have agreed on an agenda for progress to reduce and gradually eliminate these barriers. My goal is to help our farmers bring Japanese consumers lower prices for beef, citrus, and other agricultural goods, help our mining, coal, and gas industries export energy resources to a resource-poor Japan, and help our communications industries find new markets for their satellites and other products.

I also encouraged the Prime Minister to open his capital markets to more foreign investment. This will increase demand for Japanese yen, helping its price rise in relation to the dollar, thereby making it easier for the Japanese to buy our products and making our products better able to compete in other markets.

We need to remember that Japan and Korea are key allies. They know what living in the shadow of communism is like. It was a Japanese communications center that tracked the cold, calculating words of that Soviet pilot who gunned down the Korean airliner and 269 innocent victims.

Japan contributes about $20,000 for every U.S. soldier stationed here. Both Korea and Japan are committed to help us defend peace, and both are carrying an important share of the military burden. They and we share the same hopes and dreams for our loved ones. We're civilized nations believing in the same virtues of freedom and democracy.

The Williamsburg summit this summer brought together representatives of the Atlantic alliance and Japan in a common strategy for economic growth and military security. It demonstrated that our free world, spread across oceans, can join together to protect peace and freedom.

On this trip, we and our Pacific friends are taking another important step forward together. We've made our partnership stronger, and that means tomorrow can be better for us, our children, and people everywhere.

President Reagan addressed the National Assembly, visited field installations of both the Korean and the United States Armed Forces, and also met with senior Korean officials, other Korean citizens, and a group of American businessmen.

Soviet attack on a Korean civil airliner, and the October 9 North Korean terrorist attack in Burma which tragically claimed the lives of 17 innocent Koreans, among them many of the nation's most important leaders in economics, diplomacy, and politics.

Both Presidents noted the thorough and conclusive investigation by the Government of Burma of the Rangoon bomb atrocity, which has produced unequivocal evidence that the North Korean regime perpetrated this deliberate act of state terrorism. They agreed that such acts cannot be tolerated, and called for effective international sanctions against North Korea. President Reagan affirmed his admiration for the resolution and courage of the Korean people and their leaders in the face of these barbaric acts.

President Chun and President Reagan joined in declaring the unswerving opposition of the Korean and American peoples to such acts of terrorism, and pledged continued efforts to remove the scourge of terrorism from the earth.

States and its allies around the world, to bring about a reduction of tensions in volatile regions such as the Middle East, and to reach an agreement with the Soviet Union to reduce the global deployment of strategic weapons.

President Chun explained in detail the overall security situation on the Korean peninsula with particular reference to the continuing threat from North Korea, reflected in its military buildup and aggravated by its domestic problems.

Both Presidents reaffirmed the importance of maintaining deterrence and stability on the Korean peninsula, thereby ensuring peace there and in Northeast Asia, a region of critical strategic significance.

President Reagan stated that the United States would continue to fulfill its role and responsibilities as a Pacific power, dedicated to maintaining peace and stability in the region. President Chun avowed his full support for these efforts.

President Reagan stressed that the United States would continue to maintain United States forces in Korea and to strengthen their capabilities. President Chun reaffirmed his support for the presence in Korea of American military forces as part of the United Nations and Combined Forces Commands.

President Reagan noted that Korea spends six percent of its GNP on defense and further noted the efforts of the Republic of Korea to modernize and upgrade its defense capabilities. The two Presidents concurred that this program is essential if peace is to be maintained. President Reagan reconfirmed that the United States will continue to make available the weapons systems and technology necessary to enhance the strength of Korea's armed forces.

President Reagan reconfirmed that the United States would not undertake talks with North Korea without full and equal participation of the Republic of Korea. The two Presidents reaffirmed that any unilateral steps toward North Korea which are not reciprocated toward the Republic of Korea by North Korea's principal allies would not be conducive to promoting stability or peace in the area.

The two Presidents noted the significance of their respective nation's role as the hosts to important global gatherings and events, including the Los Angeles Olympics of 1984 and the Seoul Olympics of 1988. Both countries will abide by their commitments to admit representatives of all nations to participate in these international events.

Republic of Korea to the U.N. would contribute both to the reduction of tensions on the Korean peninsula and the maintenance of international peace. President Reagan promised continuing support for the entry of the Republic of Korea into the U.N.

Both Presidents noted with satisfaction the continued expansion of bilateral trade, which totaled over $11 billion in 1982, making the Republic of Korea one of the United States' most important trading partners and fifth largest market for United States agricultural products, and the United States the Republic of Korea's largest trading partner in exports as well as imports. They agreed that this continued growth of bilateral trade attests to the vitality of U.S.-Korean economic relations.

President Chun also expressed his appreciation for President Reagan's strong commitment to free trade and hoped that the Republic of Korea's major export commodities will be given greater access to the United States market with the continuation of the Republic of Korea's eligibility for GSP benefits on a non-discriminatory basis. President Reagan took note of President Chun's views on these issues. In this regard, both Presidents recognized the necessity of coordinated actions by their respective governments to reduce various tariff and non-tariff barriers.

President Reagan assured President Chun that the United States will remain a reliable supplier of energy resources and energy technology, and in particular, that the United States will seek to assist the Republic of Korea to obtain stable energy supplies in the event of a security emergency.

In this regard, President Reagan noted positively the Korean government's efforts to build up energy reserves for economic emergencies. President Chun expressed his appreciation for the United States' pledge, and the Republic of Korea's interest in the purchase and development of energy resources in the United States.

President Chun and President Reagan pledged to carry forward the full range of security, political, economic, scientific and cultural meetings and consultations on our joint agenda, in order to maintain and deepen our already excellent relations in those diverse fields.

The two Presidents agreed that exchanges of visits between the two Presidents have contributed to the further development of the existing friendly relations between the two countries. In that context, President Reagan asked President Chun to visit Washington again at a mutually convenient time, and President Chun accepted that invitation with appreciation.

We won't keep you long, but I just want to tell you how proud I am of everyone who helped make this trip a great success. We traveled nearly 16,000 miles to visit two countries that are vital to us and to our future. Japan and Korea have very different roots from our own, but each of us is a Pacific nation, and we're bound together by a great treasure of shared values -- our love of freedom and democracy, the drive, determination, and skill of our people, and our optimism for the future.

Mike Mansfield, our very wise Ambassador in Tokyo, likes to say, ``The next century will be the century of the Pacific.'' And he's right. The East Asian and Pacific region is growing faster than any other region in the world. Japan has become our largest overseas trading partner, and Korea ranks among our top 10 worldwide. We're building a future together. This means we shoulder great responsibilities, but we also have tremendous opportunities. And working as partners to make tomorrow better and more secure is what this trip is all about.

In Japan we established an agenda for progress so we can solve problems and create jobs, security, and safety for our families and for theirs. That agenda ranges from efforts to lower trade barriers to assisting recovery of the U.S. auto industry, to expanding our energy trade, promoting greater investment in capital markets, cooperating in defense technology, encouraging exports and imports of high technology, coordinating our foreign assistance efforts, and expanding our cultural programs.

American dollar. Our currencies should reflect the political stability and economic strength that our two countries enjoy. In Japan's case this will mean a stronger yen, which means that American products will compete more effectively in world markets.

Because of the breadth and comp? xity of these issues, I intend to establish a management group, under the leadership of the Vice President, to assure essential followup action. If each side is willing to give a little, then all of us will gain a lot.

Diplomacy is important. Strengthening the spirit of friendship is the best way to solve problems and create lasting partnerships. And I can't tell you how proud I was to have the historic opportunity to address the Japanese Diet and all the people of Japan. I told them what we Americans feel in our hearts -- that we, like they, are people of peace, that we deeply desire a nuclear arms reddnuction agreement, and that we will never walk away from the negotiating table.

Those who disagree with the United States get plenty of publicity. But one thing becomes more plain to me each time I travel: Across the globe, America is looked to as a friend and as a leader in preserving peace and freedom. This was certainly true in Japan and Korea.

I was at one of the meetings in Korea, and I just assumed that Nancy was out sightseeing or probably even shopping for souvenirs. And knowing Nancy as well as I do, I wasn't surprised when I came home and found that she had two little Korean friends, Lee Kil Woo and Ahn Ji Sook. They have come over to the States where they're going to be treated at St. Francis Hospital in Roslyn, New York. And Nancy met them by way of a very remarkable woman, Harriet Hodges, who has succeeded in bringing some 600 children like this, who needed medical attention that could only be given here in this country, to bring them to the United States.

Communist aggression. They understand the value of freedom, and they're paying the price to defend it. You know, sometimes you hear events are more symbolism than substance. Well, there's more than symbolism when over a million Koreans line the streets to wave and cheer Americans and to thank America for helping keep them free.

Korean artillery just some 30 kilometers away. And there's more than symbolism in the danger to our American soldiers helping to guard the border of the DMZ, often in weather that leaves them freezing from their heads to their toes.

I have just been looking forward to telling the American people we've had such a wrong impression. I think most of us just sort of pictured our forces over there as kind of garrison troops, just waiting on hand that anything should happen. That's not true. They are combat ready, and they are the farthest advanced toward a potential enemy of any American forces in the world.

I reaffirmed to the Korean people America's commitment to their peace and freedom and encouraged them to develop further their democracy. And I must tell you that one of the most unforgettable experiences of my life was the time I spent Sunday afternoon and morning with our brave troops at the DMZ.

If you could have been with me, you would have been at the worship service Sunday morning that we had with our soldiers in an open field, less than a mile from one of the most tyrannical regimes on Earth. And there, singing, was a choir of little girls, not much bigger than this one, all orphans from an orphanage that is maintained and supported by our GI's. And they have done this with several others there. The young men and women of the 2d Infantry Division maintain those institutions.

And to hear these children closing the service, singing ``America, the Beautiful'' in our language, was a spiritual experience. And you would have heard, if you'd been at that service, their chaplain telling us that we were standing on the edge of freedom. Being there teaches us that freedom is never free, nor can it be purchased in one installment. We can only struggle to keep it, pass it on to the next generation, and hope they'll preserve it for their children and their children's children.

And this they have done at the DMZ. I was honored to meet our men, and I promised them that I would tell the American people how crucial their jobs are, not just to the people of Korea but to people everywhere who love freedom. So much of what we take for granted each day we owe to these heroes and others like them around the world. They make us so proud to be Americans.

San Diego, Calif. Previously he was head of the bioanalysis group, underseas sciences department, at the Naval Ocean Systems Center. Mr. Evans is the author of more than 60 published technical papers and has coauthored several books. He holds three patents for marine systems, including a device for tagging and tracking marine animals.

Previously he served as minority staff associate for the House Energy and Commerce Committee, dealing principally with railroad, environmental, and commerce- related legislation. Mr. Oglesby also served as deputy and acting director of the State of Illinois Washington office and as executive assistant to Congressman Edward Madigan (R-Ill.). Prior to coming to Washington, he served in Illinois State government as an assistant to Gov. Richard Ogilvie and as executive assistant to the speaker of the house. Mr. Oglesby also spent 3\1/2\ years in management positions with Illinois Bell Telephone Co.

Since the transition period, you have guided our relations, first with the House of Representatives and then during the past two years with the Senate as well. Your service to our country and to me has consistently been at an uncommon level of excellence.

When we came into office in January 1981, many said the promises made during the campaign could not be achieved, the Congress would not go along, the votes would not be there. You led the way toward building the coalition in the House which resulted in our initial victories on Gramm-Latta I and II and the 1981 tax cut bill. These significant victories signaled to all the fundamental change in direction we had promised would not be forestalled.

Your leadership in the management of relations with the Congress has enabled us to continue on the path to sustained economic growth and a renewed national security. The votes on the Hill have become more difficult since the honeymoon days but we have persevered to victory upon victory. In large measure, these successes have been due to your understanding of the Hill, your personal associations with so many Senators, Members, and staff, your ability at developing legislative strategy, and your tireless devotion to ensuring sound public policy. In every sense, you are a real pro.

Within the White House and the Administration, we have all benefited from your wise counsel, cheerful teamwork and commitment to achieving the results we seek. Your way with people is a rare and precious resource.

The fundamental importance you have placed on a sound working relationship with the Congress has become a hallmark of our Administration. As a result, we have been able to build broad bipartisan coalitions in the House and Senate to enact the Social Security Reform Act, the MX-Peacekeeper, the Caribbean Basin Initiative, the Tax Equity and Fairness Reform Act and the War Powers in Lebanon Resolution.

After considerable thought, I have decided to resign my position and return to the private sector shortly after the end of this session of the 98th Congress. It has been an honor and a privilege to serve as Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs during the past two years and, prior to that, as Deputy Assistant to the President in charge of the House of Representatives. But it is time to renew the family life I have forgone and repair the financial security that has been sacrificed.

Washington scene were observing that our American system of government didn't seem to be working. There appeared to be gridlock, inertia, an inability to address, let alone solve, the major problems confronting our nation. Some believed our institutions of government were outdated, producing deadlock not decision in this modern, complex era. They are not saying this anymore.

Beginning with the transition period after your election, you have built a sound, strong and superb working relationship with the Congress. The dividends from the priority you have placed each day on that relationship are not just the scores of legislative victories you have achieved. They are the results you promised: lower interest rates, declining inflation, more employment, less excessive and unnecessary regulation, reduced tax rates for individuals and businesses, a slower rate of growth of federal spending, a stronger national defense here at home and a renewed respect for our nation abroad.

From the early legislative successes of Gramm-Latta I and II and the 1981 tax cut bill to this year's Social Security Reform Act, the Caribbean Basin Initiative, the MX-Peacekeeper votes and the War Powers in Lebanon Resolution, you have benefitted greatly from outstanding teamwork in the Senate under the leadership of Majority Leader Howard Baker and in the House under Republican Leader Bob Michel. Their uncommon loyalty, effectiveness, leadership and willingness to go the extra mile on your behalf made the crucial difference on so many legislative initiatives.

Much remains to be done. I am hopeful you will seek re-election and am confident you will be re-elected with a renewed mandate, continued Republican control of the Senate and increased support in the House.

Thank you for the confidence you have placed in me and for the opportunity to serve you and the country during the past three years. I look forward to working vigorously for your re-election and hope you will call on me for other assignments.

The President. Well, listen, I appreciate this opportunity to talk at least a minute or two with all of you during the Republican Governors Association annual conference there. And I'd like to thank Bob Orr on the fine job that he's done as chairman for the past year and, Vic, to congratulate you as the incoming chairman. I look forward to continuing a close, productive working relationship that I've enjoyed with the Republican Governors.

Governor Atiyeh. Mr. President, we appreciate that, and we have full knowledge of, of course, your Governorship and especially so as chairman, in 1968, of this association. It's kind of nice to know that you're in the company with someone as illustrious as you are.

We've passed some resolutions that you may have some interest in -- as a matter of fact, I know you will -- resolutions that relate to economic recovery. We applauded your efforts in foreign policy and appreciate very much the clear strength that you've shown in the variety of instances occurring around the Nation, and we certainly are appreciative of that.

Picking up on the theme of your interest in education, here again we recognize, as Governors, how important that is within our own States as well as nationally, and some sense the frustration that Congress hasn't acted on your crime control package, and we urge them to move forward on that issue.

Governor Atiyeh. It's really a matter of you picking those elements, Mr. President, that are important to us as Americans. And we as Governors feel very much the same, that it is important that those items move forward.

Ed Rollins spoke to us in the morning breakfast, and there were many questions asked, which I indicated today -- indicated a very keen, very keen interest on the part of the Governors here to make sure that your reelection took place. And you can be assured of my personal support and, as well as I know of, my fellow Governors.

The President. Well, I am most grateful to all of you, and, regarding the resolutions you've passed, keeping this recovery strong, of course, is going to take control of Federal spending. And I'm very pleased to hear about that resolution. I hope you'll make sure your State delegations in Congress know about it.

On the line-item veto, I can't agree more strongly. I believe that the President of the United States should have line-item authority just as most Governors in this country do. I know what it did for me when I was a Governor. And we stop to think that in 1974 back here the Congress passed what they thought was a program to straighten out and get control of the budgeting process. And from 1974 until the beginning of 1982, the result of that has been $560 billion in additional national debt.

I'm particularly pleased also with your resolution on education. The initiative for raising standards and improving education generally has got to come from you and from the State level and the local communities, and I applaud your leadership.

You might be interested to know that I'm meeting with Members of Congress today on tuition tax credits. Getting that passed is an important step that we can take at the Federal level to improve education policy for the Nation.

Well, I know you've got a lot of work to do, and I don't think I should take up any more of your time. So, again, I just want to thank you for all you're doing. I look forward to working with you in the days ahead, and I'll say goodby now, and God bless all of you.

Governor Atiyeh. Mr. President, let me just finally end with one other thought, because I know you have a great helpmate. I want you to know that I personally thank First Lady Nancy for her efforts in that program on drug and alcohol abuse, called ``Chemical People.'' You make a great team, and we're proud of you. And we thank you very much for calling us.

The President. These gentlemen and I have been meeting here on the subject of tuition tax credit, which, I believe, comes before you tomorrow in the Senate. And the opposition to it that has presented a case of somehow that this threatens public education in any way -- it does not.

It does not in any way take away from the financial support of public education, but it recognizes the equity in making a provision for people who do not use the public school system, who send their children to parochial or independent schools for whatever reason, and support fully, as fully as anyone else, the public school system financially, through their taxes and, at the same time, pay a tuition for their children going to these independent schools. And this proposal is merely one that up to a certain amount allows a tax credit for a portion of their tuition to in some way balance the fact that they are supporting the two school systems.

We believe, in addition to this, the independent, the parochial schools in this country, have offered a choice for the American people, and at the same time, they have helped, through their very presence, keep up the quality of education in the schools through simple competition.

Fifty years have passed since diplomatic relations were established between our countries. As we note this anniversary, I hope that we can recommit ourselves to working constructively on the problems before us.

November 16th will mark 50 years from the moment of the establishment of diplomatic relations between the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics and the United States of America. This is a major landmark in relations between our two states.

In establishing diplomatic relations, both sides proceeded from a recognition of the fundamental difference in their socio-economic systems, but at the same time from a recognition that this difference is not an obstacle to normal interstate relations.

This principle is of lasting significance. The Soviet state, unfailingly devoted to the cause of peace among peoples and to the development of equitable, mutually advantageous relations, is to this day firmly guided by this principle in its relations with the USA.

The Senate Committee on Foreign Relations deferred consideration of the Convention pending the negotiation of amendments to certain of its provisions. The Protocol takes into account recent changes in Danish tax laws. It also takes into account positions expressed by the Senate in its recent consideration of other United States income tax treaties.

Secretary Block. Mr. President, Senator Jepsen, ladies and gentlemen, it's a privilege and an honor for me to have the opportunity to swear in the Chairman of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission. Susan Phillips was born in Virginia, but spent more time in Iowa, I guess, than anyplace else -- out in the ``tall corn State.'' It's second to Illinois, Roger, but it's a good corn State. The responsibility that she assumes -- she's been managing that as Acting Chairman since last May. And it's a very important responsibility, especially from the standpoint of agriculture.

Kappa from Agnes Scott College in Georgia. And in 1971 Susan earned her master's in finance and economics from Louisiana State, and in 1973 she received her doctorate in finance from the same university. Susan then went on to the University of Iowa, where she served as an associate professor and then as vice president of finance. In the course of her career, Susan has done important research, published many articles, contributed to four books, and been a Brookings Institution economic policy fellow at the Securities and Exchange Commission.

Commissioner of the CFTC. She's discharged her duties in that post with distinction. And, in a few moments -- well, as a matter of fact, when I wrote that note down there I thought that I was going to go on first. [Laughter] So, I'll back up and start over again. [Laughter] So, as of a few moments ago, Susan became the first woman Chairman of a Federal financial regulatory agency in American history.

And, Susan, as you take your new place in the public eye, I just have to say I can't think of anyone who could better reflect the skill and experience of the women in our administration. From Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick to Secretary of Health and Human Services Margaret Heckler, from Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole to Susan and others, more than a thousand women in this administration hold policymaking positions. And they hold those positions because of their superb qualifications and not because of some quota.

Commission is one of my favorites, because it proves that government can do a good job without soaking up taxpayers' money or overregulating the marketplace. In a town where so many agencies have billion-dollar budgets, the CFTC budget is only about $26 million. You see, you don't have to be here long to start saying ``only'' $26 million. [Laughter] Yet, the Commission successfully oversees a vast and crucial sector of our economy. And by working in partnership with the industry's own regulatory organizations, the Commission does its job without hindering industry growth and innovation.

And, Susan, I know that you'll give the same intelligence and energy to this new job that you've given to all your endeavors. And I'm confident you'll keep the Commodity Futures Trading Commission efficient, ensure the integrity of our futures markets, promote industry growth, and protect the public good.

Dr. Phillips.  --  -- you gave me the privilege of participating in the exciting and important field of futures trading as a Commissioner at the CFTC. I will always be grateful to you for that opportunity.

Commission on options, deregulatory and market structure issues, I was even then fascinated with the potential for pricing and risk management offered by futures trading. In the trading pits of New York, Chicago, and the Midwest, agricultural products, energy supplies, financial instruments, and other materials essential to the world economy are bought and sold in open, competitive bidding. These markets exemplify the American concept of free and open trade. They set the pricing standards for commodities throughout the world.

Even representatives from countries with more tightly controlled economies than ours have expressed to me the importance of the integrity of U.S. futures markets. Nothing should ever be allowed to harm these markets or interfere in the vital services they offer.

Under my Chairmanship, I hope the CFTC will continue its commitment to efficient oversight and enforcement, the encouragement of industry self-regulation. Ours is a small agency, staffed with expert and enthusiastic people who have a big job to do and who, I believe, do it well. I look forward to my continued association with them.

Baltic States Service division. Latvia, along with her neighbors Estonia and Lithuania, were invaded by Soviet forces in 1940 and still remain under the yoke of Soviet oppression. One of the most insidious forms of oppression continues to be the denial of freedom of speech and access to information.

The people of the three Baltic Republics look to the United States international broadcasting services as their informational lifeline. Radio Liberty, an integral part of the international broadcast network, serves as a surrogate press, providing current information on events which the Government of the Soviet Union has censored and prohibited for use by the media.

The establishment of the Baltic radio division reaffirms United States policy of not recognizing the forcible and unlawful incorporation of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania into the Soviet Union. The new call signal, ``the Baltic States Service of Radio Liberty,'' will reinforce the distinct identities of the Baltic States and separate them from the rest of the Soviet Union.

As we note Latvian Independence Day and the establishment of the Baltic States Service, this administration reaffirms its resolve to maintain our commitments to the people of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania in their struggle to regain freedom and self-determination.

Today marks the fifth anniversary of the day Leo Ryan was tragically struck down by an assassin's bullet on a faraway airport runway in Guyana. As his colleagues have noted in their tribute to him, it was typical of Leo Ryan's concern for his constituents that he would investigate personally the rumors of mistreatment in Jonestown that reportedly affected so many from his district.

Bill Clark brings to that post all of the qualities necessary to be an outstanding public servant -- integrity, dedication, common sense, and a willingness to work hard on behalf of his fellow countrymen. I know he will be a great asset to our government.

He shares with me an abiding respect for our natural resources and for the splendid beauty which is uniquely American. Throughout his stewardship at Interior, Bill will be looking for ways to meet the legitimate interests of all segments of our society.

Like many of you coming home for Thanksgiving, the Members of Congress adjourned yesterday to return to their districts. They can take some satisfaction from a change in the public's attitude about their performance. According to a Harris survey, confidence in the Congress -- as well as in other major American institutions -- has increased over the past year. There are some good reasons for that, and one of the most important can be summed up in two words: economic growth. Even the most committed pessimists are reluctantly concluding America is enjoying one humdinger of an economic recovery.

From autos to housing and from construction to high technology, growth is strong, confidence is building, and progress is being made. The Congress deserves its share of the credit both for helping us pass some key reforms and for bravely resisting attempts by some to return us to the old days of tax and tax and spend and spend.

Before our returns [reforms], the medicare laws required that we pay hospitals on a cost-plus basis, footing the bill for whatever cost they wound up incurring in treating medicare patients. So, hospitals had little incentive to hold down costs. Under our new reforms, hospitals will be paid a fixed price to care for each illness. If they control costs, they'll retain sufficient funds to upgrade the quality of their care. We estimate these reforms will save taxpayers over $20 billion in the next 5 years, and the savings can be realized without taking benefits away from anyone.

The Congress helped ensure a responsible continuation of revenue sharing, which supports vital economic activities in local communities. I was also pleased to sign into law several key appropriations bills. The spending levels were not as low as we requested, but they were lower than liberal Members wanted, and that would have meant higher deficits.

Perhaps the greatest contribution of the Congress was not what it did for us, but what it didn't do to us. The big spenders are still alive and well. And these people spared no effort to take away the third year of your tax cut, to delay indexing -- the historic reform that'll protect you from being pushed by inflation into higher tax brackets -- and to hit you with huge new tax increases. Well, with the help of responsible Republicans and Democrats, we fought them back and won. And with your help, we'll keep fighting and winning.

I was also distressed that the Senate voted down -- and the House refused to consider -- our bill to provide tuition tax credits to deserving families. It was charged that this bill would have favored the rich. Well, that's a false charge. Those in high tax brackets were not eligible for the tax credits. The bill would have benefited those low- and middle-income people who bear the burden of tuition to send their children to parochial or independent schools and, at the same time, pay their full share of taxes to support the public school system. There would be no loss of revenue to public education, but there would be healthy competition among schools, which would improve the quality of education in both systems. Tuition tax credits and other unfinished business Americans want and need, like prayer in school and enterprise zones, will be pushed again by us as soon as the Congress returns.

I believe we're seeing another positive change that's making us feel more confident about our country -- a return to bipartisanship in foreign policy. Our administration's highest goal is to help build a safer, more secure and peaceful world. That mission rests upon the twin pillars of deterrence and dialog, upon a military balance together with serious negotiations to resolve differences peacefully. Thanks to bipartisan support, we're doing both. We're restoring America's military strength, and we're pursuing large reductions in nuclear weapons through genuine arms control. Last week I told the Diet, the Japanese legislature, our goal must be the eventual elimination of all such weapons.

We've had bipartisan support for our rescue mission in Grenada and for our continued peacekeeping role in Lebanon. And this same spirit of putting country before party helped pass the Caribbean Basin Initiative to stimulate trade, cooperation, and progress with our Caribbean neighbors and a bill to start up Radio Marti, the voice of truth to the imprisoned people of Cuba.

President Reagan. It's been an honor and a pleasure to welcome President Nimeiri to Washington once again. President Nimeiri is a friend. Few can match his courage and foresight as a peacemaker in Africa and in the Middle East. I place great value on his insights and wise counsel and appreciate this opportunity to speak with him directly.

In our discussions, we found ourselves in basic agreement on critical issues in the Middle East and the Horn of Africa. President Nimeiri and I reviewed efforts to find a solution to the conflict in Chad. We're agreed that the first step necessary to achieve that end is the withdrawal of Libyan forces from Chad. Likewise, we're of one mind on the need to support African countries threatened by Libyan-supported aggression.

A key to this is a settlement that would permit all states in the region to live in peace with secure borders, while at the same time protecting the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people. I thanked President Nimeiri for his continued support of our current peace initiative.

On bilateral issues, I reaffirmed our willingness to help the Sudan meet the economic and military challenges that it faces. We applaud the Sudan's efforts to reinvigorate its private sector and reform governmental policies that hinder economic progress. Economic development is of utmost importance to the people of the Sudan. And in this endeavor, the United States is happy to lend a hand to a friend.

President Nimeiri.  I would like to thank President Reagan for his invitation to me to come to visit once again the United States. And I would like to say to him that we are very pleased by our friendship to the people of the United States.

President Reagan and myself have discussed bilateral relations between our two countries and reviewed ways and means to further strengthen them. We are hoping that the important role played by the United States towards refugees will continue and expand at a time where we in the Sudan face and cater to ever-increasing numbers from our neighboring countries, especially Ethiopia.

In Africa, we have been -- and still are -- very concerned about the destabilization policies represented by Libya and its intervention in the internal affairs of others. Libya is undermining the unity of Chad by invading and occupying its territory and plotting against the unity and stability of the Sudan. Ethiopia and Libya are both playing a very dangerous role and executing policies serving the interests of a superior power.

In the Middle East, the Sudan is fully committed to a just solution to the Palestinian problem. In this context, the Sudan stands firm behind the Fez resolution. And it also supported the Reagan initiative as a step towards a more comprehensive solution. We deplore and regret the continued bloodshed in Lebanon and call on all parties to save Lebanon and its independence. We also condemn all policies and practices aimed at liquidating the PLO and deplore the shedding of Arab blood by Arab hands.

Israel remains the cause of the problem in the Middle East. We call on President Reagan to exert his utmost to stop the Israeli expansion policy and play the role becoming a great power that has such a great interest in the Arab world. And we call, also, on the Soviet Union to assist in peace progress in the Middle East.

I am especially pleased with those provisions of H.R. 2920 that are designed to help meet the needs of aging veterans. For example, this bill will allow the Veterans Administration (VA) to provide older veterans with health care services in VA and community day health care centers.

The bill expressly authorizes VA to assist veterans, usually older veterans, in obtaining residential care in community facilities following VA care. H.R. 2920 also provides an increase in per diem rates to States to help defray the costs of veterans' care in State homes as an incentive to States to continue building and expanding these facilities for veterans.

H.R. 2920 contains other health-care related provisions, such as an extension of the community-based Vet Centers program which provides Vietnam veterans with psychological readjustment counseling services. In addition, it requires the Administrator of Veterans Affairs to establish an advisory committee on women veterans and to assure that VA health care facilities can meet the gender-specific health care needs of women veterans.

There are, however, provisions in this bill which greatly concern me -- provisions which would give the VA special personnel authorities and property disposal procedures not available to other agencies. These provisions are unnecessary and costly and continue a recent, disturbing trend of giving the VA special treatment and exempting it from generally applicable executive branch rules.

In his meeting with the President, President Spyros Kyprianou of the Republic of Cyprus deplored the unilateral declaration of a separate political entity in northern Cyprus and urged U.S. support for a Cyprus settlement which included a reversal of this unilateral act.

The President noted our deep distress at the unilateral action by the Turkish Cypriots and that we had supported a British resolution at the United Nations deploring the Turkish Cypriot action and urging cooperation with U.N. efforts to promote a peaceful settlement. The President said that the United States stands foursquare behind the U.N. Secretary-General's good offices effort and emphasized the importance of reestablishing a dialog between the two communities on Cyprus.

Friday about his difficult task and offered to help in any way possible. In recognizing that the situation is complex, the President asked that the Government of Cyprus not let this ill-advised unilateral act preclude consideration of any opportunities that may emerge for progress towards a settlement.

This centennial offers an opportunity to honor one of the great First Ladies of this country whose contributions to humanity were not limited to her stay in the White House but continued thereafter on a worldwide basis.

I have been advised by the Attorney General that in view of the requirements of the appointments and the incompatibility clauses of the Constitution, a majority of the members of the Commission, and therefore the Commission itself, may perform only ceremonial and advisory functions.

The events of that day in Dallas ushered in a wave of universal mourning that led people of all races and religions to fill their churches, temples, and mosques to pray for the fate of this one man. Never before in the history of the world had the thoughts of 4 billion people been focused in such a singular way.

The President. No, I still don't believe there's danger of a nuclear conflict as long as we have the deterrent power that we have. I don't think that I'm surprised by what they did this morning, but I am disappointed. And I can't believe that it's going to be permanent. We'll be ready to continue negotiations at any time that they want to come back.

Let me just point out the two superpowers are the only force that can preserve the peace and maintain peace. And we have, for 2 years, and we were the ones who initiated these discussions about eliminating, if possible, the intermediate-range weapons in Europe at a time when NATO had none. And during these 2 years or so of negotiations and talks, they have continued to add a hundred of their triple-warhead SS - 20 missiles to the stock they already had. At the same time, they are proclaiming that we are the aggressors in wanting to accede to NATO's demand and put any missiles at all in Europe, where there are none.

Now, we, at present, have plans and are going to continue with withdrawing tactical and theater weapons, 1,400 more than we've already withdrawn. So, I think the evidence is very plain as to which country of the two is sincerely and honestly working toward a reduction of armaments.

The President. Well, they have announced that this is their intention, but I understand that there's also some unhappiness and dissatisfaction on the part of some of the Eastern European countries about their doing that.

The President. I don't know how soon. I can't put a time on it. I think they'll come back, because I think they must be aware, as much as we are, that there cannot and must not be a nuclear confrontation in the world by the only two nations that truly have the great destructive capability, nuclear capability. So, I have to believe they'll come back. And I can tell you that we're not going to sit here with false pride. We will do everything that we can to bring them back.

All too often, we take for granted the freedoms that we enjoy. We must be ever mindful, however, of the sacrifices made by those men and women who have served in our Nation's armed forces in defense of those freedoms. We especially owe a debt of gratitude to those veterans who became disabled in the service of our country, for they truly know the price of freedom. Daily, these selfless men and women must endure hardship and lost opportunities because of the sacrifices they have made. We must accord them the respect and honor that they deserve.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Crittenton Mission organization. In 1883, Charles Nelson Crittenton of New York opened his first mission which, in the words of its original Congressional charter, was to assist troubled young women to ``seek reformation of character . . . (and) to reach positions of honorable self-support'' and thereby make a new start in life.

The Florence Crittenton Mission today has grown to a network of 39 agencies in 26 States. It has achieved distinction in providing a wide range of services to young women, from residential care to career counseling.

Since its inception, the Anti-Defamation League has worked to strengthen the democratic underpinnings of American society and to establish a harmonious unity of friendship and understanding amidst this Nation's religious, racial, and ethnic diversity. The Anti-Defamation League has combatted, counteracted, and worked to educate the public against anti-Semitism, racism, and the extremists of totalitarianism. The Anti-Defamation League also has articulated the special concerns and interests of the American Jewish community in upholding human rights and civil liberties in this country and throughout the world and served as an effective advocate for friendship with Israel.

The Anti-Defamation League and its leaders and supporters set an example of leadership and participation in events and programs to affect the well-being and future of all people. In purpose and program, the Anti-Defamation League espouses and fulfills the highest ideals and aspiration of Americans of all faiths, races, and cultural origins.

Intermediate-range Nuclear Forces negotiations in Geneva. While their decision did not come as a surprise, it is a terrible disappointment. The search for an agreement to reduce nuclear weapons is so important to people everywhere that the effort cannot be abandoned.

Common sense demands that we continue. We have negotiated for 2 years while the Soviets have continued to deploy their SS - 20 missiles. There is no justification for their breaking off negotiations just as NATO is beginning to restore the balance. The United States will never walk away from the negotiating table. Peace is too important.

We have no higher priority than the reduction of nuclear weapons. Arms reductions are the only sound course to a safer future. We seek sound and verifiable agreements that meet the legitimate security interests of both sides.

We are continuing other negotiations with the Soviet Union -- on strategic arms reductions, on the reduction of conventional forces in Europe, on a chemical weapons ban and, soon, on confidence-building measures aimed at preventing military surprises in Europe.

The people of the world deserve and want our negotiations to succeed. We look forward to the day when the Soviet Union hears their call and returns to the INF negotiating table. Our negotiations have been on the right course. We must persevere if we are to serve the cause of peace.

When Jim became Secretary of Interior he told me of the things that needed doing, the things that had to be set straight. He also told me that if and when he did them, he'd probably have to resign in 18 months. Sometimes the one who straightens out a situation uses up so many brownie points he or she is no longer the best one to carry out the duties of day-to-day management. Jim understood this. But he also realized what had to be done, and he did it for more than 30 months, not 18.

Now, with the change in management, it's time to take inventory. The Federal Government owns some 730 million acres -- about one-third of the total land area of the United States. The Department of Interior has jurisdiction over most of that, including our national parks, wildlife refuges, wilderness lands, wetlands, and coastal barriers. Not included in those 730 million acres are our offshore coastal waters, the Outer Continental Shelf, which is also Interior's responsibility.

Since 1978 funds for upkeep and restoration had been cut in half. Jim Watt directed a billion-dollar improvement and restoration program. This 5-year effort is the largest commitment to restoration and improvement of the park system that has ever been made.

Watt set out to increase protection for fragile and important conservation lands. In 1982 he proposed that 188 areas along our gulf and Atlantic coasts be designated as undeveloped coastal areas. And that proposal became the basis for the historic Coastal Barrier Resources Act. This act covers dunes, marshes, and other coastal formations from Maine to Texas -- lands that provide irreplaceable feeding and nesting grounds for hundreds of species of waterfowl and fish. And, under Secretary Watt, we've added substantial acreage to our parks and wildlife refuges and some 15,000 acres to our wilderness areas.

Interior is also in charge of preserving historic sites and structures. In the economic recovery program we launched in 1981 we gave a 25-percent tax credit for private sector restoration of historic structures. The result has been private investment in historic preservation five times as great as in the preceding 4 years. Secretary Watt has explored other ways to involve the private sector in historic preservation. And one of the efforts we're all proudest of is the campaign to restore Ellis Island and that grand lady in New York Harbor, the Statue of Liberty. This campaign is being led by Lee Iacocca, the chairman of Chrysler, and is being financed almost entirely by private contributions.

Preservation of endangered species is also a responsibility of the Department, and the approval and review of plans to bring about recovery of endangered plant and animal species has nearly tripled in the 30 months of Secretary Jim Watt. From the very first, Jim pledged to the Governors of our 50 States that the Department would be a good neighbor, that they would be included in land planning, and that small tracts of isolated Federal lands would be made available to communities needing land for hospitals, schools, parks, or housing. He also stated that isolated small tracts would be sold to farmers and ranchers.

An example of what I'm talking about is a strip of land 1 mile long and only 2 to 20 feet wide that was recently sold. I think you can imagine how these efforts must have erased some problems private landowners had with clouded title to their property.

Of course, all this was distorted and led to protests that he was selling national parks and wilderness. What he actually did was sell, in 1982, 55 tracts that totaled only 1,300 acres, and this year, 228 tracts totaling a little over 10,000 acres. The largest parcel was 640 acres; that's 1 square mile. None of it was park, wildlife refuge, wilderness, or Indian trust lands. They are not for sale. And not one acre of national parkland was leased for oil drilling or mining, contrary to what you may have read or heard.

When territories were becoming States, they were promised title to Federal lands within their borders, some lands to be used for public education. But as more and more Western States joined the Union, there began to be a delay; in fact, a permanent delay in turning over these lands. Jim Watt promised the Governors that if they'd identify lands they had a right to claim under their statehood acts, we'd make the Federal Government honest. The Governors responded, and as a result, by the end of this year more land will have been delivered to the States to support their school systems than at any time since 1969.

We've made giant strides in implementing a national water policy which recognizes State primacy in managing water resources. People must be a part of our planning, and people need a reliable, safe drinking water supply, water for generating power, and water for irrigation.

Since I've mentioned energy, let me touch on that for a minute. It's estimated that 85 percent of the fuel we need to keep the wheels of industry turning is on Federal-owned property, including the Outer Continental Shelf. Efforts to increase the supply of energy have been carried out in full compliance with environmental stipulations. We can and will have an increased energy supply with an enhanced environment.

I am today signing H.R. 3222. I am doing so, however, with strong reservations about the constitutional implications of section 510 of this bill. Section 510 purports to prohibit the expenditure of appropriated funds on ``any activity, the purpose of which is to overturn or alter the per se prohibition on resale price maintenance in effect under Federal antitrust laws. . . .'' I do not understand Congress to have intended by this provision to limit or direct prosecutorial discretion, or otherwise to restrict the government's ability to enforce the antitrust laws within the framework of existing case law. Thus, despite the breadth of its language, pursuant to the advice of the Attorney General, I interpret section 510 narrowly to apply only to attempts to seek a reversal of the holdings of a certain line of previously decided cases. Even as narrowly construed, however, the provision potentially imposes an unconstitutional burden on executive officials charged with enforcing the Federal antitrust laws. Therefore, I believe it is my constitutional responsibility to apply section 510 in any particular situation consistently with the President's power and duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed.

Another provision of concern is the section which purports to mandate continued funding for current grantees of the Legal Services Corporation at essentially the same level of funding as in fiscal year 1983 unless action is taken prior to January 1, 1984, by directors of the Corporation who have been confirmed by the Senate. To the extent that this provision may be intended to disable persons appointed under the Constitution's provision governing Presidential appointments during congressional recesses from performing functions that directors who have been confirmed by the Senate are authorized to perform, it raises troubling constitutional issues with respect to my recess appointments power. The Attorney General has been looking into this matter at my request and will advise me on how to interpret this potentially restrictive condition.

Just a few minutes ago, I had the pleasure of meeting the men and women who are sharing the platform with us this morning. And this fine group has recently been named the Outstanding Handicapped Federal Employees of the Year. And we're proud that they're part of the Federal Government's team.

All of you in this room know that courage, patience, and hard work go a long way, and no one knows it better than my Press Secretary, Jim Brady. Jim has inspired people everywhere and continues to do so. And, Jim, we're delighted that you could take part in today's ceremony.

The 1981 International Year of Disabled Persons and the 1982 National Year of Disabled Persons stimulated new activity to improve the lives of our disabled Americans. Consciousness was raised, new partnerships formed, barriers reduced, and opportunities increased. Our own efforts in the White House, for example, have helped generate a number of private projects involving transportation, elementary school tutoring, eye diagnosis, and surgery. But we can't rest on past success. The task before us is to maintain our momentum and to do more.

The disabled want what all of us want: the opportunity to contribute to our communities, to use our creativity, and to go as far as our God-given talents will take us. We see remarkable achievements in medicine, technology, education, rehabilitation, and in preventive medicine.

Voluntary efforts by the private sector help in a thousand ways. America is a caring society, but too often, Federal programs discourage full participation by society. Outmoded attitudes and practices that foster dependence are still with us. They are unjust, unwanted, and nonproductive.

The maze of Federal programs complicates matters even more. Thirty-two Federal agencies fund handicapped research. There are at least 42 separate Federal programs specifically targeted toward the handicapped population with an annual budget in excess of $36 billion. More than a hundred other programs provide handicapped services and support. Now, many good things are being done, and Federal programs help in countless ways. But the patchwork quilt of existing policies and programs can be as much of a hindrance as a help. Programs overlap, they work at cross purposes, and worst of all, they don't always point toward independence and jobs. So, we have a lot of work to do, and this work will be done.

The Department of Health and Human Services will direct a program to strengthen private sector job opportunities. And this initiative will feature a new job cataloging service and a national campaign to coordinate and stimulate employment possibilities for the severely disabled.

Help is also needed to assist in the transition from special education to community integration and job placement. The Departments of Education and Health and Human Services have established a program to assist special education students during this transition.

And finally we're putting together a national information and referral system. The handicapped, their families, and physicians need to be able to cut through the maze of public and private services and gain timely access to information and programs. This new network, managed by the private sector, will provide this badly needed service.

Now, I know these programs are only a beginning, but we believe equal opportunity, equal access, and greater economic independence must be more than slogans. Whenever government puts welfare and charity before the opportunity for jobs, it misses the mark. By returning to our traditional values of self-reliance, human dignity, and independence, we can find the solution together. We can help replace chaos with order in Federal programs, and we can promote opportunity and offer the promise of sharing the joys and responsibilities of community life.

There's a young lady with us today who's demonstrated that so well. Jennifer Boatman has spinal bifida, a serious malformation of the spine. Well, Jennifer's handicap didn't stop her from saving the life of a 5-year-old boy. When Jennifer saw young Joshua Mikesell tumbling through a whitewater stretch of the North Umpqua River in southwestern Oregon, she didn't hesitate one second. She jumped into the swift mountain stream, swam to the boy, and pulled him to the river bank. Joshua's father called it a miracle.

You know, someone has said that a hero is no braver than any other person. He or she is just braver 5 minutes longer. [Laughter] Well, Jennifer, that's you, and it makes us all proud and thankful. Your courage, your compassion, and your commitment to America's disabled opened the way to a life of quality for all people.

Persons capture our imagination. In partnership between the public and private sector, among national, State, and local organizations, and between the disabled and the abled we can win the battle for dignity, equality, and increased economic opportunity for all Americans.

During the 1981 International Year and the 1982 National Year of Disabled Persons, we learned about the many accomplishments of disabled persons, both young and old. We also gained vast new insights into the significant impact that access to education, rehabilitation, and employment have on their lives.

The progress we have made is a tribute to the courage and determination of our disabled people, to innovative research and development both in technology and training techniques to assist the disabled, and to those -- whether in the private or public sectors -- who have given so generously of their time and energies to help enrich the lives of disabled persons.

We must encourage the provision of rehabilitation and other comprehensive services oriented toward independence within the context of family and community. For only through opportunities to use the full range of their potential will our disabled citizens attain the independence and dignity that are their due.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of November, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Health care in the home is as old as medical treatment itself. Today it presents Americans with important new opportunities. As an integrated part of our health care system, the home setting can offer the comfort of familiar surroundings and the flexibility of personalized treatment. It can preserve the dignity and independence of individuals and prevent or postpone institutionalization for millions of patients each year. In a significant number of cases, home care can even reduce the cost of medical treatment.

America's home health care system has been growing rapidly in recent years with more than 4,000 certified agencies now providing home care. As our elderly population grows, home health care promises to become even more important in the future. There is still much to be learned about home health care, including when it can be most beneficial, how it can make our health care system more efficient, and how it can reinforce the efforts of millions of American families who provide care for their own members. The Federal government, the States, and the private sector are vigorously pursuing the knowledge that will let us make the best use of this promising resource.

In recognition of the benefits to be derived from home health care services through home health agencies providing skilled nursing services, physical therapy, speech therapy, social services, occupational therapy, and home health aide services, and the many private and charitable organizations which also provide these services, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 122, has designated the week of November 27, 1983, through December 3, 1983, as ``National Home Care Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

Anchorage, Alaska, office, where he resided for the past 17 years. Previously he served as special counsel and administrative assistant to the Governor of Alaska, and director of the Alaska State Housing Authority.

The President. We have held 2 days of intensive talks with Prime Minister Shamir and his colleagues, covering a broad range of subjects including political, military cooperation, Lebanon, Israel's economic situation, and the pursuit of the Middle East peace process. And these discussions, as could be expected between close friends and allies, have been very productive. We reconfirmed the longstanding bonds of the friendship and cooperation between our two countries and expressed our determination to strengthen and develop them in the cause of our mutual interests.

We have agreed on the need to increase our cooperation in areas where our interests coincide, particularly in the political and military area. And I am pleased to announce that we have agreed to establish a joint political-military group to examine ways in which we can enhance U.S.-Israeli cooperation. This group will give priority attention to the threat to our mutual interest posed by increased Soviet involvement in the Middle East. Among the specific areas to be considered are combined planning, joint exercises, and requirements for prepositioning of U.S. equipment in Israel.

We've agreed to take a number of other concrete steps aimed at bolstering Israel's economy and security. These include asking Congress for improved terms for our security assistance to Israel; using military assistance for development of the Lavi aircraft in the United States and for offshore procurement of Lavi components manufactured in Israel; permitting U.S. contractors to enter into contracts with the Government of Israel consistent with U.S. law, which would allow Israeli industry to participate in the production of U.S. weapons systems procured with foreign military sales credits; offering to negotiate a free trade area with Israel.

A main focus of our meetings was the agony of Lebanon and the threats there to our common interests. We examined, together, Soviet activities in the Middle East and found a common concern with the Soviet presence and arms buildup in Syria. We reaffirmed our commonly held goals of a sovereign, independent Lebanon free of all foreign forces, and of security for Israel's northern border.

We agreed that every effort must be made to expedite implementation of the May 17th agreement between Israel and Lebanon. Adequate security arrangements for Israel's northern border must be assigned the highest priority. We're hopeful that such arrangements can be concluded soon.

Egyptian-Israeli peace treaty remains the cornerstone of the peace process. I reaffirmed my commitment to the September 1 initiative as the best way to realize the promise of Camp David and the U.N.S.C. Resolutions 242 and 338 upon which it was built.

As you can see, our 2 days together have revealed substantial areas of agreement and resulted in a number of specific concrete steps that we'll take to strengthen our ties. We have also discussed some issues on which we do not see eye to eye. But disagreements between good friends do not alter the unique and sturdy foundation of our relationship.

The Prime Minister. I am grateful for the invitation extended to me by President Reagan to come here to Washington for these discussions. The Minister of Defense and I have had the opportunity to conduct very thorough discussions with the President, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of Defense, and their senior colleagues and advisers. These discussions have been carried out in the spirit of the traditional friendship and the common bonds of mutual understanding that bind our two countries.

Israel is ready to renew the peace process and discuss the final status of Judea and Samaria, following the autonomy period in the framework of the sole agreed basis for negotiations, namely the Camp David accords. We discussed during our visit here the major threat that terrorism constitutes to the peace, and we shall pursue our fight against it in close cooperation with the United States.

Due to the need to ensure our security, a large part of our budget is spent on defense. We hope that the American administration will increase their assistance program, taking into account the great sacrifices made by Israel in the peace treaty, by relinquishing the oil wells and building new installations as a result of the withdrawal from Sinai. New measures designed to encourage the development of our economy by establishing a free trade area, by sharing new technology will enhance Israel's strength and enable us to pursue our economic program so vital to the well-being of our society.

In order to advance the search for peace and to strengthen the ties between our two countries, we decided to establish the mechanism necessary to determine the details of the nature and scope of our cooperation inter alia in the fields of prepositioning of equipment for military readiness, joint exercises, and other relevant fields. We have agreed to establish a joint political-military committee to work on the details of these agreed matters. The aim of this cooperation is to strengthen Israel and deter threats to the region. The group will hold periodic meetings, starting the first week of January 1984.

I wish to once again thank the President and the people of the United States for their strong support of Israel and for the warm feelings conveyed to the Minister of Defense and myself by the President, the Vice President, the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of Defense. We will proceed on the road to peace with increased vigor. I return to Jerusalem strengthened in my conviction that with the aid of the United States of America and fortified by the friendship of its people and government, a strong Israel can indeed achieve peace.

Good afternoon. I learned in public speaking once that you were never supposed to open any remarks with an apology, but I also found out in this job, 9 times out of 10 you have to apologize for being late. So, I apologize for keeping you all waiting.

I'm delighted to see Members of Congress, the mayors, and the other local officials who are here in the White House this afternoon. It's good to have you in the house that belongs to all of us -- from every city, county, and town.

Like millions of Americans, I grew up in a small town. Back in Dixon, Illinois, government officials and the citizens they were serving knew each other. They were part of the same community, lived next door to each other, and went to the same high school football games, and bumped into each other at the grocery. Dixon officials knew what the people of Dixon needed, and they were able to meet those needs with efficiency and imagination.

If those at the grassroots are to get their jobs done and get them done right, we must give them the resources they need. This bill will send $4.6 billion from Washington back to our cities, counties, and towns. The money will not be spent as Washington dictates, but as local officials choose. It will support police and fire protection, libraries, street maintenance, and other basic local services. And since less than 1 percent of the total will be used for administration, the general revenue sharing program will set a superb example of government efficiency for other Federal programs.

For my part, signing this bill represents a great personal pleasure. I pledged my support for revenue sharing to the United States Conference of Mayors back in 1980, and since then, I've repeated my -- or restated my support before the National League of Cities, the National Association of Counties, the National Association of Towns and Townships, and many others.

I have signed today H.R. 2230, establishing a new Commission on Civil Rights. I believe that the birth of this Commission can serve as another milestone in our long struggle as a nation to assure that individuals are judged on the basis of their abilities, irrespective of race, sex, color, national origin, or handicap.

I take this opportunity to reaffirm this administration's commitment to these ideals, which the civil rights laws of the United States were designed to implement and which it will be the central mission of this Commission to articulate and defend.

The bill I have signed today is, of course, a product of negotiation and compromise. While, as noted, I am pleased that the Commission has been re-created so that it may continue the missions assigned to it, the Department of Justice has raised concerns as to the constitutional implications of certain provisions of this legislation. I have appended a recitation of these reservations.

During the preceding 6 months there has been considerable debate on the past and the future of the Commission on Civil Rights, but all seem to agree that the Commission's best and most productive years were its earlier ones. I believe that it is no coincidence that those years were characterized by open debate and a devotion to the principle of equal treatment under the law.

Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Commission itself is not placed clearly within any of the three branches of government created by the United States Constitution, and restrictions have been placed upon the power of the President to remove members of the Commission.

Framers of our Constitution should not be created. Equally unacceptable are proposals which impermissibly dilute the powers of the President to appoint and remove officers of the United States. The Civil Rights Commission is, however, unique in form and function and should therefore not become a precedent for the creation of similar agencies in the future.

The new appointment procedure created by the Congress has effectively imposed constitutional limitations on the duties that the Commission may perform. The basic purpose of the old Commission on Civil Rights -- to investigate, study, appraise, and report on discrimination -- would be maintained, and most of its current authorities would remain intact. However, because half of the members of the Commission will be appointed by the Congress, the Constitution does not permit the Commission to exercise responsibilities that may be performed only by ``Officers of the United States'' who are appointed in accordance with the Appointments Clause of the United States Constitution (Article II, Section 2, clause 2). Therefore, it should be clear that although the Commission will continue to perform investigative and informative functions, it may not exercise enforcement, regulatory, or other executive responsibilities that may be performed only by officers of the United States.

Banks, I would like to clarify one point. While I firmly believe that we must continue the valuable and productive unofficial relations with the people of Taiwan, and I strongly support efforts to ensure their continued participation in the Asian Development Bank, certain terminology used in the amendment to the bill concerning this issue is not consistent with United States Government policy, which recognizes the People's Republic of China as the sole, legal Government of China. I want to make clear that my signing of this bill does not reflect any change in the position of four successive Presidents with respect to China, nor should it be interpreted as any shift in the United States Government's recognition policy.

This administration is firmly committed to the protection of human rights, economic and political reforms, the holding of elections, and progress in prosecuting the cases of murdered American citizens in El Salvador. However, the process of certification as called for in H.R. 4042 would not serve to support these endeavors.

His decision to oppose this certification legislation reflects the administration's policy that such requirements distort our efforts to improve human rights, democracy, and recovery in El Salvador. The key certification provisions of the present bill are already addressed in this year's continuing resolution which requires a separate certification on progress in the area of land reform and withholds 30 percent of military assistance funds until the Government of El Salvador has completed the investigation and trial in the churchwomen's case.

At the same time, the President wishes to emphasize that the administration remains fully committed to the support of democracy, reform, and human rights in El Salvador. Those very concerns are a central component of our policy. They were clearly articulated by our Ambassador, Tom Pickering, as recently as last Friday. The withholding of approval from H.R. 4042 in no way reflects a lessening of our interests in these critical areas. The President has also instructed the Department of State to continue to provide the Congress with periodic public reports -- the next on January 16, 1984 -- on the political, economic, and military situation in El Salvador.

Working with the leadership of the Government of El Salvador, we will reconfirm our joint resolve to take whatever action is necessary to help the Government of El Salvador to end the reprehensible activities of the violent right as well as the violent left. The United States will also work to preserve and expand the progress that has been achieved in the area of land reform and to maintain the momentum toward holding open and democratic elections next year in accordance with the provision of the new constitution being prepared in El Salvador's Constituent Assembly.

There must exist a genuine awareness, both in the U.S. as well as in El Salvador, that our countries' strong and productive relationship can only be based on shared values in justice and democracy and on concerted and sustained efforts to achieve these goals. We know that President Alvaro Magana of El Salvador shares these views, and we will remain in touch on developing enhanced efforts that will strengthen human rights ties.

Designation is an important step for these countries in their battle to revitalize and rebuild their weakened economies. Designation is also significant because it is further tangible evidence of the constructive cooperation between the United States and the peoples and governments of the Caribbean Basin.

Administration and potential beneficiary countries and entities regarding the designation criteria set forth in Section 212 of the CBERA. Our discussions with the eleven began rapidly and were concluded last month. However, active and constructive discussions are underway with other potential beneficiaries, and I hope to designate a number of additional countries in the near future.

The eleven countries have demonstrated to my satisfaction that their laws, practices and policies are in conformity with the designation criteria of the CBERA. The governments of these countries and entities have communicated on these matters by letter with Secretary of State Shultz and Ambassador Brock and in so doing have indicated their desire to be designated as beneficiaries (copies of the letters are attached). On the basis of the statements and assurances in these letters, and taking into account information developed by United States Embassies and through other sources, I have concluded that the objectives of the Administration and the Congress with respect to the statutory designation criteria of the CBERA have been met.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of Nov., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President. No. And I'm glad that the entire transcript has been released, because if you read it you will find we were talking about that whole subject of women in high office and so forth, in that sense. And, no, there was no criticism intended of her at all. It was a kind of a hypothetical discussion in answer to a hypothetical question.

The President. You're still trying to get me around to that question -- [laughing] -- that I've been avoiding. Frankly, the polls scare me because I still think that a lot of people could be tempted into going their own way and not bothering to vote.

Ethiopian Commissioner Dawit Walde Giorgis, Director, Ethiopian Relief Agency, today and tomorrow in Washington to discuss efforts of the Ethiopian and U.S. Governments to deal with the drought in that country. Subject to discussions with the Ethiopian Government, the President has authorized AID to contract with TransAmerica, a U.S. based airline, for two L - 100 cargo planes to airlift emergency food supplies to drought victims within Ethiopia. The planes can arrive in Ethiopia on November 4th and 5th and remain for at least 60 days at a cost of approximately $2.4 million.

The month of November is traditionally a time for families to come together and give thanks for their blessings. It is fitting that November also be designated as National Alzheimer's Disease Month to express our compassion for those who suffer from this heartbreaking disorder and our appreciation for the many families who devote themselves to the care of afflicted loved ones who no longer can help themselves.

Alzheimer's disease is the major cause of serious confusion and forgetfulness in old age. The death of brain cells, a mark of this devastating disease, at first causes erratic behavior and unusual memory lapses and ultimately results in the ``senility'' once thought to be a normal part of old age.

Experts estimate that some two million Americans suffer from Alzheimer's disease, including between five and ten percent of our population over 65 and 20 percent of those over 80. If present trends continue, anticipated increases could double the number of victims in these age groups by the turn of the century.

In addition to the unhappy victims, untold numbers of others suffer the physical, emotional and financial burdens of caring for relatives who are ill with this disease. Families care for their ill relatives at home, if possible, and later in nursing homes. Between one-third and one-half of all patients in those institutions suffer from Alzheimer's disease or another serious irreversible form of dementia.

The medical research community is focusing special attention on this disease, and research is beginning to reveal many of its mysteries. Thus, research is providing the affected families with a great deal of hope. Until a cure is found, however, these families need our support and understanding. Public awareness of their problems is growing, due to the work of voluntary health associations -- notably the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association -- but much remains to be done.

High blood pressure is a disease that affects as many as 60 million Americans and is a major factor in the 1.25 million heart attacks and half-million strokes every year in the United States. Heart attacks annually kill 500,000 Americans, and the economic cost to the Nation in direct medical costs, lost work days and lost production will soar into the tens of billions of dollars.

Unfortunate as these statistics are, there are many encouraging signs that we are making progress in controlling this disease. Death rates from heart attacks and stroke have been declining dramatically for more than a decade. From 1972 to 1982, for example, the death rate for heart attack dropped by 27 percent, and for stroke by 42 percent.

Often called the silent killer because it usually exhibits no symptoms, high blood pressure is an insidious condition that may lead to heart attack, stroke or kidney damage. Along with cigarette smoking and elevated blood cholesterol, it is one of three major risk factors for cardiovascular diseases.

High blood pressure can be detected quickly and painlessly by use of an inflatable arm cuff and stethoscope. All Americans should take advantage of the high blood pressure screening activities in their communities, their work places and their public health facilities. Once detected, high blood pressure usually can be controlled very effectively. Weight loss, salt restrictions and exercise may be prescribed as possible remedies. When these do not work, a physician can select an appropriate treatment program from a wide range of drug therapies.

At least one of the factors responsible for the decline in death rates from heart attacks and strokes is enhanced awareness among the public and the medical profession of the dangers of high blood pressure and the steps that people can take to bring it under control. This growing awareness has been brought about largely through the efforts of the National High Blood Pressure Education Program, a coordinated program involving the Federal government, community volunteer organizations, medical associations, industry and labor, state and local public health agencies and many other groups. We must intensify our efforts to promote public understanding of the dangers of this prevalent condition and public knowledge that effective treatment methods are available.

To stimulate public awareness of the role high blood pressure plays in bringing about heart attacks and strokes and to encourage all Americans to check their blood pressure and obtain treatment if it is elevated, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 260, has designated the week beginning November 11, 1984, as ``National Blood Pressure Awareness Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this week.

Reye's Syndrome is a rare and often fatal illness that affects children under the age of 18 who are recovering from influenza or chicken pox. Reye's Syndrome can be deceptive, attacking just when it appears that the child is getting better. The symptoms -- which include mental confusion, persistent or continuous vomiting, loss of energy, sleepiness and belligerent behavior -- may develop quickly, sometimes within half a day. Immediate medical care is essential. If not treated promptly, a child suffering from Reye's Syndrome may go into coma and die.

The number of cases of Reye's Syndrome has dropped dramatically since continuous national surveillance was established by the Center for Disease Control in December 1976. This does not mean, however, that the public should become complacent about this illness. Although Reye's Syndrome is rare, it is life-threatening. About one-third of its victims do not survive.

Much remains to be learned about Reye's Syndrome, including what causes it and how it can be prevented. Voluntary organizations, such as the American Reye's Syndrome Association and the National Reye's Syndrome Foundation, have conducted educational campaigns to acquaint the public with this illness. Continued public education is essential so that parents and physicians can learn to recognize the symptoms of Reye's Syndrome and initiate treatment in its earliest stages.

It's wonderful to see all of you and to stand up here with some of New England's great political leaders. I'm especially proud to stand today with your own Ed King and Ray Shamie -- and that is Shamie. I said it once the other way. That's all right, because after January, we'll just call him Senator.

And the people of Massachusetts know better than most that jobs are the key to opportunity. The immigrants who built this city certainly knew it. They worked hard to give their children a better chance to make sure they'd get ahead in America. The Italians did it; the Irish did it.

Ray Shamie knows, that the key to more jobs is an expanding economy -- or to an expanding economy, is low tax rates. And that's how we'll see to it that the young people of today and the poor people of our country get the chance they deserve.

Ray Shamie cares about the people of Massachusetts. He is the son of immigrants. He was not born to wealth and privilege. He became a high-tech pioneer. And he went into public service knowing that the odds were against him, but that the truth ultimately prevails. And he will prevail next Tuesday if you all help him. And I promise you that I will work closely with him in Washington to see that the sons and daughters of Massachusetts get the kind of future they deserve.

Now, I'm also honored today to stand with Senator Gordon Humphrey of New Hampshire, a great friend of ours and a man who has become a leader in the Senate. If the people of New Hampshire can hear us today, we're asking them to keep Gordon Humphrey in Washington. We need him there with Silvio Conte, one of the ablest men in the House of Representatives. And we need the help of Ken Redding and Greg Hyatt and Lew Crampton. And New Hampshire needs the continued leadership of Governor Sununu.

But as a candidate for the Presidency, it's fitting that I take my case to the city whose moral and intellectual fire ignited the American Revolution. For I speak today in this cradle of liberty of a second American revolution -- one that was guided by some wise words by a wise old President.

And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we'd hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up trying to live our lives for us.

We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, and record interest rates were stealing our future. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we decided to rebuild and be strong again, to be prepared for peace. It was a second American revolution. It has only just begun. But America is back, a giant on the scene.

The President. You know, my opponent's understanding of economics is well demonstrated by his predictions. Just before we took office, he said our economic program is obviously, murderously inflationary. And that was just before we lowered inflation from above 12 percent to down around 4. And just before we lowered inflation -- or after our tax cuts, I should say -- he said the most that he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months. And in the last 18 months, there have been 900,000 new business incorporations in America. My opponent said that decontrol of oil, the prices, would cost the American taxpayers $36 billion a year. Well, we decontrolled oil prices -- one of the first things we did -- and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

He says he cares about the middle class. But then he boasts, he boasts -- and I will quote -- he says, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents?

Mondale mortgage. Now, his economic plan has two parts: one, to raise your taxes, and the second, to raise them again. But I've got news for him: The American people don't want his tax cuts, and he's not going to get his tax cuts. Whoa, wait a minute. I was talking tax increases. He never asked for a tax cut in his entire career. I'm the tax-cutter. Let's keep that straight.

You know, he sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th; we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower yours and everybody's taxes, so your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

The United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago. And yet my opponent sees a different world. After the Soviets invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' But then, there's so much that baffles him.

All across this country I know there are millions of good, patriotic Democrats who can no longer follow the leadership of that party. And I say to all of them, and all of you here today, come on, and let's, in a bipartisan tradition that is the glory of this country, keep this United States free and strong for all of us.

Last month an American woman walked in space. Kathryn Sullivan made history. And she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there -- indeed, I have seen evidence already from experiments conducted in the shuttle -- advances, also, in technology and communications. But my opponent, as a Senator, personally led the fight against the shuttle program and called it a horrible waste.

If America could bring down inflation from 12.4 percent to 4 percent, then we can bring it down from 4 percent to 0.0. And we're going to do that. If lowering your tax rates led to the best expansion in 30 years, then we can lower them again and keep America growing right on into the 21st century. If we could create 6 million new jobs in 21 months, then we can make it possible for every American -- young and old, black and white -- who wants a job to find a job.

And if local governments can establish enterprise zones to create economic growth, as many of them have, then we can elect people to the Congress who will free our national enterprise zones program. We can pass that bill and provide hope for millions in the most distressed areas of America, and this we must do.

We're leading a revolution in technology, we're pushing back the frontiers of space, and if we give our workers the tools they need -- in industries old and new -- give American workers the proper tools, and they can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world.

Our drive to restore excellence in education reversed a 20-year decline in the scholastic aptitude test scores. We're going to keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence second to none.

We have reversed the decline in our military defenses and restored respect for America throughout the world. And we're going to keep this nation strong to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and for our children's children. And if we make sure that America remains strong and prepared for peace, then we can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and one day banish them entirely from the face of the Earth.

I've seen a couple of signs about nuclear freeze. Well, nuclear freeze, yes -- after we have reduced the numbers of those weapons down to where there is a fair and verifiable limit between us, yes, then we'll freeze.

And as we strengthen our economy, strengthen our security, and strengthen the values that bind us, America will become an ever greater nation -- greater in art, greater in culture, and greater in love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us as no other nation on Earth has ever been blessed.

But if you don't mind now, I'm going to turn to something I didn't get to finish a week or so ago on that debate. I'll say it here. To the young people of our country who are with us today -- and I can see you out there, and I'm so happy to see you -- you young people are what this election is all about. It's you and your future.

All across this country, on many campuses, I've seen today's young people. And that generation, your generation, really sparkles. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. And I believe that my generation and those few generations between mine and yours, we have a sacred trust. And that is, when the time comes to turn over the reins to you young people out there, that we turn over to you an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, and confidence and dreams as we knew when we were your age in this country.

The President. Thank you. And listen to me; I'm going to take the liberty of making a promise to you young people on behalf of my own and those other generations I mentioned: We're going to turn over to you an America that is free in a world that is at peace.

Ours is the land of the free because it is the home of the brave. And America's future will always be great because our nation will be strong. And our people will be free because we will be united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

I am deeply honored that you have allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years. Much remains to be done. We must continue to build upon the new beginning that we started 4 years ago. So, I have come here to ask for you support and your vote.

We've already made some progress in these last 4 years. And I want to thank New York for sending Senator D'Amato to Washington to help us get the job done. He's been an invaluable part of the team. And there's someone else that I think all America should thank -- thank you, as a matter of fact, for lending to Washington -- and that's Congressman Barber Conable. He fought the good fight, and he laid the groundwork for so much of the progress that we've made in the last 4 years. He's been a force for responsible government and a champion of liberty, and he will be sorely missed.

Help spread the word. Get out the vote. And, if you can, just win some for the Gipper. But it's fitting with this election approaching that I'm here with you in Rochester -- a town that is so synonymous with America's industrial might and our scientific and technological leadership in the world. Meeting with you in this building -- a memorial to those many veterans from Rochester who fought for our freedom -- reminds us of how much we have to be grateful for. And what this election is all about is preserving and building an even stronger, freer, and more prosperous America for our future.

Four years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn, we got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up trying to live our lives for us.

And 4 years ago, we began to navigate by some fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom; common sense our constellation. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the Government, and so we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent. We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, and record interest rates were stealing our future.

My opponent's understanding of economics is well demonstrated by his predictions. Just before we took office, he said our economic program is obviously, murderously inflationary. Now, that was just before we lowered inflation from above 12 percent down around 4. And just after we passed our tax cuts, he said the most he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months. My opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost American consumers more than $36 billion a year. And we decontrolled oil prices -- one of first things we did -- and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

He says that he cares about the middle class, but he boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you just want to be one of his constituents?

You get to trade your prosperity for whatever surprise he's got hidden behind the curtain. Now, if his campaign were a Broadway show, it would be ``Promises, Promises.'' And if his administration were a novel, a book, you would have to read it from the back to the front to get a happy ending.

And the United States is more secure than it was 4 years ago. But my opponent sees a different world. After the Soviets invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' But then, there's so much that baffles him.

Democrat myself for a good share of my life. And I feel there must be, in a gathering like this -- as there have been all over the country -- a great many Democrats who find they can no longer in clear conscience follow the leadership of the Democratic Party of today.

Back in those days, and when I was still a Democrat, the leadership of the party, they weren't the first -- or they weren't the ones who joined that ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman and, later, like Scoop Jackson and John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation and anger for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood firm for one and they damned the other.

And then, having done that thing, she returned to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the times will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there -- I have seen evidence of that already from experiments already conducted -- advances in technology and communication.

The President. Well, we support the shuttle program, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station and to do it within a decade. What America needs is high tech, not high taxes.

The President. Thank you. You know, the United States of America was never meant to be a second-best nation. And like our Olympic athletes, this nation should set its sights on the stars and go for the gold.

Our drive to restore excellence in education -- it resulted in the first time in 20 years -- or it overcame, I should say, a 20-year record of decline in the scholastic aptitude test scores, and we've had the first increases in the last couple of years that we've had in 20. Well, we're going to keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence second to none.

And our crackdown on crime produced the sharpest drop ever in the crime index. And we're going to keep cracking down until your families and friends can walk the streets of their neighborhoods and in these cities of ours without being afraid.

And to those who have thought that possibly a nuclear freeze could be of help in that, let me tell you: Yes, when we can persuade the Soviets, in joining us, to reduce the numbers of nuclear weapons down to a fair and verifiable level between each other, then a nuclear freeze makes sense, and we'll have a nuclear freeze.

And as we strengthen our economy, as we strengthen our security, and strengthen the values that bind us, America will become a nation ever greater in art and learning, greater in love and worship of the God that made us and who has blessed us as no other people have ever been blessed on this Earth.

The President. Your idealism and your love of country are unsurpassed. And my generation -- and those several generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- we have a sacred trust, and that is, when the time comes to turn over the reins to you -- you young people out there -- we're going to turn over to you an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, and confidence and dreams as we had when we were your age.

Great Depression, so worldwide and severe that it toppled governments in many places in the world. And we came back later from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in world history. And in a single lifetime -- in a lifetime -- we have gone from the horse and buggy to sending astronauts to the Moon.

I am deeply honored that you've allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years. But much remains to be done. We must continue to build upon the new beginning that we started 4 years ago. So, yes, I am here to ask for your support and to ask for your vote. And I can say America's best days are yet to come.

The President. All right. And then, look, I don't want to spend those 4 more years alone. So make sure that these candidates and these Congressmen that I mentioned in my earlier remarks, make sure they're back there with me in Washington. We need them all.

Well, you know, I know how long you've been out here and I know what the weather has been like, and I tell you, I feel as if I should heed some advice I once got from a minister from out in Oklahoma. He told me a story about his first sermon. He had been ordained a minister, and then he was invited to preach at a little country church. And he worked for weeks on that first sermon.

Well, we didn't get all that we asked for, but we got a lot of spending cuts. We cut the growth in government down from 17 percent a year to 6 percent a year. And we got that tax cut across the board. So, we're determined to keep that recovery strong so that all of us are working and going forward together again.

But I came here to tell you that those victories belong to you. You took your government back from the Washington establishment. There's a lot of politicians back there that haven't found out who they work for. They thought you worked for them. It's the other way around.

So, now I'd like to ask you to send them a message, another message, and that is: We need a man of courage and proven leadership for the United States Senate. Vote for Jack Lousma and send him back there.

He isn't afraid to vote against the special interests who want to spend more money and raise your taxes and regulate your lives. And while you're in the voting booth, a few days from now, voting for Jack Lousma, I hope you'll remember all of Michigan's Republican candidates, because they're all against higher taxes, for lower tax rates and a strong America.

Well, I want to get down to the meat of what I have to say here, so that we can all get in where it's warm. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings into the Government, and so we cut personal income tax rates, as I told you, by 25 percent. And contrary to what you're being told from the other side, that was 25 percent for everybody, not for any special segment of the society.

We knew that inflation was a thief that was stealing your earnings. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we rebuilt that. And today we're better off than we were 4 years ago, we're more secure than we were 4 years ago, and we're respected throughout the world.

You know, we can understand a little bit about the economic theories of my opponent if we look at some of his predictions. Just before we took office, he said our economic program is obviously, murderously inflationary. He said that just before we reduced inflation from more than 12 percent down to 4. And then, after the tax cuts, he said all he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was just before the United States economy created a recovery that created 6 million more jobs in 21 months for the American people. He said that decontrol of oil prices would cost you $36 billion a year more. Well, we cut them -- or we eliminated those controls, and gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon. I think all we have to do to get an absolutely perfect economy is to get him to predict absolute disaster.

As a United States Senator he voted 16 times for a tax increase on all of you. And he's proud of that. He boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you just want to be one of his constituents?

The President. Well, of course, right now, to meet all his promises, in addition to his two-phase economic program -- two phases: one, raise your taxes. He's already told you that. The second phase is, raise them again. Well, I don't think you want his tax increases, and I don't think he's going to get them. We're going to do our best to see if we can lower your tax rates so that we'll be even stronger than we are today.

And then he was very upset and said that it was immoral of us to invade Grenada. Well, a year ago we went into Grenada, and I don't think there's anything immoral about sending in our forces to save the lives of American students when their lives are in danger.

If we could bring inflation down from 12.4 to 4, we're going to bring it down from 4 to 0.0. Our tax cuts led to the greatest expansion that we've had in 30 years. In addition to those 6 million new jobs, in the last 18 months 900,000 new businesses were incorporated. Now, we've got some legislation bottled up there by Tip O'Neill's fellows in the Congress. That's why we have to have those Congressmen of yours back and have those other candidates back, also.

But there's one other thing I want to finish here with. I didn't get to finish it a couple of weeks ago in the debate; I ran out of time. So, I want to say, all over this country I have seen our young people -- your sons and daughters -- and I see them here tonight. And I just want to tell you, this is a special generation. And if I could say to you young people, my generation -- and a few generations between mine and yours -- we lived in an America where you knew you could make your dreams come true if you just went for them. And me and those other few generations I just mentioned, we've got one sacred trust that we must keep with you young people. And that is to see, when the time comes that we turn the reins over to you, we turn over an America that is free in a world that is at peace. We're going to give to you an America where you can fly as high as your own ability will take you, and there will be no government holding you down.

Let me tell you something. I am more honored than I can say over the fact that you have allowed me to serve you for these last 4 years. And yes, I want to be there to finish the job that we started 4 years ago. And I came here to ask for your vote and your support.

And now, I just want to say one other thing. The polls just scare the life out of me. Don't believe those polls. President Dewey told me you should never be overconfident. [Laughter] So, I want to ask you this. On Tuesday, don't any of you think, well, they don't need my vote, everything looks good. Don't you believe it. Go to the polls and vote. And go there and vote for those candidates, for those Congressmen. Vote for Jack Lousma. Send that team back there to help us.

And God bless you. I want to say one more thing. I know that there must be out here many of you who are Democrats, but who have found, as I found -- because I was once a Democrat -- you found that you cannot follow the course set by this present leadership. Well, then come walk with us down the path of hope and opportunity, and we'll have a bipartisan team that will keep America great and prosperous, strong and free. So, go to the polls, get your friends out there to the polls.

God, love of family, neighborhood, and good, hard work. Here are steadiness of purpose and strength of patriotism. My opponent may take a negative view of America, but he'd better not try to peddle his doom and gloom in Michigan.

Well, let me tell you, you have some outstanding candidates for the Congress who feel just the same way. Jack Lousma served with distinction as a colonel in the Marine Corps and as an astronaut. He piloted the space shuttle Columbia on one of its first flights. And today he is a candidate for the United States Senate. And he believes in keeping your taxes down, and I can guarantee you, his opponent, the present incumbent, does not believe in keeping your taxes down.

I've ever known. Bill believes, with me, that we can save you billions of dollars by cutting government waste and fraud, and that's what is the principal difference between him and his opponent, the present incumbent.

You know, Abe Lincoln said that we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn, we got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us.

Four years ago we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Freedom was our North Star, and common sense our constellations. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the Government, and so we cut personal tax rates by 25 percent across the board.

We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, that thief was stealing, along with record interest rates, stealing your future. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we decided to rebuild and be strong again to be prepared for peace.

He sees a day in which every day is tax day, April 15th. Well, we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower your taxes some more. We want to do it for everybody in this country so your families will be stronger, the economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

But you know, let me try to put this all in perspective. The 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once, and for a large part of my life. I'm sure there are many Democrats present; I hope so, because I know that all across this country are millions of patriotic Democrats who have found they can no longer follow the policies of the leadership of the Democratic Party today.

We're asking you to come walk down the path of hope and opportunity with the rest of us, and in a bipartisan way -- a solid tradition of this country -- we'll keep America prosperous and free and at peace.

Last month an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. And then she returned to a shuttle, a space shuttle, in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there -- indeed, I've seen evidence of that from some of the experiments conducted already. There will be advances in technology and communications.

Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station and to do it within a decade. What America needs is high tech, not high taxes.

You know, if America could bring down inflation from 12.4 percent to 4, as we did, then we can bring it down from 4 to 0.0, and we're going to do that. If lowering your tax rates led to the best expansion in 30 years, then we can lower them again and keep America growing right into the 21st century. If we could create those 6 million new jobs in 21 months, then we can make it possible for every American -- young and old, black or white -- who wants a job to find a job.

This is a bill to go into the distressed areas of some of our rural areas and our major city areas and, through tax incentives, establish industry and work there that will give jobs to people that presently don't have them. Well, that bill has been buried in a committee of the Congress for more than 2 years now. And if we get the right people back there in the Congress, they will break it out, and we'll have this bill that will mean hope for millions in the most distressed areas of America.

We've reversed the decline in our military defenses and restored respect for America. And we're going to keep this nation strong to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and for our children's children. And if we make sure that America remains strong and prepared for peace, then we can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and one day banish them entirely from the face of the Earth.

Now, I ran out of time a couple of weeks ago on the debate, and I didn't get to finish something I started to say there. Well, I'm going to say it now. And it's to the young people of our country who are here with us today. You, you are what this election is all about -- you and your future.

I have been seeing these young people all across the country -- on campuses, in schools, in rallies of this kind. And I have to tell you, this generation of young people really sparkles. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. And I want to tell you that my generation and a few generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- we have a sacred trust. And that is, when the time comes to turn over the reins to you, you young people out there, we're going to turn over to you an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, confidence, and dreams as it was when we were your age and growing up in America.

America will never go back, never. We were born to be a special place between the two great oceans with a unique mission to carry freedom's torch. To a tired, disillusioned world we've always been a light of hope where all things are possible. And throughout my life I've seen America do the impossible.

We survived a Great Depression that toppled governments in many parts of the world. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in world history. And in a single lifetime -- in my lifetime -- we have gone from the horse and buggy to landing astronauts on the Moon.

Ours is the land of the free because it is the home of the brave. Our future will always be great because our nation will be strong. Our nation will be strong because we're free. And our people will be free because we're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

I am deeply honored that you've let me serve you for these past 4 years. Much remains to be done. We must continue to build upon the new beginning that we started 4 years ago. So I've come here today to ask for your support and for your vote.

I have it directly from President Dewey: Go to the polls, vote. And I'll tell you, if you're going to vote for me, as you've just indicated, don't send me back there alone. Send these candidates back there with me to help do the job.

It's great to be in Ohio again and wonderful to be in Cleveland. When we were making our plans for this final campaign swing, there were so many places we wanted to visit, I said, ``Just make sure that we get to the banks of Lake Erie, alongside the Cuyahoga. I love the Buckeye State, and I love Cleveland.

Republicans, outstanding candidates, and they'll do a great job defending your interests. And I can tell you that the incumbents they seek to oust are not representing your interests, as far as I've been able to see. We need these two candidates in Washington to keep the pressure on Tip O'Neill. So, help spread the word, and get out the vote, and win 'em for the Gipper. And if you do, we can keep on building opportunities for America.

You know, Abe Lincoln said we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which ended up trying to live our lives for us. Four years ago, we began to navigate by some fixed principles.

We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the government, and so we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent. And that was across the board; no special group of any kind got any special break. We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, and record interest rates were stealing our future. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we decided to rebuild and be strong again to be prepared for peace.

The President. But this year he's outdone himself. He's already promised he's going to raise your taxes. But if he's to keep all the promises that he's made in this campaign -- we've worked it out on the computer -- it would raise your taxes about $1,890 for every household in the United States.

I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years -- on another subject -- not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to Communist aggression. The United States is more secure than it was 4 years ago.

Democrat once, for a good share of my life. And I'm sure there must be Democrats here in this crowd. I hope so, because all over America, there are fine, patriotic Democrats who have found they can no longer follow the present leadership of that party.

Kennedy. They understood the challenges of our times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood for one and damned the other.

But my opponent led the fight in the Senate against the whole shuttle program. He called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to a great challenge, and that is to build a permanently manned space station and to do it in the next decade.

And if America could bring down inflation from 12.4 percent to 4, then we can bring it down from 4 percent to 0.0, and we're going to do that. If lowering your tax rates led to the best expansion in 30 years, then we can lower them again and keep America growing right into the 21st century. If we could create 6 million new jobs in 21 months, then we can make it possible for every American -- young and old, black or white -- to find a job, everyone that wants to find a job.

We're leading a revolution in technology, pushing back the frontiers of space. And if we give our workers the tools they need, in industries old and new, well, I've always believed and I believe now -- you give American workers the proper tools, and they will outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world.

And while education scores are going up, we can be happy that one thing is going down. And that's crime. America was swept by an epidemic of crime in the years before we took office, with over 13 million reported crimes every year. With the help of the American people, we've begun to make real progress. Our national crackdown on crime has produced the sharpest decrease ever in the history of crime statistics and the first time that the serious crime index has shown a decline for 2 years in a row.

And one more thing. Our opponents don't seem to like the kind of judges we appoint. I'll tell you what I believe, and that is that we ought to appoint judges who restore respect for the laws and make criminals think twice before they commit a crime. And I'd be very pleased -- if anybody wants an example of the judges I think we should appoint -- I'd be very pleased to stand on the record of Sandra Day O'Connor in the Supreme Court.

I would like to finish here what I didn't get to finish there. To the young people of our country who are here with us today, you young people are what this election is all about -- you and your future.

And you know, my generation -- and then there's several generations between mine and yours -- well, those generations, when the time comes to turn over the reins to you young people out there, all of us are pledged to turn over to you an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, confidence, and dreams as we had when we were your age.

You know, all of us in this country -- this country is a special place, born here between the two great oceans with a unique mission to carry freedom's torch. To a tired and a disillusioned world out there, we've always been a light of hope where all things are possible. And throughout my life, I've seen America do the impossible.

I'm deeply honored that you've allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years. But much remains to be done. We have to continue to build on the new beginning we began 4 years ago. So, I came here to ask for your support and your vote. America's best days are yet to come. And -- but if you're going to -- and I thank you for that -- don't send me back there alone. Send these gentlemen that I had up here beside me back there with me, so that we can get the job done.

In 1861, just before beginning the long train journey east to become President, Abraham Lincoln stood near this spot and spoke to the people of this good town. He said, ``A duty devolves upon me which is perhaps greater than that which is devolved upon any other man since the days of Washington.'' It was the duty of making certain, as Mr. Lincoln would later say at Gettysburg, that this nation under God shall have a new birth of freedom, and a government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the Earth.

Well, ever since taking office, we've worked hard to restore government of the people, to give this blessed land a new birth of freedom and opportunity. Believe me, we couldn't have accomplished all that we have without the help of your outstanding Senator, Chuck Percy. Since 1967 Chuck has served in the United States Senate with dedication and skill. He has stood proudly for the people of Illinois, and he's worked tirelessly to help keep America strong, proud, and prosperous.

Now, you've got some other candidates around here, too, and I'll be talking about those in a minute. But during the past 4 years -- let me continue with Chuck -- he's worked to rebuild our nation's defenses, to bring your taxes down. And today, I'm running against an opponent who wants to raise your taxes, and so is Chuck running against that kind of an opponent. The difference is, while Mr. Mondale wants to hike your taxes, it seems that Mr. Simon wants to raise them even more than Mr. Mondale does. A vote for Mr. Mondale and Mr. Simon is a vote for failed policies of higher taxes, higher prices, and a weak defense.

House, Ken McMillan and Randy Patchett and Dick Austin and my close friend and trusted adviser, Bob Michel -- they're just as distinguished and just as committed to a future of low taxes, opportunity, and economic growth. So, please help spread the word. Get out the vote, and please win these votes -- or these races for the Gipper. And if you do, we can keep building our new future of opportunities for America.

You know, my opponent's been talking a lot about business taxes, and he says that there's been thousands of businesses making profits that are not paying a single penny in taxes. Well, you know, that's true. There are provisions in the tax laws that allow for investment for increased production and things of that kind. But I'm surprised that he didn't mention that in the 4 years of Carter-Mondale, there was an average of 387,000 corporations a year that didn't pay any taxes, even though they'd made a profit. So, I don't know why he's just discovered that that goes on now.

But America is back, a giant on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace. And do you know something? That's not debatable.

And then, just after our tax cuts were voted, and he said the most he could see was an anemic recovery. That was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months.

But now my opponent has promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he's to keep all the promises that he's made in this campaign, he'll have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

His economic plan has two basic parts, too: raise your taxes, and the second part is raise them again. [Laughter] But I've got news for him: The American people don't want his tax increases, and he isn't going to get his tax increases.

I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years -- this is on a change of subject -- not 1 square inch of territory anyplace in the world has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than it was 4 years ago.

Let me put this in perspective. The 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once myself, and for a great share of my life. But in those days -- in those days, its leaders weren't the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman and, later, men like Senator Scoop Jackson, John F. Kennedy. They understood the challenge of their times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up to the one and damned the other.

Now, to all the good Democrats -- and I'm sure there must be many of you in this crowd, and I hope so -- there have been in the rallies all across this country millions of patriotic Democrats who can no longer follow the policies of the leadership of that party. Well, you are not alone. Come and walk with us down this path of hope and opportunity. And in the finest tradition of America, we will have a bipartisan effort to keep this country free and prosperous and secure.

Last month, an American woman made history -- Kathryn Sullivan walked in space. And then she returned to the shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communication. I have seen some of the evidence already of the experiments in the shuttles with regard to those cures I mentioned. But my opponent led the fight in the United States Senate against the entire shuttle program and called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle. And we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station, and to do it within a decade.

And if local governments can establish enterprise zones, as you've done here in Illinois, to create economic growth, then we can elect people to Congress who will free our enterprise zones bill -- the national bill -- and we can pass that bill and provide hope for millions in the most distressed areas of America. This we must do. But it has been buried for more than 2 years in a committee in the House under the direction of Tip O'Neill.

The President. All right. Our drive to restore excellence in education has reversed a 20-year decline in the scholastic aptitude test scores. And we're going to keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence second to none.

I know my opponent talks of a nuclear freeze. Well, I'll talk of a nuclear freeze for just a split second. When we can have negotiations that reduce our weapons and the Soviet Union's weapons down to an equal, verifiable limit, yes, then we'll have a nuclear freeze, and not until.

You young people are what this election is all about -- you and your future. And, you know, I've seen you all over this country -- on campuses, in schools, out here in rallies such as this one -- as you're here today -- and your generation really sparkles. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed.

Well, my generation and those several others in between that I mentioned, we have a very sacred trust. And that is to see that when the time comes to turn over the reins to you, that we turn over to you an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, confidence, and dreams as we had when we were your age. We're going to turn over to you an America that is free in a world at peace.

But as I said, throughout my life I've seen America do the impossible. When I was a young man there was a Great Depression worldwide. It toppled governments throughout the world; here, we survived it. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory that has ever been won in world history. And in a single lifetime -- my own -- we went from the horse and buggy to sending astronauts to the Moon.

We Americans have fought harder, paid a higher price, done more to advance the freedom and dignity of man than any other people who ever lived on this Earth. Ours is the land of the free because it is the home of the brave. America's future will be great because our nation will be strong. And our nation will be strong because our people will be free. And we're free because we're united. We're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

Don't pay any attention to them, because it might tempt some of you to think your vote isn't needed. Well, let me tell you -- all of you -- go to the polls on Tuesday. Get your neighbors and your friends to go to the polls on Tuesday. Vote.

So, all right, America's best days are yet to come. And now, for a few unfriendly voices that I have heard -- I just want to say something to send them up the wall. And that is -- you ain't seen nothin' yet.

The President. The United States is a nation of great size and many resources, but our richest resource is our people. They are fiercely independent, and -- like the French -- they cherish their liberty above all else.

It is a place where the cultures of many nations have blended to produce one culture, that which we call American. We saw a dramatic example of this during the summer Olympics in Los Angeles, when athletes from almost every nation in the world were met by host committees from the Los Angeles area, all of which were composed of people who had come from those countries and are now Americans.

The President. Frankly, I have so many outstanding memories that it would be impossible to select one as my most vivid. I'd like to answer that question the same way I'd answer one about what I consider the best day of my life -- tomorrow. The best is always yet to come.

The President. It was called ``Northern Trails.'' I was quite young and impressionable when I read it, but it began for me a lifelong love of the outdoors. There was a magic world in those pages, and I was delighted to discover that such a world really does exist.

The President. I grew up in the Great Depression. That was a time when you learned that money could mean the difference between having or not having the basic necessities of life. Because God then blessed me with success, I have had the good fortune to also see that money can do more than provide necessities; it can make mankind's lot easier, afford leisure and recreation, and create opportunities for reflective and productive work.

Money can be an object of labor, but it serves its purpose best when it is not an object in itself, but an instrument of creativity, growth, and human progress. It has never had any meaning for me as an end in itself. Although I had very little money in my youth, I had a great deal of happiness.

The President. Before I became President, I spent a lot of time outdoors cutting brush, riding horses, and doing other work around my ranch. Now my time and opportunities for these activities are more limited -- so I try to workout each day with exercise equipment. Horseback riding is still my favorite form of exercise, and I do it whenever possible.

The President. I am against abortion because it is the taking of an innocent life. While some argue that we cannot pinpoint at which moment life actually begins, I am firmly convinced that we must give the unborn child the benefit of the doubt. In my view, the unborn child has a right to life, and it is our moral obligation to protect and defend that right.

Too frequently I heard the argument that ``imperfect life is too expensive to maintain and prolong.'' That worries me, because I believe that any society which concerns itself with the price of life rather than the intrinsic value of life itself has gone awry.

There are a wide variety of alternatives to abortion for dealing thoughtfully with population problems. We have only to look at the success of those nations which have enormous populations but which emphasize market-oriented economic policies to see that human freedom and dignity can be preserved, along with human life.

The President. Movies are still one of my favorite forms of relaxation. However, I do find myself preferring the older films to much of what is produced today. Too many contemporary films today rely on nudity and profanity to attract an audience. I'd rather watch something that depends on good writing, a good script, and a first-class production. It wouldn't be fair of me to name favorite movies or actors.

The President. Nancy has always had an active interest in politics. It's a good thing, because a large portion of our lives have been devoted to public life. I may be a bit prejudiced, but I think she is the perfect political wife as well as the perfect wife. She's always busy, and she takes an active role.

She has taken a keen interest in the problems of our youth, especially in the area of alcohol and drug abuse. And her work with the Foster Grandparents Program, too, is a special cause which brings the elderly and young people together.

The President. As you know, Patti, who is an actress, has recently married, and she is now working on a novel. Ron has decided to leave his career in ballet to pursue journalism. Michael is in business and devotes much of his time to fundraising for charities through speedboat racing.

The President. I believe that politics and religion are related, because I do not believe you can function in politics without some sense of morality. It is through our religious beliefs that our moral tradition in the West is descended. While a legislator or a President may not bring to his politics the specific tenets of his particular faith, each of us brings a code of morals to bear on our judgments.

There is much talk in my country now of religion interfering with politics. Actually, it is the other way around. Politics -- legalization of abortion; attempts to fund abortion with taxpayers' money; prohibition of voluntary prayer in public schools; weakening of laws against pornography; failure to enforce civil rights legislation on behalf of helpless, severely ill infants -- has moved across the barrier between church and state and has invaded the arena of religious beliefs.

Most of Western civilization is based on principles derived from the Judeo-Christian ethic. The wall of separation between church and state in America was erected by our forefathers to protect religion from the state, not the other way around.

The President. In this nation, the rights of individuals are paramount. There are times when the rights of one individual -- particularly when taken into consideration by our Supreme Court -- can influence the rest of our population. Many decisions which I make, or are made by our legislative branch, are made on the basis of the good of the majority. Our civil rights laws were drawn up to protect the rights of individuals, regardless of race, sex, religion, or handicap.

Abraham Lincoln is my favorite. He stood at the helm of this nation during its most trying and tragic time. He functioned under the most difficult of circumstances, and I believe that he served with consummate dignity and humility.

Lincoln had a strong belief in the individual taking responsibility for himself. He was truly a ``man of the people,'' and his love for all his countrymen -- even those who stood across from him in the lines of battle -- was all encompassing. We share many points of philosophy. Also, he had a wonderful facility with words and a delightful wit. This nation was well and honorably served by Abraham Lincoln.

The President. I'm superstitious, so I'm not predicting the outcome. If I am reelected, it will be because Americans do not want a return to the policies of the past. They want to go forward, marching together as a nation with economic, military, and spiritual strength. They want to continue the resurgence that has made us a more reliable ally.

The President. My priorities will be to bring about a more constructive relationship between East and West, to strengthen our ties with our allies and friends around the world, to ensure peace and promote the growth of human freedom.

Now that the United States is restoring its military and economic strength and its national self-confidence, the conditions are better than ever for a more stable and mature relationship between the United States and the Soviet Union. It is time for the Soviets to return to the arms control negotiating table, because there is much work to be done to reduce the levels of weaponry, both nuclear and conventional. We are also prepared for a dialog on regional conflicts, both to avoid confrontations and to help bring about peaceful solutions.

Pacific Basin are the cornerstones of American foreign policy. We face many challenges together, and we can deal with them most effectively if we work together. There are many steps we allies can take to strengthen our common security, promote the expansion of the global economy, and work for world peace. In addition, the United States has many other friends around the world whose security, independence, well-being, and freedom are important to us.

We know that there are many regions of the world that have not yet shared in the economic recovery. We must ensure the continued openness and expansion of the world trading system and resist the protectionist pressures that could jeopardize the recovery. We must encourage sound economic policies in the developing world that will enable these countries to take better advantage of the spreading recovery.

Finally, the United States will continue its traditional role as peacemaker wherever the parties in a local conflict seek our help in promoting negotiated solutions. In Central America, southern Africa, the Middle East, and other regions, we will continue an active diplomacy for peace.

The President. Fundamentally, the dollar is strong because the U.S. economy is strong. We are now completing the second year of our economic recovery, one of the strongest in our post-World War II experience. The recovery is being fueled by a vigorous expansion in business investment. The inflation rate remains low.

International investors appear confident that the policies which achieved these results will be continued. They have faith in the stability of our political and economic system and in our hospitality to free, market-determined capital flows. As a result of this confidence, net capital inflows into the United States have been very strong, with their positive effects on the exchange rate more than offsetting any negative effects of our current account deficit.

I don't want to get into predictions of the dollar exchange rate. Even the most learned economists don't do a good job in this kind of crystal-ball gazing, and Presidents shouldn't even try. But I will say this: In my second term we will ensure the long-term strength and vigor of the U.S. economy and seek to lead a world economic recovery.

The President. Early in my administration, I appointed a commission of 17 distinguished men and women -- economists, public servants, and people in business -- to study the question of the future role of gold in the monetary system. After careful deliberation, the majority of this commission, which was chaired by Treasury Secretary Regan, recommended that we should not return to a fixed gold standard. Some members felt that a gold standard would provide needed long-term discipline over monetary policies, but the majority view was that restoration of a gold standard would not be a fruitful way of achieving either domestic or international monetary stability.

The President. I firmly believe that the free enterprise system has proved itself the most effective in promoting economic growth and the welfare of the citizens of those countries where it is practiced. The free enterprise system is inherently linked to a democratic society. Just as people benefit from a free exchange of ideas in the political marketplace, so do they benefit from the freedom to ``vote'' by expressing their choices in a free market. A free market system ensures an efficient allocation of resources in response to the needs and wishes of the population and fosters creative energies in the productive sector.

France as an ally for many reasons -- our shared values, common adherence to democratic principles, and our mutual commitments to the prevention of Soviet attainment of military advantage. French forces in metropolitan France, as well as those in West Germany, play an important role in the defense of allied Europe. Although not integrated into NATO's military command structure, French forces can contribute effectively to the overall defense of the West and thus help deter any war in Europe.

The President. Frankly, I find the question puzzling. France is America's oldest ally. You fought by our side in our War of Independence. We fought by yours in this country's two most bloody world conflicts. We owe each other our very national existence. We are each pledged, through the North Atlantic Treaty, to treat an attack upon the other as an attack upon ourselves. I assure you America forgets neither our common history, nor our current commitments.

The President. I think of the French Revolution, the Rights of Man, and our common defense of democratic values for two centuries. Of course, no one who has ever visited France can forget the beauty of the country or the ingenuity and creativity of its people. But for me, France is, above all, the wellspring of Western culture and democratic ideas, and our ally, today as in the past, in their defense.

The President. Certainly, our most significant achievement over the past 20 years -- and it is one we share with others -- must be the preservation and promotion of democracy. The solidarity of the Atlantic alliance has provided Europe the longest period of peace in its modern history, during which the West has achieved the greatest human health, longevity, and prosperity in mankind's recorded experience. Other areas of the globe have been less fortunate. Yet everywhere the market economy system is increasingly seen as the most effective instrument for growth, and everywhere democracy is the inspiration and aspiration of mankind.

American economy; by restoring America's faith in itself, in its institutions, and in its role in the world. We have begun, with our allies, to restore Western defenses and have set forward a comprehensive program for arms control.

Perhaps the most important specific step in this regard was the NATO alliance's implementation of the decision it took in December 1979 to restore the balance in intermediate-range nuclear missiles. Facing an unprecedented Soviet campaign of propaganda and intimidation, combined with a Soviet refusal to negotiate equitable limitations, the alliance stuck together and began the deployment of cruise and Pershing II missiles on time.

The resolute support of the French Government made an important contribution to Western solidarity on this crucial issue. As a result, the alliance is, I feel, stronger and more cohesive today than at any time in its recent history.

Thank you very much. Thank you, ladies and gentlemen. It's wonderful to be in Arkansas. And if I have my history correct, it's wonderful to be the first President since Harry Truman to stay overnight here in Little Rock.

Well, I must say, I admire your spirit. You know, back just a few years ago when other people were burning our flag, you were waving it. I don't know if a President ever thanked you for that, but I'm proud to thank you.

Well -- but let's not any of us be complacent. I'm telling you quite frankly that if a gypsy were to look into her crystal ball and say, ``Mr. President, you can either win easily on Tuesday; or win with fewer votes, but with a Congress that will help you,'' I would choose the latter, because if we're to solidify our gains, the gains we've made in these past 4 years, we'll need a Congress that will allow us to move forward -- a Congress that won't insist on going back to the bad old days and the bad old ways.

Congress that will help our entire country continue to be a land of opportunity for everyone. I want to talk to you about Ed Bethune, who's going to be the first Republican Senator from Arkansas since Reconstruction.

Now, I know that many of the good people of this State are Democrats, and I respect that tradition. I was a Democrat, too, for most of my adult life. But I changed parties when the leadership of the Democratic Party changed course. Its current leaders have made that once great party into the plaything of the left, the hobby of the elite, and the home of the special pleaders.

But people like Ed Bethune do. He believes in a strong, a united country, an America of pride and power. And he's for a strong national defense. He's for prosperity. And he's for lower taxes. And I don't think his opponent could make those same statements.

And we need the can-do spirit of Judy Petty in the House of Representatives. She's for the policies that will create economic growth. And she's often said, ``Young people don't want a welfare check. They want a paycheck.'' Well, we need more of that kind of thinking in the Congress. And we need Congressman Paul Hammerschmidt, too.

Government. And so, we cut personal income tax rates across the board 25 percent. And those in this campaign who are telling you that those taxes were unbalanced and benefited certain groups more than others; they're lying in their teeth. We cut them across the board for everyone.

But America is back; America is on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and preserve the peace. And do you know something? That's not debatable.

The President. I'm with you. And any of those rumors suddenly that are being floated around desperately in these last couple of days about some suspected tax increases from our side -- over my dead body. Don't you believe it.

My opponent's understanding of economics is well described by his predictions. Just before we took office, he said that our economic program was obviously, murderously inflationary. And it was just shortly after he said that that we reduced inflation from over 12 percent down to around 4.

And then, just after our tax cuts were adopted, he said the most he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months.

Thank you. Thank you. But as I was saying, his economic plan has two basic parts. One, raise your taxes, and two, do it again. [Laughter] But I've got news for him. The American people don't want his tax increases, and he's not going to get them.

He sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15. Well, we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower your tax rates, yours and everyone's in this country, so that our economy will be stronger, our families will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

The President. And I was just going to say, I hope, though, that there are many out here who are still members of that party, but who are here because they've found they can no longer follow the policies of the leadership of that party.

Now, all across this country, in rallies like this, I've been speaking to people that I knew many were Democrats. And those who respect that tradition that I just mentioned, I say you are not alone. We're asking you to come walk with us down that path of hope and opportunity and in the traditional bipartisan manner of this country. Together, we can keep this land prosperous, secure, and free.

You know, last month an American woman, Kathryn Sullivan, walked in space. And then she made her way back to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there. I've seen the evidence in experiments already conducted, advances in technology and communications.

My opponent led the fight in the Senate against the entire shuttle program -- tried to shut it off, kill it before it was born. And he called it a horrible waste. And we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a manned space station, and to build it within a decade. And that's -- and I think that you'll all agree, what America needs is high tech, not high taxes.

We're leading a revolution in technology, pushing back the frontiers of space, and if we give our workers the tools they need -- I have always believed this and I believe it more than ever -- give American workers the right tools, and they will outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anyone, anyplace, anytime in the whole world.

Our drive to restore excellence in education has reversed a 20-year decline in the scholastic aptitude test scores, and we're going to keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence second to none.

Every once in a while, I see along the street people with nuclear freeze signs, and I know that my opponent has adopted that and I know they're kind of trying to heckle me. But I'll tell them something, and I'll tell you: Yes to a nuclear freeze. After we have reduced nuclear weapons down to a verifiable and equal level on both sides, then we can have a nuclear freeze.

And as we strengthen our economy and strengthen our security -- strengthen the values that bind us -- America will become a nation even greater in its standard of living, in art, culture, and learning; greater in love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us more than any people on this Earth have even been blessed.

Now, I ran a little short of time a couple of weeks ago on the debate. [Laughter] And I'd like to finish what I didn't get to say there. And this is to the young people of our country who are here with us today.

And throughout my life I've seen America do the impossible. When I was a much younger individual we survived a Great Depression that toppled governments in many countries of the world. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory the world has ever known. And in a single lifetime, my own, we went from the horse and buggy to sending astronauts to the Moon.

But as a people, we Americans have fought harder, paid a higher price, done more to advance the freedom and dignity of man than any people who ever lived on this Earth. And America's future will always be great because our nation will always be strong. And our nation will be strong because our people are free. And our people will be free because we're united. ``One people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.'' We're the home of the free because we're the land of the brave.

All right. But now, let me ask one more thing. Don't send me back there alone. Send these people here, and send this one to the statehouse. I know what Governors mean in a National Government, having been one myself.

In 3 days this election campaign will be over, and America's future will be in your hands. As you discuss the election with family and friends in your homes and neighborhoods, I think there's one thing we can all agree on. We all want to vote for something, not against something. We want to vote for a better America, for a stronger country with our people pulling together; a future of peace, filled with hope and new opportunity, a future where our progress is limited only by our own dreams and determination and where Americans are working because America is working.

So, it seems to me the question to be asked is a straightforward one: Which team's record and proposals stand a better chance to enable you and your families to enjoy a strong and successful future? Well, our opponents don't spend much time speaking about their record. And that's understandable. Their record speaks for itself.

After 4 years of controlling the White House and both Houses of Congress, they left America weaker, both at home and abroad. They would have us forget their legacy of an America second-best, double-digit inflation, record taxes and interest rates at home; growing instability and threats to peace abroad. I'd be willing to forget that record, too, if they weren't so bound and determined to give us more of that medicine that made us sick.

As for their new proposals, they differ from their old ones in only one respect: They've promised more. They will spend more, and they will raise your taxes much higher, the equivalent of $1,890 per household, more than $150 per month.

Now, my opponent wants very badly to make you believe his enormous tax increase proposal won't hurt your families. That's what his commercials say. And those commercials are every bit as believable as the ones he ran portraying himself as a person committed to a strong national defense, standing on the deck of a carrier, even though he voted against them, with F - 14 fighters, which he also voted against, and beside American enlisted men, whose salary increases he opposed.

Our opponents are determined to bring back even more big taxing and spending than before. And if they regain control of this government, Americans may look back on our term as one brief oasis of prosperity in an endless desert of worsening inflation and recession.

America can do better, much better. And the fact is, America is doing better. The principal difference is, our vision for America will let the eagle soar. Theirs will return us to the days of the sore eagle.

We still face great problems, but today our economy is stronger than 4 years ago because we've cut your tax rates, brought inflation and interest rates down, and created 6 million new jobs. And America is more secure, because we're rebuilding our defenses and our alliances to ensure peace through strength.

We've made a good start, but it's only a start. We want to lower your tax rates further to create more jobs and opportunities for every American with nobody left behind. And nobody left behind means we must continue our efforts to modernize our older industries and to rebuild our inner cities and distressed areas of America, so every American who wants a job can find a job.

We've sponsored enterprise zone legislation, to encourage business development and creation of jobs in distressed areas. But from day one, our enterprise zone proposal has been held hostage by the House leadership, the very people who act as if they expect black and Hispanic Americans to march in lockstep with the Democratic Party.

I believe Americans are coming together with new strength, confidence, spirit, and unity. From the bottom of my heart, I thank you for allowing me the honor of serving you these past 4 years. I urge you to vote on Tuesday, and I hope you'll cast your votes for our team, our entire team, so we can make even greater progress in building a strong, secure future of opportunity for all of you.

The President. Thank you all. Thank you all very much. Being out here in what's a rather cool, brisk day, I thank you for a heartwarming reception. If I didn't know better, I'd think maybe you were cheering for a certain football team -- the Hawkeyes.

And a heartfelt welcome to the fourth graders of Winterset Elementary School. A few weeks ago, you all sent me letters, and I want to share one with you right now. It came from Tyson Bean of 609 West Short Street. And Tyson wrote, ``Mr. President, my mom and dad watch you on television every night they can. I watch you, too. I think it's fun. But then a couple of minutes after it starts, I have to go to bed.'' [Laughter] Well, Tyson, today I think you're going to be able to stay up until the very end.

Tauke and Jim Leach and Cooper Evans in the House, we've worked hard to turn America around. We've cut inflation by two-thirds, lifted that grain embargo, lowered interest rates, and helped to give our country a new spirit of self-confidence and pride. And I believe we've made real progress. And let me ask your view. Do you believe that America is better off than it was 4 years ago? [Applause] Well, then I don't suppose I have to ask, because I'm sure you believe, then, America's best days are yet to come.

Roger has told me about the concern that Iowa pork producers have with the growth of Canadian hog imports into our country. Well, I want you to know that I have directed Secretary Baldrige to make absolutely certain that our pork producers are getting the fair shake that they deserve. And if unfair subsidies are being used to undercut you, we'll take action.

Roger stands proudly for all of you in Iowa. And I'll need Roger back in Washington, especially when the debate on new farm legislation begins next year, and so will the people of Iowa need him back there. So, will you help send him there?

Well, on behalf of Roger, Jim, and your other superb candidates, I must tell you that if we're to solidify the gains this country's made, we'll need a Congress that'll help us do the job. Spread the word, get out the vote and, if you can -- well, win 'em for the Gipper.

It was a second American revolution, and it's only just begun. America is back, a giant on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace. And you know something? That's not debatable.

My opponent's understanding of economics is pretty well demonstrated by his predictions. Just before we took office, he said our economic program is obviously, murderously inflationary. And that was just before we lowered inflation from more than 12 to down around 4 percent. And then, just after our tax cuts, he said that the most he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months. My opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost you $36 billion. Well, one of the first things we did was decontrol oil prices, and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

The President. But this year he's outdone himself. Of course, he's already promised to raise your taxes, but if he's to keep all the promises he's made to this group and that during this campaign, he'll have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

His tax plan would bring our recovery to a roaring stop. You know, if my opponent's campaign were a television show, it would be ``Let's Make a Deal.'' [Laughter] You give up your prosperity for the surprise he's got hidden behind the curtain. [Laughter] And if it were a show on Broadway, it would be ``Promises, Promises.'' [Laughter] And if his administration were a novel, a book, you'd have to read it from the back to the front in order to get a happy ending.

He sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th; we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. Now, we want to lower your taxes, yours and everyone's in this country, so your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

And America is stronger because of the recovery. I wish I could take credit for it, but the credit really belongs to the American people who came through our economic distress with courage, commitment, and strength. But we're not going to rest until the recovery has reached all Americans, including those who feed and clothe our nation and the world.

As one who lived and worked in this great State for a number of years, I know the farmers here as friends and neighbors. The long road that you had to travel and still have to travel is something I care about personally. You've been patient and understanding during these last years of hardship.

Well, if they think that embargo was a fairy tale, let them come to Iowa. Let them go to Illinois and Missouri and Ohio, Kansas, and the rest of America to see how farm families have had to struggle to recover from that fairy tale.

The only thing that embargo [did] was to fill up your bins and empty your wallets. We don't intend to hide behind their excuses. We're going to work to recapture those overseas markets they lost. We'll not rest until interest rates come down even farther. And we're going to fight to keep inflation down, so farmers and ranchers aren't buried again by out of control production costs.

On another subject a little farther away, I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years not 1 square inch of territory anyplace in the world has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago.

Democrat once, back in those days when I was back here in Iowa. I was a Democrat for the greater part of my life. But in those days, the leaders of the Democrat Party weren't in the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman; later, men like Senator Scoop Jackson and John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for our own country, for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

I know you respect that tradition of your party. But I say now, ``You are not alone.'' We're asking you to come and walk with us down that path of hope and opportunity and in that tradition in this country of bipartisanship, between us, we can assure a prosperous, a secure, and a free America.

Last month an American woman, Kathryn Sullivan, made history. She walked in space. And she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communication. On those health experiments, I've already seen enough evidence to know that progress is being made, and we may come up with some cures that are absolutely impossible anyplace but to make them up in space.

And yet my opponent, in the Senate, led the fight against the entire shuttle program, called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station and to do it within a decade. What this country needs is high tech, not high taxes.

American workers the tools they need -- I've said this and I've believed it all my life, and I believe it more than ever now: Give American workers the right tools, and they will outproduce, outcompete, and outsell any other workers in the world, anyplace, at anytime.

Our crackdown on crime produced the sharpest drop in the history of the crime index last year, and we're going to keep cracking down until your families and friends can walk on the streets at night and feel safe.

Every once in a while I see some signs about nuclear freeze, and I know my opponent has talked of this -- nuclear freeze. Yes, we can have a nuclear freeze, just as soon as we have negotiated nuclear weapons down to a verifiable, equal level on both sides -- then we'll have a nuclear freeze.

And you know, Roger Jepsen's opponent seems to have been disturbed somewhat about what he calls expensive monkey wrenches and so forth that the Defense Department is buying that they could pick up for a few pennies here and there in a store. Well, let me just straighten him out on something. Who do they think has found out about those high-priced tools and is doing something about it?

That's been going on for a long time. You didn't hear about it 4 years ago. We're the ones that have dug it up. We're the ones that have gotten out hundreds of indictments and hundreds of millions of dollars in rebates because of that kind of flaw.

America will become a nation even greater in our standard of living, in art and learning, and greater in love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us more than any people have ever been blessed in the world.

Now, a couple of weeks ago in the debate, I ran out of time and didn't get to finish what I was going to say. I'm going to finish it here. It has to do with the young people of our country who are with us here today, because you are what this election is all about -- you and your future. Your generation -- and I've seen so many of this younger generation of ours across the country, in their schools, on the campuses, and in gatherings and rallies like this, just like those young people that are here -- and I want to tell you, that generation really sparkles.

You know, this land of ours was placed here, I've always believed, between the two great oceans, with a unique mission to carry freedom's torch. To a tired, disillusioned world we've always been a light of hope where all things are possible. And throughout my life, I've seen America do the impossible.

When I was a young man, we survived a Great Depression that toppled governments all over the world. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in world history. In a single lifetime, my own, we have gone from horse and buggy to sending astronauts to walk on the Moon.

Ours is the land of the free because it's the home of the brave. And our future will be great because our nation will be strong. Our nation will be strong because our people will be free. And our people will be free because we're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

Well, now, I know that some of you have some important business to attend to, a very big football game. So, before I go, let me wish all the best to two of Iowa's outstanding teams, the Harlan Cyclones and, yes, the Winterset Huskies.

Q. Mr. President, when you said this morning that taxes would be raised ``over your dead body,'' did you mean to deny the Washington Post story that said that some people in the Treasury Department are preparing a plan to eliminate the deductions for State taxes?

The President. We're not. We turned them over to the -- the oversight -- the commission -- the oversight commission of all intelligence. And Casey's been very forthcoming in his statements about it. And I think you're going to find that it was all a great big scare, and that there was nothing in that manual that had anything to do with assassinations or anything of that kind.

The President. No. But I know enough about the reports that have been made -- some of the members in the intelligence committees in the Congress. And, no, there was nothing in that manual that talked assassination at all.

The real word was ``remove,'' meaning remove from office. If you came into a village or town, remove from office representatives of the Sandinista government. When they translated it into the Spanish, they translated it ``neutralize'' instead of ``remove.'' But the meaning still remains the same.

The President. I think it was probably the world's biggest cheap shot in a long, long time. They know better, of course. And I think to take advantage -- I know that human life doesn't mean much to them -- but to take advantage of a tragedy of this kind to try and gain some political advantage -- it was a cheap shot.

Well, it's very good to be in Milwaukee, and it's a joy to visit this Wesley -- or Welsley Park retirement home. Nancy and I thank you for inviting us. And I would like to formally say hello to all of you octogenarians, nonagenarians, and, of course, the kids -- my fellow septuagenarians.

But one of them -- is something that I think has been the -- some things I want to speak about just briefly, and one of them, I think, is the most disturbing part of the election campaign -- the eagerness of some, for political purposes, to demagogue on the issue, actually, of Social Security.

And it really leaves me steaming when they try to portray that some of us are having some plans in which secretly we're going to do something about depriving people who are dependent on that particular program.

When we came into office the problem was Social Security was facing bankruptcy. And we tried to get a bipartisan program together to salvage the program, and after the 1982 election, finally they agreed -- when we had to borrow $17 billion to -- so the checks wouldn't bounce. And I feel that the people in Social Security, who contributed all their lives in that program, invested, entrusted their money to the Government -- and now, I want to make one thing plain, and I hope to be able to talk to my contemporaries about this, and say this, and that is: There is no secret plan to do anything about depriving people who are dependent on Social Security, and there never will be as far as I have anything to say about it.

Those who are dependent on this program are going to be able to depend on it. And we have now had that bipartisan get-together, and the program is sound fiscally for as far as we can see into the future, into the next century.

Now, there's another thing I want to talk about for just a second here. Most of us have had children and helped bring them up, one way or another, give them support and encouragement, teaching them. And now in traveling over the country in these past few months -- and when I was Governor of California, there seemed to be a different era with the young people than there is now. I think you'd like to know if you had the opportunity to be on a campus or see them, today's young people are just the most wonderful young people that I can ever remember seeing. They're filled with patriotism and a love of country. They're serious about their lives and their wanting an opportunity and to get ahead. And it's just a magnificient thing to see. And you'd all be very proud.

Now, I mentioned that other time when I was Governor. I also would like to talk for just a moment about us and our generation. While I was Governor, that was in the era when I was being hung on a number of campuses in effigy, and they were burning flags and the school buildings down and so forth. But one day I got a demand from some student officers on the University of California nine campuses, a demand to see me. Well, if I went near the campus, I started a riot, so I was delighted.

And so, I think that we have nothing to apologize for. Those people who want to say, ``Well, the people that went ahead of us, they didn't leave this or that for us.'' I think this generation of ours, we can sit back and smile easily, because -- I've been saying to some people out on the road -- I don't think anyone has ever done more to give dignity and freedom to our fellow man than we have in this, our single lifetime.

Well, thank you all for a most heartwarming reception, and it's great to be back in Milwaukee, home of the Brewers and the Bucks and the best breweries in America. And it's great to be back in a State where your people vote in one voice -- or unite in one voice, I should say -- ``On, Wisconsin.'' You know, that's the song, the fight song of the university -- but when I was playing football many years ago in a high school down in Illinois, it was also our song. And all over the country I found more school bands that have made your song, their song. So, you have some universal music.

Well, yours is a beautiful State, of course. It's a wonderful, natural beauty of rivers and hills and valleys. But the best thing about Wisconsin is you, her people. I'm happy to be here with the sons and daughters of Wisconsin's immigrants, brave people who have followed their dreams to America, pushed back our frontiers, and built strong and thriving cities like this one.

But I've come to ask for your support today for some of America's -- or Wisconsin's finest, who are helping us build a better American future. And one of the bright stars in the United States Senate is not running this year. He's your own Bob Kasten. And I know that Bob agrees with me that we've got to keep America moving forward by reflecting all of Wisconsin's strong Republican Congressmen -- electing them, I should say -- Jim Sensenbrenner, Toby Roth, Tom Petri, and Steve Gunderson. And I wish I had time today to tell you how important each of them has been to our fight for the future. But please take it from me, America and Wisconsin need them back in Washington. Please see that they all get back there with us.

And then, then just after we got our tax cuts, he said the most he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months.

My opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost you $36 billion. Well, that was one of the first things we did -- we decontrolled oil prices. And the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

The President. All right. You've talked me into it. All right. You know, he sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15. And we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower your taxes and everyone's taxes in this country so that your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

And I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years -- on another subject -- not 1 square inch of territory anyplace in the world was lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago.

And now if I can, let me try to put this in perspective. The 1984 election is not just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once; in fact, for a good share of my life. But in those days, the leaders of the Democratic Party weren't in that ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, Senator Scoop Jackson, John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood for one and damned the other.

Now, to all the good Democrats who respect that tradition I say -- and I hope that there are some among you -- I've said this all over this country when we have rallies of this kind. I know that in this country there are millions of patriotic Democrats who find they can no longer follow the policies of the present leadership of that party. Well, I say to you -- if you are here -- you are not alone. We're asking you to come and walk with us down that path of hope and opportunity, and in a bipartisan effort, which is a tradition of our country, between us, we will make sure that this is a prosperous, a free America.

Last month an American woman, Kathryn Sullivan, walked in space. And then she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communications. I have seen evidence of those medical experiments that have been started already. And they're encouraging, and lead us to believe that we can -- up there -- find those cures, or make those cures, that we cannot make here on Earth. My opponent led the fight against the shuttle program in the United States Senate. He called it -- that it was a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station, and to do it within the next decade. What America needs is high tech, not high taxes.

And if local governments can establish enterprize zones to create economic growth, then we can elect people to Congress who will free our enterprise zones bill, the national bill that is going to use tax incentives to go into distressed areas in the inner cities, and even in the rural areas, and bring in industry and jobs for those people who are presently wards of the Government, and bring them hope and opportunity. And it's been buried in a committee in the House of Representatives for more than 2 years, under the direction of Tip O'Neill. And that's why we want these candidates and these Congressmen of yours, returned to Washington, so that we can get that program out on the floor.

You know, I have thought that if we give our workers in this country the proper tools, the tools they need -- and I believe this with all my heart -- they can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anyone, anywhere in the entire world, anytime.

And we're going to keep this nation strong to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and for our children's children. And if we make sure that America remains strong and prepared for peace, then we can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and, one day, to banish them from the Earth entirely.

My opponent has talked of a nuclear freeze. And every once in awhile, I see people put posters up in front of me -- Nuclear Freeze. Okay, a nuclear freeze -- when we have reduced the nuclear weapons on both sides down to an equal, verifiable level, then we will have a nuclear freeze.

And now, 2 weeks ago on the debate, I ran out of time. [Laughter] And I've decided to finish here what I didn't get to say there. And this is directed to the young people of our country who are here with us this evening.

You young people are what this election is all about -- you and your future. I have seen them all across this country, on campuses, in schools, and in rallies like this. And I have to say, your generation really sparkles. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed.

And I believe that, well, my generation -- and there were a few other generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- our sacred trust is and what we must do for you. We grew up in an America where you could dream, you could make your dreams come true, you could fly as high and as far as your own ability and strength and talent would take you. And we -- myself and those generations I mentioned -- our sacred trust is, and we pledge to you -- when it comes your turn, we're going to turn over the reins of an America that is free in a world that is at peace. And it will be an America in which you can dream and make your dreams come true and fly as high and far as your own strength can take you.

America will never give up and never go back -- never. We were born to a special place, I think, this land of ours between the two great oceans, with a unique mission, and that was to carry freedom's torch. To a tired and disillusioned world, we have always been a light of hope where all things are possible.

Then we survived and came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in all the history of mankind's wars. In a single lifetime -- my lifetime -- we've gone from horse and buggy to sending astronauts to the Moon.

We Americans, as a people, have fought harder, paid a higher price, done more to advance freedom and the dignity of man, than any people who ever lived on this Earth. Ours is the land of the free because it is the home of the brave. And America's future will always be great because our nation will be strong. And our nation will be strong because our people will be free. And because we -- we're free because we're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

The President. All right. But listen, don't send me back there alone. [Laughter] I want these people I've been talking about earlier here -- I want your Congressmen that are running, of course, for reelection now; and I want those candidates that are running for their first election here -- I want them all back there with me, so that we can do those things that need to be done.

Dewey told me not to get overconfident. [Laughter] So, please, don't get complacent; don't think your vote isn't necessary Tuesday. It's just that one simple thing: vote. And make sure your neighbors vote. Get everyone out to the polls. We need all those votes.

Rushmore, I didn't see President Dewey's face there. [Laughter] So today, once again, we want to urge our supporters to get out to the polls, to take their neighbors, to do all that's possible to see that our message gets to the people. And when they get to the polls, we would appreciate their support for the reelection of Minnesota's strong and effective Senator, Rudy Boschwitz. I need Rudy back in Washington again, as well as the two fine congressional candidates, Pat Trueman and Keith Spicer. And Keith is here with us today.

We need help to get tax rates down even lower, not up. We need help to keep America strong and always prepared for peace. We need help to keep control over the growth of government, so that we get back to the first principles in America: Here the people are in charge. And we need your help to get our initiatives passed into law -- a balanced budget amendment, a line-item veto, enterprise zones, and tuition tax credits.

We need the help of every citizen to keep alive the fire of hope in America, to make opportunity our national watchword, so that we'll go into the next decade and the next century a strong, prosperous, and united nation, which will give the next generation the fullest of freedom in a world at peace.

Q. Mr. President, you said yesterday that you would not use tax reform in any way as a guise for tax increases. In these closing days of the campaign, would you flatly, absolutely rule out, in a second term, supporting the idea of taxing unemployment or workmen's compensation benefits or changing the Federal deductions for State and local taxes?

The President. I just have to tell you that I have seen some of these reports and rumors about what is being considered. I have seen no report, as yet, directly from those who are working on the idea of tax reform. I know that the instructions to them are: we want a simplification; we want no increase in rates in the individual; if possible, to broaden the tax base to get some of that $100 billion that isn't presently being paid by people who owe it.

The President. No, not the people presently paying taxes having their taxes increased. If there would be any increase in government's revenues, it would be in the broadening of the base to where we would then be getting some of the money that, as I say, is presently not being paid to the Government. And it's been estimated by many people that the amount is probably in the neighborhood of $100 billion of tax that is being avoided in the United States.

The President. I've said many times, Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News], that there is no intention on our part whatsoever of troops going into Latin America anyplace, or any military help of that kind, nor has it been asked by anyone in Latin America. As a matter of fact, I think they would be very much opposed to it. They've expressed that feeling to us.

The President. On the other hand, should a President ever be in the position of, perhaps, encouraging more aggression down there by making such a statement? I'm just going to tell you that we have no plans whatsoever, nor any desire, to put forces into Latin America.

And we've proposed a plan -- or had a plan proposed that we've adopted -- and that is the plan from the bipartisan Kissinger-chaired commission that calls for a 5-year program of economic and social aid for about three-fourths of the amount, and about one-fourth to help them with their security by providing arms training and so forth. And we think that plan is what we want to follow.

The President. I'm glad you asked that, because no one's ever bothered to ask. I was sitting in a room -- granted, I should have been aware that there are no secrets. I was sitting in a small room, ready to do my radio broadcast, with a few of my own people around me, and actually I meant it as a kind of a satirical blast against those who were trying to paint me as a warmonger.

So, having to do a soundcheck, I simply said that for the soundman's benefit. I didn't know until later that a line had been opened, because one of you here complained -- one of the TV networks or radio networks had complained that their line to the location was giving them some trouble.

I have to say that whatever my sin was in making a joke of that kind -- even though it was intended in private for only a few people -- I don't think that was any greater sin than the media, then, broadcasting it worldwide in such a way that it could create an incident.

The President. Whether it was right or wrong to make it, it was made in the privacy of a room and a few people close to me that I believed it would not go any further. And it was just on the spur of the moment I had to say something. And you get tired, sometimes, of counting to 10 as a voicecheck and so forth.

But, all right, I shouldn't have said it. But I will further emphasize, the media also shares in a responsibility for our national security. And I don't think they should have spread it. They weren't intended to hear it.

Q. Mr. President, do you think you've been fair to the American voter by not being specific on anything you're going to do after the election? I speak of taxes, I speak of possible adventurism abroad if you have a mandate. Also, you said that you don't want to write off any part of the electorate, but the blacks will not vote for you because they think that you have not been fair.

The President. And they think that because they do not know, nor have they been told, nor have we been able to get the message to them, of how much has been done. And I will charge right now that no administration previous to ours has done as much, has filed as many criminal charges for violation of the civil rights law, has done as much with regard to the helping of the historic black colleges and universities.

I could go on with more things that we've done. As a matter of fact, in our present employment training act, enterprise zones would be aimed very predominantly in a number of areas in the country at those people; the small business support, the fact that we have directed government contractors to use minority-owned firms -- and that goes in the military, too, in the subcontractors in Defense -- and we've vastly increased anything that has ever been done in the stimulation and development of minority-owned businesses.

Q. Mr. President, just one question on that, a followup on that. You've said that many times before, about the black situation, yet in all of your campaign appearances there are hardly ever any black people in your audiences. Why haven't you encouraged more appearances in black areas of the country to invite black people out to hear -- personally from you -- what your programs are?

The President. Well, in the areas where we've been, and in the cities that we've campaigned in, there's no block to anyone being present. But doesn't it indicate that, just what I've said, we're well aware that the overwhelming majority have been misled as to what our administration represents with regard to their interests. But we also know that all of those who do know of what we've done are highly supportive of us and are doing a lot to help try to get the message to the rest of the minority groups. But I will match our record against, as I've said, that of any other administration.

The President. Well, I'm quite sure that -- [laughing] -- you know, this isn't going to be a scoreless game by the other side. And of course the supporters are coming out, and I would expect them to do that. And I'm not paying any attention to the polls. That's why I'm still campaigning right down to the wire as hard as I can.

The President. Well, let me just say something else that no one's paid any attention to. If you add up the total time that I have done with regard to the press corps -- standing under the airplane wing out there, meetings of that kind -- that total time, since Labor Day, would amount to about 6 regular 30-minute press conferences. So the fact that we haven't called it a formal press conference and done it in the East Room of the White House, I think that that sort of belies the fact that I'm in a cocoon, and that I am not available to the media.

Q. Mr. President, sir, it's 2 days before the election, and you haven't been to Minnesota before in your Presidency. Do you think, perhaps, the Minnesota voters might look at this trip with a little bit of cynicism?

The President. It isn't cynicism. I just wasn't going to forgo the chance here. I haven't intervened much in the logistics; I have left it to those people who are planning campaigns as to where we go, and we can't go every place. But, as I say, we weren't going to miss this opportunity when we were this close.

Q. Mr. President, please, you know I feel discriminated against because people are talking here about blacks, and there are a million and a half black-Hispanic like me that have been shoulder to shoulder supporting your policy in Latin America. And the people say you have no support of the black. What about the black, naturalized American from Cuba, from Santo Domingo, from all Latin America who are people who -- like others -- who value and support your policies? Have they count or not?

The President. A little bit mixed emotions. There's a certain amount of nostalgia with it, but it's sort of like you felt when coming up to your last football game of the season and knowing you weren't going to play football anymore.

Q. I have a question for the local farmers, Mr. President. We're from Austin, Minnesota, a local station about 30 miles away from here. Farming is a big issue, obviously, here. What would another 4 years mean to farmers in southern Minnesota?

The President. I think that it would mean a great deal to the farmers, because I'm well aware of what their problems have been and the problems they're suffering right now. Those problems were the result of 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, of double-digit inflation for 2 years in a row, and of a very ill-advised grain embargo. And I don't think enough has been done in the past with regard to trade in other commodities. We have been working throughout the world now to stimulate markets. We canceled the grain embargo, as you know. Certainly, inflation has come down -- and interest rates -- and both must come down farther.

But all of this is aimed at -- we're trying to develop world markets for our farm products. And the fact that we sold 23 million bushels -- or metric tons, I should say, not bushels, metric tons -- to the Soviet Union alone last year and have extended this to make another 10 million available right now -- but then we've been dealing with Southeast Asia, and our trading partners -- Japan.

I estimate that the sale of American beef to Japan will probably double over the next 4 years as a result of the things we've worked with them already. I think that the farmers should take a look at where they were under the previous administration, and how little was done for them and how much was done to them, and decide that, maybe, we're embarked on a different course.

The President. The only thing that I could ever see of the use of a grain embargo would be if this country were imposing a total boycott of everything, in which everybody in the country would participate. But to pick the farmers out as the hit, as the only people who are then going to participate in a boycott, that was decidedly unfair, and we're shooting ourselves in the foot.

The President. Thank you. And I think you know how deeply grateful I am, not only to all of you for being out here but for a long-time and good friend, Bob Hope, to come here and interrupt his trip home to be here with us.

West. And I'd like to thank you for sending to Washington an individual who's been in the forefront of the battle to strengthen our economy and rebuild America's defenses, your fine Senator Jack Danforth.

You've also sent to the Congress three Representatives who are working hard to keep our economy growing and our country safe and secure. They're strong voices for responsible government, and come election day, please make sure you send back Gene Taylor, Tom Coleman, and Bill Emerson.

Congressional District. Carrie is the kind of individual we can work with. It's a close race. We need your help, because we need Carrie in the Congress. And the same is true for Jack Buechner in the Second District. He's a former member of your general assembly. And Jack would be a major asset to our efforts to keep our taxes down and our economy growing. And here in this district, we have Eric Rathbone. We need Carrie, Jack, and Eric in Washington, and let's do our best to get them there.

You know, one of the accomplishments about which I'm most proud is that in these last 4 years we've reestablished the balance between Federal and State government. We tended for awhile to forget that this nation is unique in all the world. We are a federation of sovereign States, and we'd better keep it that way. And for that to work, we need to continue the strong leadership at the State level that's been provided to you by Kit Bond. And now we need John Ashcroft elected as Governor to continue that course. He's already done a fantastic job as attorney general, he can do even more as Governor. And to do that, he'll need the help and support of his fellow Republican statewide candidates -- Mel Hancock, Roy Blunt, Wendel Bailey, and Bill Webster.

We want a strong, a prosperous, and secure America. Abe Lincoln said that we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. Well, 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn, we got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up trying to live our lives for us.

The President. Well, you know, my opponent's understanding of economics is well demonstrated by his predictions. Just before we took office he said our economic program was obviously, murderously inflationary. And that was just before we lowered inflation from above 12 percent to down around 4.

My opponent said that decontrol of the oil prices -- that government control of the oil prices, if we decontrolled it, it would cost you $36 billion. Well, one of the first things we did was decontrol oil prices, and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

But my opponent sees a different world. After the Soviets invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' [Laughter] But then, there's so much that baffles him.

You know, this 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once; in fact, for the greater part of my life. And I have to believe -- in this place, in a crowd like this -- there must be many of you out there who are members of the Democratic Party. And I -- back in -- I know why you're here -- because you know as well as I do, that back there aways, the leaders of the Democratic Party weren't members of the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, Senator Scoop Jackson, John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of our times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

The President. All right. But to those Democrats that I've been addressing, let me just say -- we need you. We need your help in what we're trying to do. And you and I together -- all of us together in the best bipartisan tradition of this country, can keep an America that is secure, prosperous, and at peace.

Last month an American woman, Kathryn Sullivan, walked in space, and she made history. But then after she did that, she returned to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease -- I have seen evidence already of the beginning experiments of medicines that can be produced up there that we can't produce here on Earth, advances in technology and communications. But, again, my opponent, as a United States Senator, personally led the fight against having a shuttle program.

If local governments and States can establish enterprise zones to create economic growth, then we can elect people like those I've mentioned earlier to Congress to help free our enterprise zones bill, a national bill, which has been buried in committee now in the House of Representatives by Tip O'Neill for more than 2 years.

We're leading a revolution in technology in pushing back the frontiers of space. And if we give our workers the tools they need -- I have always believed and I believe more than ever now -- give American workers the proper tools, and they can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody in the world, anytime, anywhere.

Our drive to restore excellence in education reversed a 20-year decline in scholastic aptitude test scores. And we're going to keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence, second to none.

We have reversed the decline in our military defenses and restored respect throughout the world for America. And we're going to keep this nation strong to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and our children's children. And if we make sure that America remains strong and prepared for peace, then we can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and, one day, banish them entirely from the face of the Earth.

I know that my opponent has discussed nuclear freeze. And every once in awhile, I see a sign for it. Well, let me say this about nuclear freeze. When we have reduced nuclear weapons on both sides down to a verifiable, equal balance, then we will have a nuclear freeze.

To the young people of our country who are with us today -- you are what this election is all about, you and your future. Your generation really sparkles. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. I've seen you all across the United States, on campuses, in schools, and here in rallies, as you are here.

And I just want to tell you something. My generation and, well, a few generations between mine and yours, we have a sacred trust. We grew up in an America in which we just took it for granted that you could dream and make your dreams come true, if you are willing to go for them -- that this was a land of opportunity, and it was denied to no one. Well, our sacred trust is, my generation and those of others I mentioned, to see that when it comes time to turn over to you young people the reins of this country, we're going to turn over to you an America that is free in a world at peace and in which you can dream and make your dreams come true.

And throughout my life, I've seen America do the impossible. When I was a young man, we survived a Great Depression worldwide that topped governments in many places in the world, but not here. We came back from Pearl Harbor and won the greatest military victory in world history.

All right. America's future will always be great because our nation will always be strong. Our nation will be strong because our people will be free. And our people will be free because we will be united -- our people, one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

The President. All right. All right. I'm deeply honored that you have allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years, but much remains to be done. We must continue to build on that new beginning that we started 4 years ago. So, I have come here to ask for your support and for your vote.

America's best days are yet to come. And I have something that I know my opponent doesn't like to hear -- and I think there's a few people over here that aren't going to like to hear -- but I'm going to say it anyway. I'm going to say it anyway. You ain't seen nothin' yet.

Governor Deukmejian. This is in honor of the fact that you are the first California Governor to become President of the United States. And so, I've declared this room, from now on, to be the President Ronald Reagan Cabinet Room.

The President. Well, as I said yesterday in Minnesota, it's a little like coming up to that last football game and realizing that you've had all 4 years, and that's the last one you're going to play in.

Q. Mr. President, if you're reelected, will it make any difference to you knowing that you never have to worry about the realities of election politics again for your last 4 years? Will it make a difference in the way you handle the office.

The President. Well, I've always felt that discussing the political ramifications of a measure as to whether it's good or bad for the people isn't the thing to do. You discuss it purely on whether it is right or wrong.

The President. Well, number one of all, of course, is peace -- disarmament and the reduction in the world of nuclear weapons. But on the domestic scene, to continue with the policies that have led to the growth we now have, to make that an ongoing expansion so that we have a growing economy that'll provide jobs for the people that need them.

The President. Well, yes. We're going to pursue the fact that we submitted four different proposals to them -- four different areas of arms reductions, not control -- and they were the ones who walked away from the table. We're going to do everything we can to see if they'll come back.

The President. Well, we won't try to buy them back by increasing offers and so forth. We'll try to convince them that it is to their advantage as well as ours to have a settlement of this particular issue.

The President. Well, we've showed -- we've told them we're flexible on that. When they objected to some things, we immediately said, well, come back and tell us what it is you object to. Let us discuss it. And they wouldn't take yes for an answer.

The President. Well, you have to concentrate on that. That's one of the prime responsibilities of the Federal Government -- maybe a little less attention to some things the Federal Government shouldn't have been doing in the first place.

Governor Deukmejian. Well, we're very honored that you're here. And, from now on, anybody who comes into this room, whether they be visitors or legislators or anyone else, they will know that this is the President Ronald Reagan Cabinet Room.

Thompson said about this Vice President than I do. And he's been working tirelessly in this campaign all over the country. But now, now, I have to explain so you'll understand that he and Barbara -- I'm going to let them go now, because they've got a rally waiting for them down in Texas before this afternoon and evening is out. So, George and Barbara, God bless you and be on your way.

But Nancy and I want to thank all of you for your heartwarming reception, and I want to thank you for your support -- or help in -- or support in helping us put America and our future back in the hands of the people. And, believe me, we couldn't have accomplished all we have without strong Republican leaders like Chuck Percy.

Chuck has defended the interests of your State with the same determination that he has protected the interests of our nation. And if we're going to build on the gains that we've made, we'll need Chuck Percy back there to help us do it. So, now, if by some chance you intend to vote for me, please don't vote against me by voting for Chuck's opponent. A vote for the Mondale-Simon ticket is a vote to go back to failed policies which gave us higher taxes, higher prices, and a weaker America.

Government, and so we cut personal income taxes 25 percent across the board. And in spite of some of the loose talk on the other side in this campaign, that tax cut was ``even-Steven'' for everybody, and not for one particular group or the other.

But America is back -- a giant on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace. And you know something? That's not debatable.

My opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost you more than $36 billion a year. Well, one of the first things we did was decontrol oil prices, and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

The President. Yes. But then, then he boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents?

Now, if his campaign were a Broadway show, it would be ``Promises, Promises.'' And if that administration of which he was a part had been a book, you would have had to read it from the back to the front to get a happy ending.

He sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th. Well, we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower your taxes and lower those for all the people in this country so that your families will be stronger, America will be stronger, this economy will be stronger.

I'm proud to say -- on another subject -- that during these last 4 years, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago.

Yet my opponent sees a different world. After the Soviets invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' But then, there's so much that baffles him.

But, you know, this 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat for a large part of my life, more than half of it. But in those days, the Democratic Party leaders weren't members of the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, Senator Scoop Jackson, John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of our times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for the United States. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

And then she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease -- and I have seen the evidence of some of the experiments already -- to know that there is hope for that -- that developments of cures up there that we cannot develop here on Earth. There will be, also, advances that we will make in technology and communication. But my opponent, as a United States Senator, led the fight personally against having a shuttle program. He said it was a horrible waste.

The President. All right. You know, the United States of America was never meant to be a second-best nation. Like our Olympic athletes, this nation sets its sight on the stars, and we go for the gold.

And if local and State governments can establish enterprise zones to create economic growth, then we can elect people to the Congress, those people I was talking about a little while ago, who will free our enterprise zone bill. We have a national bill to use tax incentives all over the country in distressed areas, to make it possible to have hope and jobs for millions of our people. And that bill has been buried for more than 2 years in a committee of the House of Representatives under the direction of Tip O'Neill.

The President. We're leading a revolution in technology, pushing back the frontiers of space. And if we give our workers the tools they need -- I've always believed this, and I believe it now more than ever -- if you give American workers the tools they need, they will outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anyone, anywhere in the world, anytime.

America. And we're going to keep this nation strong to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and for our children's children. And if we make sure that America remains strong and prepared for peace, then we can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and one day banish them entirely from the face of the Earth.

America will become a nation with a higher standard of living, even greater in art and learning, greater in the love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us as no other people on Earth have ever been blessed.

America where, for so long a time, we simply took it for granted, and it was true, that you could dream and make your dreams come true. It was up to you. Fly as high and as far as your own ability and talent and strength and determination would take you. But then we came into a time for a while there where there were people telling us that there was an era of limits and that things couldn't ever be again as they once were. Well, don't you believe it.

And throughout my life I have seen America do the impossible. When I was a young man we survived a great worldwide depression that made anything we've seen since look like a picnic. We survived that, although governments in many parts of the world were toppled simply by the force of that recession. We came back from Pearl Harbor and won the greatest military victory in world history.

And we as a people have fought harder, paid a higher price, done more to advance the freedom and dignity of man than any other people who ever lived on this Earth. Ours is the land of the free, because it is the home of the brave. America's future will always be great, because our nation will be strong. And our nation will be strong, because our people will be free. And our people will be free, because we're united -- one people under God with liberty and justice for all.

The President. All right. We must continue to build upon the new beginning we started 4 years ago. So, I have come here to ask for your vote and to ask for your support in doing that. And just as you were told earlier, I'll repeat: Don't read those polls anymore. Just don't get complacent.

We came here for the golden opportunity that this State represents. And tomorrow the voters will determine if we're going to keep that dream alive. You know, this State is the only State I know, that if it were a nation, would be one of the top seven or eight economic powers of the world.

But I'm filled with so many memories of times before when I have stood here, including taking the oath of office to serve you as your Governor. The State I remember back in those days had some of the same economic problems that confront the Federal Government -- and confronted it 4 years ago. And I remember saying, as I stood here and faced you, the people of California -- I said that I believed that you -- well, all of us together, the people of California, had an opportunity to start a prairie fire that would sweep across this country. And do you know there were people in the East who said that California is a good place if you're an orange? They're not saying that anymore.

But Abe Lincoln said we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which we found wound up trying to live our lives for us.

Government, and so we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent. And contrary to what some have been saying in this campaign, we did it across the board, without special favors for any particular group.

America is back, a giant on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace. And do you know something? That is not debatable.

He says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts, and I quote, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents?

On another subject, I am proud to say that during these last 4 years, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago.

One year ago we liberated Grenada from the Communists who had taken over that country. And my opponent called what we did a violation of international law that erodes our moral authority to criticize the Soviets.

But now, let me, if I can, put this whole thing in perspective. The 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once, for the greater part of my life. But in those days, the leaders of that party weren't in the ``blame America first'' crowd. It's leaders were men like Harry Truman, Senator Scoop Jackson, and John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and they damned the other.

Now, to all the good Americans who respect that tradition, all the good Democrats -- and I have to believe that here in this crowd there must be many who have found they can no longer follow the leadership of their party, and yet they are loyal Democrats, they are patriotic Americans, I've seen them in meetings like this all over the country in this campaign -- well, to all of you, I say, ``You are not alone.'' We're asking you to come walk with us down the path of hope and opportunity and, in the best tradition of bipartisanship, join us in securing this country, making it prosperous, free, and making it safe and secure.

The President. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a manned space center out in space and to do it within a decade. What this country needs is high tech, not high taxes.

If we could bring inflation down from 12.4 percent to 4, then we can bring it down further, from 4 to 0.0. And we're going to do that. If lowering your tax rates led to the best expansion in 30 years, then we can lower them again and keep America growing into the 21st century. If we could create those 6 million new jobs in 21 months, then we can make it possible for every American -- young and old, black or white -- who wants a job to find a job.

You know, leading the revolution -- as this country is -- in technology, and pushing back the frontiers of space, I have always believed -- and I believe it now more than ever -- if we give American workers the tools they need, in industries old and new, they can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world.

Our crackdown on crime has produced the sharpest drop in the history of the crime index, and we're going to keep cracking down until your families and your friends can walk our streets without being afraid.

My opponent talks about a nuclear freeze, and every once in awhile some people, rather in an unfriendly way, shove a placard in my face that says, ``Nuclear Freeze.'' Well, I can answer them and tell you something, too. Yes, when we have persuaded the Soviet Union to join us in reducing nuclear weapons to an equal and verifiable number, then we will have a nuclear freeze -- but not until.

America will become even greater -- in its standard of living, and culture, in art and learning, and greater in the love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us more than any people have ever been blessed on this Earth.

Now, 2 weeks ago yesterday I didn't -- well, I ran out of time on the debate, and I didn't get to finish something I was saying. I'm going to finish it now. And if you don't mind, I'd like to address it to the young people of our country who are with us here today.

The President. All right. You young people, you're what this election is all about, you and your future. I've seen you all across this country on campuses, in schools, in rallies like this. And I can tell you, your generation really sparkles.

Your idealism and love of country are unsurpassed. And you know, my generation and -- well, there's a few generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- well those generations that I'm talking about, we all grew up in an America where we simply took it for granted that we could dream and make our dreams come true. There was no limit to how high we could fly or how far we could go if we set out to do it.

And then we entered a brief period in which there were people telling us that now we were in a era of limits; that never again would anything be as good; that we'd have to reconcile ourselves to living with less. Well, may I speak on behalf of my generation and those several other generations I mentioned and say to you young people right now, we have a sacred trust, and we're going to keep that trust. And that is to turn over to you the reins, when it comes your turn, of an America that is free in a world that is at peace and where your dreams can come true.

All of us, all of us together are part of a great revolution, and it's only just begun. America will never give up, never go back -- never. We were born to be a special place here between the two great oceans with a unique mission to carry freedom's torch throughout the world. To a tired, disillusioned world, we have always been a light of hope where they believe all things are possible.

And throughout my own life, I have seen America do the impossible. When I was a young man we survived a great worldwide depression that toppled governments throughout the world. We survived that. It made anything we've had since look like prosperity. We survived -- well, we came back from Pearl Harbor and won the greatest military victory the world has ever seen. In a single lifetime we went from the horse and buggy to landing astronauts on the Moon.

And we as a people -- and this is our heritage, all of us -- we as a people have fought harder, paid a higher price, and done more to advance the dignity and freedom of man than any other people who ever lived on this Earth.

Ours is the land of the free because it is the home of the brave. America's future will always be great because our nation will be strong. And our nation will be strong because our people will be free. And we'll be free because we're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

I was deeply honored to serve as your Governor. I have been deeply honored to serve in this office for these past 4 years. But much remains to be done. We must continue to build upon the new beginning that we started 4 years ago. I have come here today to ask for your support and for your vote.

Our best years are yet to come. And now, I'm going to say something with a certain little group in mind out there -- I think it'll drive them up the wall. I enjoy saying it. And that is, you ain't seen nothin' yet.

My special regards to Bobbi Fiedler. It's been a long time since she was organizing bus stops here in the valley. And she's doing a terrific job in the Congress. On election day, do me a favor: Send Bobbi back to Washington. And that goes for Congressmen Carlos Moorhead, Dan Lungren, Dave Dreier, and a candidate up here named, I hope, to be Congressman Dornan. And while you're at it, spread the word, also, and get out the vote for Richard Gomez and Claude Perry. And if you don't mind, try to win our California races for the Gipper.

But Abraham Lincoln said that we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we'd hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up trying to live our lives for us.

Government, so we cut personal income taxes 25 percent across the board. Now, there have been some people around in this campaign that have been suggesting that maybe we did something for some special group. Our tax cut was across the board, ``even-Steven'' for everyone, no special group.

One year ago we liberated Grenada from Communists who had taken over that country. Now, my opponent called what we did a violation of international law that erodes our moral authority to criticize the Soviets.

The President. But wait a minute. Wait a minute. I mean good, patriotic Democrats who have found, as I did, they can no longer follow the leadership of their party. These Democrats would be here because they remember when the party's leaders were men like Harry Truman, later men like Senator Scoop Jackson, John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times.

Now, last month an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. And then she returned to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there; advances in technology and communications. I have seen some evidence of the medical advances I've just mentioned in the experiments that have already been conducted. But my opponent led the fight personally against having a shuttle program at all. He called it a horrible waste.

Now, if we could bring inflation down from 12.4 percent to 4, then we can bring it down further from 4 to 0.0. And we're going to do that. If lowering your tax rates led to the best expansion in 30 years, then we can lower them again and keep this country growing right into the 21st century.

And if local governments in our country can establish, as they have, enterprise zones to create economic growth, to use tax incentives to go into distressed areas and bring business and industry in there to provide jobs for the people that are without jobs now -- well, we have such a bill at the national level to do that. And that bill has been buried for more than 2 years in a committee in the House of Representatives under the direction of Tip O'Neill.

The President. Now that's why you send back to Washington those Congress people that I mentioned, and send back the candidates that I have mentioned so that we can get that bill out of committee onto the floor and start helping people that need our help.

You know, I've always believed, and I believe more than ever, if we give American workers the tools they need -- in new industries and old -- they can outcompete, outproduce, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world, at anytime.

Now, 2 weeks ago yesterday, I didn't get to finish something in that debate that I was starting to say. And I'm going to say it here. It is to the young people of our country that I want to direct myself right now.

You know, you are what this election is all about -- you and your future. I have seen you all over this land, on campuses like this, in schools, and in rallies like this. And I want to tell you, your generation really sparkles.

Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. Now, my generation -- and then there were a few generations between mine and yours -- well, we of those several generations, we grew up in an America where we just took it for granted that you could dream and make your dreams come true, fly as high and far as your own ability and effort would take you.

And then for a brief period we went into an era when voices were telling us that we were in an era of limits, and that never again would things be as good as they were, and that everyone should lower their sights and their ambitions.

The President. Well, I want to tell you, my generation and those several others I mentioned, we have a sacred trust, and we're going to keep that trust. And it is that when the time comes to turn this nation over to you young people, we're going to turn over an America that is free in a world that is at peace.

The President. And it will be an America in which you can dream and make your dreams come true. All of us together, all of us are part of a great revolution that's only just begun. America will never give up and go back -- never.

You know, I've always believed this land of ours was placed here between the two oceans to be found by a special kind of people, from every corner of the Earth, who would come here, and come here because of that special love of freedom that they had. And our unique mission is to carry freedom's torch. To a tired, disillusioned world, we've always been a light of hope where everything is possible.

And throughout my life, I have seen America do the impossible. We survived, when I was a young man, a great worldwide Depression that toppled governments in many parts of the world, but not here. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in all the history of war. In a single lifetime -- my own -- in that lifetime we have gone from the horse and buggy to landing astronauts on the Moon.

Now, I'm deeply honored that you've allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years, but much remains to be done. We must continue to build upon the new beginning that we started 4 years ago. So, I ask you for your support and your vote. I have come here to ask for that.

But also, I want to say I'm terrified by the polls. Please don't read them anymore. Don't get complacent. Tomorrow, don't think your vote isn't needed. Go and vote and take others with you to do that. And if you're voting for me, don't send me there alone. Send these other people that I've mentioned back there with me so we can get the job done.

But there's so much to do and to plan for. These past few months have really been something. We took our campaign out to the country. We journeyed to the bright grid of the cities and the suburbs of the East, and we went to the broad avenues of the Sunbelt. We talked to farmers outside Des Moines and families in the shopping malls. On a whistlestop tour in Harry Truman's old train, I went across Ohio and saw the people of that State spill out, waving flags.

We've been to university and college campuses all across the country, yes. And we saw a dazzling new generation coming to life with an honest love for America -- had a chance to talk to them about what our country is and can be, and through them, I think we touched the future.

It's been a wonderful journey. And one thing I know, the heart of America is bigger and stronger than ever. The people are together with the ties that bind. Faith and family and loyalty to a heritage -- those are the ties that still bind.

We stand together, we Americans, and we're holding each other's hands, and we're walking into the future with pride in each other and a great faith. And I wanted to say so many times to so many of those crowds, to the people that would be just standing on the road as you drove by on your way, perhaps, to a rally or a meeting of this kind -- and they'd be holding up signs, and they'd have flags -- and I wanted many times to be able to stop and say, ``Thank you for how easy you're making it for an old campaigner.'' But, now I have stopped, so I can say it to you, the people of my beloved California.

This is the most important election in this nation in 50 years. And if we're to win it, we must win more than the Presidency. We need a Congress that will tell Tip O'Neill that his days of obstructing the progressive legislation -- [applause]. He's bottled up a great many bills that are necessary for the betterment of our country in the House of Representatives.

We need Congressman Duncan Hunter in the House to keep -- [applause]. This will make sure that our military, especially our Navy, is second to none. We need Congressman Bill Lowery. He fought hard to secure for San Diego a share of the high-tech jobs that are created in the last 4 years. And we need Congressman Ron Packard. He's a former school board member who sits on the Education and Labor Committee, and who knows education from the classroom up.

We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, was stealing our future. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened. So, we decided to rebuild and be strong again and be prepared for peace.

And now America is back, a giant on the scene, powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its growing economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace. And do you know something? You know something? That's not debatable.

But, you know, my opponent's understanding of economics is well demonstrated by his predictions. Now, just before we took office, he said of our economic program, that it is obviously, murderously inflationary. And that was just before we lowered inflation from above 12 percent down to 4.

He says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts, quote, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you just want to be one of his constituents?

The President. Yes. But this year he's outdone himself. We know, of course, that he's promised to raise your taxes. But if he's to keep all the promises that he's made in this campaign, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

But if my opponent's campaign were a television show, it would be ``Let's Make a Deal.'' You trade your prosperity for that surprise he's got hidden behind the curtain. [Laughter] And if his campaign were a Broadway show, it would be ``Promises, Promises.'' And if it were a book, a novel, you would have to read it from the back to the front to get a happy ending.

John F. Kennedy -- men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny; and they stood up for one, and they damned the other.

I hope, and I feel sure, from other rallies like this across the country, there must be many of you out there who are Democrats -- as there are all over America -- Democrats who can no longer follow the policies of the leadership of that party. And I say to all of you, you are not alone. Come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity, and we can have a bipartisan effort in the finest tradition of this country that will keep this country secure and prosperous and free.

Last month an American woman made history -- Kathryn Sullivan walked in space. And then, having done that, she returned to a shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there in space where we can't make them here on Earth. I have seen evidence of experiments already conducted that indicate that this is more than a possibility -- advances in technology and communication. But my opponent, in the United States Senate, led the fight against the entire shuttle program and called it a horrible waste.

Local governments, if they can establish enterprise zones to create economic growth -- these are zones in which you use tax incentives and go into distressed areas, whether rural or inner city, and you bring in and stimulate business and investment and get jobs to the people there who haven't had them for a long time. Well, we've done that to a certain extent at many local levels. But we have a national bill to do that, a program nationwide. And for more than 2 years, it has been buried in a committee in the House of Representatives under the direction of Tip O'Neill, and we need that out on the floor to help our people.

And in this city, where you so often see those in uniform and our military, I just have to tell you, of all the things I've been proud of in this job, nothing has made me more proud than the magnificent young men and women who are in the uniform of our military service.

My opponent has been talking about a nuclear freeze. And now and then, in a kind of an unfriendly way, some people shove signs in my face -- ``Nuclear Freeze.'' Well, when we can reduce Soviet and American weapons down to an equal and verifiable limit that there is no disadvantage to us, yes, then we'll have a nuclear freeze.

All right. You are what this election is all about -- you and your future. I've seen you all over this country, on campuses, as I said earlier, and universities and in high schools and out in rallies such as this. Your generation really sparkles. Your idealism and love of country are unsurpassed.

Now my generation -- and there are several more between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- all of us, or most of us, grew up in an America where we took it for granted that we could dream and make our dreams come true, fly as high and far as our ability and effort would take us.

Then we came to a time not too long ago when people began telling us that those days were over, that we were in an era of limits, that there was a ceiling, and we never again could have things quite as good as they had been. Well, don't you believe it.

My generation, and those other generations I mentioned, we have a sacred trust -- and we're going to fill that trust. And that is to see that when the time comes to turn the reins over to you, we're going to turn over to you a country that is free in a world that is at peace. And it will be a country in which you can dare to dream and know that you can make your dreams come true.

America will never go -- give up, will never go back -- never. We were born to be a special place between the two great oceans, with a unique mission to carry freedom's message. To a tired, disillusioned world, we have always been a light of hope where all things are possible.

We survived, when I was a young man, a Great Depression, a worldwide depression that toppled governments in many parts of the world, but not ours. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in the history of the world. And in a single lifetime, my lifetime, we have gone from the horse and buggy to landing astronauts on the Moon.

As a people, we have fought harder, paid a higher price, done more to advance the freedom and dignity of man than any other people on Earth. Ours is the land of the free because it's the home of the brave. And our future will always be great because our nation will be strong. And our nation will be strong because our people are free. And our people will be free because we're united -- one people, under God, with liberty and justice for all.

Here we're about to end the 1984 campaign. And I want to tell you, having stood here, as I said, 4 years ago, at this particular point -- same point in that campaign -- I'm deeply honored that you made the decision 4 years ago and allowed me to serve you for these past 4 years. Nancy and I will be forever grateful to all of you. But much remains to be done. We must continue to build on the new beginning that we started 4 years ago.

So, I've come here asking for your vote, asking for your support. But -- [applause]. All right. But, also, I don't want to be sent back there alone. These other people I mentioned up here, the incumbent officeholders, Members of the House, the candidates. Send them back there with us, so that as a team we can carry on.

And now, just one last request -- one last request. Don't read the polls. Don't get complacent. The last time I looked at Mount Rushmore, President Dewey's face wasn't up there. [Laughter] We need every vote, so make up your mind your vote is needed. Get out there and vote. Get your neighbors to vote. Go to the polls tomorrow.

Tonight I want to share with you my views about the issues that directly concern our future, the future of our children, and the future of this dream we call America. This election offers us the clearest choice in many years: whether we go forward together with courage, confidence, and common sense, making America strong again; or turn back to policies that weakened our economy, diminished our leadership in the world, and reversed America's long-revered tradition of progress.

Four years ago tonight I asked you to join us in a great national effort to free America from leadership that said we suffered from a malaise, that told us we must learn to live with less, and that our children could no longer dream as we once had dreamed. And, yes, that inflation, taxes, no growth at home, and the steady loss of freedom and respect for America abroad were all beyond our control.

I told you what I'd believed all my life: The greatness of America doesn't begin in Washington; it begins with each of you -- in the mighty spirit of free people under God, in the bedrock values you live by each day in your families, neighborhoods, and workplaces. Each of you is an individual worthy of respect, unique and important to the success of America. And only by trusting you, giving you opportunities to climb high and reach for the stars, can we preserve the golden dream of America as the champion of peace and freedom among the nations of the world.

The professional politicians of Washington are set in their ways. As you worked harder to keep up with inflation, they had raised your taxes. When our industries staggered, they piled on more regulations. When educational quality slumped, they piled on more bureaucratic controls. They watched crime terrorize our citizens and responded with more lenient judges, sentencing, and parole. When the Soviets invaded Afghanistan, they punished our farmers with a grain embargo and neglected to rebuild our defenses. Those who spent a career doing these things made one thing plain: They didn't care how the American people had voted. They ridiculed our new ideas.

But then we did something that shocked the old guard here in Washington -- we took our case to you, the people. And you gave us your support. You told those ``big leaguers'' how double-digit inflation, high taxes, and outrageous interest rates had made it so difficult to buy homes, raise children, live on pensions, start businesses, or even find jobs. You said that our defenses had become dangerously weak, and you felt less secure. You made democracy work by sending one message to Washington loud and clear. The message was: We want a change, and we want it now.

You got their attention. Together we took command of a rudderless ship, adrift in a sea of confusion. We reduced the growth of spending from 17 percent to 6 percent, reduced regulations and paperwork, cut your income taxes by 25 percent, and indexed the rates so government can't profit by driving you into higher tax brackets when you get a cost-of-living pay raise. We provided incentives to modernize older industries and start up new ones, reduced estate taxes for family farms and small businesses, reduced the marriage tax penalty, and increased the child-care credit, the rate of return for small savers, and incentives for IRA's and Keogh contributions. We began to rebuild your defenses, which strengthened our alliances.

We still have much to do -- to make our families more secure, to help many of you on our farms and in our inner cities, or working in older industries not yet back on their feet. There will be no final victory until we meet those challenges, until every American who wants a job can find a job, so that all of us are going forward together.

Four years ago inflation, taxes, interest rates, and crime were all going up; tonight, they're coming down. Confidence, jobs, investment, growth, and achievement in our schools were all going down; now they're going up. The United States economy was dragging the world into recession, America was falling back, the Soviets were advancing -- and all of that made peace less secure.

Duke Wayne at the suggestion that he was America's last hero. Just before he died, he said in his unforgettable way, ``Just give the American people a good cause, and there's nothing they can't lick.'' And you've proven he was right.

If anyone is looking for heroes, let them look at Main street America -- all of you who during these past 4 years proved that the big leagues aren't with the Washington establishment. The big leagues are out in the heartland with you -- small business men and women, teachers, farmers, ranchers, blue-collar workers, homemakers, and high-tech entrepreneurs. You brought America back, and you're making us great again. All we did was get government out of your way.

But our opponents have a very different vision for your future. Where we look at a problem and see opportunity, they look at opportunity and see a problem. We believe in knowing when opportunity knocks; they seem determined to knock opportunity. We work to increase your take-home pay; they're working overtime to tax it away. Despite their good intentions, I don't believe they place enough faith in people.

Rather than encourage you to dream great dreams and provide opportunities to help America grow, they keep trying to make government grow. They do everything they can to save us from prosperity. And they keep right on giving us the same medicine that made us sick in the first place. They fought the idea of giving you a tax cut. If they'd had their way, average families would be paying over $900 more in taxes today. They've tried to repeal indexing, which protects working people from higher tax brackets. Indexing doesn't help the rich; they're already in the high brackets.

Well, we stopped them, but they kept predicting disaster. They said our tax reduction would be murderously inflationary. That was just before inflation was reduced from 12.4 to around 4 percent. They said there would be no recovery -- just before recovery took off. Then they said it couldn't last -- and now we have the best economic expansion in 30 years.

Their team has a plan that will raise taxes the equivalent of more than $150 per household every single month. They have a knee-jerk addiction to tax increases. And every time their knee jerks, we get kicked.

Tomorrow we can vote to go forward with an America of momentum, or back to an America of malaise; go forward with an economy that's robust, or back to an economy that went bust; go forward with morale up, jobs up, and inflation and taxes down, or back to seeing things the other way around.

Why raise our taxes, when we can raise our sights? Why accept policies that ration our strength, when we can vote for policies that build our strength? Let's walk together on the new path of hope and opportunity and work in a new spirit of patriotism to improve our neighborhoods and communities and build a better America.

Our work is not finished. We must continue not only into the next 4 years, but into the next decade and beyond to meet our goal of sustained economic growth without inflation, a strong country prepared for peace.

We need your support for two long-overdue reforms resisted by the House leadership: a constitutional amendment to balance our budget and a line-item veto, giving a President authority to veto individual pork-barrel items within appropriations bills. Forty-three State Governors today have such authority. The President of the United States does not.

Lowering everybody's personal tax rates helped create the strongest economic expansion in 30 years. We shouldn't stop there. We can simplify our tax system, bring your tax rates down further, and keep the United States the undisputed leader for jobs, innovation, growth, and a better life for years to come.

A strong America will continue to push back frontiers of science and space, and discover wonders of the unknown, and achieve breakthroughs in medicine, technology, and communication that will enable the world to make great new leaps in human progress. We're going to maintain our leadership in space, go forward with our space shuttle program, and meet our challenge of building a permanently manned space station within a decade. We lead the world in advanced technology. We can use our knowledge and economic power to modernize our older industries. If we give our workers the tools they need, they can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world.

Going forward together also means rebuilding the most distressed areas of our country, and that begins with getting your help to force that stubborn leadership in the House of Representatives to free our enterprise zone legislation it's had bottled up in committee for 3 years now. Then they should pass our youth opportunity wage to help teenagers learn skills and start climbing the economic ladder.

We'll keep moving forward with our grassroots drive to restore in our schools needed discipline, emphasis on basics, merit pay for teachers, greater involvement by parents, and standards of excellence that again seek the best for America. Young Americans are trying harder, and test scores show they are doing better for the first time in 20 years. Their improvement should give us confidence America will become more productive and competitive in this fast-changing world.

Our crackdown on crime, thanks to energetic support from citizens groups and local law enforcement agencies, has produced the sharpest drop ever in the history of the crime index. We intend to keep cracking down until your families and friends can walk your streets again without fear. And let's make a national commitment to save our children from the drug abuse that poisons their minds and bodies.

We have always followed two tracks in our defense and national security policies. One is to reverse the decline in our military defenses and restore respect for America. The other, equally important, is to search for peace through the negotiation of real arms reductions. We're proud to say that in the past 4 years, not 1 inch of soil has been lost to Communist aggression. By rebuilding our strength and making ourselves reliable again we can keep this nation strong enough to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children and our children's children. And one day, all nations can begin to reduce nuclear weapons and ultimately banish them from the face of the Earth.

This is our plan for the future. If you believe that America has made a new beginning, that we're moving forward again but could move much faster and farther by ending the obstruction in that Congress, will you support us by sending us a Congress we can work with? -- one that believes in the same principles you do; a Congress that won't increase your taxes and spend our revenues uncontrollably.

America even greater in science, literature, and the arts, and improve the quality of life for all our people. We can keep faith with the God who has made and blessed us as no other people have ever been blessed.

In speaking tonight of America's traditional values and philosophy of government, we must remember the most distinctive mark of all in the American experience: To a tired and disillusioned world, we've always been a New World and, yes, a shining city on a hill where all things are possible.

Our alliances, the strength of our democratic system, the resolve of free people -- all are beginning to hold sway in the world. We've helped nourish an enthusiasm that grows each day, a burning spirit that will not be denied: Mankind was born to be free. The tide of the future is a freedom tide.

This, then, is our historic task -- it always has been -- to present to the world an America that is not just strong and secure, but an America that has a cause and a vision of a future where all peoples can experience the warmth and hope of individual liberty.

I'm not sure anyone really knows when this new patriotism began or how it grew so quickly. Was its seed first planted that day our POW's, who had braved a horrendous captivity in North Vietnam, came home and said, ``God bless America,'' and then actually thanked us for what we had done for them? Or maybe it was that unforgettable moment when after 444 days of captivity, our hostages came home from Iran to breathe American freedom again.

Grenada -- but also enduring grief from the loss of brave men -- on the Grenada rescue mission and on our peacekeeping mission in Beirut. Each gave his life for a noble cause. Each must be remembered and honored -- forever.

We should pray that as much as we honor those who died to make us free, we also fervently pray such sacrifice will never again be required; that there will be a day when new battlefields are never again created.

This and every election is what they sacrificed for. They gave everything to preserve and protect the vote you are free to exercise tomorrow. Regardless of how you choose, you must take the time to make that choice.

I'm profoundly thankful to all of you for giving me the privilege of serving you these last 4 years. I ask for your vote again for one purpose only -- to complete the task we began together 4 years ago.

Along with George Bush -- the strongest and finest Vice President in my memory -- I've traveled all across our country this year. We've both seen our young people -- your sons and daughters and grandchildren -- tens of thousands of them. We've met them on college and university campuses, and younger ones in schoolrooms and playgrounds.

For me, a vivid recollection of them will be from a whistlestop train tour through Ohio in that historic car that once carried Franklin Roosevelt, Harry Truman, and Dwight Eisenhower across America. America had a smile in her heart that day. At each stop and through each community, whether gathered on their sidewalks, back lawns, or the plowed fields of their farms, again and again it was the young people I remembered -- Cub Scouts in blue shirts and bright yellow kerchiefs, high school bands, college crowds, and little girls perched atop their dads' shoulders.

Yes, we are united. That is our rich heritage. There were moments in recent years when we wondered if we were still united, but not today. Crisscrossing this land these last few months, I have seen such proof of national unity I know our children will inherit an America that's united and coming together again.

America is coming together again. We're building together. But what I'm really thankful for is that all across this shining land, we're hoping together. We can say to the world and pledge to our children: America's best days lie ahead. And you ain't seen nothin' yet.

The President. We're going to carry on the program that we started 4 years ago, accompanied with economic growth without inflation, a strong defense -- every effort we can make to get arms reductions.

Yes, it's time for us to get together and talk about a great many things and try to clear the air and the suspicions between us so we can get down to the business of reducing, particularly, nuclear weapons.

The President. Well, we've been in constant touch with them, in communication, and they know that we're interested in carrying on discussions with them; and they profess to be eager to do the same thing. So, let's wait and see if they'll be more specific and definite once the campaign is over.

The President. Well, I'm sure he does. I'm quite sure that there isn't anything I could say that would make him feel any better. I hope that we can close ranks for the good of the country, and -- once the contest is over.

You know, we could spend the rest of the next 4 years thanking all of those who have made this night possible. But there are a few I'd like to mention this evening. First, Nancy and I want to express our warmth and our deep gratitude to George and Barbara Bush.

The President. And, George, if you're watching down there in Texas, thank you for campaigning so magnificently all across this country. And believe me, I'm very proud to have you as my partner for this next term. As far as I'm concerned, there has never been a finer Vice President.

And a thank you, too, to Paul Laxalt, our campaign chairman. Paul is in Washington, and I understand he's there watching in a room like this with people like yourself who are there for the same reason. And there is no better personal friend than I've ever had, and there's no better ally to have at your side when you're in a campaign.

And Paul would be the first to say how much help he had and what an outstanding job was done by Ed Rollins, our campaign director. And, Ed, please know how grateful I am for the way you put together the finest campaign organization, I think, in the history of American politics.

Back in Washington, we owe so much to the great work of the Republican National Committee and its chairman, Frank Fahrenkopf. Frank and all those dedicated people who worked with him gave -- well, they give politics a good name. We wouldn't have enjoyed this victory tonight without them.

And now, I have a special thank you for something that began here in this State almost 20 years ago. First by the dozens, and then by the hundreds, and finally by the thousands, we've seen our friends, all of you volunteers and workers who came to our side to help. From California, then across the United States, you have each given selflessly of yourselves. And I have no words to properly thank you for all that you've done.

We set out, I remember back those almost 20 years ago, and said that we could start a prairie fire here in California, one that would capture the intensity of our devotion to freedom and the strength of our commitment to American ideals.

Well, we began to carry a message to every corner of the Nation, a simple message. The message is: Here in America, the people are in charge. And that's really why we're here tonight. This electoral victory belongs to you and the principles that you cling to -- principles struck by the brilliance and bravery of patriots more than 200 years ago. They set forth the course of liberty and hope that makes our country special in the world. To the extent that what has happened today reaffirms those principles, we are part of that prairie fire that we still think defines America -- a fire of hope that will keep alive the promise of opportunity as we head into the next century.

Four years ago, when we celebrated victory in this same room, our country was faced by some deep and serious problems. But instead of complaining together, we rolled up our sleeves and began working together.

We said we would get inflation under control, and we did. We said we would get America working again, and we've created more than 6\1/2\ million new jobs. We said that we would work to restore traditional values in our society, and we have begun. And we said that we would slow down the growth of government and the rate of its spending increases, and we did. We said we'd get interest rates down, and we did. We said we would rebuild our defenses and make America prepared for peace, and we have.

Our work isn't finished; there's much more to be done. We want to make every family more secure, to help those in our inner cities, on our farms, and in some of our older industries which are not yet back on their feet. And the recovery will not be complete until it's complete for everyone.

The President. The vision we outlined in 1980, indeed the passion of the fire that we kept burning for two decades, doesn't die just because 4 years have passed. To each one of you I say: Tonight is the end of nothing; it's the beginning of everything.

What we've done only prepares us for what we're going to do. We must continue -- not only into those next 4 years but into the next decade and the next century -- to meet our goal of sustained economic growth without inflation and to keep America strong.

We've come together again. We're united again. And now, let's start building together and keep the prairie fire alive. And let's never stop shaping that society which lets each person's dreams unfold into a life of unending hope. America's best days lie ahead. And, you know, you'll forgive me, I'm going to do it just one more time: You ain't seen nothin' yet.

The President. Good morning. I don't have any opening statement, other than to say that, as you probably know already, we're going to take a couple of days now to wind down, and then we're looking forward to getting back to Washington at the beginning of the week.

The President. Well, I can't comment on any plan of what we might do. Right now, we have no -- we, ourselves, have been alerted, and we've been surveilling that ship, but we cannot definitely identify that they have MIGs on there or planes of any kind. But we're keeping a careful watch.

The President. Well, I think it would be. We have informed them that for them to bring something that is absolutely unnecessary for them -- these high performance craft, in here -- indicates that they are contemplating being a threat to their neighbors here in the Americas.

The President. I have told you, the only thing that there is yet to be revealed is when the team that has been working on a tax reform proposal presents it to us, and we make a decision one way or the other on that, that would be the only thing. But there's nothing for me to reveal now, except that my position is solid. We're not going to try to deal with the deficit problem by raising taxes.

The President. All I know is that in looking at everything, including the whole flat-tax idea and everything else, if that is done and means some changes in deductions, if we should decide that, then those would have to offset -- or be offset with regard to the rates, so that it would not result in any individual having his taxes raised by way of a tax reform.

Q. Mr. President, have you received the CIA report on the manual? When are you going to make it public? What did it say specifically? Did it recommend disciplinary action? And what are you going to do about it?

The President. I think you're going to find that -- I haven't received it yet, but I'm expecting to, probably before I get back to Washington. But I have to say from whatever advance information I have, that there was much ado about nothing; that it is not a document that is teaching someone how to assassinate. There's nothing of that kind in it. It was actually a document trying to help leaders of the contras influence and win over the people, if they came into a community down there, and how they were to persuade the people that they were on the right side.

Q. Sir, if I could follow up, please. There, I think, have been reports that the report did recommend some disciplinary action. Are you pledged to follow the recommendations of the report, whatever it is?

The President. Well, I feel that the people of this country made it very plain that they approved what we've been doing. And we're going to continue what we've been doing and, if need be, we'll take our case to the people. But we have the same number of Senators that we had in 1981 when we got this program passed. And there's a possibility -- I know that there are some seats still to be decided in the House -- but there's a possibility of as many as 17, and that's more than have happened in elections of this kind -- mid- or second-term elections -- for Presidents in the past.

The President. I'm claiming that I think the people made it very plain that they approved of what we're doing and approved of the fact that things are better and the economy is expanding. And that's what we're going to continue to do.

Soviets. What do you think the real chances are of a summit, and do you think that appointing an arms control envoy in your administration would help resolve the conflicts within the Cabinet over arms control policies?

The President. We don't have a conflict within the Cabinet. We're united on the idea of arms control, and I don't know where all this talk came from. And we're prepared to go forward with the arms control talks, and I have to believe that the Soviet Union is going to join us in trying to get together.

The President. Well, the idea of an envoy is just some of the things that we've discussed with them. It's whether they would like to establish some separate, informal channel, so that we could keep in touch and then they would be able, on both sides, to recommend whether there was something that we should get together on and negotiate. We haven't decided on that -- whether to do it or whether they would be willing to do it. But we've discussed that subject with them, and so it's under consideration.

The President. Well, as I say, we're looking at 2,478 recommendations submitted by the Grace commission. More than 2,000 of our leading citizens were together in making these recommendations. We have already implemented some 17 percent of them. And we know that we probably won't be able to do all of them, but we're studying them.

These are the things that have to do with not going along with the idea that the only way you can cut spending is to eliminate or reduce some program. What we're talking about is being able to do things government is supposed to do, but doing it more efficiently and economically. And there's evidence of that.

We've made a number of steps that have revealed that the Government is still larded with a lot of fat and still doing things in an old-fashioned way that business gave up a long time ago. So, we're going to do things of that kind.

With regard to Social Security, nothing but political demagoguery has ever been behind the bringing up of Social Security in the '82 election or in this election, because Social Security now is on a sound fiscal basis as the result of a bipartisan commission that I'd been asking for since 1981 and we finally got in 1983.

Besides, Social Security has nothing to do with the deficit. Social Security is fully funded by a payroll tax dedicated to Social Security, so it is not part of the deficit. If there was any change in the expenditures of Social Security, that would just mean the money would go back into the trust fund, or the payroll tax would be reduced accordingly.

The President. Let me just say about Medicare, we have a problem not as serious or not as imminent as the problem was with Social Security when we came here -- that it was facing immediate bankruptcy.

Medicare -- looking at the demographics and projecting ahead -- we say several years from now could find itself in a problem of outgo exceeding the trust fund and the income in that fund. So we need to look at that as to how we can set it on the same kind of basis that will ensure into the future that the people are going to get the care they need.

Q. Mr. President, do you have anything to say this morning to the people who apparently feel they didn't participate in the Reagan revolution and who didn't vote for you yesterday? -- specifically, the blacks, the poor, single mothers, those people whom studies show to be, in fact, somewhat worse off than they were?

The President. The truth is, Bill, they aren't worse off than they were. And that, again, has been some political demagoguery. We're going to make every effort to bring the truth and the facts to those people, but at the same time what we've called the safety net is still a top priority with us, and we're going to maintain that safety net.

Now, I heard as of this morning, one person on the air on one of the programs talking about the fact that there are more people living below the poverty line or at the poverty line than there were when we came here -- absolutely true. But what they didn't add is that we have cut the rate of increase in poverty to just about half what it was under the previous administration. So, we have made gains. We have not been able to reverse that trend, and we hope that we can.

But that doesn't have anything to do with our programs. That has had to do with the outside income of those people, their own earnings and income, not -- it is not the fault of any government program. If it were, we wouldn't have cut the rate of increase in poverty, as I say, almost in half, down from 9.1, I think it is, to 5 percent.

Q. Mr. President, this is your second press conference in less than a week. And before that, there was a long time. Is this an indication that in your second term you're going to hold regular press conferences, say twice a week every month? [Laughter] Or will you commit yourself to a regular press conference schedule now that you're reelected?

No. And as I say, I don't think in just counting up the number of press conferences that it's been completely fair when you look at the other opportunities, such as this, a number of other things, and the fact that -- as I was able to point out to some of you the other day -- out there by the plane, since Labor Day, during the campaign I've actually spent the equivalent time with you of at least six press conferences.

Q. Well, sir, you can't consider that press conferences by the plane, when we're shouting questions at you, when they're not seen by the American public, the actual equivalent to when you have a televised news conference, when everyone can tune in and get the give-and-take unfiltered?

Q. Mr. President, during the last year, your successful campaign, you told the audience the past 4 years not 1 inch of soil has been lost to the Communist operation. There are still 40 -- the U.S. troops in Korea, the Korea still divided into two parts. How do you help the reunification of Korea Peninsula as a friend?

The President. If I understand correctly, you're asking about how do I envision, probably, the getting together of the two Koreas. Well, we certainly have been willing to encourage that and know that steps have been undertaken, some gestures by one side, and there have been gestures by the South Koreans or movements that way. I know that they have discussed with North Korea having a single Olympic team, for example, representing all of Korea. We're hopeful that that can come about, and we have encouraged it, and we've discussed this with other countries that have an interest there -- the People's Republic of China, Japan, and others.

She had, as you know -- I know there were some rumors started as to what could be wrong -- she had a very nasty fall in the early morning, in Sacramento, in the bedroom there, and bumped her head quite severely. And it was affecting her for quite some time. But she's feeling much better -- still has a pretty tender lump there on the side of her head. But that's what it was, and it's all going away now.

The crisis between the United States and Iran that began in 1979 has eased, but has not been fully resolved. Although the international tribunal established to adjudicate claims of U.S. nationals against Iran and of Iranian nationals against the United States continues to function, full normalization of commercial and diplomatic relations between the United States and Iran will require more time. In these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to maintain in force the broad authorities that may be needed in the process of implementing the January 1981 agreements with Iran and in the eventual normalization of relations with that country.

